STATE CAPITALS: In 1955 Martin Luther King, Jr. led a boycott of this Alabama capital's segregated bus system
Montgomery
The capital of Alabama is Montgomery.
3
The state economy in the 21st century is based on management, automotive, finance, manufacturing, aerospace, mineral extraction, healthcare, education, retail, and technology.
In a 2007 poll, 92% of Alabamians reported having at least some confidence in churches in the state.
Regions Field Birmingham Sabers Birmingham Basketball Continental Basketball League Altamont School Huntsville Havoc Huntsville Ice hockey Southern Professional Hockey League Von Braun Center Mobile BayBears Mobile Baseball Southern League (AA)
TRAVEL USA: "Footsteps to Freedom" is an exhibit at this Alabama city's National Voting Rights Museum
Selma
The civil rights movement had notable events in Alabama, including the Montgomery Bus Boycott (1955–56), Freedom Rides in 1961, and 1965 Selma to Montgomery marches.
3
An 1842 article in the Jacksonville Republican proposed that it meant "Here We Rest."
In 1961, ... the Alabama legislature also intentionally diluted the effect of the black vote by instituting numbered place requirements for local elections.
One result was that Jefferson County, containing Birmingham's industrial and economic powerhouse, contributed more than one-third of all tax revenue to the state, but did not receive a proportional amount in services.
ANDORRA: lonelyplanet.com says Andorra has the finest inexpensive skiing & snowboarding in this mountain range
the Pyrenees
The oldest derivation of the word Andorra is from the Greek historian Polybius (The Histories III, 35, 1) who describes the Andosins, an Iberian Pre-Roman tribe, as historically located in the valleys of Andorra and facing the Carthaginian army in its passage through the Pyrenees during the Punic Wars.
3
From 1936 until 1940, a French military detachment was garrisoned in Andorra to secure the Principality against disruption from the Spanish Civil War and Francoist Spain.
The principal services supplied by the Corps are uniformed community policing, criminal detection, border control, and traffic policing.
There are, on average, 300 days per year of sunshine.
TOUGH BODIES OF WATER: Bristol Bay is an arm of this sea off Alaska
the Bering
To the west and south is the Pacific Ocean, with Russia (specifically, Chukotka Autonomous Okrug and Kamchatka Krai) farther west across the Bering Strait.
3
It is also larger than the combined area of the 22 smallest U.S. states.
Another European contact with Alaska occurred in 1741, when Vitus Bering led an expedition for the Russian Navy aboard the St. Peter.
The Alaska Native Language Center at the University of Alaska Fairbanks claims that at least 20 Alaskan native languages exist and there are also some languages with different dialects.
OFFICIAL STATE THINGS: It's the state animal of Maine & the state land mammal of Alaska
moose
Hunting for subsistence, primarily caribou, moose, and Dall sheep is still common in the state, particularly in remote Bush communities.
3
The Alaska Constitution was written so as to discourage dedicating state funds for a particular purpose.
Cities, towns and boroughs  thumb|180px|Anchorage, Alaska, Alaska's largest city.
Salamatof  CDP  980 67  Sand Point  City  976 68  Delta Junction  City  958 69  Chevak  City  938 King Cove  City 71  Skagway  CDP  920 72
NUMBER PLEASE: Number of representatives from Alaska in the U.S. house
one
It contains the state capital Juneau, the former capital Sitka, and Ketchikan, at one time Alaska's largest city.
3
thumb|Miners and prospectors climb the Chilkoot Trail during the 1898 Klondike Gold Rush.
Religious affiliation in Alaska (2014) Affiliation% of population Christian |-
State motto: North to the Future  Nicknames: "The Last Frontier" or "Land of the Midnight Sun" or "Seward's Icebox"  State bird: willow ptarmigan, adopted by the Territorial Legislature in 1955.
GRAB BAG: It's the first color mentioned in the song "America the Beautiful"
Amber
A Poem for July 4.Original poem (1893)  O beautiful for halcyon skies, For amber waves of grain, For purple mountain majesties Above the enameled plain! America!
3
"America the Beautiful" is an American patriotic song.
Ward had originally written the music, "Materna", for the hymn "O Mother dear, Jerusalem" in 1882, though it was not first published until 1892.
HarperResource, 2003.
"U-R" THERE: The small European part of this country lies in Thrace; the rest is in Asia
Turkey
The Romans named a province Asia (Roman province), which roughly corresponds with modern-day central-western Turkey.
3
Whether all uses and all forms of the name derive also from the Latin of the Roman Empire is much less certain.
It is bounded on the east by the Pacific Ocean, on the south by the Indian Ocean and on the north by the Arctic Ocean.
None of them are members of the UN:  Flag Arms Name Population Area(km²) Capital  20px AbkhaziaAbkhazia is a state with limited recognition.
HISTORY: In 1526 Babur, a Muslim ruler from central Asia, established the Mogul Empire in what is now this country
India
" It is bounded on the east by the Pacific Ocean, on the south by the Indian Ocean and on the north by the Arctic Ocean.
2
The first continental use of Asia is attributed to Herodotus (about 440 BC), not because he innovated it, but because his Histories are the earliest surviving prose to describe it in any detail.
Tropical rainforests stretch across much of southern Asia and coniferous and deciduous forests lie farther north.
WORLD GEOGRAPHY: Asia's 2 smallest mainland nations are Qatar at 4,473 square miles & this country west of Syria at 4,015 square miles
Lebanon
Lebanon 4,140,289 10,400 Beirut  20px Malaysia 29,179,952 329,847 Kuala Lumpur  20px Maldives 394,451 298 Malé  20px Mongolia 3,179,997 1,564,116 Ulaanbaatar  20px Myanmar 54,584,650 676,578 Naypyidaw  20px Nepal 29,890,686 147,181 Kathmandu  20px North Korea 24,589,122 120,538 Pyongyang  20px Oman 3,090,150 309,500 Muscat  20px Pakistan 190,291,129 796,095 Islamabad  20px Philippines  300,000 Manila  20px Qatar 1,951,591 11,586 Doha  20px RussiaRussia is a transcontinental country.
3
The monsoon circulation dominates across southern and eastern sections, due to the presence of the Himalayas forcing the formation of a thermal low which draws in moisture during the summer.
Abrahamic  The Abrahamic religions of Judaism, Christianity, Islam and Bahá'í Faith originated in West Asia.
Chinese Religions North Korea (1.5%–14%),CIA The World Factbook – North Korea and small communities in India and Bangladesh.
NUTRITION: Beriberi was once a major problem in Asia because this grain was polished, removing vitamin B1
Rice
Asia is the largest continent in the world by a considerable margin, and it is rich in natural resources, such as petroleum, forests, fish, water, rice, copper and silver.
3
Its etymology and language of origin are uncertain.
Many of these are geographic: Doris, Rhodea, Europa, Asia.
4,570,934 69,700 Tbilisi  20px India 1,210,193,422 3,287,263 New Delhi  20px IndonesiaIndonesia is a transcontinental country.
STATE-LY HOMES: The home where Albert Einstein spent his last 20 years is in this state
New Jersey
Einstein was affiliated with the Institute for Advanced Study in Princeton, New Jersey, until his death in 1955.
3
Einstein published more than 300 scientific papers along with over 150 non-scientific works..
Though only 17, he enrolled in the four-year mathematics and physics teaching diploma program at the Zürich Polytechnic.
Although the idea of becoming a professional himself was not on his mind at any time, among those with whom Einstein played chamber music were a few professionals, and he performed for private audiences and friends.
PETRA: (Alex presents the clue from Petra, Jordan.)  The approach to Petra is though a narrow cleft which in 312 B.C. helped it withstand a siege by the army of Antigonus of these people; he was an heir to Alexander the Great
the Macedonians
Ian Worthington, Philip II of Macedonia, Yale University Press, 2008 – Ulrich Wilcken: "When we take into account the political conditions, religion and morals of the Macedonians, our conviction is strengthened that they were a Greek race and akin to the Dorians.
3
Therefore, I urge you to prepare, and if (as may be) Mardonius should delay and not attack, wait patiently where you are; for he has but a few days' provisions left.
This led Hegesias of Magnesia to say that it had burnt down because Artemis was away, attending the birth of Alexander.
A 1998 article in the New England Journal of Medicine attributed his death to typhoid fever complicated by bowel perforation and ascending paralysis.
NAMESAKES: This measure of sound intensity is named for Alexander Graham Bell
Decibel
The bel (B) and the smaller decibel (dB) are units of measurement of sound intensity invented by Bell Labs and named after him."Decibel." sfu.ca.
3
With aspirations to obtain a degree at University College London, Bell considered his next years as preparation for the degree examinations, devoting his spare time at his family's residence to studying.
Bell's patent covered "the method of, and apparatus for, transmitting vocal or other sounds telegraphically ... by causing electrical undulations, similar in form to the vibrations of the air accompanying the said vocal or other sound"  Bell returned to Boston the same day and the next day resumed work, drawing in his notebook a diagram similar to that in Gray's patent caveat.
Until the end of his life, Bell and his family would alternate between the two homes, but Beinn Bhreagh would, over the next 30 years, become more than a summer home as Bell became so absorbed in his experiments that his annual stays lengthened.
'70s ALBUM COVERS: Andy Warhol suggested putting the zipper on this Rolling Stones album
Sticky Fingers
He designed the cover art for The Rolling Stones' albums Sticky Fingers (1971) and Love You Live (1977), and the John Cale albums The Academy in Peril (1972) and Honi Soit in 1981.
3
Warhol's 1965 film Vinyl is an adaptation of Anthony Burgess' popular dystopian novel A Clockwork Orange.
What seduced me was the Andy Warhol who I saw alone.
Actor Mark Bringleson makes a brief cameo as Warhol in Austin Powers: International Man of Mystery (1997).
POISONING: Sentenced to death by poison for corrupting the youth of Athens, he took the fatal swig in 399 B.C.
Socrates
The playwrights Aeschylus, Sophocles and Euripides flourished in Athens during this time, as did the historians Herodotus and Thucydides, the physician Hippocrates, and the philosopher Socrates.
3
Thus, the Hellenic Parliament was the first important public building to be built, between 1836 and 1843.
The ancient site of Athens is centred on the rocky hill of the acropolis.
The table below shows the historical population of Athens in recent times.
LAKES & RIVERS: This lake in the Andes is divided into 2 bodies of water connected by the Tiquina Strait
Lake Titicaca
Lake Titicaca hosts several endemics, among them the highly endangered Titicaca flightless grebe and Titicaca water frog.
3
Along their length, the Andes are split into several ranges, which are separated by intermediate depressions.
Other metals including iron, gold and tin in addition to non-metallic resources are important.
3rd.
FEMALE FIRSTS: Anna May Hayes & Elizabeth Hoisington were the first two women to achieve this Army rank
general
In the twentieth c., Mao Zedong (People's Republic of China), General Vo Nguyen Giap (Viet Nam), General Douglas MacArthur (United States),  and in medieval Japan, Takeda Shingen (1521–1573) have drawn inspiration from the work
3
This allowed the Spartans to field a full-time army with a campaign season that lasted all year.
Early modern thumb|Swiss mercenaries and German Landsknechts fighting for glory, fame and money at the Battle of Marignan (1515).
Conscription of peasants and townspeople was based on quota system, per settlement.
BIBLICAL MULTIPLE CHOICE: Of Amos, Andy, Lum or Abner, the cousin of King Saul
Abner
thumb|Illustration from the Morgan Bible of Abner (in green) taking Michal away from Paltiel.
2
For some time afterward the war was carried on, the advantage being invariably on the side of David.
It was closed to the public in 1994.
"DI" HARD: This queen of Carthage welcomes Aeneas hospitably, but then commits suicide when he has to leave
Dido
thumb|right|Aeneas tells Dido about the fall of Troy, by Pierre-Narcisse Guérin.
2
After they make love, Aphrodite reveals her true identity to him and Anchises fears what might happen to him as a result of their liaison.
The Aeneads included Aeneas's trumpeter Misenus, his father Anchises, his friends Achates, Sergestus, and Acmon, the healer Iapyx, the helmsman Palinurus, and his son Ascanius (also known as Iulus, Julus, or Ascanius Julius).
AMERICAN HOLIDAYS: This memorialized president's birthday, April 13, was a legal holiday in Virginia from 1943 to 1967
Thomas Jefferson
The Jefferson Memorial is dedicated in Washington, D.C., on the 200th anniversary of President Thomas Jefferson's birth.
3
– Thomas Lawrence, English painter and educator (d. 1830) 1771 –
1931   – Dan Gurney, American race car driver and engineer   1931   – Jon Stone, American composer, producer, and screenwriter (d. 1997) 1932 – Orlando Letelier, Chilean-American economist and politician, Chilean Minister of National Defense (d. 1976) 1933 –
Wallace Stegner, American historian and author (b. 1909) 1996 – James Burke, American gangster (b. 1931)   1996   –
1791: Born in Cove Gap, Penn. on April 23, he later became the 15th U.S. president
James Buchanan
– James Buchanan, American soldier, lawyer, and politician, 15th President of the United States (d. 1868) 1792 – Thomas Romney Robinson, Irish astronomer and physicist (d. 1882) 1794 – Wei Yuan, Chinese scholar and author (d. 1856) 1805 –
3
1935 – The Polish Constitution of 1935 is adopted.
Andruw Jones, Curaçaoan baseball player   1977   – Willie Mitchell, Canadian ice hockey player   1977   –
Brian Boru, Irish king (b. 941) 1016
VALUABLE PLACES: You can keep the valuable rocks you find in the state park near Murfreesboro, Arkansas: Crater of these
Diamonds
Crater of Diamonds State Park near Murfreesboro is the world's only diamond-bearing site accessible to the public for digging.
3
No mechanized vehicles nor developed campgrounds are allowed in these areas.
2002, p. 106.
Several main corridors pass through Little Rock, including Interstate 30 (I-30) and I-40 (the nation's 3rd-busiest trucking corridor).
THEIR NATIVE SOIL: Andrew Carnegie
Scotland
Carnegie was born in Dunfermline, Scotland, and immigrated to the United States with his very poor parents in 1848.
3
He also gave stock to Scott and Thomson in his businesses, and the Pennsylvania was his best customer.
Pratt in turn had been inspired and helped by his friend and fellow Bay Stater, George Peabody, (1795–1869) who also had made his fortune in the "Monumental City" of Baltimore before moving to New York and London to expand his empire as the richest man in America before the Civil War.
Carnegie was so proud of "Dippi" that he had casts made of the bones and plaster replicas of the whole skeleton donated to several museums in Europe and South America.
AMERICAN REVOLUTION: The battle that was fought the farthest north was the one at this Canadian city, December 31, 1775
Quebec
The British Province of Quebec, the thirteen colonies on the Atlantic coast and the Indian reserve as defined by the Royal Proclamation of 1763.
3
They consisted of four laws enacted by the British parliament.
He argued that, as all humans were created equally free, governments needed the "consent of the governed."Waldron (2002), p. 136
Andrew Jackson O'Shaughnessy, "'If Others Will Not Be Active, I must Drive': George III and the American Revolution.
HISTORY: In ancient Greece, Athens had its Delian League of city-states while Sparta had this league
the Peloponnesian League
The loose alliance of city states which had fought against Xerxes's invasion had been dominated by Sparta and the Peloponnesian league.
3
In 458 BC, the Athenians blockaded the island of Aegina, and simultaneously defended Megara from the Corinthians by sending out an army composed of those too young or old for regular military service.
Reverses followed peace with Persia in 449 BC.
Ancient Lessons for Global Politics.
ANCIENT COUNTRIES: The capital of Assyria; Ashurbanipal founded a library there
Nineveh
The cities of Assur (also spelled Ashur or Aššur) and Nineveh, together with a number of other towns and cities, existed since at least before the middle of the 3rd millennium BC (c. 2600 BC), although they appear to have been Sumerian-ruled administrative centres at this time, rather than independent states.
3
To the west, the kings of Judah, Edom, Moab, Israel, Sidon, Ekron, Byblos, Arvad, Samarra, Ammon, Amalek, and the ten Greek kings of Cyprus, are listed as Assyrian subjects.
It became a major agricultural and administrative centre of the Achaemenid Empire, and its soldiers were a mainstay of the Persian Army.
H. Patrick Glenn, Legal Traditions of the World.
ANIMAL NAMES: You'll get 3 As for effort for knowing the name of this mammal comes from Afrikaans for "earth pig"
aardvark
A few words in standard English are derived from Afrikaans, such as aardvark (lit. "earth pig"), trek ("pioneering journey", in Afrikaans lit. "pull" but used also for "migrate"), spoor ("animal track"), veld ("Southern African grassland" in Afrikaans, lit. "field"), commando from Afrikaans kommando meaning small fighting unit, boomslang ("tree snake") and apartheid ("segregation"; more accurately "apartness" or "the state or condition of being apart").
3
There is a large degree of mutual intelligibility between the two languages—especially in written form.
Ek het nie geweet dat hy nie sou kom nie.
Used for  when it is not an allophone of ; found only in borrowed words h    hael ('hail'), hond ('dog') i  ,   kind ('child'; ), ink ('ink'; ), krisis ('crisis';  for first 'i' and  for second 'i'), elektrisiteit ('electricity';  for first and second 'i'; third 'i' is part of diphthong 'ei')
DRAMA: In this Arthur Miller play, Abigail claims that she danced for the devil
The Crucible
Among his most popular plays are All My Sons (1947), Death of a Salesman (1949), The Crucible (1953) and A View from the Bridge (1955, revised 1956).
3
The play was commercially successful and critically acclaimed, winning a Tony Award for Best Author, the New York Drama Circle Critics' Award, and the Pulitzer Prize for Drama.
In 1999, Miller was awarded The Dorothy and Lillian Gish Prize, one of the richest prizes in the arts, given annually to "a man or woman who has made an outstanding contribution to the beauty of the world and to mankind’s enjoyment and understanding of life."The Dorothy and Lillian Gish Prize, official website.
The book was published in November 2008, and is reported to reveal unpublished works in which Miller "bitterly attack[ed] the injustices of American racism long before it was taken up by the civil rights movement".
ARCHAEOLOGY: In 1996 Franck Goddio found the ruins of this queen's palace in the port of Alexandria
Cleopatra
This was used by Julius Caesar as a fortress, where he withstood a siege from the city mob after he took Egypt after the battle of Pharsalus The Poseidon, or Temple of the Sea God, close to the theater The Timonium built by Marc Antony The Emporium (Exchange) The Apostases (Magazines) The Navalia (Docks), lying west of the Timonium, along the seafront as far as the mole Behind the Emporium rose the Great Caesareum, by which stood the two great obelisks, which become known as “Cleopatra's Needles,” and were transported to New York City and London.
3
This temple became, in time, the Patriarchal Church, though some ancient remains of the temple have been discovered.
Excavations were performed in the city by Greeks seeking the tomb of Alexander the Great without success.
Transport thumb|Borg El Arab International Airport|300px thumb|Alexandria tram thumb|220px|Alexandria double-deck tram thumb|Misr Station thumb|right|Double decker bus thumb|Alexandria harbor  Airports Alexandria is served by Alexandria International Airport and Borg al Arab Airport which is located about  away from city center.
LIBRARIES: Most of the books in the ancient library at Alexandria in Egypt were in this language
Greek
thumb|Residential neighborhood in Alexandria thumb|Fishing in Alexandria thumb|right|Skyline from Montaza thumb|right|Yachting club in Montaza Alexandria ( or ; Arabic:  ;  ; Ancient Greek: , )[see other names] is the second largest city and a major economic centre in Egypt, extending about  along the coast of the Mediterranean Sea in the north central part of the country.
3
Traces of its pavement and canal have been found near the Rosetta Gate, but remnants of streets and canals were exposed in 1899 by German excavators outside the east fortifications, which lie well within the area of the ancient city.
All that now lies between that point and the modern "Ras al-Tin" quarter is built on the silt which gradually widened and obliterated this mole.
Modern air conditioned red double-decker buses run the length of the Courniche.
YEARS: Atlanta hosts the Olympics
1996
Revitalization of Atlanta's neighborhoods, initially spurred by the 1996 Olympics, has intensified in the 21st century, altering the city's demographics, politics, and culture.
3
Midtown is also known for its art institutions, cultural attractions, institutions of higher education, and dense form.
Although municipal elections are officially nonpartisan, nearly all of the city's elected officials are registered Democrats.
External links   Official website  Atlanta Department of Watershed Management  Atlanta Police Department  Atlanta Convention and Visitors Bureau  Entry in the New Georgia Encyclopedia  Atlanta Historic Newspapers Archive Digital Library of Georgia  Atlanta Time Machine  Atlanta, Georgia, a National Park Service Discover Our Shared Heritage Travel Itinerary  Atlanta City Online Travel Guide    Category:1847 establishments in Georgia (U.S. state) Category:Atlanta metropolitan area cities Category:Cities in DeKalb County, Georgia Category:Cities in Fulton County, Georgia Category:Cities in Georgia (U.S. state) Category:County seats in Georgia (U.S. state) Category:Populated places established in 1837 Category:Populated places on the Chattahoochee River Category:Urban forests in the United States Category:Burial sites of the Martin Luther King family
STOP!: In the early 1790s Haydn stopped in Bonn, Germany & met this young musical genius who would become Haydn's pupil
Beethoven
Bonn is the birthplace of Ludwig van Beethoven (born 1770).
3
The Eburoni were members of a large tribal coalition effectively wiped out during the final phase of Caesar's War in Gaul.
Once past the South Gate, the Cologne–Mainz road continued along what are now streets named Belderberg, Adenauerallee et al.
In 1794, the city was seized by French troops, becoming a part of the First French Empire.
HELLO MOTHER: In the Bible, this unfortunate man remarks, "Naked came I out of my mother's womb"
Job
University Press of America, 2005  The poetic books In Masoretic manuscripts (and some printed editions), Psalms, Proverbs and Job are presented in a special two-column form emphasizing the parallel stichs in the verses, which are a function of their poetry.
3
Timothy H. Lim, a professor of Hebrew Bible and Second Temple Judaism at the University of Edinburgh, says that the Old Testament is "a collection of authoritative texts of apparently divine origin that went through a human process of writing and editing."
It dates from the 2nd century BCE. In Eastern Christianity, translations based on the Septuagint still prevail.
Moody Bible Press, 1986.
YOU GET MY "VOLT": Until 1984, the African county of Burkina Faso was known by this 2-word name
Upper Volta
Formerly called the Republic of Upper Volta, the country was renamed "Burkina Faso" on 4 August 1984 by then-President Thomas Sankara.
3
Ethnologue: Languages of the World, Sixteenth edition.
The theatre of Burkina Faso combines traditional Burkinabè performance with the colonial influences and post-colonial efforts to educate rural people to produce a distinctive national theatre.
Its goal is to reinforce the capacities of service providers and institutions who are specifically involved in project implementation.
FURNITURE: Louis XIV's style is Baroque; Louis XV's style, seen here, is this style that followed Baroque
Rococo
Though Baroque was superseded in many centers by the Rococo style, beginning in France in the late 1720s, especially for interiors, paintings and the decorative arts, the Baroque style continued to be used in architecture until the advent of Neoclassicism in the later 18th century.
3
Baroque style featured "exaggerated lighting, intense emotions, release from restraint, and even a kind of artistic sensationalism".
Lope de Vega, 2010, Comedias: El Remedio en la Desdicha.
Calderón y el barroco: exaltación y engaño de los sentidos.
LANGUAGES: In this language heard in & around Barcelona, the Spanish "bueno" becomes simply "bo"
Catalan
| blank_name_sec2         =  | blank_info_sec2         = Catalan and Spanish  | blank1_name_sec2        = Main festitivity | blank1_info_sec2        = La Mercè | blank2_name_sec2        = Patron saint | blank2_info_sec2        = Eulalia of Barcelona  | website                 =  | footnotes               = }}  Barcelona (, , ) is the capital city of the autonomous community of Catalonia in Spain and Spain's second most populated city, with a population of 1.6 million within its administrative limits.
3
The escarpment of Montjuïc (173 m), situated to the southeast, overlooks the harbour and is topped by Montjuïc castle, a fortress built in the 17–18th centuries to control the city as a replacement for the Ciutadella.
They range from vest-pocket parks to large recreation areas.
Barcelona was recognised as the Southern European City of the Future for 2014/15, based on its economic potential, by FDi Magazine in their bi-annual rankings.
POTTER ROAST: Beatrix Potter, you were engaged to Norman Warne, this professional; way to get out of doing revisions
her editor
Working with Norman Warne as her editor, Potter published two or three little books each year: 23 books in all.
2
It was drawn in black and white with a coloured frontispiece.
The Tale of Mrs William Heelis – Beatrix Potter; Lear, Ch.
THE PLACE TO "B": This city's ruins lie on the Euphrates River about 50 miles south of Baghdad
Babylon
The name Bagdadu which may also be read Hudadu, appears on Babylonian cuneiform going back to the time of Nebuchadnezzar II, describing how he rebuilt a town of this name.
3
List of largest cities throughout history#cite note-27  The city was largely destroyed at the hands of the Mongol Empire in 1258, resulting in a decline that would linger through many centuries due to frequent plagues and multiple successive empires.
[...] The Persian hamlet of Baghdad, on the Western bank of the Tigris, and just above where Sarat canal flowed in, was ultimately fixed upon [...].
There are reports of pressures by the Islamists to stop this tradition due to the associated gambling.
COUNTRIES OF THE WORLD: This country's territory on Borneo is over 50% larger than its territory on the Asian mainland
Malaysia
The island is divided among three countries: Malaysia and Brunei in the north, and Indonesia to the south.
3
Half of the annual global tropical timber acquisition comes from Borneo.
Eric Hansen.
Karim, C., A.A. Tuen and M.T. Abdullah. "Mammals."
SHE WAS IN THAT?: Joan Rivers took the plunge into dramatic acting in this 1968 Burt Lancaster film seen here
The Swimmer
He also played a U.S. Air Force general attempting a coup against the government in the political thriller Seven Days in May.  In 1966, at the age of 52, Lancaster appeared nude in director Frank Perry's film, The Swimmer in what the critic Roger Ebert called, "his finest performance."
3
His acting career ended after he suffered a stroke on November 30, 1990, which left him partly paralyzed and largely unable to speak.
The Professor David di Donatello for Best ActorFotogramas de Plata Award for Best Foreign Movie Performer 1976 Buffalo Bill and the Indians, or Sitting Bull's History Lesson Ned Buntline
Jefferson, North Carolina:
20th CENTURY QUOTATIONS: "So little done -- so much to do" were the 1902 last words of this British Empire bulider in Africa
Cecil Rhodes
Cape to Cairo  thumb|The Rhodes Colossus—Cecil Rhodes spanning "Cape to Cairo".
3
No further attempts to establish English colonies in the Americas were made until well into the reign of Queen Elizabeth I, during the last decades of the 16th century.
In 1583 he embarked on a second attempt, on this occasion to the island of Newfoundland whose harbour he formally claimed for England, although no settlers were left behind.
In 1655, England annexed the island of Jamaica from the Spanish, and in 1666 succeeded in colonising the Bahamas.
TONY WINNERS OF THE '50s: Bloody Mary was the girl the Tonys loved in 1950, when Juanita Hall won for playing her in this musical
South Pacific
Film   Agent 077: Mission Bloody Mary, a 1965 adventure film  Bloody Mary (1996 film), a 1996 comedy film  Bloody Mary (film), a 2006 horror film  Dead Mary, a 2007 horror film, called Bloody Mary in Japan  The Legend of Bloody Mary, a 2008 horror film  Urban Legends: Bloody Mary, a 2005 horror film   Literature   Bloody Mary (DC Comics), a fictional extraterrestrial vampire  Bloody Mary (Helix), a comic book  Bloody Mary (Marvel Comics), a fictional telekinetic supervillain  Bloody Mary (South Pacific), a character in a book   Music   "Bloody Mary" (The Alice Rose song)  "Bloody Mary (Nerve Endings)", a song by Silversun Pickups  Un Blodymary, an album by Las Ketchup  "Un Blodymary" (song), title track of the album   Television   "Bloody Mary" (South Park), an episode of the television series South Park  "Bloody Mary" (Supernatural), an episode of the television series Supernatural  The Bloody Mary Show, a British comedy horror web series  "Scary Mary", a 2011  two part episode of R.L. Stine's The Haunting Hour   Food and drink   Bloody Mary, a cocktail made with tomato juice, vodka, and typically spices
1
Bloody Mary may refer to:   People   Mary I of England (1516–1558), Queen of England and Ireland, so called because of her execution of numerous Protestants   Animals   "Bloody Mary", the nickname given to a skeleton of Nanotyrannus  found buried alongside a Triceratops  Mary (elephant), or Bloody Mary or Murderous Mary, an elephant that was infamously publicly hanged   Arts and popular culture   Bloody Mary (folklore), a ghost said to appear in  mirrors when a person repeats her name in front of the mirror and turn three times.
THE BLUE ANGELS: (Sarah of the Clue Crew on the tarmac)  Bearing the name of a Greek letter, this classic Blue Angels formation uses all 6 jets
Delta
thumb|left|The Blue Angels flying in a Delta Formation at Miramar, San Diego in 2011  During their aerobatic demonstration, the Blues fly six F/A-18 Hornet aircraft, split into the Diamond Formation (Blue Angels 1 through 4) and the Lead and Opposing Solos (Blue Angels 5 and 6).
3
Cdr.
Opposing Knife-Edge Pass  Diamond Roll: The whole diamond formation rolls as a single entity.
First Blue Angel leader  Admiral Patrick M. Walsh – Left Wingman and Slot Pilot, 1985–1987; Commander of the U.S. Pacific Fleet, Former Vice Chief of Naval Operations and White House Fellow  Budget In November 2011, the Blue Angels received $37 million annually, out of the annual DoD budget.
MOVIE TRIVIA: Bela Lugosi was reportedly buried in the cape he wore for this role
Dracula
Béla Ferenc Dezső Blaskó (20 October 1882 – 16 August 1956), better known as Bela Lugosi, was a Hungarian-American actor, famous for portraying Count Dracula in the original 1931 film and for his roles in various other horror films.
3
The first was Universal's Son of Frankenstein (1939), when he played the character role of Ygor, who uses the Monster for his own revenge, in heavy makeup and beard.
They had a child, Bela G. Lugosi, in 1938.
Lillian and Béla divorced in 1953, at least partially because of Béla's jealousy over Lillian taking a full-time job as an assistant to Brian Donlevy on the sets and studios for Donlevy's radio and television series Dangerous AssignmentArthur Lennig, The Immortal Count, University Press of Kentucky, 2003, p. 393; ISBN 978-0-8131-2273-1.
MY CHARLEMAGNE MAN: In 778, hoping to take advantage of civil war among its Muslim rulers, Charlemagne invaded this neighbor
Spain
Charlemagne continued his father's policy towards the papacy and became its protector, removing the Lombards from power in northern Italy, and leading an incursion into Muslim Spain.
3
The young prince was chased to the Adriatic littoral, and he fled to Constantinople to plead for assistance from Constantine V, who was waging war with Bulgaria.
thumb|Portion of the 814 death shroud of Charlemagne.
Comprises the Annales regni Francorum and The History of the Sons of Louis the Pious''        External links
PUT OUT THE CHINA: With 900 million speakers, this dialect of Chinese is the world's most widely used
Mandarin
Chinese language, a language or family of languages spoken by the Han Chinese in China  Standard Chinese, the standard form of the Chinese (Mandarin) language in mainland China, Taiwan and Singapore, and the variety most commonly taught as a foreign language  other varieties of Chinese  Written Chinese, the writing system of China  Chinese cuisine, styles of cooking originating from China  American Chinese cuisine  Chinese Peak (California), a mountain  Chinese Peak (Idaho), a mountain  "Chinese Gordon", a nickname of Charles George Gordon (1833–1885), British military commander and administrator  See also  List of all pages beginning with "Chinese"  Category:Demonyms
3
Chinese can refer to:  Something of, from, or related to China    People possessing Chinese citizenship.
Chinese people, people of Chinese nationality, or one of several Chinese ethnicities  Zhonghua minzu (中華民族), the supra-ethnic Chinese nationality   Han Chinese, the dominant ethnic group in mainland China, Taiwan, Hong Kong, and Malaysia  List of ethnic groups in China  Ethnic minorities in China, the non-Han Chinese population in China  Overseas Chinese, people of Chinese ancestry who live outside mainland China,Hong Kong and Taiwan.
It could also mean Chinese citizens who migrated to other countries.
MOUNTAINS: At 14,433 feet, Colorado's Mount Elbert is the highest peak in this mountain chain
the Rockies
Persons reporting German ancestry are especially numerous in the Front Range, the Rockies (west-central counties) and Eastern parts/High Plains.
3
In summer, this area can have many days above 95 °F (35 °C) and often 100 °F (38 °C).DRI.edu Western Regional Climate Center.
Major religious affiliations of the people of Colorado are 64% Christian, of whom there are 44% Protestants, 19% Roman Catholics, 3% Latter Day Saint/Mormon,http://www.gallup.com/poll/167120/mississippi-alabama-protestant-states.aspx 2% Jews, 1% Muslim, 1% Buddhist and 0.5% Hindu.
Doug Lamborn (Republican)
U.S. GEOGRAPHY: On Aug. 12, 1901 the first auto reached the summit of this "peak" near Colorado Springs, Colorado
Pikes Peak
Notable peaks of the Rocky Mountains include Longs Peak, Mount Evans, Pikes Peak, and the Spanish Peaks near Walsenburg, in southern Colorado.
3
On August 22, 2011, a 5.3 magnitude earthquake occurred nine miles west-southwest of the city of Trinidad.
Per capita personal income in 2010 was $51 940, ranking Colorado 11th in the nation.
Colorado has a flat 4.63% income tax, regardless of income level.
RIVER CITIES: This international river flows past Alamosa, Colorado & Brownsville, Texas on its way to the Gulf of Mexico
Rio Grande
Southern region thumb|left|The tallest dunes in North America at Great Sand Dunes National Park in southern Colorado In southmost Colorado is the large San Luis Valley, where the headwaters of the Rio Grande are located.
3
At this intersection, it is possible to stand in four states at once.
According to the Colorado statute, the SCFD distributes the money to local organizations on an annual basis.
An 11-member board of directors oversees the distributions in accordance with the Colorado Revised Statutes.
NATIONAL GEOGRAPHIC "B": The northern terminus of China's Grand Canal is located in this major city
Beijing
The PRC is a one-party state governed by the Communist Party, with its seat of government in the capital city of Beijing.
3
Early dynastic rule  thumb|Yinxu, ruins of an ancient palace dating from the Shang Dynasty (14th century BCE) According to Chinese tradition, the first dynasty was the Xia, which emerged around 2100 BCE.
26 July 2008.
However, there remains an inequality in education spending.
19th CENTURY AMERICA: On February 28, the first of the Forty-Niners to arrive by ship docked at this California port city
San Francisco
It contains the nation's second most populous census statistical area (Greater Los Angeles Area) and the fifth most populous (San Francisco Bay Area), and eight of the nation's 50 most populated cities (Los Angeles, San Diego, San Jose, San Francisco, Fresno, Sacramento, Long Beach, and Oakland).
3
16th and 17th centuries thumb|Mission San Diego de Alcalá drawn as it was in 1848.
Spanish traders made unintended visits with the Manila Galleons on their return trips from the Philippines beginning in 1565.
New York: Cambridge University Press, 2012.
POTPOURRI: The "Pig Bowl" is a California charity football game between people of this occupation
law enforcement
The county government provides countywide services such as law enforcement, jails, elections and voter registration, vital records, property assessment and records, tax collection, public health, health care, social services, libraries, flood control, fire protection, animal control, agricultural regulations, building inspections, ambulance services, and education departments in charge of maintaining statewide standards.
3
Principal mammals found in this region include the Sierra coney, white-tailed jackrabbit, and the bighorn sheep.
Eleven butterflies are also endangered and two that are threatened are on the federal list.
The California Water Wars, a conflict between Los Angeles and the Owens Valley over water rights, is one of the most well-known examples of the struggle to secure adequate water supplies.
HOLIDAY HISTORY: Appropriately, this 1846 California "Revolt" began on Flag Day, June 14
the Bear Flag Revolt
In 1846 settlers rebelled against Mexican rule during the Bear Flag Revolt.
3
California's mountains produce rain shadows on the eastern side, creating extensive deserts.
Illegal immigration
Only Arizona and Utah were lower.
HOT ENOUGH FOR YOU?: In 1960 it got up to 129 at curiously named Greenland Ranch in this grim California valley
Death Valley
California contains both the highest point (Mount Whitney) and the lowest point (Death Valley), in the contiguous United States and it has the 3rd longest coastline of all states (after Alaska and Florida).
3
Factors contributing to the growth in sales-per-acre include more intensive use of active farmlands and technological improvements in crop production.
California, with 12% of the U.S. population, has one-third of the nation's welfare recipients.
California's prison population grew from 25,000 in 1980 to over 170,000 in 2007.
IT'S A BIT CHILE TODAY: Chile shares its longest land border with this country
Argentina
It borders Peru to the north, Bolivia to the northeast, Argentina to the east, and the Drake Passage in the far south.
3
To the south, the Cordillera de la Costa reappears in the range of Nahuelbuta while glacial sediments originate a series of lakes in the area of La Frontera.
The current lower house-the Chamber of Deputies-contains 67 members of the governing center-left coalition, 48 from the center-right opposition and 5 from small parties or independents.
Chileans voted in the first round of presidential elections on 17 November 2013.
HISTORY: This island famous for its stone statues was annexed by Chile in 1888
Easter Island
Chilean territory includes the Pacific islands of Juan Fernández, Salas y Gómez, Desventuradas, and Easter Island in Oceania.
3
Spanish colonization
More Pinochet Victims.
Most of these visitors come from other countries in the American continent, mainly Argentina; followed by a growing number from the United States, Europe, and Brazil with a growing number of Asians from South Korea and PR China.
"B": Oh, you can call it Istanbul, or you can call it Constantinople, or you can call it this
Byzantium
It was reinaugurated in 324 AD"Constantinople" in The Oxford Dictionary of Byzantium, Oxford University Press, Oxford, 1991, p. 508.
3
164 (Stuttgart 2005), column 442, there is no evidence for the tradition that Constantine officially dubbed the city "New Rome"
In January 1204, the protovestiarius Alexius Murzuphlus provoked a riot, it is presumed, to intimidate Alexius IV, but whose only result was the destruction of the great statue of Athena, the work of Phidias, which stood in the principal forum facing west.
Many scholars argue that these sophisticated fortifications allowed the east to develop relatively unmolested while Ancient Rome and the west collapsed.
BRAINBUSTERS: After Paris, this capital city of the Congo has the most French speakers of any city in the world
Kinshasa
The term Congo may refer to two countries that border the Congo river:   the larger Democratic Republic of the Congo to the southeast (capital: Kinshasa), formerly known as Zaire  the smaller Republic of the Congo to the northwest (capital: Brazzaville)  The name may also refer to:   Entertainment    Acting   Kongō, one of the five schools of Noh acting   Film   Kongo (1932 film), a film starring Walter Huston, Lupe Velez, and Conrad Nagel  Congo (film), a 1995 film based on Michael Crichton's novel   Music   "Congo" (song), a 1997 song by Genesis from Calling All Stations  Kongos (band), a South African rock band  The Congos, a reggae vocal group from Jamaica   Print   Congo (novel), a 1980 novel by Michael Crichton   Television   Congo (BBC TV series), a 2001 BBC documentary series   Languages and ethnic groups   Kongo people or Congolese, an ethnic group in the two Congo states and Angola  Kongo language   People   Kongō Masahiro (born 1948), former Japanese sumo wrestler  John Kongos (born 1945), South African musician, leader of the band Johnny Kongos and the G-Men  Kid Congo Powers (born 1960), American rock guitarist and singer  Louis Congo (fl. 1725), emancipated slave appointed public executioner of the French colony Louisiana  Cheick Kongo (born 1975), a.k.a.
2
right|frame| The Congo River forms most of the border between these two countries.
Cheick Guillaume Ouedraogo, French mixed martial arts fighter and kickboxer   Places   Africa     Basins   Congo Basin   Historical states   Kingdom of Kongo (1400–1914), covering parts of present-day Angola and the two Congo states  Kongo dia Nlaza (until late in the 16th century), a former kingdom absorbed by the Kingdom of Kongo  on the territory of the current Democratic Republic of the Congo  Republic of the Congo (Léopoldville) or Congo-Léopoldville (1960–1971)  Belgian Congo (1908–1960)  Congo Free State (1885–1908)  on the territory of the current Republic of the Congo  People's Republic of the Congo (1970–1991)  French Congo (1880–1960)  Portuguese Congo, now the Angolan exclave of Cabinda Province   Administrative regions   Kongo Central, former Bas-Congo province, in the Democratic Republic of the Congo   Other places    Cities and towns   Congo, Alabama, United States  Congo, New South Wales, Australia  Congo, Paraíba, Brazil  Congo, West Virginia, United States   Rivers   Congo River (Ecuador)  Congo River (Panama)   Warships   , a steamship for the Royal Navy, United Kingdom  , launched 1877  , launched 1912 as a battlecruiser    , a Japanese destroyer launched in 1991     Other uses   Congo (loa), a spirit in Haitian voodoo mythology  Congo (chimpanzee)  The Conference of NGOs or CONGO, a worldwide group of charity and aid organizations  Vajra or Kongō, a Buddhist concept  Congo (chess variant), a chess variant invented by Demian Freeling   See also   Conga (disambiguation)  Kongō (disambiguation)  King Kong (disambiguation)  Congo craton, one of the cratons making the African continental crust  Congo River (disambiguation)  Kakongo, former kingdom
WHEN YOU WERE YOUNG: Chechnya, a breakaway republic, was overrun by the army of this country in 1994
Russia
The Chechen Republic (; ; , Noxçiyn Respublika), commonly referred to as Chechnya (; ; , Noxçiyçö), also spelled Chechnia or Chechenia, sometimes referred to as Ichkeria (lit land of minerals), is a federal subject (a republic) of Russia.
2
Context of 'September 13, 1999:
Sokolov-Mitrich, Dmitryi. "Забытый геноцид".
HISTORIC LEADERS' LETTERS TO SANTA: "I built the temples of Abu Simbel, but what I'd like is to outlive my first dozen heirs & be preserved in a Cairo museum"
Ramses
In Maadi1993Misr International University1996Misr University for Science and Technology1996Modern Sciences and Arts University1996Université Française d'Égypte2002German University in Cairo2003Arab Open University2003Canadian International College2004British University in Egypt2005Ahram Canadian University2005Nile University2006Future University in Egypt2006  Transportation  thumb|left|The Cairo Metro thumb|Nasr city Autostrade thumb|left|Cairo Transport Authority thumb|left|Ramses Station.
3
al-Nil Bridge.
In the following days Tahrir Square continued to be the primary destination for protests in Cairo.
Snowfall is extremely rare; a small amount of graupel, widely believed to be snow, fell on Cairo's easternmost suburbs on 13 December 2013, the first time Cairo's area received this kind of precipitation in many decades.
NEW ENGLANDERS: This president's father, Prescott, represented Connecticut in the Senate from 1952 to 1963
George H.W. Bush
Prescott Bush represented Connecticut in the U.S. Senate from 1952 to 1963; his son George H.W. Bush and grandson George W. Bush both would become presidents of the United States.
3
Jewish congregations had 108,280 (3.2%) members in 2000.
Separate branches of government did not exist during this period, and the General Assembly acted as the supreme authority.
, Connecticut's United States Senators are Richard Blumenthal (Democrat) and Chris Murphy (Democrat).
LIBRARIES: Founded in 1701, this university's library is Connecticut's oldest
Yale
With the establishment of Yale College in 1701, Connecticut had an important institution to educate clergy and civil leaders.
3
This irregularity in the boundary is the result of territorial disputes in the late 17th century, culminating with New York giving up its claim to the area, whose residents considered themselves part of Connecticut, in exchange for an equivalent area extending northwards from Ridgefield to the Massachusetts border as well as undisputed claim to Rye, New York.
Due in part to the inventions of Eli Whitney and other early innovators of the Industrial Revolution, Connecticut would come to be recognized as a major center for manufacturing.
Harriet Beecher Stowe, whose novel Uncle Tom's Cabin (1852) energized anti-slavery forces in the American North.
GREEK MYTHOLOGY: Ariadne got the ball of twine that she gave to Theseus from this man before his flight from Crete
Daedalus
Icarus and Daedalus were captives of King Minos and crafted wings to escape.
3
There is a large number of archaeological sites which include the Minoan sites of Knossos and Phaistos, the classical site of Gortys, and the diverse archaeology of the island of Koufonisi which includes Minoan, Roman, and World War II ruins.
In 1204, the Fourth Crusade seized and sacked the imperial capital of Constantinople.
On 25 August 1898, a Turkish mob massacred hundreds of Cretan Greeks, the British Consul and 17 British soldiers.
"U" HAD TO BE THERE: With a population of more than 2 million, its capital, Tashkent, is the largest city in Central Asia
Uzbekistan
17 million), Kyrgyzstan (5.7 million), Tajikistan (8.0 million), Turkmenistan (5.2 million), and Uzbekistan (30 million), for a total population of about 66 million as of 2013–2014.
3
Industrial activity centers in the region's cities.
The tradition arose out of early bardic oral historians.
The capital and second largest city in Kazakhstan.
THE Is HAVE IT: This former Chrysler CEO has a Boston-based foundation for diabetes research
Lee Iacocca
Lee Iacocca was brought in as CEO and is credited with returning the company to profitability in the 1980s.
3
With those exceptions per applicable year and market, Chrysler's range from lowest to highest price from the 1940s through the 1970s was Valiant, Plymouth, Dodge, DeSoto, Chrysler, and Imperial.
Under DaimlerChrysler, the company was named DaimlerChrysler Motors Company LLC, with its U.S. operations generally called "DCX".
Included was a group of German scientists and engineers led by Wernher von Braun; this group had been brought to America under Project Paperclip.
HIGHWAYS & BYWAYS: Chicago's street addresses emanate from point zero, the intersection of Madison Avenue & this street
State Street
Other famous streets include North Michigan Avenue, North State Street, Clark, and Belmont Avenue.
3
The ratification of the 18th amendment to the Constitution in 1919 made the production and sale (including exportation) of alcoholic beverages illegal in the United States.
She helped reduce crime in the Cabrini-Green housing project and led Chicago's school system out of a financial crisis.
State law courts are in the Daley Plaza Building at right The government of the City of Chicago is divided into executive and legislative branches.
ILLINOIS ME: Known as the "Second City", Chicago actually ranks in this position by population in the U.S.
Third
Chicago ( or ) is the third most populous city in the United States.
3
In a normal summer, temperatures can exceed  as many as 21 days.
To these ethnic groups, the basis of the city's industrial working class, were added an additional influx of African-Americans from the American South — with Chicago's black population doubling between 1910 and 1920 and doubling again between 1920 and 1930.
These institutions consistently rank among the top "National Universities" in the United States, as determined by U.S. News & World Report.
WOMEN: Chicago got its first black mayor, Harold Washington, 4 years after its first woman mayor, her
Jane Byrne
In 1979, Jane Byrne, the city's first female mayor, was elected.
3
Included among these are its nationally renowned deep-dish pizza; this style is said to have originated at Pizzeria Uno.
Even before then, it was not unheard of for Republican presidential candidates to win handily in downstate Illinois, only to lose statewide due to large Democratic margins in Chicago.
Expressways  Seven mainline and four auxiliary interstate highways (55, 57, 65 (only in Indiana), 80 (also in Indiana), 88, 90 (also in Indiana), 94 (also in Indiana), 190, 290, 294, and 355) run through Chicago and its suburbs.
LITERARY CROSSWORD CLUES "G": Colette's courtesan-in-training(4)
Gigi
Colette () (Sidonie-Gabrielle Colette, 28 January 1873 – 3 August 1954) was a French novelist nominated for the Nobel Prize in Literature in 1948.http://www.nobelprize.org/nomination/archive/show_people.php?id=1883 Her best known work, the novella Gigi (1944), was the basis for the film and Lerner and Loewe stage production of the same name.
3
Early years, 1893 – 1912 In 1893 she married Henry Gauthier-Villars (1859 – 1931) or 'Willy', his nom-de-plume, a well-known author and publisher, and her first four novels — the four Claudine stories, Claudine à l'école (1900), Claudine à Paris (1901), Claudine en menage (1902), and Claudine s'en va (1903) — appeared under his name.
During these years she embarked on a series of relationships with other women, notably with Mathilde de Morny, Marquise de Belbeuf ("Missy"), with whom she sometimes shared the stage.
"It ... has no plot, and yet tells of three lives all that should be known", wrote Janet Flanner of Sido.
OH WHAT A YEAR!: George V dies, Jesse Owens wins 4 gold medals, Spanish Civil War erupts
1936
thumb|left|A plane, supported by smaller fighter planes, of Francisco Franco's Nationalists bombs Madrid during the Spanish Civil War (1936-1939) The two major global ideologies, monarchism and democracy, led to several civil wars.
3
Onset and the Case Study Project Research Design," in Collier & Sambanis, Vol 1, p. 13
A high proportion of primary commodities in national exports significantly increases the risk of a conflict.
515–525.
THE SUPREME COURT: Charles Evans Hughes was appointed to the court by this man whom he later succeeded as Chief Justice
William Howard Taft
In 1908, he was offered the vice-presidential nomination by William Howard Taft, but he declined it to run again for Governor.
3
As the Governor, Hughes produced important reform legislation in three areas: improvement of the machinery and processes of government; extension of the state's regulatory authority over businesses engaged in public services; and expansion of governmental police and welfare functions.
He pushed the passage of the Moreland Act, which enabled the governor to oversee city and county officials as well as officials in semi-autonomous state bureaucracies.
NLRB v. Jones & Laughlin Steel Corp., 301 U.S. 1 (1937).
COLLEGE KNOWLEDGE: A noted Commodore from this university was Al Gore, who studied at both its divinity & law schools
Vanderbilt
It may also refer to:  Aircraft Consolidated Aircraft Commodore, a flying boat used for passenger travel in the 1930s  Animals  Several species of brush-footed butterflies in the subfamily Limenitidinae, in particular  A. danava  Automobiles Hudson Commodore, an automobile produced from 1941 to 1952 in the US by Hudson Motor Car Company Opel Commodore, an automobile produced from 1967 to 1982 in Germany by Adam Opel AG Holden Commodore, an automobile produced since 1978 in Australia by the Holden division of General Motors  Computers and software Commodore International (also known as Commodore Business Machines), a computer company founded in 1954  Fiction The Commodore, a Horatio Hornblower novel by C. S. Forester The Commodore (book), a novel in the Aubrey–Maturin series by Patrick O'Brian  Music and music venues Commodore Ballroom, a nightclub and music venue in Vancouver, British Columbia Commodore Records, a jazz and swing music record label The Commodores, a soul/funk band in the 1970s  People "The Commodore", the nickname of American entrepreneur Cornelius Vanderbilt (1794–1877) Aaron Commodore (1819/20 - 1892), African American politician Mike Commodore (born 1979), a Canadian ice hockey player Commodore P. Vedder (1838–1910), New York politician  Places Commodore, Pennsylvania, United States Commodore Island, a Canadian island in Hudson Bay  Ranks Commodore (rank), a naval rank Commodore (Royal Navy), in the United Kingdom Commodore (United States) Commodore (Canada) Commodore (Finland) Commodore (Germany) or Kommodore  Air commodore, a rank in the Royal Air Force and other Commonwealth air forces Commodore (yacht club), an officer of a yacht club Commodore (Sea Scouts), a position in the Boy Scouts of America's Sea Scout program Convoy commodore, a civilian in charge of a shipping convoy during the Second World War  Ships Commodore (shipwreck), an American steamboat shipwrecked off the coast of Florida USS Commodore, the name of various United States Navy ships  Sports mascots and team names  Vanderbilt Commodores, intercollegiate athletics teams for Vanderbilt University
1
Commodore generally refers to Commodore (rank), a naval rank.
POP GOES THE MUSIC: On this band's first album, Dave Grohl played all of the instruments
Foo Fighters
is an American rock musician, multi-instrumentalist, singer-songwriter, and producer who is best known as the former drummer for the grunge band Nirvana and the founder and frontman of the rock band Foo Fighters, of which he is the lead vocalist, one of three guitarists, and primary songwriter.
2
During his infrequent pauses he lived in Seattle and Los Angeles before returning to Alexandria, Virginia.
He still does not know how to read sheet music and writes his music only by ear.
SPORTS IN THE NEWS: In 1997 Scotty Bowman of this Detroit team became the only coach in the NHL with 1,000 wins
Detroit Red Wings
Lainter, Bill (August 12, 2014). "Metro communities struggle with flooding after torrential rain," Detroit Free Press|url=http://www.freep.com/article/20140811/NEWS05/308110181/Freeway-flooding-heavy-rain A new arena for the Detroit Red Wings, with attached residential, hotel, and retail use is under construction set to open in fall 2017.Gallagher, John (July 14, 2014).
3
During the same time period, the sprawling Detroit metropolitan area, which surrounds and includes the city, grew to contain more than half of Michigan's population.
This dynamic is luring additional new residents, and former residents returning from other cities, to the city's Downtown along with the revitalized Midtown and New Center areas.
Sports thumb|Looking toward Ford Field the night of Super Bowl XL  Detroit is one of 12 American metropolitan areas that are home to professional teams representing the four major sports in North America.
SCIENCE: Proxima Centauri is the second-closest star to the Earth; this is the closest
The sun
Earth  (also the world, in  Gaia, or in Latin: TerraOxford English Dictionary),  "terra, n." Oxford University Press (Oxford), 1911.) is the third planet from the Sun, the densest planet in the Solar System, the largest of the Solar System's four terrestrial planets, and the only astronomical object known to harbor life.
2
The Vanishing Face of Gaia.
NASA.  Earth – Audio (29:28) –
CLOSE TO YOU: Earth's crust,Earth's mantle,Earth's core
Earth's crust
The geochemist F. W. Clarke calculated that a little more than 47% of Earth's crust consists of oxygen.
3
Models predict that the Sun will expand to roughly , which is about 250 times its present radius.
In northern temperate latitudes, the Sun rises north of true east during the summer solstice, and sets north of true west, reversing in the winter.
The perception of Earth shifted again in the 20th century when humans first viewed it from orbit, and especially with photographs of Earth returned by the Apollo program.
SCIENCE & NATURE: This geological science studies the forces within the Earth that cause plate activity
tectonics
Earth's interior remains active with a solid iron inner core, a liquid outer core that generates the magnetic field, and a convecting mantle that drives plate tectonics.
3
Instead, most of the hydrogen loss comes from the destruction of methane in the upper atmosphere.
The orbital and axial planes are not precisely aligned: Earth's axis is tilted some 23.4 degrees from the perpendicular to the Earth–Sun plane (the ecliptic), and the Earth–Moon plane is tilted up to ±5.1 degrees against the Earth–Sun plane.
Earth's rotational velocity also varies in a phenomenon known as length-of-day variation.
GEOGRAPHY: Largest country entirely in Europe
France
Whether countries are considered in Europe or Asia can vary in sources, for example in the classification of the CIA World Factbook or that of the BBC. Note also that certain countries in Europe, such as France, have territories lying geographically outside Europe, but which are nevertheless considered integral parts of that country.
3
Broad has been an epithet of Earth itself in the reconstructed Proto-Indo-European religion.
The Roman Republic ended in 27 BC, when Augustus proclaimed the Roman Empire.
Land relief in Europe shows great variation within relatively small areas.
"SAN" CITY: With a population of less than 5,000, it's one of the smallest capitals in Europe & is in one of the smallest nations
San Marino
Luxembourg Lëtzebuerg/Luxemburg/Luxembourg   Macedonia 25,713 2,054,800 81.1 Skopje Makedonija   Malta 316 397,499 1,257.9 Valletta Malta   Moldova  33,843 4,434,547 131.0 Chișinău Moldova   Monaco 1.95 31,987 16,403.6 Monaco Monaco   Montenegro 13,812 616,258 44.6 Podgorica Crna Gora   Netherlands  41,526 16,902,103 393.0 Amsterdam Nederland   Norway 385,178 5,018,836 15.5 Oslo Norge/Noreg   Poland 312,685 38,625,478 123.5 Warsaw Polska   Portugal  91,568 10,409,995 110.1 Lisbon Portugal   Romania 238,391 21,698,181 91.0 Bucharest România   Russia  17,075,400 143,975,923 8.3 Moscow Rossiya   San Marino 61 27,730 454.6 San Marino San Marino   Serbia  88,361 7,120,666 91.9 Belgrade Srbija   Slovakia 48,845 5,422,366 111.0
3
Europe is now generally defined by geographers as the western part of Eurasia, with its boundaries marked by large bodies of water to the north, west and south; Europe's limits to the far east are usually taken to be the Urals, the Ural River, and the Caspian Sea; to the southeast, including the Caucasus Mountains, the Black Sea and the waterways connecting the Black Sea to the Mediterranean Sea.
thumb|100px|right|The Nebra sky disk from Bronze Age Germany Homo erectus georgicus, which lived roughly 1.8 million years ago in Georgia, is the earliest hominid to have been discovered in Europe.
By August Germany began a bombing offensive on Britain, but failed to convince the Britons to give up.
EARLY MAN: This type of man, reconstructed here, lived in Europe until about 30,000 years ago
Neanderthal
The million year old tooth from Atapuerca, Spain, found in June 2007 Neanderthal man (named after the Neandertal valley in Germany) appeared in Europe 150,000 years ago and disappeared from the fossil record about 28,000 BC, with this extinction probably due to climate change, and their final refuge being present-day Portugal.
3
Reforms in social and economic spheres followed, including the first laws on child labour, the legalisation of trade unions, and the abolition of slavery.
In the Mediterranean, many olive trees have been planted, which are very well adapted to its arid climate; Mediterranean Cypress is also widely planted in southern Europe.
A number of insects, such as the small tortoiseshell butterfly, add to the biodiversity.
PHONE HOME!: Elvis Presley, phone home to this mansion, your last residence; someone stepped on your blue suede shoes!
Graceland
Between film shoots and recording sessions, the singer also found time to purchase an 18-room mansion eight miles (13 km) south of downtown Memphis for himself and his parents: Graceland.
3
Stuck on You", which was rushed into release and swiftly became a number one hit.
It was to be Presley's last public performance for seven years.
...
COUNTIES OF ENGLAND: The westernmost county of England, or what the eldest son of the monarch is duke of
Cornwall
It is spoken by 0.1% of people in Cornwall, and is taught to some degree in several primary and secondary schools.
3
Early Modern thumb|upright|alt=Painting of large bearded man with fur trimmed cloak, wearing a hat.|King Henry VIII became Supreme Head of the Church of England During the Tudor period, the Renaissance reached England through Italian courtiers, who reintroduced artistic, educational and scholarly debate from classical antiquity.
The Napoleonic Wars fostered a concept of Britishness and a united national British people, shared with the Scots and Welsh..
Some of the most prominent philosophers of the Enlightenment were John Locke, Thomas Paine, Samuel Johnson and Jeremy Bentham.
CONQUER: This man's 11th century conquest of England gave him the nickname "The Conqueror"
William
William E. Burns, A Brief History of Great Britain, p. xxiActs of Union 1707 parliament.uk.
3
The sea level was lower than now and Britain was connected by land bridge to Ireland and Eurasia.
The Supreme Court of the United Kingdom is the highest court for criminal and civil cases in England and Wales.
Her Majesty's Prison Service, reporting to the Ministry of Justice, manages most prisons, housing over 85,000 convicts.
ENGLAND, SCOTLAND OR WALES: Regions there include Gwent & Gwynedd
Wales
It shares land borders with Scotland to the north and Wales to the west.
3
This conquest led to the almost total dispossession of the English elite and its replacement by a new French-speaking aristocracy, whose speech had a profound and permanent effect on the English language.
London became the largest and most populous metropolitan area in the world during the Victorian era, and trade within the British Empire—as well as the standing of the British military and navy—was prestigious.
Reaction Engines Limited, the company planning to build Skylon, a single-stage-to-orbit spaceplane using their SABRE rocket engine, a combined-cycle, air-breathing rocket propulsion system is based Culham.
NURSERY RHYMES: In England, "the merriest month in all the year"
May
Accessed 31 May 2013.
3
The Anglo-Saxon Chronicle recorded that the Domesday Book of 1086 covered the whole of England, meaning the English kingdom, but a few years later the Chronicle stated that King Malcolm III went "out of Scotlande into Lothian in Englaland", thus using it in the more ancient sense.
The wings for the Airbus A380 and the Airbus A350 XWB are designed and manufactured at Airbus UK's world-leading facility in Broughton.
Nick Faldo is the most successful Ryder Cup player ever, having won the most points (25) of any player on either the European or U.S. teams."Sir Nick Faldo drives on in business world".
ENGLAND: He's the primate of all England
Archbishop of Canterbury
Religion thumb|alt=Large yellow stone ornate building with buttresses and square central tower.|right|Canterbury Cathedral, seat of the Archbishop of Canterbury  According to the 2011 census, 59.4% of the population is Christian, 24.7% non-religious, 5% is Muslim while 3.7% of the population belongs to other religions and 7.2 did not give an answer.
3
England began to develop naval skills, and exploration to the West intensified.
Some experts claim that the earliest concept of a metric system was invented by John Wilkins, the first secretary of the Royal Society, in 1668.
Sausages are commonly eaten, either as bangers and mash or toad in the hole.
BRITISH ROYAL DADS: He fathered 2 queens of England by 2 different women
Henry VIII
Early Modern thumb|upright|alt=Painting of large bearded man with fur trimmed cloak, wearing a hat.|King Henry VIII became Supreme Head of the Church of England During the Tudor period, the Renaissance reached England through Italian courtiers, who reintroduced artistic, educational and scholarly debate from classical antiquity.
3
Domestically it drove the Industrial Revolution, a period of profound change in the socioeconomic and cultural conditions of England, resulting in industrialised agriculture, manufacture, engineering and mining, as well as new and pioneering road, rail and water networks to facilitate their expansion and development.
With his role in the marketing and manufacturing of the steam engine, and invention of modern coinage, Matthew Boulton (business partner of James Watt) is regarded as one of the most influential entrepreneurs in history.
England competes in the Commonwealth Games, held every four years.
EXPEDITION WEEK: In "Search for the... Headshrinkers" of this river, we learn of the practice in Ecuador & Peru
the Amazon
Some likely sailed to Ecuador by rafts from Central America, others came to Ecuador via the Amazon tributaries, others descended from northern South America, and others ascended from the southern part of South America through the Andes or by sailing on rafts.
3
After nearly 300 years of Spanish rule, Quito was still a small city numbering 10,000 inhabitants.
Peru contested Ecuador's claims with the newly discovered Real Cedula of 1802, by which Peru claims the King of Spain had transferred these lands from the Viceroyalty of New Granada to the Viceroyalty of Peru.
The level of non-revenue water is estimated at 65%, one of the highest in Latin America.
ALL HAIL: Edna St. Vincent Millay, Henry Wadsworth Longfellow, Margaret Chase Smith
Maine
Harper Collins, 1991  Early life Millay was born in Rockland, Maine, to Cora Lounella Buzelle, a nurse, and Henry Tolman Millay, a schoolteacher who would later become a superintendent of schools.
3
Millay grew her own vegetables in a small garden.
Death and legacy Millay died at her home on October 19, 1950.
On Hearing a Symphony of Beethoven).
WORLD HISTORY: Around 284 B.C. Zenodotus of Ephesus became the first superintendant of this city's library
Alexandria
The city flourished after it came under the control of the Roman Republic in 129 BC. According to estimates, Ephesus had a population of 33,600 to 56,000 people in the Roman period, making it the third largest city of Roman Asia Minor after Sardis and Alexandria Troas.
3
These wars did not greatly affect daily life in Ephesus.
The Ephesians derived the argument from John's presence in the city, and Jesus’ instructions to John to take care of Mary after his death.
It was a small salon for plays and concerts, seating about 1,500 people.
GRAB BAG: Don't panic!  Epinephrine is just another name for this hormone
adrenaline
Epinephrine, also known as adrenalin or adrenaline, is primarily a medication and hormone.
2
This reaction is catalyzed by the enzyme phenylethanolamine N-methyltransferase (PNMT) which utilizes S-adenosylmethionine (SAMe) as the methyl donor.
In 1901, Takamine successfully isolated and purified the hormone from the adrenal glands of sheep and oxen.
THE YEAR THAT WAS: The Bears won the Super Bowl, Elie Wiesel won the Nobel Peace Prize, Democrats won control of the U.S. Senate
1986
When Wiesel was awarded the Nobel Peace Prize in 1986, the Norwegian Nobel Committee called him a "messenger to mankind," stating that through his struggle to come to terms with "his own personal experience of total humiliation and of the utter contempt for humanity shown in Hitler's death camps", as well as his "practical work in the cause of peace", Wiesel had delivered a powerful message "of peace, atonement and human dignity" to humanity.
3
Early life thumb|right|The house where Wiesel was born Elie Wiesel was born in Sighet, Transylvania (now Sighetu Marmației), Maramureș, Romania, in the Carpathian Mountains.
London: Vintage, 1996.
Herman P. and Sophia Taubman Endowed Symposia in Jewish Studies.
FIJI: (Jeff reads yet one more time.)  While we've been here in Fiji the government has not survived & has been overthrown in a coup in this capital city
Suva
The capital and largest city, Suva, is on Viti Levu.
3
Over the centuries, a unique Fijian culture developed.
Nevertheless, it remains a member of the Forum.
Critics, however, claimed that he had suspended the constitution and was responsible for human rights violations by arresting and detaining opponents.
BIRTH MONTH FLOWERS: For February, you can choose this flower whose color matches the month's birthstone
the violet
thumb|right|150px|The violet Its birth flower is the violet (Viola) and the common primrose (Primula vulgaris).
2
February 2 Anniversary of Treaty of Tartu (Estonia) Constitution Day (Philippines) Day of Youth (Azerbaijan) Feast of the Presentation of Jesus at the Temple (or Candlemas) (Western Christianity), and its related observances:
(United States)
HOLIDAYS & OBSERVANCES: On February 25 this Asian nation celebrates the fall of Ferdinand Marcos in 1986
Philippines
1986 – People Power Revolution: President of the Philippines Ferdinand Marcos flees the nation after 20 years of rule; Corazon Aquino becomes the Philippines' first woman president.
3
1714   –
Jaak Tamm, Estonian politician (d. 1999) 1951
1495 –
OSCAR, GRAMMY OR BOTH: Frank Sinatra
both
Using his Las Vegas shows as a home base, he toured both within the United States and internationally until a short time before his death in 1998.
3
Rumors began spreading in newspapers that Sinatra's mobster godfather, Willie Moretti, coerced Dorsey to let Sinatra out of his contract for a few thousand dollars, holding a gun to his head.
Such was the bobby-soxer devotion to Sinatra that they were known to write Sinatra's song titles on their clothing, bribe hotel maids for an opportunity to touch his bed, and accost his person in the form of stealing clothing he was wearing, most commonly his bow-tie.
It is structured like a three-act play, each commencing with the songs "With Every Breath I Take", "Blame It On My Youth" and  "It Could Happen to You".
WORLD LITERATURE: Fernando Pessoa of Lisbon & Machado de Assis of Rio de Janeiro were great writers in this language
Portuguese
Collins English Dictionary. ; June 13, 1888 – November 30, 1935), was a Portuguese poet, writer, literary critic, translator, publisher and philosopher, described as one of the most significant literary figures of the 20th century and one of the greatest poets in the Portuguese language.
3
A Águia (1912–13), Teatro (1913), A Renascença (1914), O Jornal (1915), Orpheu (1915), Exílio (1916), Centauro (1916), Terra Nossa (1916), Portugal Futurista (1917), Acção (1919–20), Ressurreição (1920), Contemporânea (1922–26), Athena (1924–25), Diário de Lisboa (1924–35), Revista de Comércio e Contabilidade (1926), Sol (1926), O Imparcial (1927), Presença (1927–34), Notícias Ilustrado (1928–30), Girassol (1930), Revolução (1932), Descobrimento (1932), Fama (1932–33), Fradique (1934) and Sudoeste (1935).
Manuela Parreira da Silva.
The Presence of Pessoa: English, American, and Southern African Literary Responses.
COLOR MY WORLD: Fir tree cover gave this region of southwest Germany its name
the Black Forest
The 14 national parks in Germany include the Jasmund National Park, the Vorpommern Lagoon Area National Park, the Müritz National Park, the Wadden Sea National Parks, the Harz National Park, the Hainich National Park, the Black Forest National Park, the Saxon Switzerland National Park, the Bavarian Forest National Park and the Berchtesgaden National Park.
3
Until 2011, military service was compulsory for men at age 18, and conscripts served six-month tours of duty; conscientious objectors could instead opt for an equal length of Zivildienst (civilian service), or a six-year commitment to (voluntary) emergency services like a fire department or the Red Cross.
All other religious communities in Germany have fewer than 50,000 adherents each.
Secondary education includes three traditional types of schools focused on different academic levels: the Gymnasium enrols the most gifted children and prepares students for university studies; the Realschule for intermediate students lasts six years and the Hauptschule prepares pupils for vocational education.
PETS: The poodle probably originated in Germany, though it's most associated with this country
France
In 1806 the Imperium was dissolved; German states, particularly the Rhineland states, fell under the influence of France.
3
Under Augustus, Rome began to invade Germania (an area extending roughly from the Rhine to the Ural Mountains).
The relocation of the government was completed in 1999.
The Wessobrunner School exerted a decisive influence on, and at times even dominated, the art of stucco in southern Germany in the 18th century.
GOOD TIMES: Appropriately, in Germany, this roughly 2-week celebration kicks off with a brewer's parade
Oktoberfest
Germany is well known for such folk festival traditions as Oktoberfest and Christmas customs, which include Advent wreaths, Christmas pageants, Christmas trees, Stollen cakes, and other practices.
3
The Hambach Festival in May 1832 was a main event in support of German unity, freedom and democracy.
Popular game series from Germany include Turrican, the Anno series, The Settlers series, the Gothic series, SpellForce, the FIFA Manager series, Far Cry and Crysis.
Germany is one of the leading motor sports countries in the world.
I GO BY "AL": Heading south from Washington, D.C., I go by this Virginia city where George Washington once drilled troops
Alexandria
The newlywed couple moved to Mount Vernon, near Alexandria, where he took up the life of a planter and political figure.
3
Washington proved an able administrator, and established many precedents in the functions of the presidency, including messages to Congress and the cabinet form of government.
The comparison arose as Washington, like Cincinnatus, remained in command of the Continental Army only until the British had been defeated.
Gregg L. Frazer, The Religious Beliefs of America's Founders: Reason, Revelation, and Revolution (University Press of Kansas, 2012) Historian Peter A. Lillback argues that Washington was neither a deist nor a "theistic rationalist" but a Christian who believed in the core beliefs of Christianity.
AMERICAN HISTORY: On Dec. 4, 1783 George Washington bade his officers farewell at this New York City tavern
Fraunces Tavern
At Fraunces Tavern on December 4, Washington formally bade his officers farewell and on December 23, 1783, he resigned his commission as commander-in-chief, saying "I consider it an indispensable duty to close this last solemn act of my official life, by commending the interests of our dearest country to the protection of Almighty God, and those who have the superintendence of them, to his holy keeping."
3
In May 1769 Washington introduced a proposal, drafted by his friend George Mason, calling for Virginia to boycott English goods until the Acts were repealed.
Personal property auction record
Before the Revolutionary War he was Anglican—Church of England—which meant after the war, he was Episcopalian.
U.S.A.: Some of the trees still standing on this Virginia Estate were planted by George Washington himself
Mount Vernon
He retired from the presidency in 1797, returning to his home and plantation at Mount Vernon.
3
Yet his constant reiteration of the point that well-disciplined professional soldiers counted for twice as much as erratic militias (clearly demonstrated in the rout at Camden, where only the Maryland and Delaware Continentals under Baron DeKalb held firm), helped overcome the ideological distrust of a standing army.
Realizing his army's desperate shortage of gunpowder, Washington asked for new sources.
He would regularly leave services before communion with the other non-communicants (as was the custom of the day), until, after being admonished by a rector, he ceased attending at all on communion Sundays.
WHAT A COUNTRY!: In German, this country is known as Vereinigte Staaten
United States
German(s) may refer to:   something deriving from or relating to Germany  the German language, (one major language) spoken in Germany, Austria, Switzerland, and other nearby countries  Germans, an ethnic group  Germanic peoples, any of the Germanic peoples  A citizen of the Federal Republic of Germany   Places   German (parish), on the Isle of Man  German (Republic of Macedonia)  German, Albania, a village in Tirana County, Albania  German, Bulgaria, a quarter of Sofia  German, Iran, a village in Semnan Province, Iran  German, New York, in the United States  German Township (disambiguation), any of several townships  Agios Germanos, in Greece   People   German (given name)  German (surname)   Mythological beings   German (mythology), a male spirit in the folklore of Serbia and Bulgaria   Other  German Shepherd, a breed of dog Germans (band), a Canadian rock band  The German, another name for the cotillion, an 18th- and 19th-century social dance  The German, a 2008 short film   See also   Germane, a simple chemical compound of germanium and hydrogen  Germania  Germanic (disambiguation)  Germany (disambiguation)  Germanus (disambiguation)  Germen (disambiguation)  Germain (disambiguation)
1
Germaine (disambiguation)  Germantown (disambiguation)  Category:Demonyms
EUROPEAN HISTORY: Enosis isn't a disease, but the historic desire of people on this 3500-square-mile island for union with Greece
Cyprus
While most of mainland Greece and the Aegean islands was under Ottoman control by the end of the 15th century, Cyprus and Crete remained Venetian territory and did not fall to the Ottomans until 1571 and 1670 respectively.
3
In 1822 and 1824 the Turks and Egyptians ravaged the islands, including Chios and Psara, committing wholesale massacres of the population.
Due to his authoritarian rule, he was eventually dethroned in 1862 and a year later replaced by Prince Wilhelm (William) of Denmark, who took the name George I and brought with him the Ionian Islands as a coronation gift from Britain.
Greece is a [[developed country]] with high standards of living {{Citation needed|reason=Very subjective and some people would strongly disagree.
POLITICAL FIGURES: This Greek actress is now Greece's Minister of Culture
Melina Mercouri
Directors and actors of this era were recognized as important historical figures in Greece and some gained international acclaim: [[Irene Papas]], [[Melina Mercouri]], [[Mihalis Kakogiannis]], [[Alekos Sakellarios]], [[Nikos Tsiforos]], [[Iakovos Kambanelis]], [[Katina Paxinou]], [[Nikos Koundouros]], [[Ellie Lambeti]],  and others.
3
style="position:absolute;left:251px;top:233px;"><small>[[Kos]]</small></div> <div
May 2011 }}</ref> {{colorbox|#3771c8}} embassy – {{colorbox|#aaccff}} embassy in another country<br />{{colorbox|#37c837}} general consulate – {{colorbox|#ffaaaa}} liaison office – {{colorbox|#cccccc}} no representation – {{colorbox|black}} Greece]]  Greece's foreign policy is conducted through the [[Ministry for Foreign Affairs (Greece)|Ministry for Foreign Affairs]] and its head, the [[Minister for Foreign Affairs (Greece)|Minister for Foreign Affairs]].
The Classical era also saw the dawn of drama.
FRUITS & VEGETABLES: In 1493 Columbus encountered this, Hawaii's most valuable fruit crop, on the island of Guadeloupe
the pineapple
Columbus is credited with discovering the pineapple on the island of Guadeloupe in 1493, although the fruit had long been grown in South America.
3
He called it piña de Indias, which can be correctly translated as "pine cone of the Indies."Entry for "piña" in the Dictionary of the Real Academia Española de la Lengua, definition #1.Entry for "piña" in the bilingual Collins & WordReference DictionariesEntry for "piña" on the bilingual Collins Reverso Dictionary, definition #1.
Guadeloupe has always had a rich literary output, continued today by many living writers, poets, novelists, essayists and journalists, among them Mesdames Maryse Condé and Simone Schwarz-Bart, .
thumb|200px|France's all-time top scorer, half Guadeloupean Thierry Henry.
MOTHERS OF INVENTION: In the 1950s Grace Hopper created this "Common Business-Oriented Language" for computers
COBOL
She was one of the first programmers of the Harvard Mark I computer in 1944,http://chsi.harvard.edu/markone/crew.html The Mark I computer at Harvard University invented the first compiler for a computer programming language, and was one of those who popularized the idea of machine-independent programming languages which led to the development of COBOL, one of the first high-level programming languages.
3
Thomas J. Misa, ed., Gender Codes: Why Women Are Leaving Computing (Wiley/IEEE Computer Society Press, 2010), pp.
63, 117.
The academy bestows a Grace Murray Hopper Prize to a graduate who excelled in the field of computer systems.
THEATRICAL QUOTES: George S. Kaufman defined this type of comedy as "What closes Saturday night"
Satire
In addition to comedies and political satire, he wrote several musicals, notably for the Marx Brothers.
3
Hart writes that Max Siegel said: "Maybe I should have warned you.
He created scripts that revealed a mastery of dramatic structure; his characters were likable and theatrically credible.
Kaufman found himself in the center of a scandal in 1936 when, in the midst of a child custody suit, the former husband of actress Mary Astor threatened to publish one of Astor's diaries purportedly containing extremely explicit details of an affair between Kaufman and the actress.
AUCTION PACKED: Gary Busey paid over $240,000 for a guitar once owned by this man he played on film
Buddy Holly
He has appeared in films such as Thunderbolt and Lightfoot (1974),The Gumball Rally (1976), The Buddy Holly Story (1978), Big Wednesday (1978), Silver Bullet (1985), Eye of the Tiger (1986), Lethal Weapon (1987), Predator 2 (1990), Point Break (1991), Under Siege (1992), The Firm (1993), Rookie of the Year (1993),  Surviving the Game (1994), Drop Zone (1994), Black Sheep (1996), Lost Highway (1997), Soldier (1998), and Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas (1998).
3
For his skits on Uncanny Film Festival, Busey drew on his American Hero, belligerent, know-it-all character.
Hard Driver)
Too Hard to Die)
WHAT ABOUT ESTONIA?: This movement to faithfully depict behavior included George Eliot, Flaubert & Estonian novelist Tammsaare
Realism
She is the author of seven novels, including Adam Bede (1859), The Mill on the Floss (1860), Silas Marner (1861), Middlemarch (1871–72), and Daniel Deronda (1876), most of them set in provincial England and known for their realism and psychological insight.
3
She also wished to have her fiction judged separately from her already extensive and widely known work as an editor and critic.
The roots of her realist philosophy can be found in her review of John Ruskin's Modern Painters in Westminster Review in 1856.
Readers in the Victorian era particularly praised her books for their depictions of rural society, for which she drew on her own early experiences, and she shared with Wordsworth the belief that there was much interest and importance in the mundane details of ordinary country lives.
DANCE: Legend says Hi'iaka, sister of the goddess Pele, introduced this dance to Hawaii
Hula
Some of these cultural influences, including the popularity (in greatly modified form) of lūau and hula, are strong enough to affect the wider United States.
3
Some scholars have dismissed these claims due to a lack of credibility.
They departed without the ship's boat.
Research from the National Association of Realtors places the 2010 median sale price of a single family home in Honolulu, Hawaii, at  and the U.S. median sales price at .
GETTING HUNGARY?: When it was known as Pannonia, Hungary was incorporated into this empire around 14 A.D.
the Roman Empire
The second element eri, 'man, men, lineage', survives in Hungarian férj 'husband', and is cognate with Mari erge 'son', Finnish archaic yrkä 'young man'.Sergei Starostin, Uralic etymology  History  Before 895  thumb|left|Italian fresco depicting a Hungarian warrior shooting backwards The Roman Empire conquered the territory west of the Danube between 35 and 9 BC. From 9 BC to the end of the 4th century, Pannonia was part of the Roman Empire, located within part of later Hungary's territory.
3
Attila Zsoldos, Saint Stephen and his country: a newborn kingdom in Central Europe: Hungary, Lucidus, 2001, p. 40
The following political cooling saw the ascent of Imre Nagy to the premiership and the growing interest of students and intellectuals in political life.
Agricultural land use profile  Details on Hungary’s new Constitution    Category:Countries in Europe Category:Republics Category:Member states of the European Union Category:Member states of the Council of Europe Category:Landlocked countries Category:Liberal democracies Category:Member states of the Union for the Mediterranean Category:Member states of NATO Category:Member states of the United Nations Category:Central Europe
CAR TREK: (Cheryl of the Clue Crew)  In the longest run of any U.S. car model from 1908-1927, Henry Ford built 15 million of this model
Model T
His introduction of the Model T automobile revolutionized transportation and American industry.
3
2:508-40  Ford astonished the world in 1914 by offering a $5 per day wage ($ today), which more than doubled the rate of most of his workers.
Using the consumer price index, this was equivalent to $111.10 per day in 2008 dollars.
ISBN 978-1-84831-147-3
A WORLD OF FAITH: This religion of Haiti derives its name from a word meaning "spirit" in the Fon language of Africa
Voodoo
In the evenings entrepreneurs provided dancing, casino gambling and Voodoo shows.
3
Aristide spent years negotiating with the Convergence Démocratique on new elections, but the Convergence's inability to develop a sufficient electoral base made elections unattractive.
The middle and upper classes live in miniature fortresses.
This corresponds to approximately 1 in every 5 Paternal ancestors, hailing from Europe.
"B" YOUR BEST: Until 1973, it was known as British Honduras
Belize
It was at times referred to as Spanish Honduras to differentiate it from British Honduras, which became the modern-day state of Belize.
3
The government that followed the de facto government, set up a "truth and reconciliation commission", Comisión de la Verdad y Reconciliación, which after more than a year of research and debateReport by the Truth and Reconciliation Commission of Honduras.
Energy
It is one of two species of deer that live in Honduras.
ANCIENT TIMES: We know Hadrian's study center called the Athenaeum was in this city, we just don't know where
Rome
367–408 UNIPV.it or Rome,Ronald Syme, in "Hadrian and Italica" (Journal of Roman Studies, LIV, 1964; pp. 142–149) examined the question and concluded that Rome was his birthplace.
3
Australian National University, M.A. Thesis, 1992, available at .
For example, huge amounts of provisions were requisitioned during his visit to Egypt; this suggests that the burden on the mainly subsistence farmers must have been intolerable, causing some measure of starvation and hardship.
Following the death of Aelius Caesar, Hadrian next adopted Titus Aurelius Fulvus Boionius Arrius Antoninus (the future emperor Antoninus Pius), who had served as one of the five imperial legates of Italy (a post created by Hadrian) and as proconsul of Asia.
SHORT STORIES: It's the occupation of Bartleby, the title character of a Herman Melville story
Scrivener
The next years he turned to writing short fiction for magazines, such as "Bartleby, the Scrivener" and "Benito Cereno."
3
In August 1850, Melville moved his family to a farm near Pittsfield, Massachusetts, where he established a profound but short-lived friendship with Nathaniel Hawthorne.
First, the exaggerated repetition of words, as in the series "pitiable," "pity," "pitied," and "piteous" (Ch.
Themes
SPACE TECHNOLOGY: (Cheryl of the Clue Crew reads from the Johnson Space Center in Houston.)  The manned maneuvering unit was used to repair the Solar Max satellite on a 1984 flight of this
the Space Shuttle
In 1950, the availability of air conditioning provided impetus for many companies to relocate to Houston, where wages were lower than the North; this resulted in an economic boom and produced a key shift in the city's economy toward the energy sector."How Air Conditioning Changed America", The Old House Web, Retrieved on April 4, 2007"A Short History", Houston Geological Auxiliary, Retrieved on April 4, 2007 thumb|Ashburn's Houston City Map (c. 1956)  thumb|left|200px|left|The space shuttle Challenger atop its Boeing 747 SCA, flying over Johnson Space Center, 1983 The increased production of the expanded shipbuilding industry during World War II spurred Houston's growth, as did the establishment in 1961 of NASA's "Manned Spacecraft Center" (renamed the Lyndon B. Johnson Space Center in 1973).
3
Retrieved on May 15, 2012.
The Houston area has over 150 active faults (estimated to be 300 active faults) with an aggregate length of up to ,Earl R. Verbeek, Karl W. Ratzlaff, Uel S. Clanton. "Faults in Parts of North-Central and Western Houston Metropolitan Area, Texas", United States Geological Survey, September 16, 2005. Retrieved on December 14, 2006.Sachin D. Shah and Jennifer Lanning-Rush.
Each dot represents 25 people.
1950s MOVIES: "Ah, but the strawberries... that's where I had them!" says Humphrey Bogart as Captain Queeg in this film
The Caine Mutiny
In a Lonely Place (1950); The African Queen (1951; Oscar winner); Sabrina (1954); and The Caine Mutiny (1954; Oscar nomination).
3
No one does it alone.
In Sabrina, Billy Wilder wished to cast Cary Grant as the older male lead.
Bogart, a heavy smoker and drinker, had developed cancer of the esophagus.
PLAQUES: A plaque honoring the men who died building Hoover Dam reads, "They died to make" this type of area "bloom"
the desert
Instead, Wilbur announced in early 1930 that a model city was to be built in the desert near the dam site.
3
Construction    Labor force  thumb|Workers on a "Jumbo Rig"; used for drilling Hoover Dam's tunnels thumb|"Apache Indians employed as high-scalers on the construction of Hoover Dam." - NARA Soon after the dam was authorized, increasing numbers of unemployed converged on southern Nevada.
Shortly afterward, work began on two similar tunnels in the Arizona canyon wall.
In the wake of the September 11, 2001 terrorist attacks, authorities expressed security concerns and the Hoover Dam Bypass project was expedited.
HANK AARON: Aaron was a designated hitter the 2 seasons he played for this Milwaukee team
Milwaukee Brewers
He played 21 seasons for the Milwaukee/Atlanta Braves in the National League (NL) and 2 seasons for the Milwaukee Brewers in the American League (AL), from 1954 through 1976.
3
Aaron resides near Atlanta.
During this time, he picked up the nickname 'pork chops' because it "was the only thing I knew to order off the menu."
Aaron finished the season with 673 home runs.
SCIENCE & NATURE: Sir Humphry Davy named this yellowish-green gas from a Greek word meaning "greenish-yellow"
Chlorine
He is best remembered today for his discoveries of several alkali and alkaline earth metals, as well as contributions to the discoveries of the elemental nature of chlorine and iodine.
3
Davy's picture of Mounts Bay was included in the Penlee House exhibition "Penzance 400: A Celebration of the History of Penzance" 29 March – 7 June 2014  While writing verses at the age of 17 in honour of his first love, he was eagerly discussing the question of the materiality of heat with his Quaker friend and mentor Robert Dunkin.
Rumford became secretary to the institution, and Dr Thomas Garnett was the first lecturer.
Bases were substances that reacted with acids to form salts and water.
MEDICAL BREAKTHROUGHS: Testing this anesthetic on himself, Sir Humphry Davy found it made him dizzy & euphoric
Nitrous oxide (laughing gas)
While living in Bristol, Davy met the Earl of Durham, who was a resident in the institution for his health and became close friends with Gregory Watt, James Watt, Samuel Taylor Coleridge and Robert Southey, all of whom became regular users of nitrous oxide (laughing gas), to which Davy became addicted.
3
This led to an introduction to Dr Edwards, who lived at Hayle Copper House.
Gilbert recommended Davy, and in 1798 Gregory Watt showed Beddoes the Young man's Researches on Heat and Light, which were subsequently published by him in the first volume of West-Country Contributions.
They returned to Italy via Munich and Innsbruck, and when their plans to travel to Greece and Istanbul were abandoned after Napoleon's escape from Elba, they returned to England.
GET SOME CULTURE: The Villanovan culture of Italy was obliterated in the 500s B.C. by this people familiar to longtime "Jeopardy!" fans
the Etruscans
The Ancient peoples of pre-Roman Italy – such as the Umbrians, the Latins (from which the Romans emerged), Volsci, Samnites, the Celts and the Ligures which inhabited northern Italy, and many others – were Indo-European peoples; the main historic peoples of non-Indo-European heritage include the Etruscans, the Elymians and Sicani in Sicily and the prehistoric Sardinians.
3
During the Napoleonic Wars, northern-central Italy was invaded and reorganised as a new Kingdom of Italy, a client state of the French Empire,Napoleon Bonaparte, "The Economy of the Empire in Italy: Instructions from Napoleon to Eugène, Viceroy of Italy," Exploring the European Past: Texts & Images, Second Edition, ed.
The national railway network, state-owned and operated by Ferrovie dello Stato, in 2008 totalled  of which 11,727 km is electrified, and on which 4,802 locomotives and railcars run.
Starting from the early 1980s, until then a linguistically and culturally homogeneous society, Italy begun to attract substantial flows of foreign immigrants.
IDIOMS: In Spain it comes down in "jugs"; in Italy, "basins"; in France, "ropes"; & in the U.S., "cats & dogs"
rain
These territories are the comuni of: Livigno, Sexten, Innichen, Toblach (in part), Chiusaforte, Tarvisio, Graun im Vinschgau (in part), which are all part of the Danube's drainage basin, while the Val di Lei constitutes part of the Rhine's basin and the islands of Lampedusa and Lampione are on the African continental shelf.
3
They also serve as the military police for the Italian armed forces.
Galileo Galilei (1564–1642), a physicist, mathematician and astronomer, played a major role in the Scientific Revolution.
The male and female national teams are often in top four ranking of teams in the world, regarded as the best volleyball league in the world.
CLASSIC FOREIGN FILMS: (Hi, I'm Richard Simmons)  When I was living in Italy, I appeared in the food orgy scene of this director's film "Satyricon"
Federico Fellini
Notable Italian film directors from this period include Vittorio De Sica, Federico Fellini, Sergio Leone, Pier Paolo Pasolini, Luchino Visconti, Michelangelo Antonioni and Dario Argento.
3
Smyth, Howard McGaw Italy:
Historical studies in the physical and biological sciences (1998): 141–181. in JSTOR and Bruno Rossi (1905–93), a pioneer in Cosmic Rays and X-ray astronomy.
Giuseppe Occhialini received the Wolf Prize in Physics for the discovery of the pion or pi-meson decay in 1947.
A MESS O' MUSSOLINI: With big dreams of restoring the Roman Empire, Mussolini had Italy invade this African country in 1935
Ethiopia
In 1935, Mussolini invaded Ethiopia, resulting in an international alienation and leading to Italy's withdrawal from the League of Nations; Italy allied with Nazi Germany and the Empire of Japan and strongly supported Francisco Franco in the Spanish civil war.
3
This has created a highly diverse and eclectic range in architectural designs.
Later, Italy was at the forefront of the progressive rock movement of the 1970s, with bands like PFM and Goblin.
The Italian League is widely considered one of the most competitive in Europe.
IT BORDERS INDIA: Of the 6 nations India borders, this one is the most populous
China
Bounded by the Indian Ocean on the south, the Arabian Sea on the south-west, and the Bay of Bengal on the south-east, it shares land borders with Pakistan to the west; China, Nepal, and Bhutan to the north-east; and Myanmar (Burma) and Bangladesh to the east.
3
The next decade was beset with crises: Indian participation in World War II, the Congress's final push for non-cooperation, and an upsurge of Muslim nationalism.
About 21.2% of the country's landmass is covered by forests (tree canopy density >10%), of which 12.2% comprises moderately or very dense forests (tree canopy density >40%).
But the Congress, as the largest single party, was able to form a minority government led by P. V. Narasimha Rao.
PARENTAL GUIDANCE SUGGESTED: Mom might suggest hiring a Sherpa if you're planning a yak trek across this range between India & Nepal
the Himalayas
These dual processes, driven by convection in the Earth's mantle, both created the Indian Ocean and caused the Indian continental crust eventually to under-thrust Eurasia and to uplift the Himalayas.
3
The nation has provided 100,000 military and police personnel to serve in 35 UN peacekeeping operations across four continents.
At the workplace in urban India and in international or leading Indian companies, the caste related identification has pretty much lost its importance.
Use of delicate jewellery, modelled on real flowers worn in ancient India, is part of a tradition dating back some 5,000 years; gemstones are also worn in India as talismans.
SCIENTISTS: In 1661 Isaac Newton entered this university's Trinity College as a subsizar, a student with domestic duties
Cambridge
Newton was a fellow of Trinity College and the second Lucasian Professor of Mathematics at the University of Cambridge.
3
Newton's Principia formulated the laws of motion and universal gravitation, which dominated scientists' view of the physical universe for the next three centuries.
This inference was proved by   Dollond to be wrong."Tyndall, John.
In September of that year, Newton had a breakdown which included sending wild accusatory letters to his friends Samuel Pepys and John Locke.
GONE COUNTRY: It's been parading under the name Iran since 1935
Persia
Iran ( or ;  ), also known as Persia ( or ),"Communication", Iranian Studies, Jan. 1989, vol.
3
Since the earliest 2nd millennium BC, Assyrians settled in swaths of western Iran, and incorporated the region into their territories.
Local city councils are elected by public vote to four-year terms in all cities and villages of Iran.
Culture  The earliest recorded cultures within the region of Iran date back to the Lower Paleolithic era.
RHYME SPR"EE": The largest Indian tribe of Canada
Cree
Australia   Aboriginal Australians, word used until the 19th century   Languages   Languages of India, including Indo-Aryan languages and Dravidian languages  Indigenous languages of the Americas, spoken by indigenous peoples from Alaska and Greenland to the southern tip of South America   Arts    Film and television   Indian (1996 film), a Tamil film  Indian (2001 film), a Hindi film  Indian soap opera, soap operas written, produced, and filmed in India   Music   Indians (artist), moniker of Danish singer Søren Løkke Juul accompanied by some musicians also collectively known as Indians  "Indian" (song), by Sturm und Drang  "Indians" (song), by Anthrax   Indian (soundtrack), an album from the 1996 film   Theatre   Indians (play), a 1968 play by Arthur Kopit   Places   Indian, West Virginia,  an unincorporated community in Kanawha County  Indian Creek (disambiguation)  Indian River (disambiguation), several rivers and communities  Indian Run (disambiguation), streams in the U.S. states of Pennsylvania and West Virginia  The Indians, British Virgin Islands islets group   Sports   Cleveland Indians, a professional baseball team based in Cleveland, Ohio  Indianapolis Indians, a minor league baseball team based in Indianapolis, Indiana  Indios de Mayagüez, a baseball team in the Puerto Rican Professional Baseball League  Mumbai Indians, a franchise cricket team representing the city of Mumbai in the Indian Premier League  Frölunda HC or  Frölunda Indians, a Swedish professional ice hockey club based in Gothenburg  Springfield Indians, a minor professional ice hockey franchise, originally based in West Springfield, Massachusetts   Other uses   Indian (airline), a now defunct state-owned airline of India  Indian (card game), a simple card game that involves strategy  Indian (motorcycle), an American brand of motorcycles manufactured from 1901 to 1953  Indian cuisine, a wide variety of regional cuisines native to India  Indian Head cent, a coin produced by the United States Mint from 1859 to 1909  Indus (constellation), a constellation in the southern sky  Indian Ocean   See also   Hindustani (disambiguation)  India (disambiguation)  Indica (disambiguation)  Indicus (disambiguation)  Indicum (disambiguation)  Category:Demonyms
1
Indian or Indians may refer to:  People   South Asia   Something of or from the nation of India  Indian people, people of Indian nationality, or people who are citizens or residents of India  A person belonging to or from the Indian subcontinent though not necessarily from the country India  Non-resident Indian and person of Indian origin, a citizen of India who has temporarily emigrated to another country   The Americas   Indigenous peoples of the Americas, the pre-Columbian inhabitants of North and South America and their descendants  First Nations, the various Aboriginal peoples in Canada who are neither Inuit nor Métis  Native Americans in the United States, the indigenous people in the United States  Native Mexicans, indigenous people of Mexico  Indigenous peoples in South America, peoples living in South America in the pre-Columbian era and their descendents  West Indians, people from the Caribbean region and the Lucayan Archipelago  Mardi Gras Indians, African-American Carnival revelers in New Orleans, Louisiana, whose suits are influenced by Native American ceremonial apparel.
THE HOT "ROCK": This northern Illinois city of 140,000 is the seat of Winnebago County
Rockford
The city of Rockford, Illinois' third largest city and center of the state's fourth largest metropolitan area, sits along Interstates 39 and 90 some  northwest of Chicago.
3
Monks Mound, the center of the site, is the largest Pre-Columbian structure north of the Valley of Mexico.
Illinois is vulnerable to tornadoes with an average of 35 occurring annually, which puts much of the state at around five tornadoes per  annually."Annual average number of tornadoes, 1953–2004", NOAA National Climatic Data Center.
William M. Daley (1948–   ), another son of Richard J, is a former White House Chief of Staff and has served in a variety of appointed positions.
ILLINOIS, IOWA OR INDIANA: The Diamond Lady, the first of this state's riverboat casinos, launched from Bettendorf in 1991
Iowa
E. Hoxie, Encyclopedia of North American Indians (1996) 266-7, 506 As the Illini declined during the Beaver Wars era, members of the Algonquian-speaking Potawatomi, Miami, Sauk, and other tribes including the Fox (Mesquakie), Ioway, Kickapoo , Mascouten, Piankashaw, Shawnee, Wea, and Winnebago (Ho-Chunk) came into the area from the east and north around the Great Lakes.http://www.museum.state.il.us/muslink/nat_amer/post/  European exploration  thumb|Illinois in 1718, approximate modern state area highlighted, from  by Guillaume de L'Isle.
3
This etymology is not supported by the Illinois language, as the word for 'man' is ireniwa and plural 'men' is ireniwaki.
Other highlands include the Shawnee Hills in the south, and there is varying topography along its rivers; the Illinois River bisects the state northeast to southwest.
Economy  thumb|right|The Federal Reserve Bank of Chicago at the heart of Chicago's financial center  The dollar gross state product for Illinois was estimated to be  billion in 2010.
JAPAN: This automobile company is headquartered in a city of the same name in Aichi prefecture
Toyota
Exports thumb|A plug-in hybrid car manufactured by Toyota, one of the world's largest carmakers.
3
In Japan 1549–1650, University of California Press, 1951p.
Some of Japan's more prominent technological contributions are in the fields of electronics, automobiles, machinery, earthquake engineering, industrial robotics, optics, chemicals, semiconductors and metals.
Manga-influenced animation for television and film is called anime.
JAPAN: The annual Hinamatsuri, a festival of these toys, honors young girls & wishes them happiness
Dolls
Traditional Japanese arts include crafts such as ceramics, textiles, lacquerware, swords and dolls; performances of bunraku, kabuki, noh, dance, and rakugo; and other practices, the tea ceremony, ikebana, martial arts, calligraphy, origami, onsen, Geisha and games.
3
Akihito is the current Emperor of Japan; Naruhito, Crown Prince of Japan, stands as next in line to the Chrysanthemum Throne.
Most Japanese continue to see Japan as a monocultural society.
Japanese is an agglutinative language distinguished by a system of honorifics reflecting the hierarchical nature of Japanese society, with verb forms and particular vocabulary indicating the relative status of speaker and listener.
SHALL WE DANCE?: From words meaning "song", "dance" & "skill", it's a theatrical form of dance in Japan
Kabuki
Traditional Japanese arts include crafts such as ceramics, textiles, lacquerware, swords and dolls; performances of bunraku, kabuki, noh, dance, and rakugo; and other practices, the tea ceremony, ikebana, martial arts, calligraphy, origami, onsen, Geisha and games.
3
Japan contributed non-combatant troops to the Iraq War but subsequently withdrew its forces.
Fewer than one percent of Japanese are Christian.
Culture  thumb|Kinkaku-ji or 'The Temple of the Golden Pavilion' in Kyoto, Special Historic Site, Special Place of Scenic Beauty, and UNESCO World Heritage Site; its torching by a monk in 1950 is the subject of a novel by Mishima.
STARS ON THE MAP: This capital lies on the southern part of the Kanto plain, one of the largest areas of flat land in Japan
Tokyo
Approximately 9.1 million people live in Tokyo, the capital city of Japan, which is the second largest city proper in the OECD.
3
In the late 19th and early 20th centuries, victories in the First Sino-Japanese War, the Russo-Japanese War and World War I allowed Japan to expand its empire during a period of increasing militarism.
Statutory law originates in Japan's legislature and has the rubber stamp of the Emperor.
This process will reduce the number of sub-prefecture administrative regions and is expected to cut administrative costs.
CHARADES: (Cheryl of the Clue Crew.)  A James Bond movie, three words:
Diamonds Are Forever
1953 Casino Royale  1954 Live and Let Die  1955 Moonraker  1956 Diamonds Are Forever  1957 From Russia, with Love  1958 Dr. No  1959 Goldfinger 1960 For Your Eyes
3
The book—titled Devil May Care—was published in the UK by Penguin Books and by Doubleday in the US. American writer Jeffery Deaver was then commissioned by Ian Fleming Publications to produce Carte Blanche, which was published on 26 May 2011.
Several comic book adaptations of the James Bond films have been published through the years: at the time of Dr. No's release in October 1962, a comic book adaptation of the screenplay, written by Norman J. Nodel, was published in Britain as part of the Classics Illustrated anthology series.
Other handguns used by Bond in the Fleming books included the Colt Detective Special and a long-barrelled Colt .45 Army Special.
JUDAISM: Reform Jews, who doubt that this will be rebuilt in Jerusalem, use this same term for their houses of worship
the temple
Many laws were only applicable when the Temple in Jerusalem existed, and fewer than 300 of these commandments are still applicable today.
3
For the sages of the Mishnah and Talmud, and for their successors today, the study of Torah was therefore not merely a means to learn the contents of God's revelation, but an end in itself.
Humanistic Judaism is a small non-theistic movement centered in North America and Israel that emphasizes Jewish culture and history as the sources of Jewish identity.
Middle East Forum. Retrieved on 2013-07-28.Shumsky, Dmitry.
THE WAR OF 1812: Negotiators for the U.S. in Ghent included John Quincy Adams & this Speaker of the House from Kentucky
Henry Clay
His opponents included John C. Calhoun, William H. Crawford, Henry Clay, and the hero of New Orleans, Andrew Jackson.
3
These visits take up so much of my time, that I sometimes think of taking a resolution not to receive them; but, on the other hand, so much information important to be possessed, and particularly relative to current political events, is to be collected from them, that they are rather to be encouraged than discountenanced."  In 1814, Adams was recalled from Russia to serve as chief negotiator of the U.S. commission for the Treaty of Ghent, which ended the War of 1812 between the United States and United Kingdom.
Herring, George C., From Colony to Superpower: U.S. Foreign Relations Since 1776, (2008)
He is probably best known as a diplomat who shaped America's foreign policy in accordance with his ardently nationalist views, and is widely considered by historians to have been one of the greatest diplomats in American history.
STEVE BUSCEMI FILMS: As Donny, Steve didn't live to see the end of this 1998 Coen Brothers film ...but The Dude abides
The Big Lebowski
Their films include Blood Simple (1984), Raising Arizona (1987), Miller's Crossing (1990), Barton Fink (1991), Fargo (1996), The Big Lebowski (1998), O Brother, Where Art Thou? (2000), No Country for Old Men (2007), Burn
3
The film received several awards, including a BAFTA award and Cannes award for direction, and two Oscars: a Best Original Screenplay and a Best Actress Oscar for McDormand.
Only six other directors have won three Oscars for the same film, a distinction the duo shares with Billy Wilder, James L. Brooks, Francis Ford Coppola, James Cameron, Peter Jackson and later Alejandro González Iñárritu in 2015.
Deakins has been the Coen brothers' cinematographer for all their subsequent films except Burn After Reading, on which they employed Emmanuel Lubezki, and Inside Llewyn Davis, on which they employed Bruno Delbonnel.
MOVIES ABOUT THE MOVIES: John Turturro played this title screenwriter in a 1991 Coen Brothers film
Barton Fink
Their films include Blood Simple (1984), Raising Arizona (1987), Miller's Crossing (1990), Barton Fink (1991), Fargo (1996), The Big Lebowski (1998), O Brother, Where Art Thou? (2000), No Country for Old Men (2007), Burn
3
It won the Grand Prix at the 2013 Cannes Film Festival, where it was highly praised by critics.
They have been nominated for the Best Original Screenplay at the upcoming 88th Academy Awards.
Production company  The Coen brothers' own film production company, Mike Zoss Productions located in New York City, has been credited on their films from O Brother, Where Art Thou?
HOLIDAYS & OBSERVANCES: On June 17 Suffolk County in this state celebrates Bunker Hill Day
Massachusetts
William Crookes, English chemist and physicist (d. 1919) 1839 – Arthur Tooth, English priest (d. 1931) 1858 – Eben Sumner Draper, American businessman and politician, 44th Governor of Massachusetts (d. 1914) 1861
3
Fuku Suzuki, Japanese actor and singer  Deaths  656 – Uthman, Persian ruler (b. 577)  676
Danny Cedrone, American guitarist and bandleader (b. 1920) 1956 – Percival Perry, 1st Baron Perry, English businessman (b. 1878)   1956   –
Atiqul Haque Chowdhury, Bangladeshi playwright and producer (b. 1930)   2013   – Pierre F. Côté, Canadian lawyer and civil servant (b. 1927)   2013   – Bulbs Ehlers, American basketball player (b. 1923)   2013   – James Holshouser, American politician, 68th Governor of North Carolina (b. 1934)   2013   – Jalil Shahnaz, Iranian tar player and composer (b. 1921) 2014
1945: In 1945 John Steinbeck published this novel about life on the Monterey waterfront
"Cannery Row"
However, the street that Steinbeck described as "Cannery Row" in the novel, once named Ocean View Avenue, was renamed Cannery Row in honor of the novel, in 1958.
3
Opinions on Nobel Prize The award of the 1962 Nobel Prize for Literature to Steinbeck was controversial in the United States.
Works such as Of Mice and Men are short and easy to read, and compassionately illustrate universal themes that are still relevant in the 21st century.
R.S. Hughes.
"IN" THE MOVIES: This 1996 blockbuster showed humanity fighting for freedom from enslaving aliens on July 4
Independence Day
Due to the post-Independence Day admission of Hawaii as the 50th U.S. state on August 21, 1959, the 50-star flag of the United States debuts in Philadelphia, almost ten and a half months later (see Flag Act).
3
993
William Ramallo, Bolivian footballer and coach   1963
–
THE 4 BEATLES: In October 1967 John Lennon sponsored an exhibit of her work at the Lisson Art Gallery
Yoko Ono
After his marriage to Yoko Ono in 1969, he changed his name to John Ono Lennon.
3
By the summer of 1957, the Quarrymen played a "spirited set of songs" made up of half skiffle and half rock and roll.
After Ono was injured in a car accident, Lennon arranged for a king-sized bed to be brought to the recording studio as he worked on the Beatles' last album, Abbey Road.
Vocal style
A WOMAN SCORNED: When this mythological woman chopped up her own brother, Jason should have known not to make her jealous
Medea
He was married to the sorceress Medea.
1
Pelias' daughters saw this and wanted the same service for their father.
HALF-BROTHERS: Cato the Younger was half-brother of Servilia, mother of this chief assassin of Julius Caesar
Brutus
44 BC, Caesar was assassinated by a group of rebellious senators led by Marcus Junius Brutus.
3
Feeling it much safer to be far away from Sulla should the Dictator change his mind, Caesar quit Rome and joined the army, serving under Marcus Minucius Thermus in Asia and Servilius Isauricus in Cilicia.
The most important change, however, was his reform of the calendar.
The Roman middle and lower classes, with whom Caesar was immensely popular and had been since before Gaul, became enraged that a small group of aristocrats had killed their champion.
BIBLICAL PEOPLE & PLACES: (Alex stands at the Western Wall in Jerusalem.) The Western Wall is the only remnant of a retaining wall that was built to support the Temple Mount; now tradition says this mount was Moriah, the site where this patriarch prepared to sacrifice his son
Abraham
It is considered holy to the three major Abrahamic religions—Judaism, Christianity and Islam.
3
14,35.
At the time of the proclamation, Jerusalem was divided between Israel and Jordan and thus only West Jerusalem was proclaimed Israel's capital.
One of them, Holyland Tower 1, Jerusalem's tallest building, is a skyscraper by international standards, rising 32 stories.
BIBLICAL WARRIORS: Joab was this Israelite king's successful commander when he conquered Jerusalem around 1000 B.C.
David
According to the Biblical tradition, King David conquered the city from the Jebusites and established it as the capital of the United Kingdom of Israel, and his son, King Solomon, commissioned the building of the First Temple.
3
In the war of 1948, the western part of the city was occupied by forces of the nascent state of Israel, while the eastern part was occupied by Jordan.
Unlike public schools, many Haredi schools do not prepare students to take standardized tests.
The State of Palestine (according to the Basic Law of Palestine, Title One: Article 3) regards Jerusalem as its capital.
COUNTRY SINGERS WHO ACT: Glen Campbell co-starred in this 1969 film, but unlike John Wayne, he didn't win an Oscar for it
True Grit
An Academy Award-winner for True Grit (1969), Wayne was among the top box office draws for three decades.
3
Marion Mitchell Morrison (born Marion Robert Morrison; May 26, 1907 – June 11, 1979), known by his stage name John Wayne, was an American film actor, director, and producer.
Bacon, James (June 27, 1978). "John Wayne: The Last Cowboy".
" The university's official position is not to object if Wayne's image is used, but if the company wants to use the Duke name without Wayne, the university says, "we are also committed to protecting the integrity of Duke University's trademarks."
LAKES & RIVERS: In chapter 3 of the Biblical book named for him, Joshua leads the Israelites across this river
the Jordan
Biblical narrative  The Exodus left|thumb|250px|"The Children of Israel Crossing the Jordan" by Benjamin West, 1800  Joshua was a major figure in the events of the Exodus.
3
& 446Fausset's Bible Dictionary
Baroque composer Georg Frideric Handel composed an oratorio "Joshua" in 1747.
See also  Joshua Roll
FAMOUS AMERICANS: He delivered eulogies for Jackie Robinson in 1972 & Cleveland mayor Carl Stokes in 1996
Rev. Jesse Jackson
Many of his former teammates and other famous baseball players served as pallbearers, and the Rev. Jesse Jackson gave the eulogy.
3
The Dodgers, by playing Robinson, ended racial segregation that had relegated black players to the Negro leagues since the 1880s.
The trade, however, was never completed; unbeknownst to the Dodgers, Robinson had already agreed with the president of Chock full o'Nuts to quit baseball and become an executive with the company.
255–257.
AUTHORS: "The Power of Myth" is a book based on his conversations on PBS with Joseph Campbell
Bill Moyers
Citing a conversation between Campbell and Bill Moyers.
3
Evolution of myth Campbell's view of mythology was by no means static and his books describe in detail how mythologies evolved through time, reflecting the realities in which each society had to adjust.
Paglia has described Campbell's work as a "fanciful, showy mishmash".
The Joseph Campbell Phenomenon: Implications for the Contemporary Church (1992) Noel, Daniel C. (Editor) Paths to the Power of Myth (1994) Snyder, Tom.
THE REVOLUTIONARY WAR: In August 1779 naval hero John Paul Jones took command of the ship Duras, which he renamed this
Bonhomme Richard
Bonhomme Richard thumb|Engraving based on the painting Action Between the Serapis and Bonhomme Richard by Richard Paton, published 1780 thumb |right |The "John Paul Jones flag" was entered into Dutch records to help Jones avoid charges of piracy when he captured the Serapis under an "unknown flag."  In 1779, Captain Jones took command of the 42-gun  (or as he preferred it, Bon Homme Richard), a merchant ship rebuilt and given to America by the French shipping magnate, Jacques-Donatien Le Ray.
3
Brady, 1906 pp.10, 164
Were it not for the endorsement of Richard Henry Lee who knew of his abilities, Jones's potential would likely have gone unrecognized.
Another factor may have been the resentment of several ex-British naval officers also in Russian employment, who regarded Jones as a renegade and refused to speak to him.
A SCHOOL OF DAUPHINS: In the 15th Century, Joan of Arc fought to restore this Dauphin of France to the throne
Charles VII
Joan said she received visions of the Archangel Michael, Saint Margaret, and Saint Catherine instructing her to support Charles VII and recover France from English domination late in the Hundred Years' War.
3
Yet you should not marvel if I do not enter that city so quickly.
In February 2006 a team of forensic scientists announced the beginning of a six-month study to assess bone and skin remains from a museum at Chinon and reputed to be those of the heroine.
Catholic Online Saints - short biography from Catholic Online Saints.
THE OSCARS: Winning for Best Supporting Actress, she called Jon Voight "A great actor, but a better father"
Angelina Jolie
He is the father of actress Angelina Jolie and actor James Haven.
3
He married actress Marcheline Bertrand in 1971.
Voight described the process leading up to the episode in an interview on the Red Carpet at the 2006 BAFTA Emmy Awards:  Well what happened was I was asked to be on Seinfeld.
In 2005, he played Pope John Paul II in the second part of CBS' miniseries, Pope John Paul II.
AQUATIC-SOUNDING CINEMA: I know it's confusing, but in this movie sequel, Julia Roberts played Tess, who impersonated Julia Roberts
Ocean's Twelve
Her films Mystic Pizza (1988), Sleeping with the Enemy (1991), Hook (1991), The Pelican Brief (1993), My Best Friend's Wedding (1997), Conspiracy Theory (1997), Notting Hill (1999), Runaway Bride (1999), Ocean's Eleven (2001), Mona Lisa Smile (2003), Ocean's Twelve (2004), Charlie Wilson's War (2007), Valentine's Day (2010), Eat Pray Love (2010), and Mirror Mirror (2012) have collectively brought box office receipts of over $2.6 billion, making her one of the most successful actresses in terms of box office receipts.
3
She starred in the films Stepmom (1998), alongside Susan Sarandon, Notting Hill (1999), with Hugh Grant, and, also in 1999, in Runaway Bride, her second film with Richard Gere.
Reviews of the film were generally unfavorable: critics' felt that despite its famous cast, the movie lacked "sympathetic characters" and was "only funny in spurts."
In 2005, she was featured in the music video for the single "Dreamgirl" by the Dave Matthews Band; it was her first music video appearance.
PIZZA: Early in her career Julia Roberts played Daisy in this tasty film
Mystic Pizza
Her films Mystic Pizza (1988), Sleeping with the Enemy (1991), Hook (1991), The Pelican Brief (1993), My Best Friend's Wedding (1997), Conspiracy Theory (1997), Notting Hill (1999), Runaway Bride (1999), Ocean's Eleven (2001), Mona Lisa Smile (2003), Ocean's Twelve (2004), Charlie Wilson's War (2007), Valentine's Day (2010), Eat Pray Love (2010), and Mirror Mirror (2012) have collectively brought box office receipts of over $2.6 billion, making her one of the most successful actresses in terms of box office receipts.
3
They later co-founded the Atlanta Actors and Writers Workshop in Atlanta, Georgia, off Juniper Street in Midtown.
Over the next few years, she starred in Stephen Frears' Mary Reilly (1996), followed by My Best Friend's Wedding in 1997.
A success with critics and at the box office alike, Ocean's Eleven became the fifth highest-grossing film of the year with a total of $450 million worldwide.
POP-EYE: He met future ex Julia Roberts while playing a detective in Robert Altman's "The Player"
Lyle Lovett
On June 25, 1993, she married country singer Lyle Lovett; the wedding took place at St. James Lutheran Church in Marion, Indiana.
3
The film garnered largely lukewarm reviews by critics, who found it "predictable and safe".
In 2013, Roberts appeared in August: Osage County, playing one of Meryl Streep's character's three daughters.
Her performance earned her nominations for the Golden Globe Award, Screen Actors Guild Award, Critics' Choice Award and Academy Award for Best Supporting Actress, amongst other accolades.
TV TITLE REFERENCES: The Kansas hamlet that's home to the Kents
Smallville
The 2013 film Man of Steel is set primarily in Kansas (as Superman is from Smallville, Kansas –
3
5 United Parcel Service 3,500 Lenexa Package Delivery and Logistics
History The history of professional sports in Kansas probably dates from the establishment of the minor league baseball Topeka Capitals and Leavenworth Soldiers in 1886 in the Western League.
PSU passed Hillsdale College at the top of the all-time victories list in the 1995 season on its march to the national runner-up finish.
QUOTATIONS: Karl Marx: this "is the opium of the people"
religion
Like Marx, the Young Hegelians were critical of Hegel's metaphysical assumptions, but adopted his dialectical method in order to criticise established society, politics, and religion from a leftist perspective.; ; .
3
The newspaper attracted the attention of the Prussian government censors, who checked every issue for seditious material before printing; Marx lamented that "Our newspaper has to be presented to the police to be sniffed at, and if the police nose smells anything un-Christian or un-Prussian, the newspaper is not allowed to appear."; ; .
Commodity fetishism provides an example of what Engels called "false consciousness", which relates closely to the understanding of ideology.
Fine, Ben.
BROADWAY STARS: Kevin Spacey gave us a hickey to remember in the brilliant revival of this Eugene O'Neill drama
The Iceman Cometh
Spacey won the Laurence Olivier Award for Best Actor and earned another Tony nomination in 1999 for The Iceman Cometh.
3
Early life Spacey was born in South Orange, New Jersey, to Kathleen Ann (née Knutson; December 5, 1931 – March 19, 2003), a secretary, and Thomas Geoffrey Fowler (June 4, 1924 – December 24, 1992), a technical writer and data consultant.
He made his first major television appearance in the second season premiere of Crime Story, playing a Kennedy-esque American senator.
He took on the part of Clarence Darrow in the play.
"B" FOLKS: This American Jewish conductor & composer wrote "Jeremiah" & "Kaddish" symphonies
Leonard Bernstein
In music (Alphabetical by creator)Kaddish is the name of Symphony No. 3 by Leonard Bernstein, a dramatic work for orchestra, mixed chorus, boys' choir, speaker and soprano solo dedicated to the memory of John F. Kennedy who was assassinated on November 22, 1963, just weeks before the first performance of this symphony.
3
The oldest version of the Kaddish is found in the Siddur of Rab Amram Gaon, c. 900.
Recent additions to Oseh Shalom In some recent prayerbooks, for example, the American Reform Machzor, line 36 is replaced with:  36 all Israel, and all who dwell on earth; and let us say: Amen. v'al kol isra'el, v'al kol yoshvei teiveil; v'imru: Amen.
The Mourner's Kaddish can be heard being recited by Collins and Roger during the song "La Vie Boheme" in the musical Rent.
U.S. CITIES: Located in the heart of Kentucky's Bluegrass Region, it was named for a Massachusetts city
Lexington
One of the major regions in Kentucky is the Bluegrass Region in central Kentucky which houses two of its major cities, Louisville and Lexington.
3
The population density of the state is 101.7 people per square mile.
The county had a population that is 20% African American.
In 2014, Kentucky was found to be the most affordable US state in which to live.
WHAT UP, DOG?: Zeppo Marx helped establish the U.S. line of this hound that would feel at home in Kandahar
Afghan
Kandahar () or Qandahar ( , Persian: قندهار, , known in older literature as Candahar) is the second-largest city in Afghanistan, with a population of about 491,500 as of 2012.
2
History  Prehistory  Excavations of prehistoric sites by archaeologists such as Louis Dupree and others suggest that the region around Kandahar is one of the oldest human settlements known so far.
I (165 BC - 135 BC) of the Indo-Greek Kingdom practiced Greco-Buddhism and is recorded by the Mahavamsa (Chap.
DOUGH: The name of this unit of currency used in Libya is from the Latin for "ten"
Dinar
His face is currently printed on the Libyan ten dinar note in memory and recognition of his patriotism.
3
It was intended to supplant terms applied to Ottoman Tripolitania, the coastal region of what is today Libya having been ruled by the Ottoman Empire from 1551 to 1911, as the Eyalet of Tripolitania.
In 1793, Turkish officer Ali Benghul deposed Hamet Karamanli and briefly restored Tripolitania to Ottoman rule.
Due to severe lack of infrastructure, many under-developed areas and small towns do not have restaurants and instead food stores may be the only source to obtain food products.
WORLD GEOGRAPHY: Libya's Gulf of Sidra is the southernmost point of this huge sea
Mediterranean Sea
Libya ( )http://publications.europa.eu/code/en/en-5000500.htm European Union: Full name of Libya is now Libyahttps://www.cia.gov/library/publications/the-world-factbook/geos/ly.html CIA's World Factbook: Short form: Libya; long form: none is a country in the Maghreb region of North Africa bordered by the Mediterranean Sea to the north, Egypt to the east, Sudan to the southeast, Chad and Niger to the south, and Algeria and Tunisia to the west.
3
Libya lies between latitudes 19° and 34°N, and longitudes 9° and 26°E.  At , Libya's coastline is the longest of any African country bordering the Mediterranean.
However, natural and environmental conditions limit Libya’s agricultural production potential.
As of 2013, the UN estimates that around 12% of Libya's population (upwards of 740,000 people) is made up of foreign migrants.
DALLAS: This Dallas landmark is infamous as the last place to employ Lee Harvey Oswald
Texas School Book Depository
Return to Dallas thumb|right|Texas School Book Depository, where Oswald was an order filler On October 2, 1963, Oswald left Mexico City by bus and arrived in Dallas the next day.
3
28  Slightly built, Oswald was nicknamed Ozzie Rabbit after the cartoon character; he was also called OswaldskovichAffidavit of James Botelho because he espoused pro-Soviet sentiments.
When pressed for identification papers, he provided his Marine Corps discharge papers.
He was temporarily held in a mental institution on orders from President Kennedy's brother, Attorney General Robert Kennedy, but a grand jury refused to indict him.
DIA-GRAMMAR: (Jon of the Clue Crew indicates five Latin sentences, all translating to "dog bites man", on the monitor.) In Latin, word order doesn't affect meaning; canis is this in each sentence because it's in the nominative case
subject
The reading and interpretation of these inscriptions is the subject matter of the field of epigraphy.
3
In the United States and Canada, the American Classical League supports every effort to further the study of classics.
Often led by members of the clergy, they were shocked by the accelerated dismantling of the vestiges of the classical world and the rapid loss of its literature.
For example, the compound adjective, omnipotens, "all-powerful," was produced from the adjectives omnis, "all", and potens, "powerful", by dropping the final s of omnis and concatenating.
NATION"Z": Its Latin name, Helvetia, appears on its coins & stamps
Switzerland
Switzerland adopts the country's Latin short name "Helvetia" on coins and stamps, since there is no room to use all of the nation's four official languages.
3
Similarly Canada's motto "A mari usque ad mare" (from sea to sea) and most provincial mottos are also in Latin (e.g., British Columbia's is Splendor Sine Occasu (splendor without diminishment)).
Labial Dental Palatal Velar Glottal plain labial Plosive voiced b d ɡ  voiceless p t  k kʷ Fricative voiced  z voiceless f s h Nasal m n     Rhotic r    Approximant  l j w  During the time of Old and Classical Latin, the Latin alphabet had no distinction between uppercase and lowercase, and the letters  did not exist.
This means that subject (nominative) pronouns are generally unnecessary for the first (I, we) and second (you) persons, unless emphasis on the subject is needed.
ON ITS EASTERN BORDER: Lesotho
South Africa
Lesotho (; ), officially the Kingdom of Lesotho (), is an enclaved, landlocked country in southern Africa completely surrounded by South Africa.
3
Many older houses, especially in smaller towns and villages, are of this type, with walls usually constructed from large stones cemented together.
The blankets are ubiquitous throughout the country during all seasons, and worn differently for men and women.
International data from UNODC found the incidence of rapes recorded in 2008 by the police to be the highest in Lesotho."Rape at the National Level, number of police recorded offenses".
WORLD CITIES: With some 200 inches of rain per year, this capital of Liberia is one of the world's wettest cities
Monrovia
It built the Freeport of Monrovia and Roberts International Airport under the Lend-Lease program before its entry into the world.
3
Liberia also began to take a more active role in international affairs.
At $0.54 per kWh, the electricity tariff in Liberia is among the highest in the world.
See also  Gender inequality in Liberia  Ebola virus epidemic in Liberia  References  Further reading                   Wilton Sankawulo, Great Tales of Liberia.
LITERARY QUOTES: In "A Study in Scarlet" this author called London "that great cesspool"
Arthur Conan Doyle
Later important depictions of London from the 19th and early 20th centuries are Dickens' novels, and Arthur Conan Doyle's Sherlock Holmes stories.
3
The Monument in the City of London provides views of the surrounding area while commemorating the Great Fire of London, which originated nearby.
However, the population then grew by just over a million between the 2001 and 2011 Censuses, to reach 8,173,941 in the latter enumeration."2011 Census.
Notable mosques include the East London Mosque in Tower Hamlets, London Central Mosque on the edge of Regent's Park and the Baitul Futuh Mosque of the Ahmadiyya Muslim Community.
RIOT!: The Clash song "White Riot" was inspired by the chaos in this London area, title of a Hugh Grant-Julia Roberts film
Notting Hill
There is a variety of annual events, beginning with the relatively new New Year's Day Parade, fireworks display at the London Eye, the world's second largest street party, the Notting Hill Carnival is held during the late August Bank Holiday each year.
3
This bridge either crossed the Thames, or went to a now lost island in the river.
By about 680, it had revived sufficiently to become a major port, although there is little evidence of large-scale production of goods.
Accent There are many accents that are traditionally thought of as London accents.
TO THE NEAREST...: To the nearest hour, flight time of the Concorde from London to New York
4
A report by the McKinsey Global Institute published in 2012 estimated that London had a city GDP of US$751.8 billion in 2010, compared to US$764.2 billion for Paris, making them respectively the sixth- and fifth-largest in the world.
3
Greater London's population declined steadily in the decades after the Second World War, from an estimated peak of 8.6 million in 1939 to around 6.8 million in the 1980s.
London attracts 27 million overnight-stay visitors every year."
A Journal of the Plague Year (1722) by Daniel Defoe is a fictionalisation of the events of the 1665 Great Plague.
LONDON LANDMARKS: The statue of Eros, in this circle, was a tribute to Lord Shaftesbury; the bow & arrow, a play on his name
Piccadilly Circus
Other famous landmarks include Buckingham Palace, the London Eye, Piccadilly Circus, St Paul's Cathedral, Tower Bridge, Trafalgar Square, and The Shard.
3
thumb|left|A view from Victoria Tower, in late 1920s Primarily starting in the mid-1960s, London became a centre for the worldwide youth culture, exemplified by the Swinging London subculture associated with the King's Road, Chelsea and Carnaby Street.
Estimates produced by the Office for National Statistics indicate that the five largest foreign-born groups living in London in the period July 2009 to June 2010 were those born in India, Poland, the Republic of Ireland, Bangladesh and Nigeria.
The well-known St Paul's Cathedral in the City and Southwark Cathedral south of the river are Anglican administrative centres, while the Archbishop of Canterbury, principal bishop of the Church of England and worldwide Anglican Communion, has his main residence at Lambeth Palace in the London Borough of Lambeth.
CHARACTERS WITH MIDDLE NAMES: This detective calls blackmailer Charles Augustus Milverton the worst man in London
Sherlock Holmes
left|thumb|Sherlock Holmes Museum in Baker Street, bearing the number 221B The pilgrims in Geoffrey Chaucer's late 14th-century Canterbury Tales set out for Canterbury from London – specifically, from the Tabard inn, Southwark.
3
Rebuilding took over ten years and was supervised by Robert Hooke as Surveyor of London.
In 2015 there were 112 homicides, a 20% increase over 2014.
HESA. Retrieved 6 April 2015 It includes four large multi-faculty universities – King's College London, Queen Mary, Royal Holloway and UCL – and a number of smaller and more specialised institutions including Birkbeck, the Courtauld Institute of Art, Goldsmiths, Guildhall School of Music and Drama, the Institute of Education, the London Business School, the London School of Economics, the London School of Hygiene & Tropical Medicine, the Royal Academy of Music, the Central School of Speech and Drama, the Royal Veterinary College and the School of Oriental and African Studies.
IT'S ON THE TIP OF MY TONGUE: You know, this place...  London's West End...  775 rooms, 4 main wings, a 40-acre garden... Ah, geez...
Buckingham Palace
Other famous landmarks include Buckingham Palace, the London Eye, Piccadilly Circus, St Paul's Cathedral, Tower Bridge, Trafalgar Square, and The Shard.
3
It is one of the world's leading financial centres and has the fifth-or sixth-largest metropolitan area GDP in the world depending on measurement.
Prehistory  Two recent discoveries indicate probable very early settlements near the Thames in the London area.
More recent artists to emerge from the London music scene include George Michael, Kate Bush, Seal, Siouxsie and the Banshees, Bush, the Spice Girls, Jamiroquai, Blur, The Prodigy, Gorillaz, Mumford & Sons, Coldplay, Amy Winehouse, Adele, Ed Sheeran and One Direction.
TENNIS, ANYONE?: In July 1877 the first tennis championships were played on a croquet lawn in this London suburb
Wimbledon
Areas that provide for walks include Wimbledon Common, Epping Forest, Hampton Court Park, Hampstead Heath, the eight Royal Parks, canals and disused railway tracks.
3
Rising traffic congestion led to the creation of the world's first local urban rail network.
London's largest industry is finance, and its financial exports make it a large contributor to the UK's balance of payments.
London is a major international air transport hub with the largest city airspace in the world.
SCIENCE: It's the largest number in the Fibonacci sequence that's also a day in a month
21
He carried the calculation up to the thirteenth place (fourteenth in modern counting), that is 233, though another manuscript carries it to the next place: 1, 1, 2, 3, 5, 8, 13, 21, 34, 55, 89, 144, 233, 377.Fibonacci Numbers from The On-Line Encyclopedia of Integer Sequences.
3
In 1240 the Republic of Pisa honored Fibonacci (referred to as Leonardo Bigollo)See the incipit of Flos: "Incipit flos
Liber Abaci posed, and solved, a problem involving the growth of a population of rabbits based on idealized assumptions.
, 1857 & 1862) Il liber abbaci and Practica Geometriae - digital facsimile from the Linda Hall Library  Category:1250 deaths Category:1170 births Category:13th-century Latin writers Category:13th-century Italian mathematicians Category:Fibonacci numbers Category:Italian Roman Catholics Category:Medieval European mathematics Category:Number theorists Category:People from Pisa
TEXT MESSAGING: In this classic by Louisa May Alcott, Mrs. March got a letter addressed to "My precious Marmee" from her "Topsy-turvy Jo"
Little Women
Louisa May Alcott (; November 29, 1832 – March 6, 1888) was an American novelist and poet best known as the author of the novel Little Women (1868) and its sequels Little Men (1871) and Jo's Boys (1886).
3
Bronson Alcott's opinions on education and tough views on child-rearing shaped young Alcott's  mind with a desire to achieve perfection, a goal of the transcendentalists.
Their works were, as one newspaper columnist of the period commented, "among the decided 'signs of the times'"  Later years Alcott suffered chronic health problems in her later years,Maura Lerner,  Star Tribune, August 12, 2007.
A collection of ten short stories.
FAMOUS AMERICANS: A statue of this man assassinated in 1935 represents Louisiana in National Statuary Hall
Huey Long
Beginning in the 1940s, blacks went West to California for jobs in its expanding defense industries. "African American Migration Experience: The Great Migration", In Motion, New York Public Library, Schomburg Center for Research in Black Culture, accessed April 24, 2008  During some of the Great Depression, Louisiana was led by Governor Huey Long.
3
As a result, France received only $8,831,250 in cash for Louisiana.
According to the 2010 United States Census, 5.4% of the population aged 5 and older spoke Spanish at home, up from 3.5% in 2000; and 4.5% spoke French (including Louisiana French and Louisiana Creole), down from 4.8% in 2000.American FactFinder - ResultsAmerican FactFinder - Results  Race and ethnicity According to the 2010 US census, the population of Louisiana was:Louisiana QuickFacts from the US Census Bureau.
When petroleum and gas boomed in the 1970s, so did Louisiana's economy.
AMERICAN HISTORY: Unaware of the Treaty of Ghent signed earlier, the British attacked this Louisiana city on Jan. 8, 1815
New Orleans
Its capital is Baton Rouge and largest city is New Orleans.
3
The current United States Senators are Republicans David Vitter and Bill Cassidy.
Differences still exist between Louisianan civil law and the common law found in the other U.S. states.
Until the 1970s, Cajuns were often considered lower-class citizens, with the term "Cajun" being somewhat derogatory.
LET'S GO SHOPPING: Bourbon French Parfums in this Louisiana city has sold custom-blended fragrances for over 150 years
New Orleans
Its capital is Baton Rouge and largest city is New Orleans.
1
Louisiana and California (whose supreme court is seated in San Francisco) are the only two states whose high courts are not headquartered in the state capital.
AMERICAN HISTORY: Though elected to the senate in 1930, this Louisiana governor didn't take his seat until 1932
Huey Long
Beginning in the 1940s, blacks went West to California for jobs in its expanding defense industries. "African American Migration Experience: The Great Migration", In Motion, New York Public Library, Schomburg Center for Research in Black Culture, accessed April 24, 2008  During some of the Great Depression, Louisiana was led by Governor Huey Long.
3
Tornadoes are more common from January to March in the southern part of the state, and from February through March in the northern part of the state.
Despite opposition by the States Rights Party, downstate black voters began to increase their rate of registration, which also reflected the growth of their middle classes.
Elegance and Decadence, Chronicle Books, 1995, pg.
WHAT'S ON TV?: This ABC series set at Mode magazine is based on the hit Columbian telenovela "Yo Soy Betty, La Fea"
Ugly Betty
Longitudinal mode  Transverse mode  Global mode  Quasinormal mode, a type of energy dissipation of a perturbed object or field  Starvation mode, a biological condition   Computation   Mode (computer interface), distinct method of operation within a computer system, in which the same user input can produce different results depending of the state of the system  A game mode, a mode used as a game mechanic in video games  Data types in some programming languages (e.g., EL/1)  Block cipher modes of operation, in cryptography  Modes (Unix), permissions given to users and groups to access files and folders on Unix hosts  MODE (command), a DOS and Windows command line utility for the configuration of devices and the console  Asynchronous Transfer Mode, a method of digital communication   Popular culture and business   Mode Records, a record label  Mode.com and Mode Media  MODE Magazine, an out-of-print U.S. women's fashion magazine featuring plus-size clothing shot inVogue-like aesthetic  Mode magazine, a fictional fashion magazine which is the setting for the ABC series Ugly Betty  Fashion  Explosive Mode, a 1998 album by San Quinn and Messy Marv  Mode series, a quartet of novels by Piers Anthony  The Devil's Mode, a collection of short stories by Anthony Burgess  Places  Mode, Banmauk, a village in Burma  Mode, Illinois, an unincorporated community in Shelby County, Illinois, United States  Other uses  Transport mode, a means of transportation  A technocomplex of stone tools  Mode of production, a Marxist term for way of producing goods   See also   Modal (disambiguation)  Modality (disambiguation)
1
Mode ( meaning "manner, tune, measure, due measure, rhythm, melody") may refer to:  Language  Grammatical mode or grammatical mood, a category of verbal inflections that expresses an attitude of mind  Imperative mood  Subjunctive mood  Rhetorical modes, a category of discourse  Narrative mode, the type of method voice and point of view used to convey a narrative  Modes of persuasion, oratorical devices  Mode (literature), the general category of a literary work, e.g. the pastoral mode  Music  Mode (music), a system of musical tonality involving a type of scale coupled with a set of characteristic melodic behaviors  Modus (medieval music)  Gregorian mode, a system of modes used in Gregorian chant (as opposed to ancient Greek modes or Byzantine octoechos)  Mathematics  Mode (statistics), the most common value among a group  Modes of convergence, a property of a series  Modes of a linear field  Science  Normal mode, patterns of vibration in acoustics, electromagnetic theory, etc.
MTV: One of MTV's most popular series ever featured this family: Ozzy, Kelly, Jack & Sharon
The Osbournes
The Osbournes, a reality show based on the everyday life of Black Sabbath frontman Ozzy Osbourne, his wife Sharon, and two of their children, Jack and Kelly, premiered on MTV in 2002.
3
The creative use of music videos within their 1964 debut film A Hard Day's Night, particularly the performance of "Can't Buy Me Love", led MTV decades later to honor the film's director, Richard Lester, with an award for "basically inventing" the music video.
" It's On was cancelled in December of the same year, which again eliminated the only live in-studio programming from MTV's schedule, just one year after TRL was also cancelled.
The service hosted at the domain name was originally branded "MTV Online" during MTV's first few years of control over it in the mid-1990s.
LETTERS & NUMBERS: Viacom Inc. owns MTV as well as this music network aimed at an older audience
VH1
But after one month as a money-losing venture, Turner sold it to MTV, who redeveloped the channel into VH1.
3
At the end of each year, MTV takes advantage of its home location in New York City to broadcast live coverage on New Year's Eve in Times Square.
The show was supposed to return in Fall 2012, but was moved to MTV2 instead, where it was rebranded and merged with Sucker Free Countdown.
Shortly after the 2006 Video Music Awards, which were streamed on MTV.com and heavily utilized the MTV Overdrive features, MTV introduced a massive change for MTV.com, transforming the entire site into a Flash video-based entity.
"MAC" WORDS: The public is only allowed to use buggies, bikes & saddle horses on this Michigan resort island
Mackinac Island
Michigan has two official Governor's Residences; one is in Lansing, and the other is at Mackinac Island.
3
Cadillac later departed to serve as the French governor of Louisiana from 1710 to 1716.
An invasion of Canada which culminated in the Battle of the Thames was then launched from Michigan.
The state has 11,037 inland lakes (totaling  of inland water) in addition to  of Great Lakes waters.
SHAKESPEARE: Although not historically accurate, Shakespeare set Macbeth's demise at this hill near Perth
Dunsinane
Thirdly, a crowned child holding a tree states that Macbeth will be safe until Great Birnam Wood comes to Dunsinane Hill.
3
Gay (2002, 164)  Henry Irving was the most successful of the late-Victorian actor-managers, but his Macbeth failed to curry favour with audiences.
16 Coctober, 2014</ref>“Scottish Curse”
Rosenthal (2007, 112–3)
STATE SEALS: On this state's seal, 1847 refers to the year in which the Mormons settled there
Utah
After Smith's death in 1844, the Mormons followed Brigham Young to what would become the Utah Territory.
3
which was a distinguishing practice of many early Mormons; however it was renounced by the LDS Church in 1890; .
This vision would come to be regarded by some Mormons as the most important event in human history after the birth, ministry, and resurrection of Jesus Christ.;  (belief in the First Vision now considered second in importance only to belief in the divinity of Jesus.);  ("[N]othing we teach, nothing we live by is of greater importance than this initial declaration.").
They place considerable emphasis on "asking God" to find out if something is true.
FOREIGN EXCHANGE: Jabal al-Noor, where the Koran began to be revealed to Muhammad, is on the reverse of its 20-riyal currency
Saudi Arabia
Muhammad's birthday is celebrated as a major feast throughout the Islamic world, excluding Wahhabi-dominated Saudi Arabia where these public celebrations are discouraged.
3
168–9.
The marriage lasted for 25 years and was a happy one.
In Islamic belief, Muhammad is regarded as the last prophet sent by God for the benefit of mankind.
EXPLORATION: Diego de Ordaz was the first European to see this Aztec capital on the site of modern Mexico City
Tenochtitlan
The city was originally built on an island of Lake Texcoco by the Aztecs in 1325 as Tenochtitlan, which was almost completely destroyed in the 1521 siege of Tenochtitlan, and subsequently redesigned and rebuilt in accordance with the Spanish urban standards.
3
It was also the site of two major riots in the seventeenth century, one in 1624, the other in 1692.Ida Altman, Sarah Cline, and Javier Pescador, The Early History of Greater Mexico, Pearson 2003, pp.
With no housing available, they took over lands surrounding the city, creating huge shantytowns that extended for many miles.
The historic district is also roamed by tourist police, aiming to orient and serve tourists.
KINGS NAMED GUSTAV: Current king Carl XVI Gustaf met his wife at this event in Munich in 1972; she was an interpreter
Summer Olympics
Unlike many other German cities, which were heavily bombed and destroyed during World War II, Munich rebuilt most of its traditional cityscape and added a modern face to the city with the Olympic Stadium, while hosting the 1972 Summer Olympics.
3
Though the first attempt of the Nazi movement to overtake the German government in 1923 with the Beer Hall Putsch, which was stopped by the Bavarian police in Munich with gunfire, the Nazis declared the city after their rise to power to be Hauptstadt der Bewegung (lit.
The Bavaria statue before the neo-classical Ruhmeshalle is a monumental, bronze sand-cast 19th-century statue at Theresienwiese.
There are countless Wirtshäuser (traditional Bavarian ale houses/restaurants) all over the city area, many of which also have small outside areas.
"D"OUBLE TALK: The island of Mauritius has featured this extinct bird on quite a few stamps
the dodo
The island is widely known as the only known home of the dodo, which, along with several other avian species, was made extinct by human activities relatively shortly after the island's settlement.
3
Under British rule, the island's name reverted to Mauritius.
Charles Mathieu Isidore Decaen was a successful general in the French Revolutionary Wars and, in some ways, a rival of Napoléon I. He ruled as Governor of Isle de France and Réunion from 1803 to 1810.
The general election was again won by the Labour Party, led this time by Sir Seewoosagur Ramgoolam.
ECOLOGY: The lack of this bird on Mauritius almost caused the extinction of a nut tree there
dodo
The island is widely known as the only known home of the dodo, which, along with several other avian species, was made extinct by human activities relatively shortly after the island's settlement.
3
In 1959, Harold Macmillan had made his famous Winds of Change Speech where he acknowledged that the best option for Britain was to give complete independence to its colonies.
The politics of Mauritius take place in a framework of a parliamentary representative democratic republic, in which the President is the head of state and the Prime Minister is the head of government who is assisted by a Council of Ministers.
The island of Mauritius is divided into 20 constituencies that return three members each, while Rodrigues is a single constituency that returns two members.
A WORLD OF CURRENCY: Befitting his importance, this 13th century conqueror appears on Mongolia's currency
Genghis Khan
In 1206, Genghis Khan founded the Mongol Empire, and his grandson Kublai Khan conquered China to establish the Yuan dynasty.
3
It is bordered by Russia to the north and China to the south, east and west.
Nohlen, D, Grotz, F & Hartmann, C (2001) Elections in Asia: A data handbook, Volume II, p491 ISBN 0-19-924959-8
The aimags are:   Major cities   About 40% of the population lives in Ulaanbaatar, and in 2002 a further 23% lived in Darkhan, Erdenet, the aimag centers and sum-level permanent settlements.
OTHER CIVIL WARS: This country's civil war, lasting from 1936 to 1939, began in Morocco
Spain
It is one of only three countries (with Spain and France) to have both Atlantic and Mediterranean coastlines.
2
In 2010, security forces stormed a protest camp in the Western Sahara, triggering violent demonstrations in the regional capital El Aaiún.
The country's distinctive group of Moroccan Arabic dialects is referred to as Darija.
ANNUAL EVENTS: Every March 2 this state commemorates the 1836 signing of a Declaration of Independence from Mexico
Texas
Texas Revolution: Declaration of independence of the Republic of Texas from Mexico.
3
–
– John Cullum, American actor and singer   1930   – Emma Penella, Spanish actress (d. 2007)   1930   –
Lee Hodges, English footballer   1978   – Tomáš Kaberle, Czech ice hockey player   1978   – Giannis Skopelitis, Greek footballer 1979 –
MARSHALL ARTS: Marshall McLuhan summarized the influence of TV & computers with his aphorism "The medium is" this
the message
McLuhan is known for coining the expressions the medium is the message and the global village, and for predicting the World Wide Web almost thirty years before it was invented.
3
Old Messengers, New Media: The Legacy of Innis and McLuhan, a virtual museum exhibition at Library and Archives Canada
McLuhan thereby meshes this into the term global theater.
Penguin Canada, 2009; US edition: Marshall McLuhan: You Know Nothing of my Work!. Atlas & Company, 2011.
NAME'S THE SAME: The third largest city in Missouri & Massachusetts
Springfield
As defined by the 2010 US census, the four largest urban areas in order of population are St. Louis, Kansas City, Springfield, and Columbia.
3
Although it is usually today considered part of the Midwest, Missouri was historically considered by many to be a border state, chiefly because of the settlement of migrants from the South and its status as a slave state before the Civil War, balanced by the influence of  the St. Louis.
The center of population of Missouri itself is located in Osage County, in the city of Westphalia.
Missouri schools are commonly but not exclusively divided into three tiers of primary and secondary education: elementary school, middle school or junior high school and high school.
STATE CAPITALS: This capital was created by the Missouri legislature & laid out by the son of Daniel Boone in the 1820s
Jefferson City
Centers of Population for the 2010 Census, U.S. Census Bureau The state's capital is Jefferson City.
3
Louisiana remained nominally under Spanish control until a transfer of power to France on November 30, 1803, just three weeks before the cession to the United States.
Though regular Confederate troops staged some large-scale raids into Missouri, the fighting in the state for the next three years consisted chiefly of guerrilla warfare. "Citizen soldiers" or insurgents such as Captain William Quantrill, Frank and Jesse James, the Younger brothers, and William T. Anderson made use of quick, small-unit tactics.
These bodies comprise the Missouri General Assembly.
U.S. CITIES: If you want "mo" money, go to this Missouri city, home to the Tenth Federal Reserve Bank
Kansas City
As defined by the 2010 US census, the four largest urban areas in order of population are St. Louis, Kansas City, Springfield, and Columbia.
3
Missouri has many large river bluffs along the Mississippi, Missouri, and Meramec Rivers.
348-355 in JSTOR
External links               U.S. Census Bureau                         Category:States of the United States Category:States and territories established in 1821 Category:Midwestern United States
NUTTY TV: Walnut Grove, Minnesota was the setting for this drama of the American West
Little House on the Prairie
Life in Minnesota is depicted in movies such as Fargo, Grumpy Old Men, Grumpier Old Men, Juno, Drop Dead Gorgeous, Young Adult, A Serious Man, New in Town, and in famous television series like Little House on the Prairie, The Mary Tyler Moore Show, The Golden Girls, Coach, The Rocky and Bullwinkle Show, and Fargo.
3
Minnesota's standard of living index is among the highest in the United States, and the state is also among the best-educated and wealthiest in the nation.
Land west of the Mississippi River was acquired with the Louisiana Purchase, although a portion of the Red River Valley was disputed until the Treaty of 1818.
The remainder of the state is known as "Greater Minnesota" or "Outstate Minnesota".
MEDICAL SCHOOL: This renowned Minnesota institution opened its own med school in 1972
the Mayo Clinic
Health thumb|left|The Mayo Clinic in Rochester.
3
Steil, Mark and Tim Post.
Minnesota's leading fine art museums include the Minneapolis Institute of Art, the Walker Art Center, the Frederick R. Weisman Art Museum, and the The Museum of Russian Art (TMORA).
The course will also host the Ryder Cup in the fall of 2016, when it will become one of two courses in the U.S. to host all major golf competitions.http://hazeltinenational.com/  Interlachen Country Club has hosted the U.S. Open, U.S. Women's Open, and Solheim Cup.
THE 1830S: In 1832 an expedition led by Henry Schoolcraft discovered the source of the Mississippi at this Minnesota lake
Lake Itasca
The Mississippi River begins its journey from its headwaters at Lake Itasca and crosses the Iowa border  downstream.
3
St. Paul native F. Scott Fitzgerald writes of the social insecurities and aspirations of the young city in stories such as Winter Dreams and The Ice Palace (published in Flappers and Philosophers).
There is water transportation along the Mississippi River system and from the ports of Lake Superior.
Regional In addition to the city and county levels of government found in the United States, Minnesota has other entities that provide governmental oversight and planning.
NOVELISTS: His later works include 1949's "The God-Seeker", about a missionary in his own native Minnesota
Sinclair Lewis
Small-town life is portrayed grimly by Sinclair Lewis in the novel Main Street, and more gently and affectionately by Garrison Keillor in his tales of Lake Wobegon.
3
Gigantic Lake Agassiz formed in the northwest 13,000 years ago.
The rate of population change, and age and gender distributions, approximate the national average.
Although the high-grade ore is now depleted, taconite mining continues, using processes developed locally to save the industry.
NAME THAT ROMAN EMPEROR: 27 B.C.-14 A.D.:His sister married Mark Antony & he defeated Mark Antony
Augustus
In 27 BC, he was granted the title of Augustus, marking the final stage in the transformation of the Roman Republic into an empire, with himself as the first Roman emperor.
3
Lucius and Fulvia, supported by their army, marched on Rome and promised the people an end to the Triumvirate in favor of Antony's sole rule.
As part of the compromise between Antony and the Republicans to restore order following Caesar's murder, Publius Cornelius Dolabella was assigning the governorship of Syria and command over Caesar's planned Parthian campaign.
The lack of food in Rome caused the public to blame the Triumvirate and shift its sympathies towards Pompey.
DO YOU LIKE ME.?: Tired of this largest city in Maine?  You can take a ferry from there to Nova Scotia
Portland
In spite of its maritime position, it has a continental climate even in coastal areas such as its largest city, Portland.
3
44-6.Stanley Lieberson and Mary C. Waters, "Ethnic Groups in Flux: The Changing Ethnic Responses of American Whites", Annals of the American Academy of Political and Social Science, Vol. 487, No. 79 (September 1986), pp.
In the 1960s, Maine began to lean toward the Democrats, especially in presidential elections.
Carrie, based on the Stephen King novel, is set in Maine.
I'M NOT REALLY A SCIENTIST: In "Medicine Man" Sean Connery finds a cure for this but then loses it -- don't you hate when that happens?
Cancer
Effectiveness Some people believe Native American healing can be used to treat a variety of human ailments including heart disease, diabetes and cancer.
3
Fienup-Riordan, Ann.
Washington DC: Smithsonian Institution, 2007.
As Nuttall writes, "An inquiry to a Native person about religious beliefs or ceremonies is often viewed with suspicion.
THE STONES: The Black Stone set in this holy landmark in Mecca is actually a meteorite
Kaaba
Mecca is home to the Kaaba, by majority description Islam's holiest site, as well as being the direction of Muslim prayer.
3
In the Sharḥ al- Asāṭīr, a  commentary on the Samaritan  midrashic chronology of the Patriarchs, of unknown date but probably composed in the tenth century C.E., it is claimed that Mecca was built by the sons of Nebaioth, the eldest son of Ishmael.
Goods from Africa and the Far East passed through en route to Syria including spices, leather, medicine, cloth, and slaves; in return Mecca received money, weapons, cereals and wine, which in turn were distributed throughout Arabia.
It was in Mecca, in the nearby mountain cave of Hira on Jabal al-Nour, that, according to Islamic tradition, Muhammad began receiving divine revelations from God through the Archangel Gabriel in 610 AD, and advocated his form of Abrahamic monotheism against Meccan paganism.
ROCK YOUR WORLD: (Jimmy of the Clue Crew shows off a rock in the University of Wisconsin-Madison Geology Museum.)  The University of Wisconsin-Madison Geology Museum has the state rock of Wisconsin; not to be confused with the state rock of New Hampshire, it's the red type of this
granite
The state's nickname, "The Granite State", refers to its extensive granite formations and quarries.
3
and other mountains like Mount Madison and Mount Adams surrounding it.
Pittsburg – shares a land border with the state of Vermont.
New Hampshire was a Jacksonian stronghold; the state sent Franklin Pierce to the White House in the election of 1852.
EDUCATORS: Among the Challenger crew on its fateful mission was this social studies teacher from New Hampshire
Christa McAuliffe
Christa McAuliffe of Concord became the first private citizen selected to venture into space.
3
New Hampshire was a Jacksonian stronghold; the state sent Franklin Pierce to the White House in the election of 1852.
It immediately became the most important testing grounds for candidates for the Republican and Democratic nominations.
Democrats had not held both the legislature and the governorship since 1874.
BIG ISLANDS: L'Anse aux Meadows on this eastern Canadian island is the first authenticated Viking site in North America
Newfoundland
Alfred E. Hudd proposed a theory in 1908 that the continents are named after a Welsh merchant named Richard Amerike from Bristol, who is believed to have financed John Cabot's voyage of discovery from England to Newfoundland in 1497.
3
Figures listed here are for the entire country.
The USGS further states that "No marked or monumented point has been established by any government agency as the geographic center of either the 50 States, the conterminous United States, or the North American continent." Nonetheless, there is a  field stone obelisk in Rugby claiming to mark the center.
There are also large cities in the Caribbean.
POTENT PORTABLES: Nintendo's 1998 version of this toy can transform your black & white games to color
Game Boy
In 1988, Gunpei Yokoi and his team at Nintendo R&D1 conceived the new Game Boy handheld system, with the purpose of merging the two very successful ideas of the Game & Watch's portability along with the NES's cartridge interchangeability.
3
Both are the first such features to have come to market for home console gaming and eventually became the de facto industry standard.
Handheld consoles    Game & Watch   Game & Watch is a line of handheld electronic games produced by Nintendo from 1980 to 1991.
Policy    Content guidelines
U.S. MAYORS: In 1999 Oscar Goodman, once a lawyer for Tony "The Ant" Spilotro, was elected mayor of this Nevada city
Las Vegas
Nearly three-quarters of Nevada's people live in Clark County, which  contains the Las Vegas–Paradise metropolitan area where three of the state's four largest incorporated cities are located.
1
Historian Lawrence Friedman has explained what happened next:  "Nevada, in a burst of ingenuity, built an economy by exploiting its sovereignty.
WHAT'S "NU"?: This region on both sides of the Nile was known to the ancient Egyptians as Cush
Nubia
In the north of Sudan the river enters Lake Nasser (known in Sudan as Lake Nubia), the larger part of which is in Egypt.
3
Salama, R.B. (1997).
The White Nile system in Bahr El Arab and White Nile Rifts remained a closed lake until the connection of the Victoria Nile to the main system some 12,500 years ago.
It was published in full only in the early 20th century, although it was featured in works of Páez's contemporaries, including Baltazar Téllez,Historia geral da Ethiopia a Alta, 1660 Athanasius KircherMundus Subterraneus, 1664 and by Johann Michael Vansleb.
WORLD POLITICS: North Korea went nuclear with this man as its leader
Kim Jong-il
The Arduous March In 1992, as Kim Il-sung's health began deteriorating, Kim Jong-il slowly began taking over various state tasks.
3
The MPS, State Security and the police allegedly conduct real-time monitoring of text messages, online data transfer, monitor phone calls and automatically transcribe recorded conversations.
Occasional deliberate disinformation on the part of North Korean establishments further complicates the issue.
Document on conditions in North Korean prison camps "Show and Tell Pyongyang" –
NOW YOU'RE TALKING MY LANGUAGE: The official language of Niger, it's a remnant of its colonial times
French
- Niger  thumb|300px|Overlooking the town of Zinder and the Sultan's Palace from the French fort (1906).
3
The West African giraffe is currently not found in the W National Park, but further north in Niger, where it has its last relict population.
When Endemic Malnutrition is Labeled as Famine Eden Foundation   Mining   The Niger mining industry is the main source of national exports, of which uranium is the largest export.
United States Bureau of Democracy, Human Rights and Labor (14 September 2007).
ARMY, NAVY, AIR FORCE OR MARINES: The Civil War's David Glasgow Farragut
Navy
thumb|right|The Spanish Armada fighting the English navy at the Battle of Gravelines in 1588 thumb|INS Vikramaditya (R33) with a Sea Harrier aircraft in the Arabian Sea.
2
Successive decisive Dutch victories in the second and third Anglo-Dutch Wars confirmed the Dutch mastery of the seas during the Dutch Golden Age, financed by the expansion of the Dutch Empire.
During World War II, Nazi Germany's submarine fleet of U-boats almost starved the United Kingdom into submission and inflicted tremendous losses on U.S. coastal shipping.
IT'S AUSTRALIA, MATE: It's "evolved" to become the largest city of Australia's Northern Territory
Darwin
After three failed attempts to establish a settlement (1824–1828, 1838–1849, and 1864–66), success was achieved in 1869 with the establishment of a settlement at Port Darwin.
2
The Northern Territory is also home to two spectacular natural rock formations, Uluru (Ayers Rock) and Kata Tjuta (The Olgas), which are sacred to the local Aboriginal peoples and which have become major tourist attractions.
In 2005–06, 1.38 million people visited the Northern Territory.
LETS TAKE A "D" TOUR: It's the capital of Australia's Northern Territory, which, incidentally, is located on the Beagle Gulf
Darwin
After three failed attempts to establish a settlement (1824–1828, 1838–1849, and 1864–66), success was achieved in 1869 with the establishment of a settlement at Port Darwin.
3
Palmerston, Alice Springs, Katherine, Nhulunbuy, and Tennant Creek.
Private fee-paying schools include schools run by the Catholic Church and independent schools, some elite ones similar to English public schools.
The largest contributor to the territory's exports was: petroleum and natural gas (33.4%), metal ores and concentrates (20.0%), other manufacturing (5.9 per cent) and agriculture (4.9%).
FUN DATES: Cities can earn the designation "Tree City USA" from the foundation for this holiday in Nebraska
Arbor Day
Redbook The Arbor Day holiday was founded in Nebraska City by territorial governor J. Sterling Morton.
3
Nebraska State Historical Society.
thumb|Forested hills in the Pine Ridge region of Nebraska.
January 8, 2009.
MUSEUMS: A Kenly, North Carolina museum is devoted to the history & economic impact of this crop
Tobacco
In the past five decades, North Carolina's economy has undergone a transition from reliance upon tobacco, textiles, and furniture-making to a more diversified economy with engineering, energy, biotechnology, and finance sectors.
3
In 1788 Raleigh was chosen as the site of the new capital, as its central location protected it from attacks from the coast.
A major American victory in the war took place at King's Mountain along the North Carolina–South Carolina border; on October 7, 1780, a force of 1000 mountain men from western North Carolina (including what is today the state of Tennessee) overwhelmed a force of some 1000 British troops led by Major Patrick Ferguson.
As of 2011, 49.8% of North Carolina's population younger than age 1 were minorities.
OLD SWEET SONGS: Jimmy Gilmer & the Fireballs had a hit with "Sugar Shack" & Nancy Sinatra with this sweet place
Sugar Town
Other defining recordings include "Sugar Town", the 1967 number one "Somethin' Stupid" (a duet with her father), the title song from the James Bond film You Only Live Twice, several collaborations with Lee Hazlewood such as "Jackson", and her cover of Cher's "Bang Bang", which was used in the opening sequence of Quentin Tarantino's 2003 film Kill Bill: Volume 1.
3
("Somethin' Stupid" ranked number 27).
That year she released a non-LP single, "Sugar Me" b/w "Ain't
The single ‘
NUMBER, PLEASE: You saw thousands of spots before your eyes in the 2 Disney movies about this number of dalmatians
101
The subject has received later contributions at the hands of Weierstrass, Kronecker (Crelle, 101), and Méray.
3
Calculations with numbers are done with arithmetical operations, the most familiar being addition, subtraction, multiplication, division, and exponentiation.
The computable numbers may be viewed as the real numbers that may be exactly represented in a computer: a computable number is exactly represented by its first digits and a program for computing further digits.
Ramus (1855) first connected the subject with determinants, resulting, with the subsequent contributions of Heine, Möbius, and Günther, in the theory of Kettenbruchdeterminanten.
NUMBER, PLEASE: Years of bad luck associated with breaking a mirror
7
ISBN 978-0691118802.
3
Gilsdorf, Thomas E. Introduction to Cultural Mathematics: With Case Studies in the Otomies and Incas, John Wiley & Sons, Feb 24, 2012.Restivo, S. Mathematics in Society and History, Springer Science & Business Media, Nov 30, 1992.
Because of this, complex numbers correspond to points on the complex plane, a vector space of two real dimensions.
He treated 0 as a number and discussed operations involving it, including division.
NUMBER, PLEASE: According to World Book, it's considered the IQ of the average person
100
3400 BC) and the earliest known base 10 system dates to 3100 BC in Egypt.
3
For example,  and    (forever repeating 3s, otherwise written 0.).
The p-adic numbers play an important role in this analogy.
It had remained almost dormant since Euclid.
NUMBER, PLEASE: (AUDIO DAILY DOUBLE):Number in the title of the following Neil Sedaka hit:  "Tonight's the night, I've waited for...."
16
The 16th century brought final European acceptance of negative integral and fractional numbers.
3
Rational numbers  A rational number is a number that can be expressed as a fraction with an integer numerator and a positive integer denominator.
The elements of an algebraic function field over a finite field and algebraic numbers have many similar properties (see Function field analogy).
His student, Gotthold Eisenstein, studied the type , where ω is a complex root of  Other such classes (called cyclotomic fields) of complex numbers derive from the roots of unity  for higher values of k. This generalization is largely due to Ernst Kummer, who also invented ideal numbers, which were expressed as geometrical entities by Felix Klein in 1893.
NUMBER, PLEASE: Dial this 3-digit number on the phone to get emergency help
911
ISBN 978-0691118802.
3
Numbers can be classified into sets, called number systems, such as the natural numbers and the real numbers.
For example −7 can be written .
;   Category:Group theory   Category:Mathematical objects
BIBLE BOOKS BY QUOTATION: "And God remembered Noah, and every living thing, and all the cattle that was with him in the ark"
Genesis
The story of Noah's Ark is told in the Torah in the Genesis flood narrative.
3
Peters, DM., Noah Traditions in the Dead Sea Scrolls:
In later Christian thought, the Ark came to be compared to the Church: salvation was to be found only within Christ and his Lordship, as in Noah's time it had been found only within the Ark. St Augustine of Hippo (354–430), demonstrated in The City of God that the dimensions of the Ark corresponded to the dimensions of the human body, which corresponds to the body of Christ; the equation of Ark and Church is still found in the Anglican rite of baptism, which asks God, "who of thy great mercy didst save Noah," to receive into the Church the infant about to be baptised.
Noah is considered the head of a dispensation along with Adam, Enoch, Abraham, Moses, Jesus and Joseph Smith .
HOT TRAVEL SPOTS: If you want to climb the tallest mountain in North Africa, go to Jebel Toubkal near Marrakech in this country
Morocco
Geopolitically, the United Nations definition of Northern Africa includes seven countries Orleans  territories; Algeria, Egypt, Libya, Morocco, Sudan, Tunisia, and Western Sahara.
3
The distinction between North Africa and much of Sub-Saharan Africa is historically and ecologically significant because of the effective barrier created by the Sahara Desert for much of modern history.
People
African pope Victor I served during the reign of Roman emperor Septimius Severus, of Roman/Berber ancestry."Berbers : ...
TELEVISION HISTORY: This star, called "Mr. Television", hosted a prime-time bowling series for NBC in the 1960s
Milton Berle
jumped to CBS.  In addition, NBC stars began migrating to television, including comedian Milton Berle, whose Texaco Star Theater on the network became television's first major hit.
3
In the summer of 1987, GE sold NBC Radio's network operations to Westwood One, and sold off the NBC-owned stations to various buyers.
is he black, white or Hispanic?,"
Love and Kisses, Michael J. Fox," which Tartikoff kept in his office for the rest of his career.
OBI-WAN KENOBI'S YARD SALE: You cannot escape your destiny; you must buy my old microwave made by this company that also owns NBC
GE
The network is headquartered in the Comcast Building (formerly known as the GE Building) at Rockefeller Center in New York City, with additional major offices near Los Angeles (at Universal City Plaza), Chicago (at the NBC Tower) and soon in Philadelphia at Comcast Innovation and Technology Center.
2
On February 18, 2015, NBC began providing live programming streams of local NBC stations in select markets, which are only available to authenticated subscribers of participating pay television providers.
Caribbean In the Caribbean, many cable and satellite providers carry either select U.S.-based NBC affiliated stations or the main network feed from NBC O&Os WNBC in New York City or WTVJ in Miami.
BALLPARK NICKNAMES: Municipal Stadium in this Ohio city was not so affectionately known as "The Mistake by the Lake"
Cleveland
+Average daily maximum and minimum temperatures for selected cities in OhioLocationJuly (°F)July (°C)January (°F)January (°C)Columbus  85/65  29/18  36/22  2/–5Cleveland  82/64  28/18  34/21  1/–5Cincinnati  86/61  30/19  38/23  3/–5Toledo  84/62  29/17  32/18  0/–7Akron  82/62  28/16  33/19  0/–7Dayton  87/67  31/19  36/22  2/–5Canton  82/62  28/16  33/19  1/–7  Records
3
Significant rivers within the state include the Cuyahoga River, Great Miami River, Maumee River, Muskingum River, and Scioto River.
Severe weather is not uncommon in the state, although there are typically fewer tornado reports in Ohio than in states located in what is known as the Tornado Alley.
In 1835, Ohio fought with Michigan in the Toledo War, a mostly bloodless boundary war over the Toledo Strip.
ATLAS: Atlas fathered this nymph who liked to entertain shipwrecked sailors like Odysseus
Calypso
He was washed ashore on the island of Ogygia, where Calypso compelled him to remain as her lover for 7 years before he finally escaped upon Hermes telling Calypso to release Odysseus.
3
Thetis said that the arms of Achilles would go to the bravest of the Greeks, but only these two warriors dared lay claim to that title.
In 5th century BC Athens, tales of the Trojan War were popular subjects for tragedies.
p. 122.</blockquote
"D"-RIGEUR: This lord known for a relationship with Oscar Wilde declared, "I am the love that dare not speak its name"
Lord Alfred Douglas
The Marquess was the father of Wilde's lover, Lord Alfred Douglas.
3
She read the Young Irelanders' poetry to Oscar and Willie, inculcating a love of these poets in her sons.
He also wrote books about Irish archaeology and peasant folklore.
Raby (1997:6,10)
WISH I'D SAID THAT: "It is the spectator, and not life, that art really mirrors", wrote Oscar Wilde in the preface to this novel
The Picture of Dorian Gray
He is remembered for his epigrams, his novel The Picture of Dorian Gray, his plays, as well as the circumstances of his imprisonment and early death.
3
Fox described it in this way:  "I am not sure if she ever became a Catholic herself but it was not long before she asked me to instruct two of her children, one of them being the future erratic genius, Oscar Wilde.
The left hand is in the pocket.|Oscar Wilde at Oxford  At Magdalen, he read Greats from 1874 to 1878, and from there he applied to join the Oxford Union, but failed to be elected.
Criminal Trial Transcript Page, University of Missouri-Kansas Law School.
PHILOSOPHY: He developed his own method of inquiry, but as he didn't write it down we mostly know of it from Plato
Socrates
Along with his teacher, Socrates, and his most famous student, Aristotle, Plato laid the very foundations of Western philosophy and science.
3
Thus is born the idea of the "philosopher-king", the wise person who accepts the power thrust upon him by the people who are wise enough to choose a good master.
It is believed that Plethon passed a copy of the Dialogues to Cosimo de' Medici when in 1438 the Council of Ferrara, called to unify the Greek and Latin Churches, was adjourned to Florence, where Plethon then lectured on the relation and differences of Plato and Aristotle, and fired Cosimo with his enthusiasm; Cosimo would supply Marsilio Ficino with Plato's text for translation to Latin.
No modern edition of Plato in the original Greek represents a single source, but rather it is reconstructed from multiple sources which are compared with each other.
ANCIENT SCIENCE: Considered 1st universal genius, this student of Plato believed goats breathed through their ears
Aristotle
Along with his teacher, Socrates, and his most famous student, Aristotle, Plato laid the very foundations of Western philosophy and science.
3
There is no record of a line from Aristocles to Plato's father, Ariston.
It was Plethon's student Bessarion who reconciled Plato with Christian theology, arguing that Plato's views were only ideals, unattainable due to the fall of man.
Márquez, Xavier (2012)
ALL THE WORLD'S A STAGE: This existentialist's play "The Flies", or "Les Mouches", debuted in Nazi-occupied Paris in 1943
Jean-Paul Sartre
thumb|left|Jean-Paul Sartre
3
Many other suburban residential districts (grands ensembles) were built between the 1960s and 1970s to provide a low-cost solution for a rapidly expanding population: these districts were socially mixed at first, but few residents actually owned their homes (the growing economy made these accessible to the middle classes only from the 1970s).
Other difficult areas are located in the Seine valley, in Évry et Corbeil-Essonnes (Essonne), in Mureaux, Mantes-la-Jolie (Yvelines), and scattered among social housing districts created by Delouvrier's 1961 "ville nouvelle" political initiative.
Literature thumb|Victor Hugo|294x294px
FRIEND: Friends Andre Derain, Maurice De Vlaminck & Henri Matisse were the leaders of this art movement in Paris in the early 1900s
fauvism
At the beginning of the century, artists from around the world, including Picasso, Modigliani and Matisse made Paris their home; it was the birthplace of Fauvism, Cubism and abstract art,Dan Franck, Bohemian Paris: Picasso, Modigliani, Matisse, and the Birth of Modern Art, Grove Press, 2003, ISBN 080219740X and authors such as Marcel Proust were exploring new approaches to literature.
3
There are a total of 20 arrondissement mayors and 120 deputy mayors.
Theatre thumb|right|The Opéra Bastille|225x225px
During the reign of Francois I, the lute became popular in the French court, and a national musical printing house was established.
IN PARIS: For a great view, get to the top of this 300-meter structure located on the Champs de Mars
Eiffel Tower
The notable architectural landmarks of Paris include Notre Dame Cathedral (12th century); the Sainte-Chapelle (13th century); the Eiffel Tower (1889); and the Basilica of Sacré-Cœur on Montmartre (1914).
3
Picasso, living in Montmartre, painted his famous La Famille de Saltimbanques and Les Demoiselles d'Avignon between 1905 and 1907.Dictionnaire historique de Paris, p. 68
Now brasseries, like cafés, serve food and drinks throughout the day.
With Paris' growth many of these, particularly the city's largest cemetery, les Innocents, were filled to overflowing, creating quite unsanitary conditions for the capital.
THE URBAN SCENE: It opened in 1900, its first line running from Paris' Porte de Vincennes to Porte Maillot
the Métro
A suburban railway network, the RER (Réseau Express Régional), was built to complement the Métro, and the Périphérique expressway encircling the city, was completed in 1973.
3
The Musée d'Orsay, in the former Orsay railway station, was the third-most visited museum in the city in 2014; it displays French art of the 19th century, including major collections of the Impressionists and Post-Impressionists.
Paris is also home to several of France's most famous high-schools such as Lycée Louis-le-Grand, Lycée Henri-IV, Lycée Janson de Sailly and Lycée Condorcet.
Internationally, air traffic has increased markedly in recent years between Paris and the Gulf airports, the emerging nations of Africa, Russia, Turkey, Portugal, Italy, and mainland China, whereas noticeable decline has been recorded between Paris and the British Isles, Egypt, Tunisia, and Japan.
PAKISTAN & DELIVER: Since 1947, Pakistan has fought 2 wars over this disputed region to its far north
Kashmir
It was coined in 1933 as Pakstan by Choudhry Rahmat Ali, a Pakistan Movement activist, who published it in his pamphlet Now or Never, using it as an acronym ("thirty million Muslim brethren who live in PAKSTAN") referring to the names of the five northern regions of the British Raj: Punjab, Afghania, Kashmir, Sindh, and Baluchistan".
3
The Arab conqueror Muhammad bin Qasim conquered Indus valley from Sindh to Multan in southern Punjab in 711 CE.
Complete and comprehensive Constitution was adopted in 1973—suspended by Zia-ul-Haq in 1977 but reinstated in 1985—is the country's most important document, laying the foundations of the current government.
Pakistan has competed many times at the Olympics in field hockey, boxing, athletics, swimming, and shooting.
RHYMES WITH FOUR: Pakistan's second most populous city
Lahore
thumb|Edwin Lord Weeks illustration of an open-air restaurant near Wazir Khan Mosque, Lahore.
3
According to UN reports, the Pakistani military are the largest troop contributors to UN peacekeeping missions.
Tourism  thumb|150px|left|Shangrila Resort, Skardu.
The Orangi Pilot Project in Karachi and community-led total sanitation in rural areas are two examples of such innovation.
WHAT "A" COUNTRY!: This nation is bordered on the east & south by Pakistan
Afghanistan
Pakistan has a  coastline along the Arabian Sea and the Gulf of Oman in the south and is bordered by India to the east, Afghanistan to the west, Iran to the southwest and China in the far northeast respectively.
3
Law enforcement
It is the 36th largest nation by total area, although this ranking varies depending on how the disputed territory of Kashmir is counted.
By 2012, Pakistan increased its ranking to tenth in the world for remittances with a total sum of US$13 billion.
"B" BOYS: Despite international protests, this prime minister of Pakistan was hanged in 1979
Bhutto
thumb|upright|Signing of Tashkent Declaration to end hostilities with India in 1965 in Tashkent, USSR, by President Ayub alongside Bhutto (center) and Aziz Ahmed (left).
3
Pakistan does not have diplomatic relations with Israel; nonetheless some Israeli citizens have visited the country on a tourist visas.
Pakistani neurosurgeon Ayub Ommaya invented the Ommaya reservoir, a system for treatment of brain tumours and other brain conditions.
ISBN 1-4067-1215-9  External links       Pakistan from UCB Libraries GovPubs   Pakistan from the BBC News  Pakistan at Encyclopædia Britannica''    Key Development Forecasts for Pakistan from International Futures  Population Of Pakistan  Pakistan Public Policies & Researches  World Bank Pakistan Summary Trade Statistics      Category:Pakistan Movement Category:Developing 8 Countries member states Category:English-speaking countries and territories Category:Federal republics Category:Former British colonies Category:Hindustani-speaking countries and territories Category:Iranian Plateau Category:Plateaus of India Category:Islamic republics Category:Islamic states Category:Member states of the Commonwealth of Nations Category:Member states of the Organisation of Islamic Cooperation Category:Member states of the South Asian Association for Regional Cooperation Category:Member states of the United Nations Category:Muslim-majority countries Category:South Asian countries Category:States and territories established in 1947   Category:Commonwealth republics Category:Republics Category:Pashto-speaking countries and territories Category:Asia Category:Articles containing video clips
CHEMISTRY: Penicillin, the first of these drugs, comes from a fungus
antibiotics
Penicillin (PCN or pen) is a group of antibiotics which include penicillin G (intravenous use), penicillin V (oral use), procaine penicillin, and benzathine penicillin (intramuscular use).
3
Gram-negative bacteria do not lose their cell walls completely and are called spheroplasts after treatment with penicillin.
Had Fleming been more successful at making other scientists interested in his work, penicillin for medicinal use would possibly have been developed years earlier.
Jackson Moyer, Method for Production of Penicillin, United States Patent Office, US Patent 2,443,989, filed 11 May 1945, issued 22 June 1948.Andrew Jackson Moyer, Method for Production of Penicillin, United States Patent Office, US Patent 2,476,107, filed 11 May 1945, issued 12 July 1949.
STATE CAPITALS: Pennsylvania
Harrisburg
The state capital is Harrisburg.
2
Independence Hall, where the United States Declaration of Independence and United States Constitution were drafted, is located in the state.
Traveling between Chicago and New York City, the Lake Shore Limited passes through Erie once in each direction.
U.S. HISTORY: America's first successful world exposition was held in 1876 in this Pennsylvania city
Philadelphia
The state's five most populous cities are Philadelphia (1,560,297), Pittsburgh (305,801), Allentown (118,577), Erie (100,671), and Reading (89,893).
2
The Appalachian Mountains run through its middle.
The Black and African American population grew by 13%, which was the largest increase in that population amongst the state's peers (New York, New Jersey, Ohio, Illinois, and Michigan).The White population declined by 0.7%, a trend that is beginning to reverse itself.
THE EMMYS: Peter Falk has won 4 Emmys for playing this role
Columbo
Columbo in the television series Columbo.
3
When Angels Come to Town (2004) – in which he portrayed Max, a quirky guardian angel who uses disguises and subterfuge to steer his charges onto the right path.
Death Falk died at his longtime Roxbury Drive Beverly Hills home on the evening of June 23, 2011 at the age of 83."Peter Falk" The Daily Telegraph.
Falk was survived by his wife and two daughters.
BEFORE HE WAS PRESIDENT: He was the head of Princeton University
Wilson
It offers professional degrees through the Woodrow Wilson School of Public and International Affairs, the School of Engineering and Applied Science, the School of Architecture and the Bendheim Center for Finance.
2
thumb|left|A Birds-eye view of campus in 1906  James McCosh took office as the college's president in 1868 and lifted the institution out of a low period that had been brought about by the American Civil War.
Additionally, it is among the largest "open stack" libraries in existence.
THE NORMANS: Norman crusader Tancred of Hauteville became prince of this region of Palestine known for its sea
Galilee
Syria Palaestina or Roman Palestine, a Roman province (135-390 CE) (135-330 CE), a province of the Roman Empire following merger of renamed Iudaea with Roman Syria  Byzantine Palestine  Palaestina Prima, a Byzantine province in the Levant from 390 to 636, comprising the Galilee and northern Jordan Valley  Palaestina Secunda, a Byzantine province in the Levant from 390 to 636, comprising the shoreline and hills of the Southern Levant (Judea and Samaria)  Palaestina Salutaris alias Palestina Tertia, a Byzantine province established in 6th century, covering the Negev and Transjordan  Modern  Jund Filastin (638 – 10th century), one of the military districts of the Umayyad and Abbasid Caliphate province of Bilad al-Sham (Syria)  Ottoman Syria, divisions of the Ottoman Empire within the Levant  Mutasarrifate of Jerusalem (1872-1917), also known as the "Sanjak of Jerusalem", an Ottoman district commonly referred to as "Southern Syria" or "Palestine".
2
Since 2013, the Palestinian National Authority is officially referred to as the State of Palestine by most international organisations.
Falastin , a newspaper published between 1911–1967, based in Jaffa  Journal of Palestine Studies, an academic journal founded in 1971  Palestine (comics), a graphic novel by Joe Sacco  Palestine (2011 book), a 2011 compilation of the Ayatollah Khomenei's statements on Israel and Palestine  Palestine Herald-Press, a newspaper published in and serving the Palestine, Texas area  Palestine–Israel Journal, a quarterly journal based in Jerusalem  Palestine Times, a daily English-language newspaper produced in Palestine  The Palestine Telegraph, an electronic newspaper produced in the Gaza Strip  The Palestine Post, the former name of The Jerusalem Post, an Israeli English-language daily newspaper   People   Charlemagne Palestine, American composer   Politics   All-Palestine Government, a Palestinian Arab state proclaimed by the Arab League on September 22, 1948, and seated in Egyptian occupied Gaza Strip.
AUTHORS: She wrote "Sense and Sensibility", "Pride and Prejudice" & "Northhanger Abbey" between 1795 & 1798
Jane Austen
Pride and Prejudice is a novel of manners by Jane Austen, first published in 1813.
3
Pride and Prejudice retains a fascination for modern readers, continuing near the top of lists of "most loved books.
Georgiana Darcy Georgiana Darcy is Mr Darcy's quiet, amiable, and shy younger sister, aged 16 when the story begins.
A 1936 stage version was created by Helen Jerome played at the St. James's Theatre in London, starring Celia Johnson and Hugh Williams.
NUDIST, BUDDHIST OR CUBIST: Pablo Picasso
Cubist
As one of the greatest and most influential artists of the 20th century, he is known for co-founding the Cubist movement, the invention of constructed sculpture, the co-invention of collage, and for the wide variety of styles that he helped develop and explore.
3
His son became preoccupied with art to the detriment of his classwork.
thumb|Portrait of Gertrude Stein, 1906, Metropolitan Museum of Art, New York City.
Moskowitz, Clara (8 February 2013). "Picasso's Genius Revealed: He Used Common House Paint", Live Science.
THEY ALL WENT TO YALE: This Yale grad's play "The Skin of Our Teeth" premiered in New Haven in 1942 (& later won him his 3rd Pulitzer Prize)
Thornton Wilder
Arts & Letters  Four prizes  Robert Frost, Poetry  Eugene O'Neill, Drama  Robert E. Sherwood, Drama (3) and Biography  Three prizes  Edward Albee, Drama  Archibald MacLeish, Poetry (2) and Drama  Edwin Arlington Robinson, Poetry  Carl Sandburg, Poetry (2) and Biography  Robert Penn Warren, Poetry (2) and Fiction  Thornton Wilder, Drama (2) and the Novel  Two prizes  Bernard Bailyn, History  Samuel Barber, Music Composition  Walter Jackson Bate, Biography  Samuel Flagg Bemis, History and Biography  Stephen Vincent Benét, Poetry  Robert Caro, Biography  Elliott Carter, Music Composition  David Herbert Donald, Biography  Horst Faas, Photography  William Faulkner, Fiction  Douglas Southall Freeman, Biography  Burton J. Hendrick, Biography  Paul Horgan, History  Marquis James, Biography  George S. Kaufman, Drama (both shared)  Margaret Leech, History  David Levering Lewis, Biography  Robert Lowell, Poetry  Norman Mailer, Fiction and Nonfiction  David McCullough, Biography  Gian Carlo Menotti, Music Composition  William S. Merwin, Poetry  Samuel Eliot Morison, Biography  Allan Nevins, Biography  Walter Piston, Music Composition  Booth Tarkington, Novel  Alan Taylor, History  Barbara W. Tuchman, Nonfiction
3
The mistaken pronunciation , starting off like "pew", is quite common, and included in the major British and American dictionaries.
History Newspaper publisher Joseph Pulitzer gave money in his will to Columbia University to launch a journalism school and establish the Prize.
Criticism – for distinguished criticism.
THE RIVER: Have some pizza in Pisa, Italy as you sail down this river with a 4-letter name
the Arno
However, due to the alluvial sediments from the Arno and the Serchio, whose mouth lies about  north of the Arno's, the shore moved west.
3
In the 90s AD, a baths complex was built in the city.
In 1063 admiral Giovanni Orlando, coming to the aid of the Norman Roger I, took Palermo from the Saracen pirates.
In spite of these reforms, the conquered lands and the city itself were harassed by the rivalry between the two families of Della Gherardesca and Visconti.
ISLANDS: A causeway connects this Persian Gulf nation with the Saudi Arabian mainland
Bahrain
Countries with a coastline on the Persian Gulf are (clockwise, from the north): Iran, Oman (exclave of Musandam), United Arab Emirates, Saudi Arabia, Qatar on a peninsula off the Saudi coast, Bahrain on an island, Kuwait, and Iraq in the northwest.
3
Etymology 300px|right|thumb|Map of the Persian Gulf.
Under the leadership of the Achaemenid king Darius the Great (Darius I), Persian ships found their way to the Persian Gulf.
Persian Gulf therefore became a critical maritime path through which the Allies transported equipment, to Russia against the Nazi invasion.
POINT: At Pittsburgh's "The Point", the Allegheny & Monongahela meet to form this third river
the Ohio
The Combined Statistical Area (CSA) population of 2,659,937 is the largest in both the Ohio Valley and Appalachia and the 20th-largest in the U.S. Pittsburgh is known as both "the Steel City" for its more than 300 steel-related businesses, as well as "the City of Bridges" for its 446 bridges.
3
The Pittsburgh Dad series has showcased the Pittsburghese genre to a global YouTube audience since 2011.
Livability thumb|Pittsburgh from the West End Overlook Pittsburgh often places high in lists of the nation's most livable cities.
NBA's Color Line Is Broken.
AMERICAN PLAYWRIGHTS: Pittsburgh's African American Cultural Center was renamed for this "Piano Lesson" author who was born in Pittsburgh
August Wilson
Modern writers include Pulitzer Prize-winning playwright August Wilson and Michael Chabon with his Pittsburgh-focused commentary on student and college life.
3
The city's most popular team is the NFL's Pittsburgh Steelers,named after the distribution company the Pittsburgh Steeling company established in 1927.
The University of Pittsburgh, established in 1787 and popularly referred to as "Pitt", is a state-related school with one of the nation's largest research programs.
Transportation thumb|At least 17 of Pittsburgh's bridges are visible in this aerial photo  Pittsburgh is a city of bridges.
"C"OLLEGES & UNIVERSITIES: Its official address is on Forbes Avenue in Pittsburgh
Carnegie Mellon
The area is home to 68 colleges and universities including research and development leaders Carnegie Mellon University and the University of Pittsburgh.
3
A month later, Forbes named Pittsburgh the 7th best place to raise a family.
The Ed Debartolo owned Pittsburgh Maulers featured a Heisman Trophy winner in the mid-1980s.
Natural gas is provided by Equitable Gas, Columbia Gas, Dominion Resources, Direct Energy, and Novec.
BEHIND BARS: Wyborowa is a popular Polish brand of this liquor also associated with Russia
Vodka
Crops of rye, wheat, barley, and millet provide the ingredients for various breads, pancakes and cereals, as well as for kvass, beer and vodka drinks.
3
New York: Random House, 1994, p. 30
Russia is the world's top producer of  barley, buckwheat and oats, and one of the largest producers and exporters of  rye,  sunflower seed and wheat.
Typically, major Russian cities have well-developed systems of public transport, with the most common varieties of exploited vehicles being bus, trolleybus and tram.
REMEMBER THE USSR?: Then & now president of Russia, in 1991 he saved Gorbachev's borscht after a coup attempt
Boris Yeltsin
thumb|Incumbent Russian President Boris Yeltsin stands on a tank during the August Coup of 1991, two months after the presidential election.
3
Beginning in the 8th century BC, Ancient Greek traders brought their civilization to the trade emporiums in Tanais and Phanagoria.
The Romans settled on the western part of the Caspian Sea, where their empire stretched towards the east.
The latter events are traditionally referred to as baptism of Rus'  (, ) in Russian and Ukrainian literature.
"C"OUNTRIES: When the Warsaw Pact invaded what was then this country in 1968, Romania didn't participate
Czechoslovakia
Thus, communist Romania was the only Warsaw Pact country who refused to participate at the Soviet-led 1968 invasion of Czechoslovakia (Ceaușescu even publicly condemned the action as "a big mistake, [and] a serious danger to peace in Europe and to the fate of communism in the world"); it was also the only communist state to maintain diplomatic relations with Israel after the 1967 Six-Day War; and established diplomatic relations with West Germany the same year.
3
Contemporary musicians like Angela Gheorghiu, Gheorghe Zamfir, Inna, Alexandra Stan and many others have achieved various levels of international acclaim.
At the Winter Olympic Games, Romania has won only a bronze medal in bobsleigh at the 1968 Winter Olympics.
See also  Index of Romania-related articles  Outline of Romania  Notes  References  Sources  Primary sources  The Ancient History of Herodotus (Translated by William Beloe) (1859).
ROMANIA: On TV's "The Munsters", part of Romania where Grandpa was born & Herman was assembled
Transylvania
At the end of World War I, Transylvania, Bukovina and Bessarabia united with the sovereign Kingdom of Romania.
3
After the Romanian Revolution of 1989, a significant number of Romanians immigrated to other European countries, North America or Australia.
Bucharest is the capital and the largest city in Romania, with a population of over 1.8 million in 2011.
Dinamo București reached the European Champions' Cup semifinal in 1984 and the Cup Winners' Cup semifinal in 1990.
ARCHAEOLOGY: Many of these subterranean Christian cemeteries in Rome have been found using written ancient guides
catacombs
There are also the ancient Catacombs of Rome underneath the city.
3
Rome hosted the 1960 Summer Olympics and is the seat of United Nations' Food and Agriculture Organization (FAO).
This compares with the Italian average of 18.06 percent (minors) and 19.94 percent (pensioners).
The city suffers from traffic problems largely due to this radial street pattern, making it difficult for Romans to move easily from the vicinity of one of the radial roads to another without going into the historic centre or using the ring-road.
HISTORIC STRUCTURES: Pope Sixtus' death in 1590 ended his plan to convert this, still in Rome today, to a wool factory to employ city prostitutes
the Colosseum
Monuments and museums such as the Vatican Museums and the Colosseum are among the world's most visited tourist destinations with both locations receiving millions of tourists a year.
3
The official residences of the President of the Italian Republic and the Italian Prime Minister, the seats of both houses of the Italian Parliament and that of the Italian Constitutional Court are located in the historic centre.
Rome hosted a great number of neoclassical and rococo artists, such as Pannini and Bernardo Bellotto.
In the 1990s, an extension of the B line was opened from Termini to Rebibbia.
"M"MMMMM GOOD!: In the 1920s & 1930s, this leader had his office in Rome's Venezia Palace
Benito Mussolini
Soon after World War I, Rome witnessed the rise of Italian Fascism, led by Benito Mussolini, who marched on the city in 1922, eventually declaring a new Italian Empire and allying Italy with Nazi Germany.
3
Since this period three powers tried to rule the city: the pope, the nobility, together with the chiefs of militias, the judges, the Senate and the populace; and the Frankish king, as king of the Lombards, patricius and Emperor.
Pope Boniface VIII, born Caetani, was the last pope to fight for the church's universal domain: he proclaimed a crusade against the Colonna, and in 1300 he called for the first Jubilee of Christianity, which brought to Rome millions of pilgrims.
Chronic congestion caused by cars during the 1970s and 1980s led to restrictions being placed on vehicle access to the inner city-centre during the hours of daylight.
RULERS: This emperor for whom a wall is named built a spectacular villa at Tivoli, near Rome
Hadrian
thumb|Rome stock exchange in ancient Temple of Hadrian  Although the economy of Rome is characterised by the absence of heavy industry and it is largely dominated by services, high-technology companies (IT, aerospace, defence, telecommunications), research, construction and commercial activities (especially banking), and the huge development of tourism are very dynamic and extremely important to its economy.
3
Rome's history spans more than two and a half thousand years.
Hermann & Hilgemann (1964), p.117
PUQ. p.185.
WOMEN RULE!: Mark Antony's "marriage" to her wasn't exactly legal; he already had a wife in Rome
Cleopatra
More than 3,000 productions have been made on its lot, from recent features like The Passion of the Christ, Gangs of New York, HBO's Rome, The Life Aquatic and Dino De Laurentiis' Decameron, to such cinema classics as Ben-Hur, Cleopatra, and the films of Federico Fellini.
3
Etymology According to the founding myth of the city by the Ancient Romans themselves, the long-held tradition of the origin of the name "Roma" is believed to have come from the city's founder and first king, Romulus.
Examples of Roman dishes include "Saltimbocca alla Romana" – a veal cutlet, Roman-style; topped with raw ham and sage and simmered with white wine and butter; "Carciofi alla romana" – artichokes Roman-style; outer leaves removed, stuffed with mint, garlic, breadcrumbs and braised; "Carciofi alla giudia" – artichokes fried in olive oil, typical of Roman Jewish cooking; outer leaves removed, stuffed with mint, garlic, breadcrumbs and braised; "Spaghetti alla carbonara" – spaghetti with bacon, eggs and pecorino, and "Gnocchi di semolino alla romana" – semolina dumpling, Roman-style, to name but a few.
In addition, Rome has only 21 taxis for every 10,000 inhabitants, far below other major European cities.
RENAISSANCE MEN: In the 15th century Guillaume Dufay wrote many of these musical pieces, French for "songs"
chansons
Dissemination of chansons, motets, and masses throughout Europe coincided with the unification of polyphonic practice into the fluid style which culminated in the second half of the sixteenth century in the work of composers such as Palestrina, Lassus, Victoria and William Byrd.
3
Stork, David G. Optics and Realism in Renaissance Art (Retrieved May 10, 2007)
While the schism was resolved by the Council of Constance (1414), the 15th century saw a resulting reform movement known as Conciliarism, which sought to limit the pope's power.
Emperor Maximilian
LEE: In 1859 it took Robert E. Lee less than a day to suppress the uprising by this white abolitionist
John Brown
John Brown led a band of 21 abolitionists who seized the federal arsenal at Harpers Ferry, Virginia, in October 1859, hoping to incite a slave rebellion.
3
Although brought up to be a practicing Christian, he was not confirmed in the Episcopal Church until age 46.
While home in the summer of 1829, Lee had apparently courted Mary Custis whom he had known as a child.
Lee Chapel at Washington and Lee University marks Lee's final resting place.
AMERICAN LITERATURE: This 1950 Ray Bradbury book collected 26 stories about Earth's colonization of Mars
The Martian Chronicles
Widely known for his dystopian novel Fahrenheit 451 (1953) as well as his science fiction and horror story collections The Martian Chronicles (1950) The Illustrated Man (1951), and  There Will Come Soft Rains (1950).
3
Particularly noted among these were EC Comics' line of horror and science-fiction comics.
Bradbury's grandson, Danny Karapetian, said Bradbury's works had "influenced so many artists, writers, teachers, scientists, and it's always really touching and comforting to hear their stories".
In 2005, the film A Sound of Thunder was released, loosely based upon the short story of the same name.
IT WAS A VERY GOOD YEAR: Roald Amundsen first reached the South Pole late in this year
1911
He led the Antarctic expedition of 1910–12 which was the first to reach the South Pole, on 14 December 1911.
2
He telegraphed news to backers.
In contrast to the misfortunes of Scott’s team, Amundsen’s trek proved relatively smooth and uneventful.
TAFT!: Taft was the first civil governor of these islands, acquired from Spain in 1898 after the Spanish-American War
Philippines
In the late 19th century nationalist movements arose in the Philippines and Cuba.
3
Portuguese part) and Siega Verde (Salamanca, Castile-León – Spanish part).
Later Arab style architecture continued to be developed under successive Islamic dynasties, ending with the Nasrid, which built its famed palace complex in Granada.
Cuisine   thumb|Paella, a traditional Valencian dish Spanish cuisine consists of a great variety of dishes which stem from differences in geography, culture and climate.
SEAMANSHIP: A convoy is a fleet of merchant ships & this is a fleet of warships; Spain had a famous one
Armada
Military  thumb|Aircraft carrier/assault ship Juan Carlos I (L61), multirole fighter Eurofighter Typhoon, Boeing CH-47 Chinook, universal tank Leopard 2  The armed forces of Spain are known as the Spanish Armed Forces (Fuerzas Armadas Españolas).
3
The last Moorish kingdom fell in the same year Columbus reached the Americas.
The recent waves of immigration have also led to an increasing number of Hindus, Buddhists, Sikhs and Muslims.
The Spanish writers are: José Echegaray, Jacinto Benavente, Juan Ramón Jiménez, Vicente Aleixandre and Camilo José Cela.
BOOK & AUTHOR: Arthur C. Clarke wrote this 1968 sci-fi novel in collaboration with director Stanley Kubrick
2001: A Space Odyssey
The scientific realism and innovative special effects of 2001: A Space Odyssey (1968) were without precedent in the history of cinema, and the film earned him his only personal Oscar, for Best Visual Effects.
3
During the course of the film, one of the soldiers becomes infatuated with an attractive girl in the woods and binds her to a tree.
Although Barry Lyndon found a great audience in France, it was a box office failure, grossing just $9.5 million in the American market, not even close to the $30 million Warner Bros. needed to generate a profit.
He further added that working with Kubrick was "a stunning experience" and that he never recovered from working with somebody of such magnificence.
HISTORICAL ROLES: In "Time Bandits", Sean Connery plays this King of Mycenae who led the Greeks in the "Iliad"
Agamemnon
In 1981, Connery appeared in the film Time Bandits as Agamemnon.
3
The remainder of his family was of Scottish descent, and his maternal great-grandparents were native Scottish Gaelic speakers from Fife (unusually, for a speaker of the language) and Uig on the Isle of Skye.
Henderson urged him to take elocution lessons and got him parts at the Maida Vale Theatre in London, and he had already begun pursuing a film career, playing an extra in Herbert Wilcox's 1954 musical Lilacs in the Spring alongside Anna Neagle.
Retrieved 28 January 2013  thumb|upright|Connery at the 1988 Academy Awards  After his experience with Never Say Never Again in 1983 and the following court case, Connery became unhappy with the major studios and for two years did not make any films.
SOUTH DAKOTA: This South Dakota capital was founded as a fort in the early 1800s & named for a French fur trader
Pierre
Pierre is the state capital and Sioux Falls, with a population of about 165,000, is South Dakota's largest city.
3
Thompson (ed.), p. 90.
The Skyforce play in the NBA D-League, and are affiliated with the NBA's Miami Heat.
State symbols  right|thumb|Reverse side of U.S. quarter coin with a commemorative South Dakota design depicting Mt. Rushmore, a pheasant, wheat, and the year of statehood.
THE SUN BELT: These dark areas appear so because they are 4,000 degrees cooler than the rest of the Sun's visible surface
sunspots
Its polar field is , whereas the field is typically  in features on the Sun called sunspots and  in solar prominences.
3
Scholars theorize that the Sun, as a Germanic goddess, may represent an extension of an earlier Proto-Indo-European Sun deity because of Indo-European linguistic connections between Old Norse Sól, Sanskrit Surya, Gaulish Sulis, Lithuanian Saulė, and Slavic Solntse.
II.
At this speed, it takes around 1,190 years for the Solar System to travel a distance of 1 light-year, or 7 days to travel 1 AU.  Theoretical problems thumb|Map of the full Sun by STEREO and SDO spacecraft  Coronal heating problem  The temperature of the photosphere is approximately 6,000 K, whereas the temperature of the corona reaches 1,000,000–2,000,000 K.
WORLD FAMOUS: Some of this U.S. pop artist's silkscreens are in a museum in Slovakia, near his parents' birthplace
Andy Warhol
Andy Warhol (1928–1987), a leading figure in the 20th century visual art movement known as pop art, was born in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania as Andrej Varchola to Slovak parents Ondrej Varchola (1889–1942) and Júlia (née Zavacká, 1892–1972).
3
Slovakia is an attractive country for foreign investors mainly because of its low wages, low tax rates and well educated labour force.
From electrical engineering companies, Foxconn has a factory at Nitra for LCD TV manufacturing, Samsung at Galanta for computer monitors and television sets manufacturing.
The first was Anton Bernolák whose concept was based on the western Slovak dialect in 1787.
LOVE'S LABOUR'S LOST: Steven Spielberg divorced this actress in '89; was the courtroom a War of the Worlds? (Sorry, pun fatigue [I'm sure])
Amy Irving
Personal life  Marriages and children Spielberg first met actress Amy Irving in 1976 at the suggestion of director Brian De Palma, who knew he was looking for an actress to play in Close Encounters.
3
Roger Ebert, who named it the best film of 2002, praised its breathtaking vision of the future as well as for the way Spielberg blended CGI with live-action.
His father had lost between sixteen and twenty relatives during the Holocaust.
Spielberg was also awarded the Department of Defense Medal for Distinguished Public Service by Secretary of Defense William Cohen at the Pentagon on August 11, 1999; Cohen presented the award in recognition of Spielberg's film Saving Private Ryan.
SPANS: A rail bridge across this firth at Queensferry, Scotland has 2 1700-foot spans
the Firth of Forth
The East Coast Main Line crosses the Firth of Forth by the Forth Bridge.
3
Scotland is represented in the European Union and the European Parliament with six MEPs.
, BBC NewsScottish Independence Referendum: statement by the Prime Minister, UK Government   Administrative subdivisions   thumb|right|Glasgow City Chambers, viewed from George Square Historical subdivisions of Scotland included the mormaerdom, stewartry, earldom, burgh, parish, county and regions and districts.
From Columba to the Union, until 1707 (Edinburgh: Edinburgh University Press, 2007), ISBN 0-7486-1615-2, pp.
SHORT SCIENCE BIOS: Born 1736 in Scotland, improved on Thomas Newcomen's engine, ran out of steam 1819
James Watt
While the Scottish Enlightenment is traditionally considered to have concluded toward the end of the 18th century, disproportionately large Scottish contributions to British science and letters continued for another 50 years or more, thanks to such figures as the physicists James Clerk Maxwell and Lord Kelvin, and the engineers and inventors James Watt and William Murdoch, whose work was critical to the technological developments of the Industrial Revolution throughout Britain.
3
G. Robb, "Popular Religion and the Christianization of the Scottish Highlands in the Eighteenth and Nineteenth Centuries", Journal of Religious History, 1990, 16(1): 18–34.
Over 62 million passenger journeys are made each year.
Andrew Collier, "Scotland's Confident Catholics,"
ARE YOU WELL RED?: In this novel Sherlock Holmes investigates a murder at Lauriston Gardens
A Study in Scarlet
The first novel, A Study in Scarlet, appeared in Beeton's Christmas Annual in 1887 and the second, The Sign of the Four, in Lippincott's Monthly Magazine in 1890.
3
Mews News.
Lewis, Tanya.
ISBN 978-0-87972-198-5                     Previously published as chapter 2, pp.
A VISIT WITH SHERLOCK HOLMES: In several cases, Sherlock Holmes matched wits with this adversary he called "one of the greatest brains of the century"
Moriarty
The Great Hiatus thumb|alt=Holmes and Moriarty wrestling at the end of a narrow path, with Holmes's hat falling into a waterfall|Holmes and Moriarty struggle at the Reichenbach Falls; drawing by Sidney Paget.
3
When Watson is injured by a bullet, although the wound turns out to be "quite superficial", Watson is moved by Holmes's reaction:
The detective's analysis of physical evidence includes examining latent prints (such as footprints, hoof prints and bicycle tracks) to identify actions at a crime scene ("A Study in Scarlet", "The Adventure of Silver Blaze", "The Adventure of the Priory School", The Hound of the Baskervilles, "The Boscombe Valley Mystery"); using tobacco ashes and cigarette butts to identify criminals ("The Adventure of the Resident Patient", The Hound of the Baskervilles); comparing typewritten letters to expose a fraud ("A Case of Identity"); using gunpowder residue to expose two murderers ("The Adventure of the Reigate Squire"); comparing bullets from two crime scenes ("The Adventure of the Empty House"); analyzing small pieces of human remains to expose two murders ("The Adventure of the Cardboard Box") and an early use of fingerprints ("The Norwood Builder").
Sherlock Holmes plaques on openplaques.org  The Sherlock Holmes Collections at the University of Minnesota (special collections and rare books)    Category:Edwardian era Category:Crime film characters Category:Thriller film characters Category:Fictional characters introduced in 1887 Category:Fictional cocaine users Category:Fictional escapologists Category:Fictional scientists Category:Fictional chemists Category:Fictional criminologists Category:Fictional detectives Category:Fictional English people Category:Fictional gentleman detectives Category:Fictional martial artists Category:Fictional people from London Category:Fictional private investigators Category:Fictional violinists Category:Fictional intellectuals Category:Sherlock Holmes characters Category:Victorian culture Category:Novels adapted into comics Category:Novels adapted into films Category:Novels adapted into plays Category:Novels adapted into radio programs Category:Novels adapted into television programs Category:Novels adapted into video games
19TH CENTURY NOVELISTS: Around 1889 this Scotsman purchased an estate in Samoa, which he called Valima, or "Five Streams"
Robert Louis Stevenson
However, Robert Louis Stevenson, who lived in Samoa from 1889 until his death in 1894, wrote in A Footnote to History: Eight Years of Trouble in Samoa, "… the Samoans are gentle people."Stevenson, Robert Louis  (1892).
3
p. 249
The late John Kneubuhl, born in American Samoa, was an accomplished playwright and screenwriter and writer.
The music video for Reverse Resistance was filmed in Savai'i at his villages.
SINGAPORE: Singapore gained its independence in 1965 from this nation to which it's connected by a causeway
Malaysia
It lies one degree (137 km) north of the equator, at the southernmost tip of continental Asia and peninsular Malaysia, with Indonesia's Riau Islands to the south.
3
Its cultural diversity is reflected in its extensive "hawker" cuisine and major ethnic festivals—Chinese, Malay, Indian,
The Singaporean economy is known as one of the freest, most innovative, most competitive, most dynamic and most business-friendly.
Lee Kuan Yew (2000).
THE CITY'S OLDEST RESTAURANT: Antoine's, 713 rue St. Louis
New Orleans
Steamboats first arrived in St. Louis in 1818, improving connections with New Orleans and eastern markets.
3
Historic Native American tribes in the area included the Siouan-speaking Osage people, whose territory extended west, and the Illiniwek.
There were hopes of finding a water route to the Pacific Ocean, but the party had to go overland in the Upper West.
Detroit, Michigan and Youngstown, Ohio are the only other cities that have had population declines of at least 60% in the same time frame.
THE 1990s: On Jan. 31, 1999 this team repeated as Super Bowl champs with John Elway throwing for 336 yards
the Denver Broncos
1997–2009: AFC resurgence Super Bowl XXXII saw quarterback John Elway and running back Terrell Davis lead the Denver Broncos to an upset victory over the defending champion Packers, snapping the NFC's 13 year winning streak.
3
All three of these players went to the Hall of Fame.
Stadiums may include temporary seating for Super Bowls, but seating must be approved by the league.
Some critics say the NFL is exaggerating its ownership rights by stating that "any use is prohibited", as this contradicts the broad doctrine of fair use in the United States.
THE SYDNEY OPERA HOUSE: (Sarah of the Clue Crew reports from outside the Opera House in Sydney, Australia.) In 1973, "The Magic Flute", which included a queen character, was the first performance given here, & in the hall on opening night was this woman, who officially opened the Opera House
Queen Elizabeth
The people of Sydney warmly welcomed Queen Elizabeth II in 1954 when the a reigning monarch stepped onto Australian soil for the first time to commence her Australian Royal Tour.http://www.royal.gov.uk/MonarchAndCommonwealth/Australia/Royalvisits.aspx Having arrived on the Royal Yacht Britannia through Sydney Heads, Her Majesty came ashore at Farm Cove.
3
The Inner West also includes Sydney Olympic Park, a suburb created to host the 2000 Summer Olympics.
Australian companies based in Sydney include Woolworths, Westpac, Qantas, Coca-Cola Amatil, the Australian Securities Exchange, AMP, Caltex, Fairfax Media, the Commonwealth Bank, Optus, Macquarie Group, Westfield, Origin Energy, Cochlear, and David Jones.
Government in the present Sydney is divided into local government areas (also known as councils or shires) which are comparable in nature to London's boroughs.
AMERICANA: The Dock Street Theatre, one of America's oldest, was built in this South Carolina seaport in 1736
Charleston
The state's coastline contains many salt marshes and estuaries, as well as natural ports such as Georgetown and Charleston.
3
Parts of Carolina (mostly the coastal areas) had been colonized earlier by Spain (see Fort Caroline), but battles between the Spanish and the Native Americans resulted in the Spanish people retreating to Florida, Cuba, Mexico, and Central and South America.
Domtar, located in Rock Hill, is the only Fortune 500 company headquartered in South Carolina.
South Carolina Tennessee, Retrieved May 10, 2012 Foreign Direct Investment (FDI) brought 1.06 billion dollars to the state economy in 2010.FDI in south Carolina a five year report, Retrieved May 10, 2012 Since 1994, BMW has had a production facility in Spartanburg.
ALMOST RHYMES WITH ORANGE: The Italian city of this name has Il Duomo; the one in South Carolina has the Pee Dee Experiment Station
Florence
Transportation  Major highways  Major interstate highways passing through include: I-20 which runs from Florence in the east through Columbia to the southwestern border near Aiken; I-26 which runs from Charleston in the southeast through Columbia to Spartanburg and the northern border in Spartanburg County; I-77 which runs from York County in the north to Columbia; I-85 which runs from Cherokee County in the north through Spartanburg and Greenville to the southwestern border in Oconee County; I-385 which runs from Greenville and intersects with I-26 near Clinton; and I-95 which runs from the northeastern border in Dillon County to Florence and on to the southern border in Jasper County.
3
The environment here is that of the Appalachian-Blue Ridge forests ecoregion.
Thousands of Loyalists and slaves left with them.
Winthrop is now a public university that has an enrollment of just over 6,000 students.
THE OLD TESTAMENT: This city was the site of Solomon's temple
Jerusalem
Concise Encyclopedia of Islam - Page 374, Cyril Glasse - 1988  The Hebrew Bible credits him as the builder of the First Temple in Jerusalem.
3
According to The Bible Unearthed, archaeological evidence suggests that the kingdom of Israel at the time of Solomon was little more than a small city state, and so it is implausible that Solomon received tribute as large as 666 talents of gold per year.
Masonic Temples, where a Masonic Lodge meets, are an allegorical reference to King Solomon's Temple.
In Neal Stephenson's three-volume The Baroque Cycle, 17th-century alchemists like Isaac Newton believe that Solomon created a kind of "heavier" gold with mystical properties and that it was cached in the Solomon Islands where it was accidentally discovered by the crew of a wayward Spanish galleon.
THE OLD TESTAMENT: This queen gave Solomon 120 talents of gold & other precious items
Queen of Sheba
Relationship with Queen of Sheba  thumb|The
3
The archaeological remains that are considered to date from the time of Solomon are notable for the fact that Canaanite material culture appears to have continued unabated; there is a distinct lack of magnificent empire, or cultural development – indeed comparing pottery from areas traditionally assigned to Israel with that of the Philistines points to the Philistines having been significantly more sophisticated.
162–164, National Gallery of Art, Washington, 1990, ISBN 1558610391  Film  Solomon and Sheba (1959) –
Toivo Tulev composed a piece for choir, soloists and chamber orchestra entitled "Songs" in 2005.
DID YOU READ YOUR BIBLE?: The subject of the second book of Samuel is this king's reign over Judah & all of Israel
David
According to the text of the Books of Samuel, he also anointed the first two kings of the Kingdom of Israel: Saul and David.
2
The motif of Elkanah and Hannah as devout, childless parents will reoccur with Zachariah and Elizabeth and the birth of John the Baptist, and with Joachim and Anna and the birth of Mary.
But the enemy captured it, carried it away, and retained it for seven months.
SOME BRAINTEASERS ABOUT SEINFELD: "I'm out."(Michael Richards reads the clue.)  When he wrote that classic episode from Season 4, this Seinfeld co-creator turned curbing his enthusiasm into an Emmy
Larry David
It was created by Larry David and Jerry Seinfeld, the latter starring as a fictionalized version of himself.
3
Syndicated broadcast stations and the cable network TBS began airing the syndicated version of Seinfeld in HD.
Retrieved on May 8, 2008<ref name="1st ASG awards">1st Annual Screen Actors Guild Awards –
ISBN 1-84457-201-3.
COUNTRIES' LARGEST ISLANDS: Sumatra
Indonesia
Sumatra () is an island in western Indonesia and part of the Sunda Islands.
1
Samudra was succeeded by the powerful Aceh Sultanate, which survived to the 20th century.
ON VALENTINE'S DAY: 1989:This religious leader issues a fatwa against Salman Rushdie, encouraging Muslims to kill him
Ayatollah Khomeini
On 14 February 1989, the day of the funeral of his close friend Bruce Chatwin, a fatwā requiring Rushdie's execution was proclaimed on Radio Tehran by Ayatollah Khomeini, the spiritual leader of Iran at the time, calling the book "blasphemous against Islam" (chapter IV of the book depicts the character of an Imam in exile who returns to incite revolt from the people of his country with no regard for their safety).
3
In November 2010 he became a founding patron of Ralston College, a new liberal arts college that has adopted as its motto a Latin translation of a phrase ("free speech is life itself") from an address he gave at Columbia University in 1991 to mark the two-hundredth anniversary of the first amendment to the US Constitution.
He had a backstage pass and he used it as often as possible.
Rushdie is a supporter of gun control, blaming a shooting at a Colorado cinema in July 2012 on the American right to keep and bear arms.
"A" IN GEOGRAPHY: It's the city in Uttar Pradesh where Shah Jahan built a memorial to his wife Mumtaz Mahal
Agra
In 1658, he fell ill and was confined by his son and successor Aurangzeb in Agra Fort until his death in 1666.
2
Upon the death of Jahangir in 1627, Khurram succeeded to the Mughal throne as Abu ud-Muzaffar Shihab ud-Din Mohammad Sahib ud-Quiran ud-Thani Shah Jahan Padshah Ghazi (Urdu: شهاب الدین محمد خرم), or Shah Jahan.
A person speaking inside one end of the dome can be heard at the other end when the speech exceeds 100 decibels.
PROFESSIONAL SPORTS: (Hi, I'm Shannon Sharpe of the Denver Broncos)  In Super Bowl XXXII, this Denver running back, my teammate, ran for 157 yards, scored 3 TDs & was named MVP
Terrell Davis
Both defenses stiffened until Broncos running back Terrell Davis scored the go-ahead touchdown with 1:45 left.
2
This broadcast was the last for NBC as the AFC network after 33 years (CBS has held the AFC broadcast rights ever since), their last NFL broadcast overall until 2006, when they signed on to televise Sunday Night Football, and their last Super Bowl broadcast until 2009 (Super Bowl XLIII).
Then on 4th down, Denver linebacker John Mobley broke up a pass intended for Chmura, enabling the Broncos to take the ball back and run out the clock for the victory.
THERE'S A "WAY": Friends & Romans!  Stephen Sondheim launched his career as a Broadway composer with this musical
A Funny Thing Happened on the Way to the Forum
His best-known works as composer and lyricist include A Funny Thing Happened on the Way to the Forum, Company, Follies, A Little Night Music, Sweeney Todd, Sunday in the Park with George and Into the Woods.
3
Cleveland Jewish News, October 10, 2008 Sondheim and Rich had additional conversations on January 18, 2009 at Avery Fisher Hall,Gans, Andrew. "Sondheim and Rich Will Discuss A Life in the Theater in January 2009".
And talks." Orlandosentinel.com, February 5, 2009  On February 1, 2011, Sondheim joined former Salt Lake Tribune theatre critic Nancy Melich before an audience of 1,200 at Kingsbury Hall.
Unfinished and canceled works According to Sondheim, he was asked to translate Mahagonny-Songspiel: "
MUSICAL INSPIRATIONS: Ingmar Bergman's movie "Smiles of a Summer Night" inspired this Stephen Sondheim musical
A Little Night Music
His best-known works as composer and lyricist include A Funny Thing Happened on the Way to the Forum, Company, Follies, A Little Night Music, Sweeney Todd, Sunday in the Park with George and Into the Woods.
3
The logic of it.
The composer wanted to write music and lyrics; after consulting with Hammerstein, Bernstein told Sondheim he could write music later.thumb|alt=West Side Story album cover|West Side Story original cast recording
this angry, red-faced lady" and told him "You have been keeping me awake all night!" (she was practicing for her musical debut in Coco).
ONE-NAMED TV CHARACTERS: In 1987 this android, a Lt. Commander in Starfleet, began going where no android had gone before
Data
Data participates in a JAG hearing to determine whether he is Starfleet property in the TNG episode "The Measure of a Man".
3
The term "Starfleet Command" is first used in TOS episode "Court Martial".
Its headquarters are depicted as being in Fort Baker, across the Golden Gate from San Francisco, in Star Trek: The Motion Picture and Star Trek IV: The Voyage Home.
Starfleet Operations
LET'S MESS WITH TEXAS: From 1846 to 1859 this ex-Tennessee governor was a U.S. senator from Texas
Sam Houston
After several weeks of retreat, the Texian Army commanded by Sam Houston attacked and defeated Santa Anna's forces at the Battle of San Jacinto.
3
The Speaker of the House leads the House, and the lieutenant governor, the Senate.
Americans with origins from the Pacific are the smallest minority in Texas.
United States Census.
IT'S A DISASTER: When one of these hit Galveston, Texas in September 1900, causing a flood, as many as 8,000 people perished
a hurricane
A hurricane in 1875 killed about 400 people in Indianola, followed by another hurricane in 1886 that destroyed the town.
3
Chipman (1992), p. 202.
p.11.
People of European and Native American heritage number over 108,800 (close to the number of Native Americans), and make up 0.5 percent of the population.
COLLEGES & UNIVERSITIES: In 1996, after lifting a ban, this Waco, Texas university held the 1st on-campus dance in its 151-year history
Baylor
Four of the state's universities, the Baylor Bears, Texas Longhorns, TCU Horned Frogs, and Texas Tech Red Raiders, compete in the Big 12 Conference.
3
Mexico controlled the territory until 1836 when Texas won its independence, becoming an independent Republic.
As a result, the Democratic Party dominated Texas politics from the end of Reconstruction until after passage in the mid-1960s of the civil rights legislation enforcing constitutional rights, establishing segregation and white supremacy.
The institution's medical school employs the most medical school Nobel laureates in the world.
TEXAS: On Sept. 24, 2005 the Gulf region was still recovering from Katrina when this hurricane slammed into Texas
Rita
Other devastating Texas hurricanes include the 1915 Galveston hurricane, Hurricane Audrey in 1957 which killed over 600 people, Hurricane Carla in 1961, Hurricane Beulah in 1967, Hurricane Alicia in 1983, Hurricane Rita in 2005, and Hurricane Ike in 2008.
3
thumb|Nicolas de La Fora's 1771 map of the northern frontier of New Spain clearly shows the Provincia de los TejasBolton, H.E., 1915, Texas in the Middle 18th Century, Berkeley: University of California Press, facing p. 382
New laws also called for the enforcement of customs duties angering both native Mexican citizens (Tejanos) and recent immigrants.
thumb|left|Texas A&M University Thirty-six (36) separate and distinct public universities exist in Texas, of which 32 belong to one of the six state university systems.
THE CIVIL WAR: In 1861, this Texas governor was deposed for refusing to support secession
Sam Houston
After several weeks of retreat, the Texian Army commanded by Sam Houston attacked and defeated Santa Anna's forces at the Battle of San Jacinto.
3
These salt deposits formed salt dome diapirs, and are found in East Texas along the Gulf coast.
Combined with United States' attempts to purchase Texas, Mexican authorities decided in 1830 to prohibit continued immigration from the United States.
In the 1890s, 100,000 blacks voted in the state; by 1906, only 5,000 could vote.
GULF TALK: Since 1899 the Sabine-Neches Canal has linked Port Arthur, Texas with this gulf
the Gulf of Mexico
The Gulf Coastal Plains region wraps around the Gulf of Mexico on the southeast section of the state.
3
The party has attracted some minorities, but many have continued to vote for Democratic candidates.
Incorporated areas are part of a municipality.
Breezes and Sunshine to Power Georgetown, TX. Huffington Post, retrieved 22.
SAM I AM: Found in Bonham, Texas, the library named for this Speaker of the House features a replica of his U.S. Capitol office
Sam Rayburn
Geography  thumbnail|250px|Sam Rayburn Reservoir thumb|250px|Texas Hill Country thumb|250px|Big Bend National Park.
3
Davis (2006), p. 46.
Texians met at the Convention of 1832 to discuss requesting independent statehood, among other issues.
Between 2006 and 2007, Texas spent $7,275 per pupil ranking it below the national average of $9,389.
DON'T MISS THE BOAT: You can take a boat ride down the River Walk section of this southern Texas city
San Antonio
Houston is the largest city in Texas and the fourth-largest in the United States, while San Antonio is the second largest in the state and seventh largest in the United States.
3
These changes helped Texas universities receive federal research funds.
Adherents of many other religions reside predominantly in the urban centers of Texas.
The first railroad to operate in Texas was the Buffalo Bayou, Brazos and Colorado Railway, opening in August 1853.
THE VEEP: Vice President under Thomas Jefferson, he was the first Vice President who did not later become President
Aaron Burr
Jefferson's second term was beset with difficulties at home, including the trial of former Vice President Aaron Burr.
3
Tucker, 1837, v.1, p. 263
Peterson, 1970, p. 275
And he contributed generously to several local denominations nearby Monticello.
OSCAR WINNERS ONSTAGE: Mike Nichols saw him in a play called "Eh?" & offered him the starring role in "The Graduate"
Dustin Hoffman
The film tells the story of 21-year-old Benjamin Braddock (Dustin Hoffman), a recent college graduate with no well-defined aim in life, who is seduced by an older woman, Mrs. Robinson (Anne Bancroft), and then proceeds to fall in love with her daughter Elaine (Katharine Ross).
2
For the character of Elaine, casting was also problematic.
Mike Nichols won the Academy Award for Best Director.
CLUBS: On film the members of "The Breakfast Club" were sentenced to it in the library
detention
The storyline follows five teenagers, each a member of a different high school clique, who spend a Saturday in detention together and come to realize that they are all more than their respective stereotypes, while facing a strict disciplinarian principal.
3
In 2008, a "Flashback Edition" DVD was released with several special features, including an audio commentary with Anthony Michael Hall and Judd Nelson.
– Karla DeVito  "Reggae" (instrumental) –
References  External links             Category:1980s comedy-drama films Category:1980s teen films Category:1985 films Category:1985 soundtracks Category:A&M Records soundtracks Category:American comedy-drama films Category:American coming-of-age films Category:American films Category:American high school films Category:American teen comedy films Category:American teen drama films Category:English-language films Category:Film soundtracks Category:Films directed by John Hughes Category:Films set in 1984 Category:Films set in Chicago, Illinois Category:Films set in schools Category:Films shot in Illinois Category:Universal Pictures films
TENNESSEE, ANYONE?: This city is home to the American Museum of Atomic Energy
Oak Ridge
In the 20th century, Tennessee transitioned from an agrarian economy to a more diversified economy, aided by massive federal investment in the Tennessee Valley Authority and, in the early 1940s, the city of Oak Ridge.
3
Winter storms are an occasional problem, such as the infamous Blizzard of 1993, although ice storms are a more likely occurrence.
Politics  + Presidential elections results Year Republican Democratic201259.42% 1,462,330   39.04%    960,709200856.85% 1,479,178   41.79%    1,087,437200456.80% 1,384,375   42.53%    1,036,477200051.15% 1,061,949   47.28%    981,7201996   45.59%    863,53048.00% 909,1461992   42.43%    841,30047.08% 933,521198857.89% 947,233   41.55%    679,794198457.84% 990,212   41.57%    711,714198048.70% 787,761   48.41%    783,0511976   42.94%    633,96955.94% 825,879197267.70% 813,147   29.75%    357,293196837.85% 472,592   28.13%    351,2331964   44.49%    508,96555.50% 634,947196052.92% 556,577   45.77%    481,453  Tennessee politics, like that of most U.S. states, are dominated by the Republican and the Democratic parties.
The Davidson County Sheriff's duties focus on warrant service and jail operations.
FAMILIAR PHRASES: Thomas Gray originated the phrase "Far from" this tumultuous group; Thomas Hardy borrowed it
Madding crowd
"Celestial fire"  "Some mute inglorious Milton"  "Far from the Madding Crowd" (the title of a novel by Thomas Hardy, filmed several times)  "The unlettered muse"  "Kindred spirit"  "Elegy" contemplates such themes as death and afterlife.
3
Gray was so self-critical and fearful of failure that he published only thirteen poems during his lifetime.
These elements were not generally valued in the early 18th century, when the popular taste ran to classical styles in architecture and literature, and most people liked their scenery tame and well-tended.
References  Further reading  The Poems of Thomas Gray, William Collins, Oliver Goldsmith, ed.
THEODORE ROOSEVELT: Having reconciled with Teddy only a short time before, this ex-president attended TR's funeral
William Howard Taft
Roosevelt successfully groomed his close friend, William Howard Taft, to succeed him in the presidency, and after leaving office, went on safari in Africa and toured Europe.
3
Roosevelt himself was not usually a target, but his speech in 1906 coined the term "muckraker" for unscrupulous journalists making wild charges.
After a briefing of several of his own expeditions, he persuaded Roosevelt to participate in such an expedition in 1912.
Cooper compared him with Woodrow Wilson, and discovered that both of them played the roles of warrior and priest.
ARTISTS: His "Last Supper" in Milan was already a wreck by the end of his lifetime
Leonardo Da Vinci
thumb|450px|right|Depictions of the Last Supper in Christian art have been undertaken by artistic masters for centuries, Leonardo da Vinci's late 1490s mural painting in Milan, Italy, being the best-known example.
3
Some scholars, therefore, believe that it is an interpolation, while others have argued that it is original.
No more specific indication of the location is given in the New Testament, and the "city" referred to may be a suburb of Jerusalem, such as Bethany, rather than Jerusalem itself.
The ethics of Aquinas by Stephen J. Pope 2002 ISBN 0-87840-888-6 page 22
PLAYWRIGHTS: A freed slave named Terence was one of the greatest comic playwrights of this ancient civilization
Rome
His comedies were performed for the first time around 170–160 BC. Terentius Lucanus, a Roman senator, brought Terence to Rome as a slave, educated him and later on, impressed by his abilities, freed him.
3
Terence's popularity throughout the Middle Ages and the Renaissance is attested to by the numerous manuscripts containing part or all of his plays; the scholar Claudia Villa has estimated that 650 manuscripts containing Terence's work date from after AD 800.
The short dialogue Terentius et delusor was probably written to be performed as an introduction to a Terentian performance in the 9th century (possibly earlier).
US President John Adams once wrote to his son, "Terence is remarkable, for good morals, good taste, and good Latin...
POLITICS: The rooster was symbol of this party before Thomas Nast drew their new one in 1870
the Democrats
Democratic Party donkey (although the donkey was associated with the Democrats as early as 1837, Nast popularized the representationDonal A. Voorhees, The Book of Totally Useless Information, 1998; pp.
3
Nast's cartoons and articles about the Garibaldi military campaign  to unify Italy captured the popular imagination in the U.S.
His body was returned to the United States, where he was interred in the Woodlawn Cemetery in The Bronx, New York City.
Scholarly biography Nast, T., & St. Hill, T. N. (1974).
THE CARS: Bad news for some Toyota owners: this model is the car that's stolen most often
Camry
In the 1990s, Toyota began to branch out from producing mostly compact cars by adding many larger and more luxurious vehicles to its lineup, including a full-sized pickup, the T100 (and later the Tundra); several lines of SUVs; a sport version of the Camry, known as the Camry Solara; and the Scion brand, a group of several affordable, yet sporty, automobiles targeted specifically to young adults.
3
According to an unofficial count, based on unit production reported by major automakers, Toyota regained its top rank with 9,909,440 units produced globally in calendar year 2012.
The system takes into consideration rate of acceleration, engine and transmission efficiency, and speed.
See also   List of Toyota engines  List of Toyota manufacturing facilities  List of Toyota transmissions  List of Toyota vehicles   Nagoya Grampus, formerly the company's football club and still sponsored by them  Toyota Verblitz, the company's rugby team  Toyota War, a conflict between Libya and Chad which saw a heavy use of Toyota's pickup trucks.
IRISH WRITERS: His preface to "The Picture of Dorian Gray" says, "There is no such thing as a moral or an immoral book"
Oscar Wilde
The Picture of Dorian Gray is a philosophical novel by the writer Oscar Wilde, first published complete in the July 1890 issue of Lippincott's Monthly Magazine.
3
This prompts Dorian to wish that the painted image of himself would age in his stead.
British reviewers condemned the novel's immorality, and said condemnation was so controversial that the W H Smith publishing house withdrew every copy of the July 1890 issue of Lippincott's Monthly Magazine from its bookstalls in railway stations.
Never.
AROUND THE "GLOBE": Nominated 7 times, Tom Cruise has won 3 of these
a Golden Globe
Cruise portrayed real-life paralyzed Vietnam War veteran Ron Kovic in 1989's Born on the Fourth of July, which earned him a Golden Globe Award for Best Actor - Motion Picture Drama, the Chicago Film Critics Association Award for Best Actor, the People's Choice Award for Favorite Motion Picture Actor, a nomination for BAFTA Award for Best Actor in a Leading Role, and Cruise's first Best Actor Academy Award nomination.
3
One of his paternal great-great-great-grandfathers, Patrick Russell Cruise, was born in north County Dublin, in 1799; he married Teresa Johnson in Warrenstown House, County Meath, in 1825.
Cruise's family spent part of his childhood in Canada.
Management of United Artists In November 2006, Cruise and Paula Wagner announced that they had taken over United Artists film studio.
A DAY IN THE LIFE: May 2, 1863:He sends Stonewall Jackson on a brilliant attack at Chancellorsville
Robert E. Lee
May 10, 1863) was a Confederate general during the American Civil War, and the best-known Confederate commander after General Robert E. Lee.
3
His discipline was systematic and firm, but very kind. ...
Jackson's family owned six slaves in the late 1850s.
233–34.
MOVIE PRODUCERS: Tim Burton, director of the 1989 smash about this comic book hero, also co-produced the 1992 sequel
Batman
He is also known for blockbusters such as the adventure comedy Pee-wee's Big Adventure (1985), the superhero films Batman (1989) and its first sequel Batman Returns (1992), the sci-fi film Planet of the Apes (2001), the musical adventure film Charlie and the Chocolate Factory (2005) and the fantasy film Alice in Wonderland (2010), which garnered a worldwide gross of over $1 billion.
2
I don't know if it was dyslexia or whatever, but that's why I loved The Killing Joke, because for the first time I could tell which one to read.
The film helped to generate a renewed interest in stop motion animation.
CHINA: Teng Hsiao-P'ing tried to unsuccessfully to persuade him to return to Tibet
Dalai Lama
Rise of Ganden Phodrang  In 1578, Altan Khan of the Tümed Mongols gave Sonam Gyatso, a high lama of the Gelugpa school, the name Dalai Lama, Dalai being the Mongolian translation of the Tibetan name Gyatso "Ocean".Laird 2006, pp.
3
It is also said that Tibetan activists in Tibet have been arrested or tortured.
Royal Asiatic Society (1985), pp.
Goldstein 1997, pg.
DO YOU KNOW HOW FAST YOU WERE GOING?: In October of 1970, driver Gary Gabelich averaged 622.407 mph over 2 runs at this Utah plain
the Bonneville Salt Flats
The Bonneville Salt Flats are an exception, being comparatively flat as a result of once forming the bed of ancient Lake Bonneville.
3
A group led by two Catholic priests—sometimes called the Dominguez-Escalante Expedition—left Santa Fe in 1776, hoping to find a route to the coast of California.
One of western Utah's most impressive, but least visited attractions is Notch Peak, the tallest limestone cliff in North America, located west of Delta.
Major cities and towns  right|px225|thumb|Salt Lake City  right|px200|thumb|Logan  px200|thumb|Ogden  right|px200|thumb|Park City  right|px200|thumb|Provo  right|px200|thumb|Sandy  right|px200|thumb|St.
PLANT LIFE: This type of habitat comes before "marigold" in the name of a plant of Arizona & Utah
desert
The Spanish made further explorations in the region, but were not interested in colonizing the area because of its desert nature.
3
Utah also has the 14th highest median average income and the least income inequality of any U.S. state.
Utah does not charge intangible property taxes and does not impose an inheritance tax.
Salt Lake City was previously host to the Utah Stars, who competed in the ABA from 1970–76 and won 1 championship, and to the Utah Starzz of the WNBA from 1997 to 2003.
"O", WHAT A PLACE!: A spectacular stairway called the Potemkin Steps slopes down to this Ukraine seaport's harbor on the Black Sea
Odessa
+Average daily maximum and minimum temperatures for the seven largest cities in UkraineLocationJuly (°C)July (°F)January (°C)January (°F)Kiev  25/16  78/61  –1/−6  30/21Kharkiv  26/16  79/61  −2/−7  28/19Dnipropetrovsk  28/16  82/61  –1/−6  30/21Odessa  27/18  80/65  2/−2  36/27Donetsk  27/16  81/61  –1/–6  29/20Zaporizhia  28/16  83/61  –0/−5  31/21Lviv  24/13  75/56  0/–6  32/21  Politics  Ukraine is a republic under a mixed semi-parliamentary semi-presidential system with separate legislative, executive, and judicial branches.
3
Instead, the Nazis preserved the collective-farm system, carried out genocidal policies against Jews, deported millions of people to work in Germany, and began a depopulation program to prepare for German colonisation.
However Ukraine also has a number of highland regions such as the Volyn-Podillia Upland (in the west) and the Near-Dnipro Upland (on the right bank of Dnieper); to the east there are the south-western spurs of the Central Russian Uplands over which runs the border with Russian Federation.
In The Ukraine, Mitchell Vallentine & Co, 2005. 394 pp.
THE HISTORY OF JANUARY: After leading a military coup on Jan. 25, 1971, he made himself president of Uganda
Idi Amin
1971 (after the coup)–1979 (end of Amin regime)  After a military coup on 25 January 1971, Obote was deposed from power and the dictator Idi Amin seized control of the country.
3
Uganda (  or  ), officially the Republic of Uganda, is a landlocked country in East Africa.
Newvision.co.ug (3 January 2013).
English was the only official language until the constitution was amended in 2005.
ANY PORT: Mombasa, a city in this country also serves as a port for landlocked Uganda
Kenya
It is bordered to the east by Kenya, to the north by South Sudan, to the west by the Democratic Republic of the Congo, to the southwest by Rwanda, and to the south by Tanzania.
3
Parallel with the state administration, five traditional Bantu kingdoms have remained, enjoying some degrees of mainly cultural autonomy.
The Muslim population is primarily Sunni.
Theatre & Cinema.
THE CIVIL WAR: Rewards offered for the capture of this Underground Railroad conductor once totaled $40,000
Harriet Tubman
Declaration of the Immediate Causes Which Induce and Justify the Secession of South Carolina from the Federal Union http://avalon.law.yale.edu/19th_century/csa_scarsec.asp     Structure  thumb|Harriet Tubman (photo H. B. Lindsley), c. 1870.
3
Because the law required sparse documentation to claim a person was a fugitive, slave catchers also kidnapped free blacks, especially children, and sold them into slavery.
The resting spots where the runaways could sleep and eat were given the code names "stations" and "depots," which were held by "station masters". "
These included Lower Canada (present-day Quebec) and Vancouver Island, where Governor James Douglas encouraged black immigration because of his opposition to slavery.
WEATHER WORLD: In Venezuela, this "season" is from April to October; in the mountains of Peru, from November to March
rainy season
Venezuela's national tree is the araguaney, whose characteristic lushness after the rainy season led novelist Rómulo Gallegos to name it "[l]a primavera de oro de los araguaneyes" (the golden spring of the araguaneyes).
3
The town of Caracas, founded in the central coastal region in 1567, was well-placed to become a key location, being near the coastal port of La Guaira whilst itself being located in a valley in a mountain range, providing defensive strength against pirates and a more fertile and healthy climate.
thumb|Federal Dependencies of Venezuela.
Manufacturing contributed 17% of GDP in 2006.
WORLD FACTS: It's the monetary unit of Vatican City
Lira
Until the adoption of the Euro, Vatican coinage and stamps were denominated in their own Vatican lira currency, which was on par with the Italian lira.
3
The Institute for Works of Religion, also known as the Vatican Bank, and with the acronym IOR (Istituto per le Opere di Religione), is a bank situated in the Vatican that conducts worldwide financial activities.
As a result, all of the City's actual citizens are Catholic as are all the places of worship.
The Holy See, not being a country, issues only diplomatic and service passports, whereas Vatican City State issues normal passports for its citizens.
CHECK THE NEWSPAPER: Though based in McLean, Virginia, this top-selling daily serves the entire nation
USA Today
The paper with the nation's widest circulation, USA Today, with 1.83 million daily subscriptions, is headquartered in McLean.
3
The border with Tennessee was not settled until 1893, when their dispute was brought to the U.S. Supreme Court.
Resident and touring theater troupes operate from the American Shakespeare Center in Staunton.
Enfranchisement and immigration of other groups, especially Hispanics, have placed growing importance on minority voting, while voters that identify as "white working-class" declined by three percent between 2008 and 2012.
WHERE THERE'S A WILLIAM: The Virginia city settled in 1633 as Middle Plantation was renamed this in 1699
Williamsburg
thumb|left|Williamsburg was Virginia's capital from 1699 to 1780.|alt=A three-story red brick colonial style hall and its left and right wings during winter.
3
The capital of the Commonwealth is Richmond; Virginia Beach is the most populous city, and Fairfax County is the most populous political subdivision.
Virginia's boundary with Maryland and Washington, D.C. extends to the low-water mark of the south shore of the Potomac River.
In the American Lung Association's 2011 report, 11 counties received failing grades for air quality, with Fairfax County having the worst in the state, due to automobile pollution.
GLASS: The first glass making plant in America was built at this Virginia settlement in 1608
Jamestown
"Jamestown 1607" marked Virginia's quadricentennial year, celebrating 400 years since the establishment of the Jamestown Colony.
3
The execution of Gabriel Prosser in 1800, Nat Turner's slave rebellion in 1831 and John Brown's Raid on Harpers Ferry in 1859 marked the growing social discontent over slavery and its role in the plantation economy.
This general method of treating cities and counties on par with each other is unique to Virginia, with only three other independent cities in the United States outside Virginia, in three different states.
Virginia was given the title "Dominion" by King Charles II of England at the time of The Restoration, because it had remained loyal to the crown during the English Civil War, and the present moniker, "Old Dominion" is a reference to that title.
OFFICIAL STATE THINGS: This "sweet" state tree of Vermont is an important source of syrup
sugar maple
Vermont has a humid continental climate, with muddy springs, in general a mild early summer, hot Augusts; it has colorful autumns: Vermont's hills reveal red, orange, and (on sugar maples) gold foliage as cold weather approaches.
3
The dairy barn remains an iconic image of Vermont, but the 87 percent decrease in active dairy farms between 1947 and 2003 means that preservation of the dairy barns has increasingly become dependent upon a commitment to maintaining a legacy rather than basic need in the agricultural economy.
As a result, voters often have extensive choices for general elections.
It plays its home games at the Colchester High School stadium.
AMERICANA: This Vermont capital with 1 "L" took the name of a French city that has 2 "L"s
Montpelier
thumb|260px|right|thumb|Vermont State House in Montpelier thumb|right|Vermont has 14 counties.
3
This was the first seismic event noted in Vermont.
In 2009, the average rent for a two-bedroom apartment was $920 per month.
thumb|Lake Champlain  Visitors participate in trout fishing, lake fishing, and ice fishing.
LAKES & RIVERS: The northern tip of this long lake on the border between Vermont & New York extends into Quebec
Lake Champlain
Lake Champlain forms half of Vermont's western border, which it shares with the state of New York.
3
Property taxes are levied by municipalities for the support of education and municipal services.
In Baker v. Vermont (1999), the Vermont Supreme Court ruled that, under the Constitution of Vermont, the state must either allow same-sex marriage or provide a separate but equal status for them.
Vermont became the first state to call for a convention to amend the U.S. Constitution to reverse the U.S. Supreme Court's Citizens United decision ...
GREEN STUFF: It's what's green in Vermont's nickname
Green Mountains
The Green Mountains run north-south from the Canadian border with the province of Quebec in the north to the Massachusetts line to the south.
3
About 500 million years ago, Vermont was part of Laurentia and located in the tropics.
Housing prices did not rise much during the early 2000s.
Sports  Winter sports Winter sports are popular in New England, and Vermont's winter sports attractions are a big part of Vermont tourism.
REALLY OLD HISTORY: This highest civil office of old Venice originated in the 7th century & got its first palace in 814
doge
The traditional first doge of Venice, Paolo Lucio Anafesto, was actually Exarch Paul, and his successor, Marcello Tegalliano, was Paul's magister militum (General: literally, "Master of Soldiers").
3
The newly invented German printing press spread rapidly throughout Europe in the 15th century, and Venice was quick to adopt it.
The urban organization is governed by the Italian Constitution (art.
Venice: Pure City.
WORLD GEOGRAPHY: Venice is known as the "Queen Of" this sea
Adriatic
Venice has been known as the "La Dominante", "Serenissima", "Queen of the Adriatic", "City of Water", "City of Masks", "City of Bridges", "The Floating City", and "City of Canals".
3
The Roman defences were again overthrown in the early 5th century by the Visigoths and, some 50 years later, by the Huns led by Attila.
The French writer Philippe Sollers spent most of his life in Venice and published  A Dictionary For Lovers Of Venice in 2004.
Contarini, Gasparo (1599).
IN WHICH CANADIAN PROVINCE?: The Nine O' Clock Gun, which booms every evening to let Vancouver's citizens set their watches
British Columbia
Vancouver ( or ) officially the City of Vancouver, is a coastal seaport city on the mainland of British Columbia, Canada.
3
There is also a freshwater beach at Trout Lake in John Hendry Park.
In 2011, Vancouver hosted the Grey Cup, the Canadian Football League (CFL) championship game which is awarded every year to a different city which has a CFL team.
The city is also actively working towards becoming a greener city.
MAD, I TELL YOU!: Howard Cosell covers an assassination & a marital consummation in this "fruity" Woody Allen film
Bananas
Those films eventually became Bananas (1971, co-written with Rose), Everything You Always Wanted to Know About Sex* (1972), Sleeper (1973), and Love and Death (1975).
3
And although he was described as a "classic nebbish", he did not tell Jewish jokes.
His success continued with Play
Allegations of child sexual abuse Allen and Farrow engaged in a heated and emotionally damaging custody battle after they broke up in January 1992.
CLASSICAL MUSIC GOES TO THE MOVIES: "Rhapsody In Blue" was put to good use in this "geographic" Woody Allen comedy
Manhattan
Some best-known of his over 40 films are Annie Hall (1977), Manhattan (1979), and Hannah and Her Sisters (1986), although he considers Stardust Memories (1980), The Purple Rose of Cairo (1985), and Match Point (2005) to be his best films.
3
Allen brought innovation to the comedy monologue genre and his stand-up comedy would be considered influential.
Retrieved June 18, 2015.
Retrieved June 18, 2015.
FAMOUS GERMANS: German director Wim Wenders cast her in her 1st film, "The Wrong Move", & used her again in "Paris, Texas"
Nastassja Kinski
Filmography   Year English title German title Notes1970Summer in the City First full-length feature film (Dedicated to The Kinks)1972The Goalkeeper's Fear of the Penalty (UK) or The Goalie's Anxiety at the Penalty Kick (USA)Die Angst des Tormanns beim ElfmeterAdaptation of a novel by Peter Handke1973The Scarlet LetterDer Scharlachrote BuchstabeAdapted from the novel by Nathaniel Hawthorne1974Alice in the Cities |Alice in den Städten|First part of Wenders' Road Movie Trilogy |- |1975 |The Wrong Move|Falsche Bewegung|Second part of Wenders' Road Movie Trilogy, with Nastassja Kinski |- |1976 |Kings of the Road|Im Lauf der Zeit|Third part of Wenders' Road Movie Trilogy |- |1977 |The American Friend|Der Amerikanische Freund|Adaptation of Patricia Highsmith's novel Ripley's Game|- |1980 |Lightning
3
Since 1996, Wenders has been the president of the European Film Academy in Berlin.
Wenders has directed several highly acclaimed documentaries, most notably Buena Vista Social Club (1999), about Cuban musicians, and The Soul of a Man (2003), on American blues.
He has also directed many music videos for groups such as U2 and Talking Heads, including "Stay (Faraway, So Close!)" and "Sax and Violins".
CAPITAL RIVERS: Warsaw
the Vistula
It stands on the Vistula River in east-central Poland, roughly  from the Baltic Sea and  from the Carpathian Mountains.
3
It goes through the city and plays an important role as a landmark.
Powstał w latach 1865–1871, według projektu Jana Dobrowolskiego, na prawym brzegu Wisły.
Poland's large nationwide daily newspapers have their headquarters in Warsaw.
WINE, WHITE WINE: "C" this white grape?  It's a French-named type that's used to make champagne & white burgundy
Chardonnay
Grape varieties  thumb|right|Grape vineyard  Wine is usually made from one or more varieties of the European species Vitis vinifera, such as Pinot noir, Chardonnay, Cabernet Sauvignon, Gamay and Merlot.
3
The Armenian Trail 02;|  .
Characteristics of highly collectible wines include:   A proven track record of holding well over time  A drinking-window plateau (i.e., the period for maturity and approachability) that is many years long  A consensus among experts as to the quality of the wines  Rigorous production methods at every stage, including grape selection and appropriate barrel aging  Investment in fine wine has attracted those who take advantage of their victims' relative ignorance of this wine market sector.economist.com Fine-wine fraud.
In Christianity, wine is used in a sacred rite called the Eucharist, which originates in the Gospel account of the Last Supper (Gospel of Luke 22:19) describing Jesus sharing bread and wine with his disciples and commanding them to "do this in remembrance of me."
PRESIDENTS: In the first presidential White House wedding, he married Frances Folsom
Grover Cleveland
Even so, the practice continued until 1885, when newly elected Grover Cleveland arranged for a presidential review of the troops from a grandstand in front of the White House instead of the traditional open house.
3
In the main mansion, the third-floor attic was converted to living quarters in 1927 by augmenting the existing hip roof with long shed dormers.
ISBN 978-0-415-92320-0.
The West Wing was damaged by fire in 1929, but rebuilt during the remaining years of the Herbert Hoover presidency.
TRAIN STATIONS: A real depot inspired the symbol of this Wisconsin insurance company, seen here
Wausau
Meanwhile, the lumber industry dominated in the heavily forested northern sections of Wisconsin, and sawmills sprang up in cities like La Crosse, Eau Claire, and Wausau.
3
55/35 (13/1) 67/45 (19/7) 76/55 (25/13) 81/59 (27/15) 79/58 (26/14) 71/49 (22/10) 58/38 (14/4) 43/28 (6/−2)
30/15 (−1/−9) Hurley 19/0 (−7/−18) 26/4 (-4/−16)
In 2006, Democrats gained in a national sweep of opposition to the Bush administration, and the Iraq War.
ANIMAL YOUTH: In "Songs of Innocence", William Blake asked it, "Who made thee?"
the lamb
Modern British composer John Tavener set several of Blake's poems, including The Lamb (as the 1982 work "The Lamb") and The Tyger.
3
The Emanation of the Giant Albion.
Watercolour on wood.
Routledge & K. Paul.
ROLES IN 2010 BEST PICTURE OSCAR NOMINEES: Winston Churchill, Neville Chamberlain
The King's Speech
Portrayals of Churchill include Dudley Field Malone (An American in Paris, 1951); Peter Sellers (The Man Who Never Was, 1956); Richard Burton (Winston Churchill: The Valiant Years, 1961); Simon Ward (Young Winston, 1972); Warren Clarke (Jennie: Lady Randolph Churchill, 1974); Wensley Pithey (Edward and Mrs Simpson, 1978); Timothy West (Churchill and the Generals, 1979, Hiroshima, 1995); William Hootkins (The Life and Times of David Lloyd George, 1981); Robert Hardy (Winston Churchill: The Wilderness Years, 1981, War and Remembrance, 1989); Bob Hoskins (World War II: When Lions Roared 1994); Albert Finney (The Gathering Storm 2002); Ian Mune (Ike: Countdown to D-Day, 2004); Rod Taylor (Inglourious Basterds, 2009); Brendan Gleeson (Into the Storm, 2009); Ian McNeice (Doctor Who: "Victory of the Daleks"; "The Pandorica Opens"; "The Wedding of River Song" in 2010 and 2011); Timothy Spall (The King's Speech, 2010), and John Lithgow (The Crown, 2016).
3
The couple spent their honeymoon at Highgrove House in Eastcote.
Although he disapproved strongly of the mass slaughter involved in many Western Front actions, he exposed himself to danger by making excursions to the front line or into No Man's Land.
246–49  Churchill expressed similar sentiments at a meeting of the Primrose League at the Albert Hall on 18 May 1947.
SPORTS: Except for 1995, the NHL scoring title has gone to either Wayne Gretzky or this Penguins star the past 16 years
Mario Lemieux
For only the second time in his NHL career, Gretzky finished second in scoring, but narrowly beat out Pittsburgh's Mario Lemieux (who scored 199 points) for the Hart Trophy as MVP.
3
NHL career  Edmonton Oilers (1979–1988) After the World Hockey Association folded in 1979, the Edmonton Oilers and three other teams joined the NHL.The other three teams to join the NHL were the New England Whalers, the Quebec Nordiques, and the Winnipeg Jets.
Finally, in early 1996, Gretzky requested a trade.
Gretzky resumed his head-coaching duties on December 28.
NATIONAL GEOGRAPHIC: The prairie dogs seen here are having a picnic at this national monument (in Wyoming)
Devils Tower
They include:  National parks thumb|upright|215px|An eruption of Castle Geyser in Yellowstone National Park  Yellowstone National Park  Grand Teton National Park  Recreation areas  Bighorn Canyon National Recreation Area  Flaming Gorge National Recreation Area (Forest Service-Ashley National Forest)  National monuments  Devils Tower National Monument  Fossil Butte National Monument  National historic trails and sites  California National Historic Trail  Independence Rock (Wyoming)  Fort Laramie National Historic Site  Medicine Wheel National Historic Site  Mormon Pioneer National Historic Trail  National Register of Historic Places listings in Wyoming  Oregon National Historic Trail  Pony Express National Historic Trail  National parkways  John D. Rockefeller, Jr. Memorial Parkway between Yellowstone National Park and Grand Teton National Park  Wildlife refuges and hatcheries  Seedskadee National Wildlife Refuge  National Elk Refuge  Jackson National Fish Hatchery  Saratoga National Fish Hatchery  Climate  thumb|Wyoming state welcome sign on Interstate 80 in Uinta County (at the Utah border).
3
Several rivers begin in or flow through the state, including the Yellowstone River, Bighorn River, Green River, and the Snake River.
Source:    Average maximum and minimum temperatures, and average rainfall.
Norman: University of Oklahoma Press, pg.
LANGUAGES: It evolved from Anglo-Saxon dialect of Wessex
English
His successor, Ine, issued one of the oldest surviving English law codes and established a second West Saxon bishopric.
3
However, following a previous incursion in 360 that was stopped by Roman forces, the Picts and Scots attacked Hadrian's Wall in the far north in 367 and defeated the soldiers stationed along it.
Yorke, p. 131
Having defeated King Beorhtwulf of Mercia in battle, the Danes moved on to invade Wessex, but were decisively crushed by Egbert's son and successor King Aethelwulf in the exceptionally bloody Battle of Aclea.
AMERICAN LITERATURE: This William Faulkner novel opens with a tale told by Benjy, an idiot
The Sound and the Fury
In 1998, the Modern Library ranked his 1929 novel The Sound and the Fury sixth on its list of the 100 best English-language novels of the 20th century; also on the list were As I Lay Dying (1930) and Light in August (1932).
3
Faulkner also spent much of his boyhood listening to stories told to him by his elders.
There he was supported in his dream to become a writer.
ISBN 1-55994-572-9
SAMS & SAMUELS: He wrote "The Rime of the Ancient Mariner" for a book of poetry co-written with William Wordsworth
Samuel Taylor Coleridge
William Wordsworth (7 April 1770 – 23 April 1850) was a major English Romantic poet who, with Samuel Taylor Coleridge, helped to launch the Romantic Age in English literature with their joint publication Lyrical Ballads (1798).
3
It was this repayment that afforded Wordsworth the financial means to marry.
The following year Mary gave birth to the first of five children, three of whom predeceased her and William:  John Wordsworth (18 June 1803 – 1875).
Sylvanus Urban, The Gentleman's Magazine, 1823 The two were fully reconciled by 1828, when they toured the Rhineland together.
SHE'S LOST CONTROL: After downing a bottle of aspirin & a bottle of vodka, Winona Ryder is committed to a mental ward in this 1999 film
Girl, Interrupted
She later appeared in the Generation X hit Reality Bites (1994), Alien: Resurrection (1997), the Woody Allen comedy Celebrity (1998), and Girl, Interrupted (1999), which she also executive-produced.
3
Bigger, Longer & Uncut.
On October 6, 2000, Ryder received her own star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame, located directly in front of the Johnny Grant building next to the Hollywood Roosevelt Hotel on Hollywood Boulevard.
Retrieved January 16, 2008.
"PIE" FLINGING: General term for a Xerox machine or a medieval transcriber
a copier
In 1963 Xerox introduced the Xerox 813, the first desktop plain-paper copier, realizing Carlson's vision of a copier that could fit on anyone's office desk.
3
The LDX system was introduced in 1964.
Many of the concepts used in today's "Photo Shop" programs were pioneered with this technology.
It did take off with many customers, but was soon replaced with its still smaller and lower cost 2700 Distributed Electronic Printer offering in 1982.http://simson.net/ref/Xerox/1987.Xerox.
GRAB BAG: This Jewish festival begins on the eve of the 25th day of Kislev, which in 2004 is December 8, & lasts 8 days
Hanukkah
Holidays in Kislev   25 Kislev—2 Tevet  - Hanukkah –
3
The Greeks set up the "Abomination of Desolation" in the Temple."Now the fifteenth day of the month Kislev, in the hundred forty and fifth year, they set up the abomination of desolation upon the altar, and builded idol altars throughout the cities of Judah on every side." (1 Maccabees 1:54) 20 Kislev (circa 457 BC) - Ezra addresses a three-day assemblage of Jews in Jerusalem, telling them to adhere to the Torah and to dissolve their interfaith marriages.
25 Kislev (167 BC)
In the Warhammer universe, Kislev is both the name for a city near the chaos wastes and the country in which it resides.
ELEMENT NAMES: Found by Carl Gustav Mosander, terbium is named for Ytterby, a village in this country
Sweden
Category:Metropolitan Stockholm Category:Populated places in Vaxholm Municipality Category:Science and technology in Sweden
3
The name of the village means "outer village".
This crude mineral eventually proved to be the source of four new elements that were named after the mineral ore and the village.
In addition, three other lanthanides, holmium (Ho, named after Stockholm), thulium (Tm, named after Thule, a mythic analog of Scandinavia), and gadolinium (Gd, after the chemist Johan Gadolin) can trace their discovery to the same quarry.
SCIENCE & NATURE: The elements erbium, terbium, ytterbium & yttrium are named for the town of Ytterby in this country
Sweden
Category:Metropolitan Stockholm Category:Populated places in Vaxholm Municipality Category:Science and technology in Sweden
2
These elements are yttrium (Y), erbium (Er), terbium (Tb), and ytterbium (Yb) and were first described in 1794, 1842, 1842, and 1878, respectively.
In addition, three other lanthanides, holmium (Ho, named after Stockholm), thulium (Tm, named after Thule, a mythic analog of Scandinavia), and gadolinium (Gd, after the chemist Johan Gadolin) can trace their discovery to the same quarry.
2-LETTER SCRABBLE WORDS: It's used to express dismay or pain, especially in Yiddish
oy
In common usage, the language is called  (mame-loshn, literally "mother tongue"), distinguishing it from Hebrew and Aramaic, which are collectively termed  (loshn-koydesh, "holy tongue").
3
Yiddish Civilization: The Rise and Fall of a Forgotten Nation.
Retrieved 25 December 2006.
The Monument National was the center of Yiddish theater from 1896 until the construction of the Saidye Bronfman Centre for the Arts, inaugurated on September 24, 1967, where the established resident theater, the Dora Wasserman Yiddish Theatre, remains the only permanent Yiddish theatre in North America.
20th CENTURY NOVELS: "The Magician of Lublin", by this Yiddish language Nobel Prize winner, is set in his native Poland
Isaac Bashevis Singer
He was fluent in Yiddish, and translated several Yiddish poems and stories into English, including Isaac Bashevis Singer's "Gimpel the Fool".
3
This included secular works, such as the בָּבָֿא-בּוך Bovo-Bukh, and religious writing specifically for women, such as the צאנה וראינה Tseno Ureno and the תחנות Tkhines.
The name commonly given to the semicursive form used exclusively for Yiddish was  (vaybertaytsh = "women's taytsh," shown in the heading and fourth column in the adjacent illustration), with square Hebrew letters (shown in the third column) being reserved for text in that language and Aramaic.
The population is largely elderly: 72,885 of the speakers were older than 65, 66,815 were between 18 and 64, and only 39,245 were age 17 or lower.
OLD YORK: These medieval plays, none by Agatha Christie, are performed in a cycle at York every 4 years
Mystery plays
right|thumb|The interior of York's Grand Opera House The York Mystery Plays are performed in public at intervals, using texts based on the original medieval plays of this type that were performed by the guilds –
3
Between 1998 and 2008 York gained 80 new technology companies and 2,800 new jobs in the sector.
York St John University has a Film and Television Production department with links to many major industrial partners.
See also   List of people from York  Notes There was no census in 1941: figures are from National Register.
YOU LOOK LIKE A GREEK GOD: Talk about a difficult birth--she sprang from Zeus' head, which had been split with an axe
Athena
These resulted in many godly and heroic offspring, including Athena, Apollo, Artemis, Hermes, Persephone, Dionysus, Perseus, Heracles, Helen of Troy, Minos, and the Muses.
3
Most of the titles listed below, for instance, could be found at any number of Greek temples from Asia Minor to Sicily.
She wrapped a stone in a blanket, and Cronus swallowed it thinking he was swallowing his last child.
Throughout history Zeus has used violence to get his way, or even terrorize humans.
EURO COINS: This country has a very busy coin; Europa is being abducted by Zeus who is in the form of a bull
Greece
Minoan culture contributed many essentials of ancient Greek religion: "by a hundred channels the old civilization emptied itself into the new", Will Durant observed,Durant, The Life of Greece (The Story of Civilization Part II, New York: Simon & Schuster) 1939:23.
3
The god is known under this name in the  Rigveda (Vedic Sanskrit Dyaus/Dyaus Pita), Latin (compare Jupiter, from Iuppiter, deriving from the Proto-Indo-European vocative *), deriving from the root *dyeu- ("to shine", and in its many derivatives, "sky, heaven, god").
Many myths render Hera as jealous of his amorous conquests and a consistent enemy of Zeus's mistresses and their children by him.
Consorts and children  Divine offspring   Mother  Children Aega AegipanHyginus, Fabulae 155 Ananke or Themis Moirai/Fates1  Atropos  Clotho  Lachesis Aphrodite Tyche6 (possibly) Demeter Persephone Dione or Thalassa Aphrodite Eris Limos Eurynome/Eurydome/Eurymedusa/Euanthe Charites/Graces2   Aglaea   Euphrosyne   Thalia Gaia Manes Hera Ares3  Eileithyia  Eris  Hebe3  Hephaestus3  Angelos Leto Apollo  Artemis Maia Hermes Metis Athena4 Mnemosyne  Muses (Original three)  Aoide  Melete  Mneme   Muses (Later nine)   Calliope   Clio   Euterpe   Erato   Melpomene   Polyhymnia   Terpsichore   Thalia   Urania Nemesis Helen of Troy (possibly)
GEOGRAPHY: First colony since 1776 to break from Britain without consent, it is now Zimbabwe
Rhodesia
The British South Africa Company of Cecil Rhodes first demarcated the present territory during the 1890s; it became the self-governing British colony of Southern Rhodesia in 1923.
3
Encyclopædia Britannica.
The Brigade had been reformed by 2006, with its commander, Brigadier-General John Mupande praising its "rich history".
News.sky.com (24 May 2004). Retrieved 4 July 2013.
HORTON HEARS THE WHO: The Who's demo of "I Can't Explain" featured this Led Zeppelin guitarist
Jimmy Page
In 1968, English rock band Led Zeppelin chose their name after Keith Moon, drummer of The Who, told guitarist Jimmy Page that his idea to create a band would "go down like a lead balloon." Page's manager Peter Grant suggested changing the spelling of "Lead" to "Led" to avoid mispronunciation.
3
Leckie which had been alerted following interception of its radio traffic.
Warneford was awarded the Victoria Cross for his achievement.
No dirigible shall be kept." Article 202"On the coming into force of the present Treaty, all military and naval aeronautical material ... must be delivered to the Governments of the Principal Allied and Associated Powers ...
1960s POP MUSIC: Drummer Andy White played on this group's U.S. release of "Love Me Do"; Ringo was heard on the British version
The Beatles
420px|thumb|right|Top, L-R: A soldier crawls on the ground during the Vietnam War; The Beatles, part of the British Invasion, change music in the United States and around the world  Centre, L-R:
3
150px|right|thumb|A child suffering the effects of severe hunger and malnutrition during the Nigerian blockade of Biafra 1967–1970.
Commercials often portrayed a woman as being helpless if her car broke down.
Emperor Haile Selassie
NUMB WITH NUMBERS: It's the number of years in a French president's term of office; in 2000 it was reduced from 7
5
January 5–8 –
2
The Democratic National Convention in Los Angeles nominates U.S. Vice President Al Gore for President and Senator Joe Lieberman for Vice President.
October 23 – Madeleine Albright holds talks with North Korean dictator Kim Jong-il.
SCORPIOS: Born October 26, 1947 in Chicago, she was elected to the U.S. Senate from New York in 2000
Hillary Rodham Clinton
Hillary Rodham Clinton is elected to the United States Senate, becoming the first First Lady of the United States to win public office.
3
The Russian submarine Kursk sinks in the Barents Sea during one of the largest Russian naval exercises since the 1991 dissolution of the Soviet Union, resulting in the deaths of all 118 men on board.
Widespread flooding occurs throughout England and Wales after days of heavy rain.
Noah Cyrus, American actress  January 26 – Piper Mackenzie Harris, American actress and model  February 5 – Jordan Nagai, American actor  February 25 – Laura Ann Kesling, American actress  February 26 - Alexa Ilacad, Filipina actress  March 25 – Christian Traeumer, American actor  March 27 – Sophie Nélisse, Canadian actress   April–June  thumb|right|150px|Willow Shields  April 6 –
SCIENCE & TECHNOLOGY: In 2000 news, an experiment appeared to accelerate a pulse of this to 300 times its already high speed
light
January 30 – Kenya Airways Flight 431 crashes off the coast of Ivory Coast into the Atlantic Ocean, killing 169.
3
Effective date of Canada's first modern-day treaty –
It is one of the worst catastrophes in Slovenia in the past 100 years.
David Tomlinson, English actor (b. 1917)  June 27 –
WAR MOVIE LOCATIONS: The 2001 film "Enemy at the Gates"
Russia
February 18 – FBI agent Robert Hanssen is arrested and charged with spying for Russia for 25 years.
3
68 people die of methanol poisoning in Pärnu County, Estonia.
September 18 –
November 2 –
1990S BUSINESS: This company's 1st restaurant in China served nearly 40,000 people the day it opened April 23, 1992
McDonald's
The first McDonald's restaurant opens in Moscow in 1990 with then-President of the Supreme Soviet of the Russian SFSR and future Russian President Boris Yeltsin attending, symbolizing Russia's transition towards a capitalist free market economy and a move towards adopting elements of western culture.
3
ISBN 0-7190-7115-1
Development of biodegradable products, replacing products made from styrofoam; advances in methods for recycling of waste products (such as paper, glass, and aluminum).
In 1990, the World Health Organization removed homosexuality from its list of diseases.
PLACE: This country's oil-refining Kharg Island was often bombed during its long 1980s war with Iraq
Iran
Major civil discontent and violence occurred in the Middle East, including the Iran–Iraq War, the Soviet–Afghan War, the 1982 Lebanon War, the Nagorno-Karabakh War, the Bombing of Libya in 1986, and the First Intifada in the Gaza Strip and the West Bank.
3
The AIDS epidemic became recognized in the 1980s and has since killed an estimated 39 million people (as of 2013).https://www.aids.gov/federal-resources/around-the-world/global-aids-overview/ Global warming became well known to the scientific and political community in the 1980s.
It eventually reached Europe before becoming infused in mainstream pop and dance music worldwide.
The events surrounding the Jamaica bobsled team in 1988 would lead to the creation of the Disney movie Cool Runnings five years later.
18th CENTURY AMERICAN QUOTES: In 1781 this admiral urged, "In time of peace... prepare... for war"
John Paul Jones
Ricklefs (1991), page 106  Significant people  World leaders, politicians, military  thumb|upright|Peter the Great thumb|upright|Louis XV thumb|upright|Queen Anne upright|thumb|Marie Antoinette, Queen of France and Archduchess of Austria thumb|upright|Ferdinand VI, King of Spain upright|thumb|Prince Alexander Suvorov upright|thumb|Horatio Nelson, Vice Admiral in the British navy thumb|upright|Toussaint Louverture thumb|upright|Benjamin Franklin upright|thumb|Joseph II of Austria thumb|upright|Louis XVI thumb|upright|Robespierre thumb|upright|Yeongjo, King of the Joseon Dynasty in Korea  John Adams, American statesman  Samuel Adams, American statesman  Ahmad Shah Abdali, Afghan King  Ahmed III, Sultan of the Ottoman Empire  Hyder Ali, Ruler of Mysore  Ethan Allen, American Revolutionary Army  Anne, Queen of Great Britain  Marie Antoinette, Austrian-born Queen of France  Ferdinand VI, King of Spain  Augustus III, Elector of Saxony, King of Poland, and Grand Duke of Lithuania  Aurangzeb, Mughal Emperor  Boromakot, King of Ayutthaya  Boromaracha V, King of Ayutthaya  Aaron Burr, American statesman  William Cavendish, Anglo-Irish politician  William Pitt the Younger, Prime Minister of Britain   John Carteret, Anglo-Irish politician  Catherine the Great, Empress of Russia  Charles III, King of Spain, Naples, and Sicily  Charles VI, Emperor of the Holy Roman Empire, King of Bohemia and Hungary  Charles XII, King of Sweden, the Goths and the Wends;  Charlotte Corday, French revolutionary  Georges Danton, French revolutionary   Elizabeth of Russia, Empress of Russia  Farrukhsiyar, Emperor of Mughal  Ferdinand I, King of Naples, Sicily, and the Two Sicilies  Benjamin Franklin, American leader, scientist and statesman  Juan Francisco, Spanish naval officer and explorer  Adolf Frederick, King of Sweden, the Goths and the Wends  Frederick the Great, King of Prussia  George I, King of Great Britain and Ireland  George II, King of Great Britain and Ireland  George III, King of Great Britain and Ireland  Olympe de Gouges, French feminist  Robert Gray, American revolutionary, merchant, and explorer  Gustav III, King of Sweden, the Goths and the Wends  Guru Gobind Singh, tenth of the eleven Sikh Gurus  Gyeongjong, King of Joseon Dynasty  Nathan Hale, American patriot, executed for espionage by the British  Abdul Hamid I, Sultan of Ottoman Empire  Alexander Hamilton, American statesman  Patrick Henry, American statesman  Emperor Higashiyama, Emperor of Japan  John Jay, American statesman  Thomas Jefferson, American statesman  Jeongjo, King of Joseon Dynasty  John Paul Jones, American naval commander  Joseph I, King of Portugal  Joseph II, Austrian Emperor  Kangxi Emperor, Chinese Emperor  Karim Khan, Shah of Iran and King of Persia  Marquis de Lafayette, Continental Army officer  Louis XIV, King of France  Louis XV, King of France  Louis XVI, King of France  Louis XVII, imprisoned King of France, never ruled  James Madison, American statesman  Madhavrao I, Peshwa/Prime Minister of Maratha Empire  Madhavrao I Scindia, Marathan leader  Mahmud I, Sultan of Ottoman Empire  Alessandro Malaspina, Spanish explorer  George Mason, American statesman  Prince Aleksandr Menshikov, Russian statesman, generalissimo  Michikinikwa, Miami chief and warrior  José Moñino y Redondo, Spanish statesman  Louis-Joseph de Montcalm, French officer  Mustafa III, Sultan of Ottoman Empire  Nader Shah, King of Persia  Nakamikado, Emperor of Japan  Horatio Nelson, British admiral  Nanasaheb, Peshwa/Prime Minister of Maratha Empire  Shivappa Nayaka, King of Keladi Nayaka  Osman III, Sultan of Ottoman Empire  Peter I (Peter the Great), Emperor of Russia  Philip V, King of Spain  Pontiac, Ottawa chief and warrior  Prince Grigory Potyomkin, Russian statesman and general  Nguyen Hue, Emperor of Tây Sơn Dynasty of Vietnam  Qianlong Emperor, Emperor of China  Rajaram II of Satara, Monarch of the Maratha Confederacy  Francis II Rákóczi, Prince of Hungary and Transylvania, revolutionary leader  Tadeusz Rejtan, Polish politician  Paul Revere, American revolutionary leader and silversmith  Maximilien Robespierre, French revolutionary leader  Betsy Ross, American flag maker  Count Pyotr Rumyantsev, Russian general  Shah Rukh of Persia, King of Persia.
3
1738: Turlough O'Carolan, famous Irish harper, dies.
1767: Burmese conquer the Ayutthaya kingdom.
1773–1775:
BACK TO SCHOOL: Social studies: In 1984 this Baptist minister established the National Rainbow Coalition
Jesse Jackson
January 3 – President of the United States Ronald Reagan meets with Navy Lieutenant Robert Goodman and the Reverend Jesse Jackson at the White House, following Lieutenant Goodman's release from Syrian captivity.
3
Jaimie Alexander, American actress  March 16  Michael Ennis, Australian rugby league player  Hosea Gear, New Zealand Rugby Union player  March 19 – Bianca Balti, Italian model  March 20  Fernando Torres, Spanish football player  Nomura Yuka, Japanese actress  Christy Carlson Romano, American stage and film actress  Justine Ezarik, Internet celeberity and actress  March 21   Kerry Bishé, American model, actress and reality television star  Sopho Gelovani, Georgian singer  March 24  Chris Bosh, American basketball player  Park Bom, Korean singer  March 25 – Katharine McPhee, American Idol finalist  March 26  Stéphanie Lapointe, Canadian singer  Sara Jean Underwood, American model  March 28 – Nikki Sanderson, English actress  March 30  Anna Nalick, American singer  Samantha Stosur, Australian tennis player  Justin Moore, American country music singer   April  thumb|right|120px|Mandy Moore thumb|right|120px|Nikola Karabatić thumb|right|120px|America Ferrera thumb|right|120px|Aram Mp3  April 1 – Murali Vijay, Indian cricketer  April 2 – Shawn Roberts, Canadian actor  April 3 – Allana Slater, Australian gymnast  April 4 –
George Rigaud, Argentinian actor (b. 1905)  January 20 –
(b. 1911)   March  150px|thumb|William Powell  March 1 –
ANCIENT HISTORY: THE 1980s: In 1984 the world came to this West Coast city to compete in the Summer Olympics
Los Angeles
May 8  The Soviet Union announces that it will boycott the 1984 Summer Olympics in Los Angeles.
3
April 25 –
Severomorsk Naval Base destroys two-thirds of all the missiles stockpiled for the Soviets’
November 9 – Cesar Chavez delivers his speech, "What The Future Holds For Farm Workers And Hispanics", at the Commonwealth Club in San Francisco.
COURT CASES: In December 1996 the 1993 federal conviction of this S&L operator was thrown out
Charles Keating
November 20  Savings and loan crisis: The United States Senate Ethics Committee issues a stern censure of California senator Alan Cranston for his dealings with savings-and-loan executive Charles Keating.
3
August 17 –
For the first time, the public is allowed inside Buckingham Palace in London.
An Avioimpex Yakovlev Yak-42D crashes into Mount Trojani near Ohrid, Macedonia.
SPORTS SUPERSTARS: In 1993, 1995 & 1996 this German star won 3 of the 4 major women's tennis titles
Steffi Graf
April 30 – Tennis star Monica Seles is stabbed in the back by an obsessed fan of rival Steffi Graf at a tournament in Hamburg, Germany.
3
North Korea nuclear weapons program: North Korea announces that it plans to withdraw from the Nuclear Nonproliferation Treaty and refuses to allow inspectors access to nuclear sites.
November   November 1 –
An agreement establishing the Permanent Commission for East African Co-operation is signed.
THE CITY'S MAYOR: Tom Bradley (1973 to 1993)
Los Angeles
The 65th Academy Awards, hosted by Billy Crystal, are held at the Dorothy Chandler Pavilion in Los Angeles, with Unforgiven winning Best Picture.
3
February  thumb|150px|The aftermath of the World Trade Center bombing.
Two Iraqi nationals confess to driving a car-bomb into Kuwait on behalf of the Iraqi Intelligence Service.
June 5  The National Assembly of Venezuela designates Ramón José Velásquez as successor of suspended President Carlos Andrés Pérez.
NEWSPAPERS: This Boston-based newspaper was founded by a religious group in 1908
The Christian Science Monitor
The Christian Science Monitor newspaper is first published, in the United States.
3
The 1908 Hong Kong typhoon sinks the passenger steamer Ying King, losing 421 lives.
September 27 – Henry Ford produces his first Model T automobile at the Ford Piquette Avenue Plant in Detroit, Michigan.
Wilhelm Busch, German painter and poet (b. 1832)  January 14 – Holger Drachmann,  Danish poet (b. 1846)  January 17 –
IMAX FILMS: Astronauts became cinematographers for the 1997 film "Mission to" this space station
Mir
Mir Aimal Kasi is sentenced to death for a 1993 assault rifle attack outside CIA headquarters that killed 2 and wounded 3.
3
May 22 – Kelly Flinn, the U.S. Air Force's first female bomber pilot certified for combat, accepts a general discharge in order to avoid a court-martial.
October 27 –
Brent and Shane Kinsman, American actors  November 17 – James Whitley, British paralympic skier  November 19  Kenny, Alexis, Natalie, Kelsey, Nathan, Brandon and Joel McCaughey, American citizens, first set of septuplets to survive infancy  Maud Chifamba, Zimbabwean citizen, youngest university student in Africa  Rachel Parsons, American ice dancer  November 23 – Akari Takeuchi, Japanese singer  November 27 – Song Yoo-geun, South Korean child prodigy, youngest university student in the country  November 28 – Thor Salden, Belgian singer  November 29  Agata Kryger, Polish figure skater  Ye Qiuyu, Chinese tennis player  November 30 – Liu Huixia, Chinese diver  December  thumb|right|150px|Ana Konjuh  December 3 –
RUN IT UP THE FLAGPOLE: In 1997 this organization resumed its stamp series depicting flags of new member countries
United Nations
The Kyoto Protocol is adopted by a United Nations committee.
3
In the United Kingdom, the House of Commons votes for a total ban on handguns.
September 4 –
Steven Chu, Claude Cohen-Tannoudji, William D. Phillips  Medicine –
THE CENSUS: The Census Bureau bought its first electronic one of these in 1951, the UNIVAC
Computer
Remington Rand delivers the first UNIVAC I computer.
3
Nuclear testing at the Nevada Test Site begins with a 1-kiloton bomb dropped on Frenchman Flat, northwest of Las Vegas.
A military coup occurs in Bolivia.
A state of emergency is declared in Egypt due to increasing riots.
THE PREZ SAYS: In a 1951 speech he said, "What we are doing in Korea...is...trying to prevent a third world war"
Harry S. Truman
April 11  U.S. President Harry S. Truman relieves General Douglas MacArthur of his Far Eastern commands.
3
West Germany joins UNESCO.  March 29  Second Red Scare: Julius and Ethel Rosenberg are convicted of conspiracy to commit espionage.
June 15–July 1– In New Mexico, Arizona, California, Oregon, Washington and British Columbia, thousands of acres of forests are destroyed in fires.
July 16 – King Léopold III of Belgium abdicates in favour of his son Baudouin.
TELEVISION: Believe it or not, back in 1949, he was the original host of "Believe It or Not"
Robert Ripley
May 27 – Robert Ripley, American creator of Ripley's Believe It or Not!
3
The Kuomintang regime declares Taiwan under martial law.
March 28 – Grigoraș Dinicu, Romanian composer (b. 1889)  March 30  Friedrich Bergius, German chemist, Nobel Prize laureate (b. 1884)  Prince Harald of Denmark (b. 1876)  April  April 1 – Evelyn Owen, Australian gun designer (b. 1915)  April 6 –
Richard Strauss, German composer  (b. 1864)  September 10 – Wiley Rutledge, U.S. Supreme Court Justice (b. 1894)  September 13 – August Krogh, Danish zoophysiologist, recipient of the Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine (b. 1874)  September 14   Gottfried Graf von Bismarck-Schönhausen, German Resistance figure (b. 1901)  Pandeli Evangjeli, former Prime Minister of Albania (b. 1859)  September 18 – Frank Morgan, American actor (b. 1890)  September 19  Will Cuppy, American humorist (b. 1884)  George Shiels, Irish writer (b. 1886)  Nikos Skalkottas, Greek composer (b. 1901)  September 20 – Richard Dix, American actor (b. 1893)  September 22 – Sam Wood, American director (b. 1883)  October  October 1 – Buddy Clark, American singer (b. 1911)  October 14 –
SHAKESPEAREAN NAME ROUNDUP: This chef was born one dreamy midsummer in Austria in 1949
Wolfgang Puck
Chavo Guerrero Sr., professional wrestler  January 8 – Wolfgang Puck, Austrian chef   January 9 – Mary Roos, German singer  January 10  George Foreman, American boxer  Linda Lovelace, American actress (d. 2002)  January 11 –
3
Indonesia seizes Yogyakarta from the Dutch.
Daryl Braithwaite, Australian singer   January 12  Ottmar Hitzfeld, German football player and coach  Haruki Murakami, Japanese author  Wayne Wang, Hong Kong-born film director  January 13 – Brandon Tartikoff, American television executive (d. 1997)  January 14 –
Will Hay, English comedian and actor (b. 1888)  April 19 – Ulrich Salchow, Swedish figure skater (b. 1877)  April 22 – Charles Middleton, American actor (b. 1874)  April 28 – Aurora Quezon, First Lady of the Philippines (shot) (b. 1888)  May  May 6 –
THE SOLAR SYSTEM: Its moon Triton was first seen in 1846; a second satellite around this planet wasn't found until 1949
Neptune
May  May 1 – Nereid, a moon of Neptune, is discovered by Gerard Kuiper.
3
Steve Perry, American rock singer  January 24   John Belushi, American actor and comedian (d. 1982)  Nikolaus Brender, German television journalist  January 28 – Gregg Popovich, American basketball coach  January 29 – Tommi Salmelainen, Helsinki, FIN  January 30 – Peter Agre, American biologist, recipient of the Nobel Prize in Chemistry  January 31  Johan Derksen, Dutch footballer and sports journalist  Ken Wilber, American philosopher  February thumb|right|120px|Niki Lauda thumb|right|120px|Ric Flair  February 2  Duncan Bannatyne, Scottish entrepreneur  Brent Spiner, American actor  February 3 – Hennie Kuiper, Dutch cyclist  February 4 – Rasim Delić, Bosnian military chief of staff and war criminal (d. 2010)  February 6 –
Ghulam Nabi Azad, Indian politician  March 9 –
Randy Neugebauer, American politician  December 25  Simone Bittencourt de Oliveira, Brazilian singer  Sissy Spacek, American actress  Joe Louis Walker, American musician  December 26 – José Ramos-Horta, President of East Timor, recipient of the Nobel Peace Prize  December 28 – Barbara De Fina, American film producer   Date Unknown  Suthep Po-ngam, Thai comedian, actor, film director and screenwriter  Mu Tiezhu, Chinese basketball player and coach (d. 2008)  Deaths  January  January 6 –
WE'VE GOT DESIGNS ON BROADWAY: Costume designers win awards named for Irene Sharaff, who designed Jet & Shark costumes for this 1957 musical
West Side Story
September 26 - Leonard Bernstein's musical West Side Story makes its first appearance on Broadway and runs for 732 performances.
3
February 18  Kenyan rebel leader Dedan Kimathi is executed by the British colonial government.
July  July  The International Geophysical Year begins.
October 12 – Ayn Rand's fourth, last and longest novel, Atlas Shrugged, is published in the United States.
BACK TO THE '50s: Introduced in 1957, this car model from Ford was not embraced by the car-buying public
Edsel
The Ford Motor Company introduces the Edsel on what the company proclaims as "E Day".
3
A coal gas explosion at the giant Bishop coal mine in Bishop, Virginia, kills 37 men.
Arturo Lezama becomes President of the National Council of Government of Uruguay.
Dr. Seuss' The Cat in the Hat is published in the United States.
"NEW" GEOGRAPHY: On the banks of India's Yamuna River, it was dedicated in 1931
New Delhi
February 10 – Official inauguration ceremonies for New Delhi as the capital of India begin.
3
Sir Isaac Isaacs is sworn in as the first Australian-born Governor-General of Australia.
April 15 –
Fernando Henrique Cardoso, President of Brazil  June 20  Olympia Dukakis, American actress  Arne Nordheim, Norwegian composer (d. 2010)  June 21 – Margaret Heckler, American Secretary of Health and Human Services  June 24 – Billy Casper, American golfer  June 25 – Vishwanath Pratap Singh, Prime Minister of India (d. 2008)  June 26 –
1969: On January 20 he was sworn in as president of the United States
Richard Nixon
U.S. President Richard Nixon and South Vietnamese President Nguyễn Văn Thiệu meet at Midway Island.
3
January 14  An explosion aboard the USS Enterprise near Hawaii kills 27 and injures 314.
Serious border clashes occur between the Soviet Union and the People's Republic of China.
Jason Kay, English singer (Jamiroquai)  December 31 – Dominik Diamond, Scottish presenter and newspaper columnist   Date unknown   Molly Kiely, American cartoonist  Deaths  January  Daisy and Violet Hilton, English conjoined twin actresses (b. 1908; bodies discovered on January 4, 1969)  January 1 – Barton MacLane, American actor (b. 1902)  January 2 –
EAGLE-EYED: In 1969 he commanded the "Eagle" lunar module
Armstrong
The Stonewall riots in New York City mark the start of the modern gay rights movement in the U.S.  July thumb|Neil Armstrong descends a ladder to become the first human to step onto the surface of the Moon during Apollo 11  July 1   Charles, Prince of Wales, is invested with his title at Caernarfon.
3
The Piazza Fontana bombing in Italy (Strage di Piazza Fontana) takes place.
Kim Rossi Stuart, Italian actor and director  November thumb|120px|Sean Combs thumb|120px|Matthew McConaughey thumb|120px|Tomas N'evergreen  November 1 - Diane Parish, English actress November 2 – Reginald Arvizu (aka Fieldy Snuts), American bassist November 3 – Robert Miles, Swiss-Italian record producer and DJ  November 4  Sean Combs, African-American rapper (aka Puff Daddy, P. Diddy)  Matthew McConaughey, American actor  November 7  Michelle Clunie, American actress  Hélène Grimaud, French pianist  Bryant H. McGill, American poet  November 8 – Roxana Zal, American actress  November 9  Sandra Denton, African-American rapper (Salt-n-Pepa)  Allison Wolfe, American musician  November 10  Faustino Asprilla, Colombian football player  Jens Lehmann, German football player  Ellen Pompeo, American actress  November 11 – Carson Kressley, American fashion expert  November 12  Johnny Gosch, American child kidnap victim  Tomas N'evergreen, Danish singer  Heinz-Christian Strache, Austrian politician  November 13  Gerard Butler, Scottish actor  Josh Mancell, American freelance composer and multi-instrumentalist  November 17  Jean-Michel Saive, Belgian table tennis player  Ryotaro Okiayu, Japanese voice actor  November 18  Kathleen van Brempt, Belgian politician  Sam Cassell, American basketball player  Ahmed Helmy, Egyptian actor  November 19 – Ertuğrul Sağlam, Turkish football coach and former player  November 20 – Sakura, Japanese musician  November 21 –
Peter van Eyck, German-American actor (b. 1911)  July 18  Mary Jo Kopechne, American teacher, secretary, and political campaign specialist (b. 1940)  Barbara Pepper, American actress (b. 1915)  July 20   Bertram "Bert" Cooper, American advertising executive (b. 1886)  Cathy Wayne, pop entertainer, first Australian woman killed in Vietnam War (b. 1949)  July 24 –
THE DUTCH ROYAL FAMILY: In accordance with her wishes, when this queen abdicated in 1948, she became known once again as "Princess"
Wilhelmina
Queen Wilhelmina of the Netherlands abdicates for health reasons.
3
thumb|right|115px|Israeli Declaration of Independence, 1948  May 14 –
The day is a public holiday nationwide.
Marc Singer, Canadian actor  January 30 – Paul Magee, Provisional Irish Republican Army member  January 31  Paul Jabara, American actor, singer and songwriter (d. 1992)  Muneo Suzuki, Japanese politician  February thumb|120px|Carlos Felipe Ximenes Belo thumb|120px|Alice Cooper thumb|120px|Barbara Hershey thumb|120px|Teller thumb|120px|Bernadette Peters  February 1 – Rick James, Motown performer (d. 2004)  February 2 – Ina Garten, American cooking author  February 3  Carlos Filipe Ximenes Belo, East Timorean Catholic bishop, recipient of the Nobel Peace Prize  Henning Mankell, Swedish crime novelist (d. 2015)  February 4  Alice Cooper, American hard rock singer and musician  Ram Baran Yadav, President of Nepal  February 5  Sven-Göran Eriksson, Swedish football manager  Christopher Guest, American actor, screenwriter, director and composer  Barbara Hershey, American actress  Tom Wilkinson, English actor  February 10 – John Magnier, Irish businessman and thoroughbred racehorse breeder  February 11 –
BALLPARK FIGURES: With the Yankees from 1923 to 1939, his No. 4 was the first number retired in either league
Lou Gehrig
May 2 – Major League Baseball's Lou Gehrig, the legendary Yankee first baseman known as "The Iron Horse", ends his  2,130 consecutive games played streak after contracting amyotrophic lateral sclerosis.
3
The Soviet government offers its definition of what constitutes "aggression", upon which the projected Anglo-Soviet-French alliance will come into effect.
The world is stunned by the rapidity of the German advance and the Polish High Command is effectively isolated, but lack of infantry support and effective civilian resistance cause Hoeppner to halt outside the city itself.
Grace Abbott, American social worker and activist (b. 1878)  June 22 – Benjamin Tucker, American anarchist (b. 1854)  June 26 – Ford Madox Ford, English writer (b. 1873)  June 28 –
RHYMES WITH ME: In 1939 she played a "Scarlett" woman
Vivien Leigh
The epic historical romance film Gone with the Wind, starring Vivien Leigh, Clark Gable, Olivia de Havilland and Leslie Howard, premieres at Loew's Grand Theatre in Atlanta.
3
February 2 – Hungary joins the Anti-Comintern Pact.
May 6 –
Ivan Mosjoukine, Russian actor (b. 1889)  January 23 –
1920s TRANSPORTATION: Last name of the Chicago cab fleet operator who started the "Drive-Ur-Self" rental system
Hertz
President Herbert Hoover (United States)  King of Ras Tafari (Ethiopia)  Prime Minister James Barry Munnik Hertzog (Union of South Africa)  President Washington Luís Pereira de Sousa (Brazil)  President Hipólito Yrigoyen (Argentina)  Pope Pius XI (Vatican)   Politics   Hendrik G. Cannegieter, Chief of the Secretariat World Meteorological Organization  Oskar Dressler, Secretary International Criminal Police Organization  Sir James Eric Drummond, Secretary-general League of Nations  Christian Louis Lange, Secretary-general Inter-Parliamentary Union  Fridtjof Wedel-Jarlsberg Nansen, League of Nations High Commissioner for Refugees  Pierre Nolf, Chairman of the Standing Commission International Red Cross and Red Crescent Movement  Ludwik J. Rajchman, Medical Director of the Health Section International Health Organization  Johann Schober, President International Criminal Police Organization  Albert Thomas, Director International Labour Organization  Harry Thuku helped to found the Young Kikuyu Association in Kenya  Zaccheus Richard Mahabane and Josiah Tshangana Gumede President of the African National Congress  Marcus Garvey   Science  thumb|150px|right|Albert Einstein, 1921  Albert Einstein  Sigmund Freud  Alexander Fleming  Frederick Banting  Niels Bohr  Werner Heisenberg  Howard Carter  Georges Lemaître  Edwin Powell Hubble  Garrett Morgan   Literature   Bertolt Brecht  Countee Cullen  Nancy Cunard  T. S. Eliot  William Faulkner  F. Scott Fitzgerald  Zelda Fitzgerald  Ernest Hemingway  Langston Hughes  Zora Neale Hurston  James Weldon Johnson  Erich Kastner  Sinclair Lewis  Alain Locke  Thomas Mann  Claude McKay  Carl Sandburg  William Butler Yeats   Entertainers    Charlie Chaplin  Buster Keaton  Roscoe "Fatty" Arbuckle  Mary Astor  Josephine Baker  Tallulah Bankhead  Ethel Barrymore  John Barrymore  Lionel Barrymore  Clara Bow  Louise Brooks  Anna May Wong  Lon Chaney  Katharine Cornell  Joan Crawford  Bebe Daniels   Betty Bronson  Mary Brian  Marion Davies  Douglas Fairbanks  Eva Le Gallienne  Greta Garbo  Janet Gaynor  John Gilbert  Dorothy Gish  Lillian Gish  William Haines  William S. Hart  Harry Houdini  Emil Jannings  Al Jolson  Harold Lloyd  thumb|150px|right|Charlie Chaplin during the 1920s  Tom Mix  Colleen Moore  Mae Murray  Pola Negri  Ramón Novarro  Will Rogers  Mary Pickford
3
May 24, 1923)
The Lost Generation (which characterized disillusionment), was the name Gertrude Stein gave to American writers, poets, and artists living in Europe during the 1920s.
Knute Rockne (American football player and coach)  Alex James (Arsenal and Scotland soccer player)  Gordon Coventry (Australian rules football player)  Walter Hagen (American golfer)  Bobby Jones (American golfer)  Paavo Nurmi (Finnish runner)  Fanny "Bobbie" Rosenfeld (Canadian athlete)  Earl Sande (jockey)
IT'S A TELEGRAM: In 1912 White Star Lines in NYC got a distressing wire reading, "Deeply regret advise" this "sunk"
the Titanic
Thomas Andrews, Jr., Irish shipbuilder (b. 1873)  John Jacob Astor IV, American businessman (b. 1864)  Archibald Butt, American presidential aide (b. 1865)  Thomas R.D. Byles, English-born Catholic priest (b. 1870)  Benjamin Guggenheim, American businessman (b. 1865)  Edward J. Smith, captain of the Titanic (b. 1850)  William Thomas Stead, English journalist (b. 1849)  Isidor Straus, German-born owner of Macy's (b. 1845)  Ida Straus, wife of Isidor Straus (1 of only 5 Titanic first-class female fatalities) (b. 1849)  Jack Phillips, senior wireless officer of the Titanic (b. 1887)  Wallace Hartley, violinist and band leader of the Titanic (b. 1878) thumb|110px|right|Bram Stoker   April 19 – Patricio Escobar, 9th President of Paraguay (b. 1843)  April 20 – Bram Stoker, Irish writer (Dracula) (b. 1847)  May 5 – Rafael Pombo, Colombian poet (b. 1833)  May 14  August Strindberg, Swedish playwright and painter (b. 1849)  Frederick VIII, King of Denmark (b. 1843)  May 25 – Austin Lane Crothers, American politician (b. 1860)  May 30 – Wilbur Wright, American aviation pioneer (b. 1867)  June 1 – Philip Parmalee, American aviator (b. 1887)  June 9 - Ion Luca Caragiale, Romanian writer (b. 1852)  June 10 –
3
The Girl Scouts is founded by Juliette Gordon Low in Savannah, Georgia.
March 27 –
July–September  thumb|right|110px|Henri Poincaré  July 1 – Harriet Quimby, American aviator (b. 1875)  July 2 – Tom Richardson, English cricketer (b. 1870)  July 15 – Francisco Lázaro, Portuguese marathon runner (Olympics)  July 17 –
THE TITANIC: When the RMS Titanic sank in 1912, its cargo included more than 7 million pieces of this, in some 3,400 sacks
mail
Reta Shaw, American actress (d. 1982)  September 15 – Ismail Yasin, Egyptian comedian and actor (d. 1972)  September 19 –
3
William J. Tuttle, American makeup artist (d. 2007)  April 15 –
Auguste Marie François Beernaert, Belgian statesman, recipient of the Nobel Peace Prize (b. 1829)  October 8 –
References    1912 Coin Pictures
BALLET: A maiden is chosen for a sacrifice, the title act of this 1913 ballet
The Rite of Spring
The ballet The Rite of Spring, with music by Igor Stravinsky conducted by Pierre Monteux, choreography by Vaslav Nijinsky and design by Nicholas Roerich, is premièred by Sergei Diaghilev's Ballets Russes at the Théâtre des Champs-Élysées in Paris; its modernism provokes one of the most famous classical music riots in history.
3
The British Board of Film Censors receives the authority to classify and censor films.
March    March
Supporters of Phan Xích Long begin an attempt to revolt against colonial rule in French Indochina.
NEW HAMPSHIRE: In 1944 this resort area in the White Mountains was the site of an important U.N. monetary conference
Bretton Woods
The United Nations Monetary and Financial Conference begins at Bretton Woods, New Hampshire, United States.
3
February 23 –
Start of Dutch famine ("Hongerwinter") in the occupied northern part of the Netherlands.
Alois Kayser, German missionary (b. 1877)  October 22 –
THE 1940S: The Allies' invasion of Normandy began on this date in 1944
June 6
June 6 – WWII –
3
WWII: The Red Army captures Tallinn, Estonia.
December 3 –
April 27  Michael Fish, British TV weatherman  Cuba Gooding, Sr.
POETS & POETRY: In 1945 this South American country's Gabriela Mistral won the Nobel Prize for Literature
Chile
February 14 – Chile, Ecuador, Paraguay and Peru join the United Nations.
3
March 26 – WWII: The Battle of Iwo Jima officially ends, with the destruction of the remaining areas of Japanese resistance.
This ends the August Revolution.
October 15 –
FASHION HISTORY: This rakish lord of poetry, born in 1788, wore romantic open-neck shirts still popular with poets today
Byron
George Byron, 6th Baron Byron, English poet (d. 1824)  February 5 – Robert Peel, Prime Minister of the United Kingdom (d. 1850)  February 10 – Johann Peter Pixis, German pianist and composer (d. 1874)  February 12 –
3
Sydney was named and founded by the British Colony of New South Wales.
April 13 – America's first recorded riot, the 'Doctors' Mob', begins.
David G. Burnet, President of the Republic of Texas (d. 1870)  May 16 – Friedrich Rückert, German poet, translator, and professor of Oriental languages (d. 1866)  May 22 –
FILM QUOTES: From a 1942 movie, No. 2 on Guinness' top 10 film quotes is a line that mentions this liquor
gin
WWII: The siege of the Bataan Peninsula begins.
3
December 8 –
1942 FIFA World Cup competition in Association football, which Nazi Germany sought to host, is not held, due to World War II.  Births  January thumb|120px|Stephen Hawking thumb|120px|Muhammad Ali  January 1  Country Joe McDonald, American musician  Gennadi Sarafanov, Russian cosmonaut (d. 2005)  January 2  Dennis Hastert, American politician, Speaker of the United States House of Representatives  Hugh Shelton, American military leader, Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff  January 3  László Sólyom, President of Hungary  John Thaw, English actor (d. 2002)  January 4   Bolaji Akinyemi, Nigerian professor of political science  Dame Marcela Contreras, Chilean-British immunologist and educator  January 5   Maurizio Pollini, Italian pianist  Charlie Rose, American television anchor, talk show host  January 7 – Vasily Alekseyev, Soviet weightlifter  January 8  Stephen Hawking, British physicist  Junichiro Koizumi, 56th Prime Minister of Japan  January 14 – Yogesh Kumar Sabharwal, Chief Justice of India  January 16 – René Angélil, Canadian singer and manager (d. 2016)  January 17  Muhammad Ali, American boxer  Ulf Hoelscher, German violinist  January 19 – Michael Crawford, English actor, singer and entertainer   January 25  Carl Eller, American football player  Eusébio, Mozambican Portuguese footballer (d. 2014)  January 26 – Soad Hosny, Egyptian actress (d. 2001)  January 28   Hans Jürgen Bäumler, German figure skater, actor, pop singer and television host  Erkki Pohjanheimo, Finnish TV-producer and director  January 31  Daniela Bianchi, Italian actress  Derek Jarman, English director and writer (d. 1994)  February thumb|160px|Terry Jones thumb|120px|Ehud Barak thumb|120px|Brian Jones  February 1   Bibi Besch, Austrian-American actress (d. 1996)  Terry Jones, Welsh actor and writer  February 2 – Graham Nash, English rock musician (The Hollies)  February 5 – Roger Staubach, American football player  February 6 – Ahmad-Jabir Ahmadov Ismail oghlu, Azeri professor and academic  February 7 – Gareth Hunt, English actor (d. 2007)  February 9 –
Heber Doust Curtis, American astronomer (b. 1872)  January 14 –
CELEBRITY MARRIAGES: Clark Gable's short but happy marriage to this actress ended with her death in a 1942 plane crash
Carole Lombard
January 16 – American film actress Carole Lombard and her mother are among all 22 aboard TWA Flight 3 killed when the Douglas DC-3 plane crashes into Potosi Mountain near Las Vegas while she is returning from a tour to promote the sale of war bonds.
3
Events Below, events of World War II have the "WWII" prefix.
They are known as the SPARS ("Semper Paratus, Always Ready!")  November 25–26 – WWII: Operation Harling: A British Special Operations Executive team, together with Greek Resistance fighters, blows up the Gorgopotamos viaduct in the first major sabotage act in occupied continental Europe.
May 16 – Bronisław Malinowski, Polish anthropologist (b. 1884)  May 19 – A. E. Waite, British occultist (b. 1857)  May 27 – Chen Duxiu, General Secretary of the Communist Party of China (b. 1879)  May 29  John Barrymore, American actor (b. 1882)  Akiko Yosano, Japanese author, poet (b. 1878)  June  June 4  Lofton R. Henderson, United States Marine Corps aviator and commanding officer of Marine Scout Bomber Squadron 241 (VMSB-241); killed in action at the Battle of Midway (b. 1903)  Reinhard Heydrich, headed the Nazi Reich Main Security Office and was Reich governor of Bohemia and Moravia (b. 1904)  John C. Waldron, United States Navy aviator and commander of Torpedo Squadron 8, killed in action at the Battle of Midway (b. 1900)  Tamon Yamaguchi, Japanese admiral, killed in action at the Battle of Midway (b. 1892)  June 5 – Virginia Lee Corbin, American actress (b. 1910)  June 7 – Alan Blumlein, English electronics engineer (b. 1903)  June 25 –
GONE FISSION: In 1942 this Italian-born physicist & his team produced the first controlled self-sustaining fission reaction
Enrico Fermi
Below the bleachers of Stagg Field at the University of Chicago, a team led by Enrico Fermi initiates the first self-sustaining nuclear chain reaction (a coded message, "The Italian navigator has landed in the new world" is then sent to U.S. President Franklin D. Roosevelt).
3
January 7 –
August  August 7 – WWII: Guadalcanal Campaign begins –
Jean Baptiste Perrin, French physicist, Nobel Prize laureate (b. 1870)  April 18 – Gertrude Vanderbilt Whitney, American heiress, socialite and sculptor (b. 1875)  April 24  Deenanath Mangeshkar, Indian singer and composer (b. 1900)  Lucy Maud Montgomery, Canadian writer (b. 1874)  April 27 –
SCIENTISTS: In 1943, the year of his death, the plantation on which he was born was made a national monument
George Washington Carver
George Washington Carver, African-American botanist (b. 1864)  January 7 – Nikola Tesla, Serbian-American electrical engineer and inventor (b. 1856)  January 8 –
3
January 18  WWII: Soviet officials announce that the Red Army has broken the Wehrmacht's siege of Leningrad as part of Operation Iskra, opening a narrow land corridor to the city.
March–December – History of computing hardware: Construction of British prototype Mark I Colossus computer, the world's first totally electronic programmable computing device, to assist in cryptanalysis of German signals at Bletchley Park.
Germany dissolves the Danish government after it refuses to deal with a wave of strikes and disturbances to the satisfaction of the German authorities.
WE HAVE THE TECHNOLOGY: In 1946 Del Harder of this auto co. coined the term "automation" to describe the way its engines were assembled
Ford
In the last mass lynching in the United States, a mob of white men shoot and kill two African-American couples near Moore's Ford Bridge in Georgia.
3
The United Kingdom grants Transjordan, as it is then known, its independence; 3 years later the country changes its name to Jordan."Year by Year 1946" –
In Japan, women vote for the first time, during elections for the House of Representatives of the 90th Imperial Diet.
July 7  Mother Frances Xavier Cabrini becomes the first American saint to be canonized.
AMERICAN HISTORY: The U.S. supplied materiel to its allies during WWII through this 1941 Congressional act
the Lend-Lease Act
The Lend-Lease Act is introduced into the United States Congress.
3
Thailand Prime Minister Plaek Phibunsongkhram decrees January 1 as the official start of the Thai solar calendar new year (thus the previous year that began April 1 had only 9 months).
Date unknown  Classic Comics series launched in the United States with a version of The Three Musketeers.
Anneke Wills, British actress  October 23 – Mel Winkler, American actor  October 25  Helen Reddy, Australian singer and actress  Anne Tyler, American novelist  October 27 – Gerd Brantenberg, Norwegian feminist author and gay rights activist  October 28  John Hallam, Irish actor  Jochen Hasenmayer, German cave diver  Hank Marvin, British guitarist, singer and songwriter (The Shadows)  October 30 – Theodor W. Hänsch, German physicist, Nobel Prize in Physics  October 31 –
OPERA: The title libertine of this 1787 Mozart opera seduces women in 17th century Seville
Don Giovanni
October 29 – Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart's opera Don Giovanni (libretto by Lorenzo Da Ponte) premieres in the Estates Theatre in Prague.
2
May 25 –
Ivan Nabokov, Russian General (d. 1852)  April 26 –
THE OSCARS: It's "clear" he's the perfect choice to host the Oscars; since 1990, he's done it 5 times
Billy Crystal
The 62nd Academy Awards, hosted by Billy Crystal, are held at the Dorothy Chandler Pavilion in Los Angeles, California, with Driving Miss Daisy winning Best Picture.
3
January 25 Avianca Flight 52 crashes into Cove Neck, Long Island, New York after a miscommunication between the flight crew and JFK Airport officials, killing 73 people on board.
Sri Lankan Civil War:
December 20 – Eduard Shevardnadze announces his resignation as Soviet Minister of Foreign Affairs Tim Berners-Lee completes the test for the first webpage at CERN. December 22 The first constitution of the Republic of Croatia is adopted.
LITERATURE IN SPANISH: In 1990 he became the first Mexican poet to win the Nobel Prize for Literature, not the eighth for Peace
Octavio Paz
Octavio Paz Peace –
3
March 12  Cold War:
June 12 Cold War: The Congress of People's Deputies of the Russian Federation formally declares its sovereignty.
President Hussain Muhammad Ershad of Bangladesh is forced to resign following massive protests; he is replaced by Shahabuddin Ahmed, who becomes interim president.
1996: He resigned from the Senate June 11, 1996 to devote himself to running for a higher office
Bob Dole
August 15 – Bob Dole is nominated for President of the United States, and Jack Kemp for Vice President, at the Republican National Convention in San Diego, California.
3
Serious fighting breaks out between Russian soldiers and rebel fighters in Chechnya.
–
The Australian federal election, 1996 is held; Labor's Paul Keating loses to Liberal leader John Howard.
MOUNTAINS: Its 1980 eruption was the first in the lower 48 states since 1921
Mount St. Helens
May 18  The 1980 eruption of Mount St. Helens kills 57 and causes US$3 billion in damage.
3
James Alexander George Smith "Jags" McCartney the Turks and Caicos Islands’
Michael Stasko, Canadian actor  May 30 –
Willie Parker, American football player  November 12 – Ryan Gosling, Canadian actor  November 13 – Monique Coleman, American actress  November 15 –
HAIL TO THE CHIEF: After losing the GOP nomination to Ford in 1976, he began his successful effort to snag the 1980 spot
Ronald Reagan
Former California Governor and actor Ronald Reagan is nominated for U.S. President, at the 1980 Republican National Convention in Detroit.
3
May   May 2 –
In Australia, baby Azaria Chamberlain disappears from a campsite at Ayers Rock (Uluru), reportedly taken by a dingo.
Justin Amash, U.S. Representative  April 20  Jasmin Wagner, German singer  Waylon, Dutch singer, member of The Common Linnets, Eurovision Song Contest 2014 runner-up  April 21  Tony Romo, American football player  Vincent Lecavalier, Canadian hockey player  April 22 –
CAR PETS: For 1980 American Motors let it soar as the 1st domestic-built 4-wheel-drive car
Eagle
– Operation Eagle Claw, a commando mission in Iran to rescue American embassy hostages, is aborted after mechanical problems ground the rescue helicopters.
3
June 20 – Augusta AVA becomes the first federally recognized American Viticultural Area.
Youth riots in Tallinn, the capital of the Estonian SSR, are quickly put down.
Anri Jokhadze, Georgian pop singer  November 7 – Gervasio Deferr, Spanish gymnast  November 10
PLEAS & CARATS: Henry David Thoreau's 1859 essay "A Plea for" this Harpers Ferry guy didn't work; he was executed
John Brown
October 16 – John Brown raids the Harpers Ferry Armory in Harper's Ferry, Virginia, in an unsuccessful bid to spark a general slave rebellion.
3
June 17 –
July 11 –
Marx publishes A Contribution to the Critique of Political Economy.
I'M GETTING SPACED OUT!: It was big science news in 1998 when a fourth ring was discovered around this gigantic planet
Jupiter
March  March 2  Data sent from the Galileo probe indicates that Jupiter's moon Europa has a liquid ocean under a thick crust of ice.
3
February 28 –
June 25 –
August 26 – Computer virus CIH activates and attacks Windows 9x.
BRIDGES: In 1998 the U.K. lost out to this Asian country for the longest suspension bridge in the world record
Japan
The 1998 Winter Olympics are held in Nagano, Japan.
3
August 15 –
The Omagh bombing is carried out in Northern Ireland by the Real IRA.  August 24 –
Carl Perkins, American guitarist (b. 1932)
GONE BUT NOT FORGOTTEN: Last name of American astronaut Alan & his wife Louise, who died 5 weeks apart in 1998
Shepard
October 6 – Matthew Shepard is beaten and left to die in a cornfield in Laramie, Wyoming.
3
Peter Arnett publishes a false report of Operation Tailwind (initiated 1970), claiming that sarin nerve agents were used to eliminate a group of deserting U.S. soldiers.
April thumb|150px|Pol Pot thumb|150px|Octavio Paz  April 1  Gene Evans, American actor (b. 1920)  Rozz Williams, American singer (b. 1963)  April 2 – Rob Pilatus, member of the pop group Milli Vanilli (b.circa 1966)  April 3 – Charles Lang, American cinematographer (b. 1901)  April 5 –
– José Saramago  Peace – John Hume and David Trimble  Bank of Sweden Prize in Economic Sciences in Memory of Alfred Nobel –
PEOPLE OF THE '60S: Appearing in the news in 1963, his name was usually followed by "a Dallas nightclub owner"
Jack Ruby
November 24  Lee Harvey Oswald, assassin of John F. Kennedy, is shot dead by Jack Ruby in Dallas, an event seen on live national television.
3
May 8  Dr.
June 20  Establishment of the Moscow–Washington hotline (officially, the Direct Communications Link or DCL; unofficially, the "red telephone"; and in fact a teleprinter link) is authorized by signing of a Memorandum of Understanding in Geneva by representatives of the Soviet Union and the United States.
Masahiro Chono, Japanese professional wrestler  September 19  Jarvis Cocker, English rock musician (Pulp)  David Seaman, English football goalkeeper  September 21  Cecil Fielder, American baseball player  Angus Macfadyen, Scottish actor  Mamoru Samuragochi, Japanese impostor  September 28   Steve Blackman, American professional wrestler  Elliot Levine, Jazz musician and keyboardist with Heatwave (band)  September 29  Dave Andreychuk, Canadian hockey player  Les Claypool, American bassist (Primus)  October thumb|120px|Elisabeth Shue thumb|120px|Lauren Holly thumb|120px|Rob Schneider thumb|120px|Farin Urlaub  October 1 – Mark McGwire, American baseball player  October 5  Dame Laura Davies, English golfer  Ronni Le Tekrø, Norwegian guitarist (TNT)  October 6 – Elisabeth Shue, American actress  October 10  Anita Mui, Hong Kong singer (d. 2003)  Daniel Pearl, American journalist (d. 2002)  Jolanda de Rover, Dutch swimmer  October 12   Satoshi Kon, Japanese anime director (d. 2010)  Dave Legeno, English actor and mixed martial artist (d. 2014)  October 13  Mabi de Almeida, Angolan professional football coach  October 14   Lori Petty, American actress, director, and screenwriter  Alan McDonald, Northern Irish footballer  October 17 – Norm Macdonald, Canadian comedian  October 19 – Sinitta, Anglo-US singer  October 20 – John Storgårds, Finnish conductor and violinist  October 22 – Brian Boitano, American figure skater  October 23  Thomas Di Leva, Swedish singer  Wilson Yip, Hong Kong actor and director  October 25 – John Levén, Swedish bassist (Europe)  October 26 – Natalie Merchant, American singer, songwriter, and musician  October 27   Johnny Adair, Northern Irish/Ulster loyalist  Feyyaz Uçar, Turkish footballer  Farin Urlaub, German singer, band Die Ärzte  October 28 –
LUCY!: The hominid fossil remains known as Lucy were dug up in Hadar in this East African country in 1974
Ethiopia
September 12 – Emperor Haile Selassie of Ethiopia is deposed by the Derg, bringing an end to the Solomonic dynasty's rule since 1270.
3
A soccer stampede occurs in Cairo, killing 49.
The Philadelphia Flyers defeat the Boston Bruins to become the first team from the 1967 NHL expansion class to win the Stanley Cup in the North American National Hockey League.
Princess Nina Georgievna of Russia, Russian great-granddaughter of Tsar Nicholas I of Russia (b. 1901)    February 28 – Carole Lesley, British actress (b. 1935)  March  March 1   Hüseyin Kemal Gürmen, Turkish theatre and cinema actor (b. 1901)  Bobby Timmons, American jazz pianist and composer (b. 1935)  March 2 – Péter Schell, Hungarian politician (b. 1898)   March 3  Barbara Ruick, American actress and singer (b. 1930)  Frank Wilcox, American character actor (b. 1907)  March 4 – Adolph Gottlieb, American abstract expressionist painter (b. 1903)  March 5  John Samuel Bourque, French-Canadian politician, Cabinet Minister, military member, and businessman from Québec, Canada (b. 1894)  Billy De Wolfe, American character actor (b. 1907)  March 6 –
LITERATURE: Completes the title of Eldridge Cleaver's 1968 memoir "Soul on..."
Ice
A Viet Cong officer named Nguyễn Văn Lém is executed by Nguyễn Ngọc Loan, a South Vietnamese National Police Chief.
2
The Nuclear Non-Proliferation Treaty opens for signature.
At Paine Field, near Everett, Washington in the United States, Boeing officially rolls out its new 747 for the media and the public.
MOVIE FAMILIES: A 1968 scarefest:The title character made it a family of 3 for the Woodhouses
Rosemary's Baby
The film Rosemary's Baby premieres in the U.S.  June 17 –
3
One of the most publicized and controversial battles of the war begins, ending on April 8.
The first International Special Olympics Summer Games are held at Soldier Field in Chicago, Ill, with about 1,000 athletes with intellectual disabilities.
United States Air Force First Lieutenant and Bell UH-1F helicopter pilot James P. Fleming rescues an Army Special Forces unit pinned down by Viet Cong fire, earning a Medal of Honor for his bravery.
BALLET: The Ballets Russes was dissolved after the 1929 death of this great Russian impresario
Sergei Diaghilev
Sergei Diaghilev, Russian ballet impresario (b. 1872)  August 22 – Otto Liman von Sanders, German general (b. 1855)  August 26 – Sir Ernest Satow, British diplomat and scholar (b. 1843)  August 27 –
3
New York: Routledge, 1996.
143–144
Herman Potočnik Noordung, Slovenian rocket engineer (b. 1892)  September  September 2 – Paul Leni, German filmmaker (b. 1885)  September 12 – Rainis, Latvian poet and playwright (b. 1865)  September 23 –
HISTORY: The 1929 Lateran Treaty recognized the inherent sovereignty of this holy state
Vatican City
On February 11, Mussolini signed the Lateran Treaty, making Vatican City a sovereign state.
3
It registered as a Richter magnitude 7.2 submarine earthquake centered on Grand Banks, broke 12 submarine transatlantic telegraph cables and triggered a tsunami that destroyed many south coast communities in the Burin Peninsula area, killing 28 (as of 1997, Canada's most lethal earthquake).
A special election was held in this year, which Jose Vasconselos lost to Ortiz Rubio.
August 23–24 –
RELAX, WE'RE STILL RATED G: Tom Hanks says, "That wasn't flying. That was...falling with style" in this 1995 animated movie
Toy Story
The first-ever full length computer animated feature film, Toy Story, is released by Pixar Animation Studios and Walt Disney Pictures.
3
June 29  Lisa Clayton completes her 10-month solo circumnavigation from the Northern Hemisphere.
August 30 –
Participants in the Yugoslav Wars begin negotiations at the Wright-Patterson Air Force Base in Dayton, Ohio.
PILOTS: American pilot on the ground & "Behind Enemy Lines" in Bosnia for 6 days in 1995
Scott O'Grady
June 2  Mrkonjić Grad incident: A United States Air Force F-16 piloted by Captain Scott O'Grady is shot down over Bosnia and Herzegovina while patrolling the NATO no-fly zone.
3
The Schengen Agreement, easing cross-border travel, goes into effect in several European countries.
This equals the record set at Braemar, Aberdeenshire in 1895 and 1982.
Pancho Gonzales, American tennis champion (b. 1928)  July 4  Eva Gabor, Hungarian actress (b. 1919)  Bob Ross, American television painter (b. 1942)  July 5 – Takeo Fukuda, Japanese politician (b. 1905)  July 16  Patsy Ruth Miller, American actress (b. 1904)  Stephen Spender, English poet and writer (b. 1909)  July 17  Juan Manuel Fangio, Argentine race car driver (b. 1911)  Harry Guardino, American actor (b. 1925)  July 18 – Fabio Casartelli, Italian cyclist (b. 1970)  July 19 – Tomas Mendez, Mexican composer (b. 1921)  July 20 – Genevieve Tobin, American actress (b. 1899)  July 22 – Otakar Borůvka,  Czech mathematician best known today for his work in graph theory (b. 1899)  July 24  Marjorie Cameron, American writer, painter, actress, and occultist (b. 1922)  George Rodger, British photojournalist (b. 1908)  July 25 – Charlie Rich, American singer (b. 1932)  July 27   Rick Ferrell, American baseball player (Washington Senators, St. Louis Browns) and member of the MLB Hall of Fame (b. 1905)  Miklós Rózsa, Hungarian composer (b. 1907)  July 29 – Philippe De Lacy, American actor (b. 1917)   August  thumb|150px|Ida Lupino thumb|150px|Jerry Garcia
BOOKS OF THE '70s: This prolific British mystery writer's last published novel was 1976's "Sleeping Murder"
Agatha Christie
Danny McBride, American actor and stand-up comedian  Date unknown  Bozorgmehr Hosseinpour, Iranian cartoonist   Deaths    January  thumb|140px|Agatha Christie thumb|140px|Paul Robeson  January 5 – John A. Costello, former Taoiseach of the Republic of Ireland (b. 1891)  January 6 – Martha Walter, American impressionist painter (b. 1875)  January 8 –
3
Frampton Comes Alive!
August  August 1  The Caribbean nation of Trinidad and Tobago becomes a republic, replacing Elizabeth II with President Ellis Clarke as its head of state.
September 3 – Viking program: The Viking 2 spacecraft lands at Utopia Planitia on Mars, taking the first close-up color photos of the planet's surface.
INTERNATIONAL TRAFFIC: Murtala Mohammed, this country's head of state, was shot dead in a Lagos traffic jam in 1976
Nigeria
General Murtala Mohammed of Nigeria is assassinated in a military coup.
3
T. Cullen Davis, Priscilla's husband and one of the richest men in Texas, is tried and found innocent for Andrea's murder, involvement in a plot to kill several people (including Priscilla and a judge), and a wrongful death lawsuit.
August 16 –
Date unknown  In late March 1976, the first truly complete recording of the opera Porgy and Bess is released in a 3-LP set, by Decca Records in England and by London Records in the U.S.
WORLD CITIES: After hosting the 1976 Summer Olympics, this city's Olympic Stadium became the home of the Expos
Montreal
July 17  The 1976 Summer Olympics begin in Montreal, Canada.
3
February 15 –
Jaime Ornelas Camacho takes office as the first President of the Regional Government of Madeira, Portugal.
June 1 –
THE SPIRIT OF 1976: In March baseball's American League voted to award its first Canadian franchise to this city
Toronto
The Toronto Blue Jays are created.
3
April 5  James Callaghan becomes Prime Minister of the United Kingdom.
In Santiago, Chile, Cruzeiro from Brazil beats River Plate from Argentina and are the Copa Libertadores de América champions.
Random breath testing is introduced in Victoria (Australia).
THE SILVER SCREEN: 1960 film that says "Matricide is probably the most unbearable crime of all", especially for "the son who commits it"
Psycho
Melanie Klein, Austrian-British psychoanalyst (b. 1882)  September 23 – Kathlyn Williams, American actress (b. 1879)  September 24 – Mátyás Seiber, Hungarian composer (b. 1905)  September 27 – Sylvia Pankhurst, English suffragette (b. 1882)  October  October 11 – Richard Cromwell, American actor (b. 1910)  October 12 – Inejiro Asanuma, Japanese Socialist politician (assassinated) (b. 1898)  October 15  Henny Porten, German actress (b. 1890)  Clara Kimball Young, American actress (b. 1890)  October 21 – Ma Hongbin, Chinese warlord (b. 1884)  October 24 - Yevgeny Ostashev, was the test pilot of rocket and space complexes, head of the 1st control polygon NIIP-5 (Baikonur), Lenin prize winner, Candidate of Technical Sciences, engineer-Lieutenant Colonel.(b.
3
Bob Stoops, American football coach  September 7 – Phillip Rhee, American actor, producer and writer  September 9  Mario Batali, American chef and host  Hugh Grant, English actor and activist  September 10 –
Jennifer Rush, American singer  September 29 – Alan McGee, British music industry mogul and musician  September 30 – Blanche Lincoln, American politician  October thumb|120px|Jean-Claude Van Damme thumb|120px|Diego Maradona
Osvaldo Aranha, Brazilian politician (b. 1894)  January 28 –
WHERE THERE'S A WILLIAM: After this man's speech at the National Convention in 1896, the Democrats came out pro-silver
William Jennings Bryan
William Jennings Bryan delivers his Cross of Gold speech at the Democratic National Convention, which nominates him for President of the United States.
3
The opening ceremonies of the 1896 Summer Olympics, the first modern Olympic Games, are held in Athens.
Retrieved 2013-07-08.
A causeway is opened between the islands of Saaremaa and Muhu in Estonia.
TV HISTORY: In 1988 George Bush engaged this CBS anchorman in an on-air shouting match
Dan Rather
January 25 – U.S. Vice President George H. W. Bush and CBS News anchor Dan Rather clash over Bush's role in the Iran–Contra affair during a contentious television interview.
3
January 2  The Soviet Union begins its program of economic restructuring (perestroika) with legislation initiated by Premier Mikhail Gorbachev (though Gorbachev had begun minor restructuring in 1985).
October 7 – War of the Worlds premieres in syndication.
Jamie Campbell Bower, English actor  November 24 – Sabi, American pop singer-songwriter, dancer and actress  November 25  Jay Spearing, English footballer  Nodar Kumaritashvili, Georgian lugar (d. 2010)  November 29 – Russell Wilson, American football player  November 30  Phillip Hughes, Australian cricketer (d. 2014)  Eir Aoi, Japanese singer  Rotimi, singer-songwriter, actor, and model  December  150px|thumbnail|Zoe Kravitz  150px|thumbnail|Emily Browning  150px|thumbnail|Vanessa Hudgens 150px|thumbnail|Hayley Williams 150px|thumbnail|Marco Mengoni  December 1 – Zoë Kravitz, American actress  December 2 Alfred Enoch, British actor Athena, Filipina singer, stage actress  December 4   Mario Maurer, Thai model and actor  Yeng Constantino, Filipina singer  December 5 – Miralem Sulejmani, Serbian football player  December 6 –
AWARDS: In 1988, during the Iran-Contra investigation, this ex-Marine received an honorary degree from Liberty U.
Oliver North
Iran–Contra affair: Lieutenant Colonel Oliver North and Vice Admiral John Poindexter are indicted on charges of conspiracy to defraud the United States.
3
September 22 –
David Rudisha, Kenyan middle-distance runner  December 19 –
British oboist (b. 1897)  February 14 – Frederick Loewe, Austrian-American composer (b. 1901)  February 15 – Richard Feynman, American physicist, Nobel Prize laureate (b. 1918)  February 16 –
20th CENTURY WOMEN: In 1988 this Karachi-born woman became the first female to head a modern Islamic country
Benazir Bhutto
In the first open election in more than a decade, voters in Pakistan choose populist candidate Benazir Bhutto to be Prime Minister.
3
Kuwait Airways Flight 422 is hijacked while en route from Bangkok, Thailand to Kuwait.
August 8 – 8888 Uprising: Thousands of protesters in Burma, now known as Myanmar, are killed during anti-government demonstrations.
August 12 – Jean-Michel Basquiat, American musician/graffiti painter (b. 1960)  August 14  Robert Calvert, writer, poet, and musician (b. 1944)  Enzo Ferrari, Italian car maker (b. 1898)  August 17  Franklin Delano Roosevelt, Jr., American lawyer and politician (b. 1914)  Muhammad Zia-ul-Haq, leader of Pakistan (b. 1924)  August 21 –
POTPOURRI: In 1988 officials in this country admitted they had printed false maps for years to fool enemies
USSR
The USSR declares it unconstitutional on 26 November.
3
March  March 3 –
Chilean dictator Augusto Pinochet loses a national plebiscite on his rule; he relinquishes power in 1990.
Karp Osipovich Lykov, Russian Old Believer and survivalist   February 19  René Char, French poet (b. 1907)  André Frédéric Cournand, French-American physician, recipient of the Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine (b. 1895)  February 25 – Kurt Mahler, German-Australian mathematician (b. 1903)  March thumb|150px|Kurt Georg Kiesinger  March 1 –
MOVIE QUOTES: This 1972 movie begins with a funeral director telling Don Corleone, "I believe in America"
The Godfather
March 24  The Godfather is released in cinemas in the United States.
3
August 26 – September 11 –
September 19 –
The United Nations Environment Programme is established as a specialized agency of the United Nations.
WAR: (Sarah of the Clue Crew delivers the clue from Nellis Air Force Base in Las Vegas, NV.)  In 1972, responding to poor combat performance in this war, the United States Air Force began the Aggressor program to provide adversaries during training
the Vietnam War
He is sworn in on 5 December and his first action using executive power is to withdraw all Australian personnel from the Vietnam War.
3
April 16  Apollo 16 (John Young, Ken Mattingly, Charlie Duke) is launched.
Hong Kong's worst flooding and landslides in recorded history with  of rainfall in the previous 3 days.
Over $10,000 cash is found in the purse of Watergate conspirator Howard Hunt's wife.
DON'T FORGET THE LYRICS!: "In and around the lake, mountains come out of the sky", sang this group in 1972's "Roundabout"
Yes
Asghar Farhadi, Iranian film director  May 8 Darren Hayes, Australian musician Ray Whitney, Canadian former NHL player  May 9 Lisa Ann, American pornographic actress Daniela Silivaș, Romanian gymnast  May 10  Radosław Majdan, Polish goalkeeper  Katja Seizinger, German alpine skier May 15 – Richard Blackwood, English comedian, actor and rapper  May 16 – Derek Mears, American actor/stuntman
3
The Nishitetsu Lions baseball club, part of the NPB's Pacific League, is sold to the Fukuoka Baseball Corporation, a subsidiary of Nishi-Nippon Railroad.
Imelda Marcos is stabbed and seriously wounded by an assailant; her bodyguards shoot him.
Jesper Kyd, Danish video game composer  February 4 – Giovanni Silva de Oliveira, Brazilian footballer  February 5  Mary, Crown Princess of Denmark  Koriki Chōshū, Japanese comedian  February 8 – Big Show, American professional wrestler  February 9  Crispin Freeman, American voice actor  Norbert Rózsa, Hungarian swimmer  February 11  Craig Jones, American musician  Steve McManaman, British footballer  Kelly Slater, American professional surfer  February 14  Drew Bledsoe, American football player  Rob Thomas, American singer-songwriter (Matchbox Twenty)  February 15 – Jaromír Jágr, Czech hockey player  February 16 – Jerome Bettis, American football player  February 17  Billie Joe Armstrong, American rock musician and lead singer/guitarist (Green Day)
I REALLY DIG YOU (UP): Imre Nagy, this country's leader during the 1956 uprising, was reburied with honors in 1989
Hungary
Hungary attempts to leave the Warsaw Pact.
3
March 20 – Tunisia gains independence from France.
France resigns due to his government's policy on Algeria.
British and French troops leave the Suez Canal region.
THE 1930s: In 1936, in defiance of the Treaty of Versailles, this country began remilitarizing the Rhineland
Germany
The IV Olympic Winter Games open in Garmisch-Partenkirchen, Germany.
3
Hitler and other Nazis admitted then that the French army alone could have destroyed the Wehrmacht.
Charles Dierkop, American actor  September 14 –
October  October 2 – Juho Sunila, twice Prime Minister of Finland (b. 1875)  October 3 – John Heisman, American football coach (b. 1869)  October 8   Cheiro, Irish astrologer (b. 1866)  William Henry Stark, American businessman (b. 1851)  October 20 – Anne Sullivan, American teacher of Helen Keller (b. 1866)  October 26 –
FAMOUS PHYSICIANS: In 1928 he discovered penicillin in a culture of staphylococcus bacteria
Alexander Fleming
Alexander Fleming, at St Mary's Hospital, London, accidentally rediscovers the antibiotic Penicillin.
3
OED (1933, 1978 vol. 1, pp.
Women's athletics and gymnastics debut at these games and discus thrower Halina Konopacka of Poland became the first female Olympic gold medal winner for a track or field event.
Aleksey Batalov, Russian actor.
EUROPE: In 1924 it became the first country to host the Summer & Winter Olympics in the same year
France
The Third Ministry of Raymond Poincaré starts in France.
3
Earl W. Bascom, rodeo cowboy and artist, designs and makes rodeo's first one-hand bareback rigging at Stirling, Alberta Canada.
August 17 – Pavel Urysohn, Russian mathematician (b. 1898)  August 23 – Heinrich Berté, Austrian operetta composer (. 1858)
Samuel Gompers, American labor leader (b. 1850)  December 29 – Carl Spitteler, Swiss writer, Nobel Prize laureate (b. 1845)  December 31 –
HISTORICAL VOICEMAILS FROM...: Si, President Wilson... I led the 1916 raid of a N.M. town but sending troops into Mexico after me?  Bad idea!
Pancho Villa
March 8–9 – Mexican Revolution: Pancho Villa leads about 500 Mexican raiders in an attack against Columbus, New Mexico, killing 12 U.S. soldiers.
3
January 13 – WWI: Battle of Wadi: Ottoman Empire forces defeat the Allied British during the Mesopotamian campaign in modern-day Iraq.
July 15–19 –
September 13 – Mary, a circus elephant, is hanged in the town of Erwin, Tennessee for killing her handler, Walter "Red" Eldridge.
WOMEN: This dancer, once the mistress of Bavaria's Ludwig I, died in obscurity in 1861
Lola Montez
Vengayil Kunhiraman Nayanar, Malayali journalist and short story writer (d. 1914)   Deaths    January–June  thumb|right|110px|Frederick William IV of Prussia thumb|right|110px|Abdülmecid I  January 2 – King Frederick William IV of Prussia (b. 1795)  January 17 – Lola Montez, Irish-born dancer and mistress of King Ludwig I of Bavaria (b. 1821)  March 10 – Taras Shevchenko, Ukrainian poet (b. 1814)  March 16 – Princess Victoria of Saxe-Coburg-Saalfeld, mother of Queen Victoria (b. 1786)  April 15 – Isaiah Stillman, U.S. Army Major in the Black Hawk War (b. 1793)  May 29 – Joachim Lelewel, Polish nationalist historian (b. 1786)  June 3 – Stephen A. Douglas, U.S. Senator from Illinois and Presidential candidate (b. 1813)  June 25 –
3
July 12 – Confederate States signed Treaty with Choctaws and Chickasaws in Indian Territory.
August 27 – Martin Doyle's is the last execution in Britain for attempted murder.
October 26 –
TRANSPLANT: Born in England in 1937, this painter discovered sunny California in the 1960s & made it his home
David Hockney
David Hockney, English-born artist  July 12  Bill Cosby, American actor and comedian  Lionel Jospin, Prime Minister of France  July 14 – Yoshirō Mori, 55th Prime Minister of Japan  July 18  Roald Hoffmann, Polish-born chemist, Nobel Prize laureate  Hunter S. Thompson, American author and journalist  (d. 2005)  July 20  Dick Hafer, American Christian cartoonist (d. 2003)  Ken Ogata, Japanese actor (d. 2008)  July 27  Anna Dawson, British actress  Don Galloway, American actor (d. 2009)  July 29    Ryutaro Hashimoto, 53rd Prime Minister of Japan (d. 2006)  Daniel McFadden, American economist, Nobel Prize laureate  August thumb|120px|Dustin Hoffman  August 2 – Coenraad Bron, Dutch computer scientist (d. 2006)  August 4 –
3
This is the first time Inauguration Day in the United States is on this date, on which continues to occur; the change is due to the ratification in 1933 of the Twentieth Amendment to the United States Constitution.
January 26 –
– Anne Aubrey, English actress  January 4  Grace Bumbry, American opera singer  Dyan Cannon, American actress  January 6  Paolo Conte, Italian singer, pianist and composer  Underwood Dudley, American mathematician  January 8  –
U.S. HISTORY: In 1915 he called San Francisco from New York City & spoke with Dr. Thomas A. Watson
Alexander Graham Bell
January 25   First United States coast-to-coast long-distance telephone call, facilitated by a newly invented vacuum tube amplifier, ceremonially inaugurated by Alexander Graham Bell in New York City and his former assistant Thomas A. Watson, in San Francisco, California.
3
Harry Houdini performs a straitjacket escape performance."No Jacket Can Hold Him", Life, accessed May 9, 2011.
WWI: Ottoman Army begins the Raid on the Suez Canal.
Terry Frost, English artist (d. 2003)  October 14 –
CABINET DEPARTMENTS: The 1789 act that created it specified that its officers would include a comptroller & an auditor
the Treasury
The United States Department of the Treasury is founded.
3
An estimated 150,000 of Paris's 600,000 people are without work.
The Judiciary Act of 1789 establishes the federal judiciary and the United States Marshals Service.
German chemist Martin Heinrich Klaproth discovers the element Uranium while studying the mineral pitchblende.
NEWSMAKERS: The Senate testimony of this law professor made headlines in 1991
Anita Hill
The U.S. Senate Judiciary Committee interviews both Supreme Court candidate Clarence Thomas and former aide Anita Hill, who alleges that Thomas sexually harassed her while she worked for him.
3
On April 30, he is succeeded as prime minister by Davíð Oddsson.
Iraqi soldiers fire warning shots in the air to prevent inspectors from approaching the vehicles.
June 28 – Comecon is dissolved in Moscow.
THE ARABIAN PENINSULA: In 1991 retreating Iraqi troops looted this country & set fire to hundreds of its oil wells
Kuwait
A U.N.-authorized coalition force from thirty-four nations fought against Iraq, which had invaded Kuwait in the previous year, 1990.
3
In Lesotho, a bloodless coup ousts military ruler Justin Lekhanya.
Rueben Randle, American football player   May 9 – Christy Mack, American pornographic actress and model   May 10 –
Wilfrid Hyde-White, British actor (b. 1903)  May 7 – Dennis Crosby, American singer (b. 1934)  May 8  Jean Langlais, French composer and organist (b. 1907)  Rudolf Serkin, Austrian pianist (b. 1903)  May 13 –
KIDS RULE!: Isabella II, the daughter of Ferdinand VII, was just under 3 years old when she was proclaimed queen of this in 1833
Spain
Three-year-old Isabella II becomes Queen of Spain, under the regency of her mother, Maria Cristina of Bourbon-Two Sicilies.
3
William Fraser Tolmie experiences an earthquake at Fort Nisqually.
Daniel Dunglas Home, Scottish medium (d. 1886)  May 7 – Johannes Brahms, German composer (d. 1897)  May 9 – Hermann von Spaun, Austro-Hungarian admiral (d. 1919)  June 4 –
Samuel Sterett, American politician (b. 1758)  July 20 –
LET'S PLAY JEOPARDY!: In 1833 musician Jakob Brahms named his second child this
Johannes
Foundation of:  Kalamazoo College in Kalamazoo, Michigan  Madras College, St Andrews  Oberlin College in Oberlin, Ohio  Births January–June thumb|upright|110px|Johannes Brahms  January 1
2
thumb|right|300px|The Last Day of Pompeii was first exhibited in 1833.
Benjamin Harrison, 23rd President of the United States (d. 1901)  September 20 –
PATRON: Nadezhda von Meck gave him 6,000 rubles a year to devote himself to composing, but suddenly cut him off in 1890
Tchaikovsky
The Sleeping Beauty with music by Tchaikovsky is premiered at the Imperial Mariinsky Theatre in St Petersburg, Russia.
3
Two Hundred Drowned - Panic among the Chinese on the burned steamer Shanghai.
Roy Kilner, English cricketer (d. 1928)  October 25 –
Ulrich Ochsenbein, member of the Swiss Federal Council (b. 1811)  November 4 – Félix du Temple de la Croix, French Army Captain & aviation pioneer (b. 1823)  November 8 – César Franck, Belgian composer and organist (b. 1822)  November 11 – Marie-Charles David de Mayréna, French adventurer and self-styled King of Sedang (b. 1842)  November 23 –
SHOW BUSINESS: Started in 1890, this conglom shows off its products on the networks it owns, like Sci Fi, USA & Bravo
GE
Alice Sanger becomes the first female staffer in the White House.
3
Formal founding event on November 2 a month later.
November 29  The Meiji Constitution goes into effect in Japan and its first Diet convenes.
Matome Ugaki, Japanese admiral (d. 1945)  February 16 – Francesco de Pinedo, Italian aviator (d. 1933)  February 17 –
"P" IS FOR PHYSICS: This element, Pu, was first detected in a cyclotron at Berkely in 1940
Plutonium
Plutonium is first synthesized in the laboratory by a team led by Glenn T. Seaborg and Edwin McMillan at the University of California, Berkeley.
3
January 27 –
The Prince Edward, Duke of Windsor, is installed as Governor of the Bahamas.
John Havlicek, American basketball player  April 12  John Hagee, American televangelist  Herbie Hancock, American musician  April 13 – Max Mosley, British motorsport boss  April 16 –
POLITICIANS: A 1940 anti-FDR window sticker read, "No Third Term!  Democrats for" this Republican
Wendell Willkie
June 24  United States politics: The Republican Party begins its national convention in Philadelphia and nominates Wendell Willkie as its candidate for president.
3
Three gasoline-powered trains carrying factory workers crash and explode while approaching Ajikawaguchi Station, Yumesaki Line (Nishinari Line), Osaka, Japan, killing at least 181 people and injuring at least 92.
The film becomes one of the highest grossing of the year.
September 5 –
FAMOUS JOHNS: In 1889 this man, "The Boston Strong Boy", KO'd Jake Kilrain after 75 rounds
John L. Sullivan
The last official bare-knuckle boxing title fight ever held (under London Prize Ring Rules) as Heavyweight Champion John L. Sullivan, the "Boston Strong Boy", defeats Jake Kilrain in a world championship bout lasting 75 rounds in Mississippi.
3
Vincent van Gogh paints The Starry Night at Saint-Rémy-de-Provence.
June 3 –
Rodrigo Augusto da Silva, Brazilian Senator and author of the Golden Law (b. 1833)  October 19 –
AMERICAN RED CROSS HISTORY: In 1889, in one of its earliest relief efforts, the Red Cross aided victims of the killer flood in this Pennsylvania city
Johnstown
May 31   Johnstown Flood: The South Fork Dam collapses in western Pennsylvania, killing more than 2,200 people in and around Johnstown, Pennsylvania.
3
The Wall Street Journal is established.
The first free elections are held in Costa Rica.
November 23 –
HISTORY: In 1962, this country became a constitutional monarchy under King Hassan II
Morocco
Theresa Andrews, American swimmer  August 26  Princess Lalla Meryem of Morocco  Bob Mionske, American cyclist and attorney  August 27 –
3
March 8–12 –
April 9 –
The Dubliners is formed at O'Donoghue's Pub in Dublin.
THIS OLD HAUNTED HOUSE: Her home for a time, Hollywood's Roosevelt Hotel boasts the ghost of this sex symbol who died in 1962
Marilyn Monroe
August   August 5  Death of Marilyn Monroe: Marilyn Monroe is found dead from an overdose of sleeping pills and chloral hydrate at her home in Brentwood, Los Angeles; officially ruled a "probable suicide" (the exact cause has been disputed).
3
A military coup occurs in the Dominican Republic.
July 13 –
–
THE ASTRONAUT HALL OF FAME: His historic 1962 orbital flight was marked by drama over a possibly loose heat shield
John Glenn
While aboard Friendship 7, John Glenn became the first American to orbit the Earth, three times in 4 hours, 55 minutes.
3
A group of armed Cuban exile terrorists fire at a hotel in Havana from a speedboat.
October 10 –
The beginning of Sino-Indian War, a border dispute involving two of the world's largest nations (India and the People's Republic of China).
THE PLAY'S THE THING: Don't fear!  This 1962 Edward Albee play won the New York Drama Critics Circle Award
Who's Afraid of Virginia Woolf?
October 13 – Broadway debut of Edward Albee's drama Who's Afraid of Virginia Woolf?.
3
The S. S. Kresge Company opens its first Kmart discount store in Garden City, Michigan.
Jamie Moyer, American baseball player  November 18 –
Joseph Lade Pawsey, Australian radio astronomer.
LATIN AMERICAN HISTORY: In 1970 he became the first democratically elected Marxist to head a nation in the Western Hemisphere
Salvador Allende
October 24 – Salvador Allende is elected President of Chile.
3
The New York Knicks win their first NBA championship, defeating the Los Angeles Lakers 113-99 in Game 7 of the world championship series at Madison Square Garden.
June 28 – U.S. ground troops withdraw from Cambodia.
October 7 – General Juan José Torres becomes the new President of Bolivia.
COLORADO: In 1873 solid silver bricks were laid in a pavement in Central City to welcome this visiting president
Ulysses S. Grant
The Coinage Act of 1873 in the United States is signed into law by president Ulysses S. Grant; coming into effect on April 1 it ends bimetallism in the U.S. and places the country on the gold standard.
3
Censorship: The United States Congress enacts the Comstock Law, making it illegal to send any "obscene, lewd, or lascivious" books through the mail.
April–June  April 4 –
Max Reger, German composer (d. 1916) thumb|110px|Sergei Rachmaninoff  April 1 (N.S.)/March 20 (O.S.) –
BURIED AT ARLINGTON NATIONAL CEMETERY: Roger Chaffee & this astronaut, killed in a 1967 fire aboard their Apollo spacecraft, are buried next to each other
Gus Grissom
January 27  Apollo 1: U.S. astronauts Gus Grissom, Edward Higgins White, and Roger Chaffee are killed when fire breaks out in their Apollo spacecraft during a launch pad test.
3
The dictatorship ends in 1974.
April 27 – Montreal, Quebec, Expo 67, a World's Fair to coincide with the Canadian Confederation centennial, officially opens with Prime Minister Lester B. Pearson igniting the Expo Flame in the Place des Nations.
Many fans greet the staff upon their return to London that evening with placards reading "Freedom died with Radio London."
MOVIES IN OTHER WORDS (SORT OF): 1965 Rodgers & Hammerstein film:"Honk Honk,Toot Toot,Drum Drum,Strum Strum"
The Sound of Music
The film of The Sound of Music premieres at the Rivoli Theater in New York City.
3
April 14 –
The largest antiwar teach-in to date begins at Berkeley, California, attended by 30,000.
April 30 – Helen Chandler, American actress (b. 1906)
"NEW" PLACES: In 1965 it gave self-government to the Cook Islands
New Zealand
Mikhail Shtalenkov, Russian ice hockey player  October 26  Aaron Kwok, Hong Kong singer and actor  Julius O'Riordan, British dance music DJ, producer and entertainment lawyer  Sakari Oramo, Finland Conductor and violinist  Kelly Rowan, Canadian actress  Kenneth Rutherford, New Zealand cricketer  October 29 – Christy Clark, Canadian politician  November 120px|thumb|right|Björk 120px|thumb|right|Ben Stiller 120px|thumb|right|Shahrukh Khan  November 1 – Mia Korf, American actress  November 2 – Shahrukh Khan, Indian actor, film/television producer and television presenter  November 3 –
3
Forces loyal to the deposed military-imposed government stage a countercoup the next day, and civil war breaks out, although the new government retains its hold on power.
Philippe Dhondt, French singer known as Boris  May 23  Manuel Sanchís Hontiyuelo, Spanish footballer  Kappei Yamaguchi, Japanese voice actor  May 24  Carlos Franco, Paraguayan golfer  John C. Reilly, American actor  Shinichirō Watanabe, Japanese anime director  May 25 – Yahya Jammeh, President of the Gambia  May 27 –
Mendes 149px|thumb|right|Kyra Sedgwick  August 1 – Sam Mendes, English film director  August 2  Sandra Ng, Hong Kong actress  Hisanobu Watanabe, Japanese baseball player and coach  August 4  Dennis Lehane, American crime writer  Fredrik Reinfeldt, Swedish Prime Minister  August 6  David Robinson, American basketball player  Mark Speight, British television presenter (d. 2008)  August 9 – Chin Ka-lok, Hong Kong actor  August 10  Claudia Christian, American actress, writer, singer, musician, and director  Mike E. Smith, American jockey  John Starks, American basketball player  August 11  Viola Davis, African-American actress  Duane Martin, American actor  August 14  Emmanuelle Béart, French actress  Terry Richardson, American fashion photographer  August 15  Vincent Kuk, Hong Kong director and actor  Mark Labbett, British mathematician  August 18  Kōji Kikkawa, Japanese singer  Ikue Ōtani, Japanese voice actress  August 19 – Kyra Sedgwick, American actress  August 25 –
THE 20th CENTURY: The first successful Mars probe; it passed the planet in 1965 but orbited the sun until it became "ancient"
Mariner
July 14 – U.S. spacecraft Mariner 4 flies by Mars, becoming the first spacecraft to return images from the Red Planet.
3
The state funeral of Sir Winston Churchill takes place in London with the largest assembly of statesmen in the world until the 2005 funeral of Pope John Paul II.  February   February 4 – Trofim Lysenko is removed from his post as director of the Institute of Genetics at the Academy of Sciences in the Soviet Union and Lysenkoist theories subjected to criticism as pseudoscience.
The United Nations adopts the International Convention on the Elimination of All Forms of Racial Discrimination.
Lars Hanson, Swedish actor (b. 1886)  April 10 –
BRIDGES: In 1973 Queen Elizabeth II dedicated a new one of these bridges; the old one's in Arizona
London Bridge
March 17  Elizabeth II opens the modern London Bridge.
3
The first handheld mobile phone call is made by Martin Cooper of Motorola in New York City.
September 11   Chile's democratically elected government is overthrown in a military coup after serious instability.
Beverley Turner, British TV and radio presenter  October 22 – Ichiro Suzuki, Japanese baseball player  October 24 –
THE NEW YORK YANKEES: In 1973 he said he wouldn't interfere with the Yankees' management & he'd stick to building ships -- uh-huh
George Steinbrenner
CBS sells the New York Yankees for $10 million to a 12-person syndicate led by George Steinbrenner (3.2 million dollars less than CBS bought the Yankees for).
3
January 25 – English actor Derren Nesbitt is convicted of assaulting his wife Anne Aubrey.
November 25 – Greek dictator George Papadopoulos is ousted in a military coup led by Brigadier General Dimitrios Ioannidis.
September 20  Jim Croce, American songwriter (b. 1943)  Glenn Strange, American actor (b. 1899)  September 23 – Pablo Neruda, Chilean poet, Nobel Prize laureate (b. 1904)  September 24 – Josué de Castro, Brazilian writer, physician, geographer and activist against hunger (b. 1908)  September 26  Ralph Earnhardt, American race car driver (b. 1928)  Anna Magnani, Italian actress (b. 1908)  September 29 – W. H. Auden, English poet (b. 1907)  September 28 –
1973: On Jan. 1, 1973 Great Britain, Ireland & Denmark formally joined this
Common Market
August  thumb|150px|Flag of CARICOM  August 1 – Caribbean Community and Common Market (CARICOM) inaugurated.
3
February 13 –
May 17 – Watergate scandal:
Mike Alstott, American football player  December 24  Stephenie Meyer, American novelist   Kerry Nettle, Australian politician  December 25  Shalom Harlow, Canadian model and actress  Chris Harris, American professional wrestler  December 27  Wilson Cruz, American actor  Kristoffer Zegers, Dutch composer  December 28  Seth Meyers, American actor and comedian, currently hosts Late Night with Seth Meyers  Ids Postma, Dutch speed skater  December 29  Theo Epstein, American baseball general manager  Pimp C, American rap artist  December 30  Jason Behr, American actor  Ato Boldon, West Indian athlete  December 31 – Nikolay Tsiskaridze, Russian dancer  Date unknown  Tiago Carneiro da Cunha, Brazilian artist  Eimear Quinn, Irish Celtic singer, Eurovision Song Contest 1996 winner  Deaths  January 150px|thumbnail|right|Lyndon B. Johnson  January 1  Sir Arthur Elton, pioneer of the British documentary film industry (b. 1906)  Sergei Kourdakov, former KGB agent (b. 1951)  January 2 – Eleazar López Contreras, 32th President of Venezuela (b. 1883)  January 7 –
RAGE AGAINST THE MACHINE: In a 1978 attack on the new Narita Airport serving this capital, protesters broke into & trashed its control tower
Tokyo
The control tower and some other facilities of New Tokyo International Airport, which were scheduled to open on March 31, are illegally occupied and damaged in a terrorist attack by New Left activists, forcing a rescheduling of its opening date to May 20.
3
1978 Iranian Chinook shootdown: Iranian helicopters stray into Soviet airspace and are shot down.
Alexis Amore, Peruvian actress, dancer, and model December 30  Inferno, Polish musician    Tyrese Gibson, African-American actor and singer  December 31 –
John Paul I  September 15 –
THEY RULED!: In 1979, this leader had to flee his own country
the Shah
April   April 1  Iran's government becomes an Islamic Republic by a 98% vote, overthrowing the Shah officially.
3
January 5 – Queen releases "Don't Stop Me Now".
July 11 – NASA's first orbiting space station Skylab begins its return to Earth, after being in orbit for 6 years and 2 months.
References   Further reading   Caryl, Christian, Strange Rebels: 1979 and the Birth of the 21st Century (2013), 1979 as worldwide turning point; excerpt and text search  Facts on File.
THE '97 WORLD ALMANAC: In 1983 only 7% of U.S. homes had one of these; in 1996 40%, 18% with modems
Computers
Lotus 1-2-3 is released for IBM PC compatible computers.
3
August 26 – Heavy rain triggers flooding at Bilbao, Spain, and surrounding areas, killing 45 people and causing millions in damages.
Maurice Ronet, French film actor and director (b. 1927)  March 15 – Rebecca West, English-born writer (b. 1892)  March 16  Arthur Godfrey, American radio and television broadcaster and entertainer (b. 1903)  Freda Dudley Ward, former royal mistress (b. 1894)  March 17 –
Gérard Debreu
POP MUSIC: His 1983 hit "Beat It" featured Eddie Van Halen on gutiar
Michael Jackson
March 25 – Motown celebrates its 25th anniversary with the television special Motown 25, during which Michael Jackson performs "Billie Jean" and introduces the moonwalk.
3
A cinema fire in Turin, Italy, kills 64 people.
May 27 –
The Drug Abuse Resistance Education (DARE) program is launched in the U.S.  Flashdance and Return of the Jedi are box-office hits.
POP MUSIC: His 1982 album "Thriller" spawned the No. 1 hits "Beat It" & "Billie Jean"
Michael Jackson
November 30 – Michael Jackson releases Thriller, the biggest selling album of all time.
3
Syrian president Hafez al-Assad orders the army to purge the city of Harran of the Muslim Brotherhood.
After six years in opposition, Social Democrat Olof Palme becomes once again Prime Minister of Sweden .
The United States Environmental Protection Agency recommends the evacuation of Times Beach, Missouri due to dangerous levels of dioxin contamination.
WORLD HOLIDAYS: This country has Bataan Day & People Power Day, commemorating the 1986 revolt
the Philippines
People Power Revolution begins in the Philippines to remove President Ferdinand Marcos from office.
3
May 12 –
The Goodwill Games are held in Moscow.
Emily Hart, American actress  May 5 – Grace Wong, Hong Kong actress and beauty pageant contestant  May 7 –
U.S. HISTORY: The political ring led by this man stole as much as $200 million from NYC before it was ousted in 1871
Boss Tweed
John Taliaferro, In a Far Country: The True Story of a Mission, a Marriage, a Murder, and the Remarkable Reindeer Rescue of 1898 (PublicAffairs, 2007) p179  September 3 – New York City residents, tired of the corruption of Tammany Hall and Boss Tweed, meet to form the "Committee of Seventy" to reform local politics.
3
Events    January–March   January 18 –
March 29 First Surgeon General of the United States (John Maynard Woodworth) appointed.
George Biddell Airy presents his discovery that astronomical aberration is independent of the local medium.
EXPLORERS: In 1871 he answered, "Yes, and I feel thankful that I am here to welcome you"
Dr. Livingstone
Henry Morton Stanley, Welsh-born correspondent for the New York Herald, locates the missing Scottish explorer and missionary Dr. David Livingstone in Ujiji, near Lake Tanganyika, and greets him by saying "Dr. Livingstone, I presume?"
3
April 20 – U.S. President Ulysses S. Grant signs the Civil Rights Act.
Félix Édouard Justin Émile Borel, French mathematician and politician (d. 1956)  January 17 – David Beatty, 1st Earl Beatty, British admiral (d. 1936)  January 30 – Wilfred Lucas, Canadian-born actor (d. 1940)  February 4 – Friedrich Ebert, President of Germany (d. 1925)  February 9 –
Reginald R. Belknap, United States Navy rear admiral (d. 1959)   July–December  thumb|right|110px|Marcel Proust thumb|right|110px|Orville Wright
GLASS & GLASSMAKING: In 1882 Edward Johnson, a partner of this inventor, put the first string of glass lights on a Christmas tree
Edison
September 4 – Thomas Edison flips the switch to the first commercial electrical power plant in history, lighting one square mile of lower Manhattan.
3
Irish-born author Oscar Wilde arrives in the United States for an extended lecture tour; when asked by a customs official if he has anything to declare, he replies "I have nothing to declare but my genius" according to later tradition.
The University of the Punjab is founded in modern-day Pakistan.
Edward Bouverie Pusey, British churchman (b. 1800)  September 30 –
OLD NEWS: In 1981 a federal judge ruled it illegal to indefinitely imprison refugees from this communist island
Cuba
Cuba suffers a major outbreak of Dengue fever, with 344,203 cases.http://w3.whosea.org/en/Section10/Section332/Section521_2454.htm  Use of crack cocaine, a smokeable form of the drug, first reported in the United States and Caribbean."DEA History Book, 1876–1990" (drug usage & enforcement), US Department of Justice, 1991, USDoJ.gov webpage: DoJ-DEA-History-1985-1990.
3
Belize gains independence from the United Kingdom.
December 31 –
Chief Dan George, Canadian First Nations actor (b. 1899)  September 24 – Patsy Kelly, American actress (b. 1910)  September 27 – Robert Montgomery, American actor (b. 1904)  September 28  Sir Edward Boyle, Baron Boyle of Handsworth, British Conservative cabinet minister (b. 1923)  Rómulo Betancourt, two-term President of Venezuela (b. 1908)  September 29 – Bill Shankly, British football manager (b. 1913)  October 150px|thumb|Anwar Sadat  October 2  Harry Golden, American journalist (b. 1902)  Hazel Scott, American jazz singer and pianist (b. 1920)  October 4 – Freddie Lindstrom, American baseball player (New York Giants) and a member of the MLB Hall of Fame (b. 1905)  October 5 – Gloria Grahame, American actress (b. 1923)  October 6 – Anwar Sadat, President of Egypt, recipient of the Nobel Peace Prize (assassinated) (b. 1918)  October 13   Antonio Berni, Argentine painter (b. 1905)  Nils Asther, Danish-born actor (b. 1897)  October 16  Stanley Clements, American actor (b. 1926)  Moshe Dayan, Israeli general (b. 1915)  October 20 – Mary Coyle Chase, American playwright (b. 1906)  October 23 – Reg Butler, English sculptor (b. 1913)  October 24 –
GOLF: Willie Park won the first of these annual competitions at Prestwick, Scotland in 1860
British Open
The Open Championship, also known as the British Open, is played for the first time at Prestwick Golf Club in Ayrshire, Scotland.
3
One of the worst storms ever experienced in the region hits the east coast of England, sinking more than 100 ships and killing at least 40 people.
The historic debate about evolution is held at the Oxford University Museum.
July 2 –
NOVELS: Even the epilogue is lengthy in this 1869 Tolstoy epic; it comes out in 2 parts &, in our copy, is 105 pages long
War and Peace
Publication of Leo Tolstoy's novel War and Peace complete in book form concludes in Russia.
3
March 24 – Titokowaru's War ends with surrender of the last Māori troops at large in the South Taranaki District of New Zealand's North Island.
Rutgers University defeats Princeton University 6–4 in a forerunner to American football and College football.
Charles Wilson, Scottish physicist and Nobel laureate (d. 1959)  February 26 – Nadezhda Konstantinovna Krupskaya, Russian Marxist revolutionary and Vladimir Lenin's wife (d.1939)  February 28 – William V. Pratt, American admiral (d. 1957)  March 3  Michael von Faulhaber, German cardinal and archbishop (d. 1952)  Henry Wood, British conductor (d. 1944)  March 12 –
YOU NEED A DRINK: To be patriotic during WWII, this soda invented in 1898 adopted red, white & blue colors, still on its logo today
Pepsi
August 28 – Caleb Bradham names his soft drink Pepsi-Cola.
3
October–December  October 1 –
October 3 – Battle of Sugar Point: Ojibwe tribesmen defeat U.S. government troops in northern Minnesota.
Henry George Lidell, Dean of Christ Church, Oxford (b. 1811)  February 1 – Tsuboi Kōzō, Japanese admiral (b. 1843)  February 16 – Thomas Bracken, author of the official national anthem of New Zealand (God Defend New Zealand) (b. 1843)  March 1 –
WORLD BOOK DESCRIBES THE "G" MAN: "Served under the Apache leaders Cochise and Mangas Coloradas... in 1894, he was moved to Fort Sill
Geronimo
August 15 – Sante Geronimo Caserio is executed for the assassination of Marie François Sadi Carnot.
3
January 7 –
Kate Chopin writes The Story of An Hour (fiction).
Moshe Sharett, Israeli Prime Minister (d. 1965)  October 18 – H. L. Davis, American author (d. 1960)  October 25  Claude Cahun, French photographer and writer (d. 1954)  Âşık Veysel Şatıroğlu, Turkish poet, songwriter and saz player (d. 1973)  October 27 – Fritz Sauckel, German Nazi politician and war criminal (d. 1946)   November–December  November 2 –
ROMANS: Under this emperor, the Romans stuttered to a conquest of Britain in 43 A.D.
Claudius
He halts at the Thames and sends for emperor Claudius, who leads the march on Camulodunum.
3
__NOTOC__ Year 43 (XLIII) was a common year starting on Tuesday (link will display the full calendar) of the Julian calendar.
Aulus Plautius lands with four legions (20,000 men) and the same number of auxiliaries at Rutupiae (modern Richborough, on the east coast of Kent) and defeats the Britons, led by Caratacus and Togodumnus, in battles on the rivers Medway and Thames.
Vietnam is designated a province of China.
ROMANS: In 41 A.D. members of his own praetorian guard gave him "the boot" for good
Caligula
Events   By place    Roman Empire   Consuls are the emperor Caligula and Gnaeus Sentius Saturninus.
3
Sentius Saturninus (or, less frequently, year 794 Ab urbe condita).
After a night of negotiation, Claudius is accepted as Emperor by the Senate.
Messalina, wife of Claudius, persuades Claudius to have Seneca the Younger banished to Corsica on a charge of adultery with Julia Livilla.
WOMEN IN HISTORY: The Equal Rights Party nominated Belva Lockwood for this high office in 1884 & 1888
President of the United States
April–June  thumb|right|110px|Harry Truman thumb|110px|Claude Dornier  April 1 – Laurette Taylor, American stage actress (d. 1946)  April 4 – Isoroku Yamamoto, Japanese naval commander (d. 1943)  April 6 – Walter Huston, American actor (d. 1950)  April 7 – Bronisław Malinowski, Polish anthropologist (d. 1942)  April 12  Otto Fritz Meyerhof, German-born physician and biochemist, recipient of the Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine (d. 1951)  April 22 – Armas Launis, Finnish composer and ethnomusicologist (d. 1959)  Tenby Davies, Welsh half-mile world champion runner (d. 1932)  May 1 – Henry Norwest, Canadian World War I sniper (d. 1918)  May 8 – Harry S. Truman, 33rd President of the United States (d. 1972)  May 10 – Olga Petrova, English-born actress (d. 1977)  May 14 – Claude Dornier, German aircraft designer (d. 1969)  May 20
3
Property damage was severe in Jamaica and Amityville in New York.
December 1  American Old West:
Georges Imbert, Alsatian chemist (d. 1950)  March 26  Wilhelm Backhaus, German pianist (d. 1969)  Isaac C. Kidd, American admiral (d. 1941)  March 27 – James Cruze, American motion picture director (d. 1942)
POPE-POURRI: (Sarah reports from the cathedral in Lima, Peru.) On his visit to Latin America in 1985 he crowned this statue of the Virgin de la Evangelizacion here in Lima's cathedral
Pope John Paul II
Pope John Paul II announces the instituting of World Youth Day for Catholic youths.
3
One passenger, U.S. Navy Petty Officer Robert Stethem, is killed.
Carl Schmitt, German jurist, political theorist, and professor of law (b. 1888)  April 8 – J. Fred Coots, American songwriter (b. 1897)  April 11 – Enver Hoxha, Albanian head of state (b. 1908)  April 14 – Noele Gordon, British actress (b. 1919)  April 15 – Jack Medica, American Olympic swimmer (b. 1914)  April 16 – Scott Brady, American actor (b. 1924)  April 17 – Evadne Price (aka Helen Zenna Smith), Australian-British writer, actress and astrologer (b. 1888)  April 18 – Gertrude Caton–Thompson, English archaeologist (b. 1888)  April 21 – Tancredo Neves, Brazilian elected president (b. 1910)  April 22 –
George K. Arthur, English actor and producer (b. 1899)   June    June 1 – Eugène Séguy, French entomologist (b. 1890)  June 5 –
ORGANIZATIONS: In 1985 its ship, the Rainbow Warrior, was sunk by French agents in New Zealand
Greenpeace
The Greenpeace vessel Rainbow Warrior is bombed and sunk in Auckland Harbour by French DGSE agents.
3
March 3 –
June 14  TWA Flight 847, carrying 153 passengers from Athens to Rome, is hijacked by a Hezbollah fringe group.
The Black Cauldron makes its theatrical debut.
ROCK & ROLL: In 1989 the aging members of this band toured with a special version of the rock opera "Tommy"
The Who
The first mass demonstration against the socialistic regime in the GDR began in Plauen, East Germany, at 7 October 1989 and it was the beginning of a series of mass demonstrations in the whole GDR which ultimately led to the unification of Germany in 1990.
3
Perestroika –
September 18 – alleged coup attempt in Burkina Faso foiled.
November 6 –
1989: He replaced Admiral William Crowe as chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff
Powell
Army General Colin Powell became the first black chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff after being nominated by President Bush.
3
Magnum XL-200 opens at Cedar Point amusement park in Sandusky, Ohio as the world's tallest and fastest roller coaster.
The same day, the United Nations Security Council passes United Nations Security Council Resolution 638, condemning the taking of hostages by both sides in the conflict.
Gerald Anderson, Filipino-American actor  March 9 –Kim Tae-yeon, South Korean singer (Girls' Generation)  March 11  Daniella Kertesz, Israeli actress  Anton Yelchin, Russian-born American actor  March 14 –
CNN: City where the footage seen here was shot in 1989: (hammering a wall)
Berlin
It was a historical turning point for the wave of revolutions that swept the Eastern Bloc, starting in Poland that summer with the beginning of a move towards private enterprise, coming to a head with opening of the Berlin Wall in November, embracing the overthrow of the communist dictatorship in Romania in December and ending in December 1991 with the dissolution of the Soviet Union.
3
The same day, the United Nations Security Council passes United Nations Security Council Resolution 638, condemning the taking of hostages by both sides in the conflict.
The Phillips Disaster in Pasadena, Texas kills 23 and injures 314 others.
Moshe Ziffer, Israeli sculptor (b. 1902)* April 12  Gerald Flood, British actor (b. 1927)  Abbie Hoffman, American political activist (b. 1936)  Sugar Ray Robinson, American boxer (b. 1921)  April 15  Hu Yaobang, General Secretary of the Communist Party of China (b. 1915)  Charles Vanel, French actor (b. 1892)  April 16 –
STUPID ANSWERS: Dolores Del Rio was one of the stars of the 1933 musical "Flying Down to" here
Rio
Japan announces to leave the League of Nations (due to a cancelation period of exactly two years, the egression becomes effective March 27, 1935)pdf   March 31 –
3
The Lone Ranger debuts on American radio.
After 6 days, it is bombed by a Dutch aircraft, killing 23, and the remaining mutineers surrender.
Bert Hinkler, Australian pioneer aviator (b. 1892)  January 10 –
LEGENDS OF THE SILENT SCREEN: The title character of this 1922 film had trouble with his place in the sun
Nosferatu
The movie Nosferatu is released.
3
Võ Văn Kiệt, Vietnamese politician and statesman (d. 2008)  November 25 – Shelagh Fraser, British actress (d. 2000)  November 26 –
Ava Gardner, American actress (d. 1990)  December 28 –
Thomas E. Watson, American politician and senator (b. 1856)  October–December thumb|right|110px|Oscar Hertwig thumb|right|110px|Marcel Proust  October 7 –
ARCHITECTURE: After WWI he became director of the Grand Ducal art school in Weimar; in 1925 he moved the school to Dessau
Walter Gropius
In Germany, the Bauhaus moved to a building in Dessau designed by Walter Gropius.
3
November 28 –
thumb|right|115px|Reza Shah  December 16  Reza Shah became shah of Persia.
Richard Adolf Zsigmondy  Physiology or Medicine – not awarded  Literature –
ODDS & ENDS: When he died in England in 1703, he left his famous diary to a nephew
Samuel Pepys
Johann Christoph Bach, German composer (b. 1642)  April 20 – Lancelot Addison, English royal chaplain (b. 1632)  May 16 – Charles Perrault, French author (b. 1628)  May 26 – Samuel Pepys, English civil servant and diarist (b. 1633)  June 14 –
3
February 3 –
July–December  thumb|100px|left| July 29: Daniel Defoe thumb|140px|right| November 24: Great Storm of 1703  July 29–July 31 –
Johann Georg Graevius, German classical scholar and critic (b. 1632)  March 3 – Robert Hooke, English scientist (b. 1635)  March 31 –
AMERICAN INDIANS: When this chief, Pocahontas' father, died in 1618, he was succeeded by his brother Opitchapam
Powhatan
Joshua Sylvester, English poet (b. 1563)  October 29 – Sir Walter Raleigh, English courtier and settler of Virginia (executed) (b. 1554)  November 2 – Maximilian III, Archduke of Austria (b. 1558)  December 6 – Jacques Davy Duperron, French cardinal (b. 1556)  December 10 – Giulio Caccini, Italian composer (b. 1551)  probable – Chief Powhatan (proper name Wahunsenacawh), father of Pocahontas (b. c. 1547)   References
3
July–December   August 29 –
Madeleine Béjart, actress, theatre director (d. 1672)
Joan Cererols, Catalan composer and Benedictine (d. 1680)  September 14 –
THE AUTOBIOGRAPHY OF BEN FRANKLIN: One of my last public acts was signing a 1790 petition to Congress urging the abolition of this
Slavery
Two Quaker delegates petition the United States Congress for the abolition of slavery.
3
February 4 – Louis XVI of France declares to the National Assembly that he will maintain the constitutional laws.
July 9 – Russo-Swedish War –
August 4 –
"OO", SORRY!: This Ontario city was settled by Pennsylvania Mennonites who named it for an 1815 European battle
Waterloo
June 18 – Battle of Waterloo:
3
June 22 – Napoleon abdicates again; Napoleon II (1811–1832), age four, rules for two weeks (22 June to 7 July).
The Ionian Islands become a British protectorate.
July 26 – Robert Remak, German embryologist, physiologist and neurologist,  (d. 1865)   July–December   August 5 – Edward John Eyre, English explorer and colonial governor (d. 1901)  August 16 –
TIME'S MAN OF THE YEAR: Issues flew off the newsstand when this pilot was Man of the Year for 1927
Charles Lindbergh
May 20–21 – Charles Lindbergh makes the first solo, nonstop transatlantic airplane flight, carried out from New York City to Paris, France, in his single-engined aircraft, the Spirit of St. Louis.
3
The first armored car robbery is committed by the Flatheads Gang near Pittsburgh.
April 21 –
Paul R. Redfern leaves Brunswick, Georgia, flying his Stinson Detroiter "Port of Brunswick" to attempt a solo nonstop flight to Rio de Janeiro, Brazil.
AVIATION FIRSTS: Admiral Byrd gave navigational training to him prior to his historic 1927 transatlantic solo flight
Lindbergh
May 20–21 – Charles Lindbergh makes the first solo, nonstop transatlantic airplane flight, carried out from New York City to Paris, France, in his single-engined aircraft, the Spirit of St. Louis.
3
June 28 – Iberia Spanish Airlines is established.
August 24 – August 25 – Hurricane hits the Atlantic Provinces of Canada, causing massive damage and at least 56 deaths.
December 27 – Kern and Hammerstein's musical play, Show Boat, based on Edna Ferber's novel, opens on Broadway and then goes on to become the first great classic of the American musical theater.
QUESTIONS FROM A 1927 QUIZ BOOK: Article 10 of this international organization's covenant implies that an attack on one is an attack on all
the League of Nations
A treaty signed by the League of Nations Slavery Commission abolishes all types of slavery.
3
March 24 – Nanking Incident:
May 20:
December 30 –
IN THE PAST MILLENNIUM: In 1999 Gallup found 18% polled believed the sun revolved around the Earth, opposite to this man's 1543 theory
Copernicus
thumb|May: Nicolaus Copernicus.
2
June – Andreas Vesalius publishes De humani corporis fabrica (On the Fabric of the Human Body), revolutionising the science of human anatomy.
–
THE "FIFTH" ELEMENT: Political entity proclaimed in France in 1958
Fifth Republic
In France, a majority of 79% says yes to the constitution of the Fifth Republic.
3
February 20 –
The Menzies Liberal government in Australia is re-elected for a fifth term.
Marguerite Snow, American actress (b. 1889)  February 20 – Thurston Hall, American actor (b. 1882)  February 21 – Duncan Edwards English footballer (b. 1936), injury in the Munich air disaster  February 27 – Harry Cohn, American film producer (b. 1891)   March   March 11 – Princess Ingeborg of Denmark (b. 1878)  March 20 – Adegoke Adelabu, Nigerian politician (b. 1915) (car crash)  March 21 –
WORLD LEADERS: He became a Bolshevik in 1918 & Soviet Premier in 1958
Nikita Khrushchev
March 27 – Nikita Khrushchev becomes Premier of the Soviet Union.
3
The San Francisco Giants beat the Los Angeles Dodgers 8–0 at San Francisco's Seals Stadium, in the first Major League Baseball regular season game ever played in California.
June 2 –
Keith Haring, American artist (d. 1990)
1958: He began making a name for himself, becoming, at age 15, the youngest grandmaster in chess to that time
Bobby Fischer
January 8 – 14-year-old Bobby Fischer wins the United States Chess Championship.
3
The Monarch Underwear Company fire occurs in New York.
Michael Sorich, American voice actor, actor, writer, director and voice director  March 24 - Roland Koch, German politician  March 25
Douglas Mawson, Australian geologist and polar explorer (b. 1882)  October 15 –
COLLEGES & UNIVERSITIES: St. Mary's Academy, a sister school to this South Bend, IN college, was founded in 1844
Notre Dame
The University of Notre Dame, based in the city of the same name, receives its charter from Indiana.
3
__NOTOC__   Events   January–March   January 15 –
Henry Eyster Jacobs, American Lutheran theologian (d. 1932)  November 11 –
Alexandra of Denmark, queen of Edward VII of England (d. 1925)  December 8 – Émile Reynaud, French science teacher and animation pioneer (d. 1918)  December 18 – Takashima Tomonosuke, Japanese general (d. 1916)   Date unknown   probable –
YMCA: The YMCA was founded in this world capital in 1844
London
The Fleet Prison for debtors in London is closed, marking a significant milestone in the country's human rights record.
2
`Abdu'l-Bahá Himself was later proclaimed by Bahá'u'lláh to be His own successor, thus being the third "central figure" of the Bahá'í Faith.
The anonymously written Vestiges of the Natural History of Creation is published and paves the way for the acceptance of Darwin's book On the Origin of Species.
DOUBLE "F": Begun in 1935, it means "air weapon" in German
Luftwaffe
February 26  In Nazi Germany, Adolf Hitler orders reinstatement of the air force, the Luftwaffe, in violation of the 1919 Treaty of Versailles.
3
January 4 – Dry Tortugas National Park is established.
20th Century Pictures, Inc., becomes 20th Century Fox.
October 10 –
THIRTYSOMETHING: Number of "Steps" in a Hitchcock thriller from 1935
39
Their next Championship win is not until 29 May 1939.
3
The Italian colonies of Tripoli and Cyrenaica are joined together as Libya.
–
Biol., 120, 23 November 1935, p. 756.
AMERICAN HISTORY: A fire in 1851 destroyed some 35,000 volumes in its collection
the Library of Congress
The Library of Congress in Washington, D.C., burns.
3
– Victor Hugo uses the phrase United States of Europe in a speech to the French National Assembly.
April 20 – Ramón Castilla loses power in Peru.
Melvil Dewey, American librarian, inventor of Dewey Decimal Classification (d. 1931)  December 20 – Dora Montefiore, English suffragist and socialist (d. 1933)  December 30 –
19th CENTURY: When papa, Pedro, abdicated in 1831, 5-year-old Pedro II acquired this So. American country's crown
Brazil
Pedro I abdicates as Emperor of Brazil in favor of his 5-year-old son Pedro II, who will reign for almost 59 years.
3
The Bosnian Uprising against the Ottoman Empire begins.
April 18 – University of Alabama founded.
Charles Albert becomes king of Sardinia after the death of King Charles Felix.
EUROPEAN CAPITALS: The column of King Sigismund in this Polish city honors the king who moved the capital there from Krakow in 1596
Warsaw
King Sigismund III Vasa moves the capital of Poland from Kraków to Warsaw.
3
The Black Death hits parts of Europe.
Jan van Goyen, Dutch painter (d. 1656)  February 2 –
René Descartes, French philosopher and Mathematician (d. 1650)  May 9 –
CLOSE ENCOUNTERS: He's now a correspondant emeritus for "60 Minutes"; his memoir "Close Encounters" came out in 1984
Mike Wallace
Initially, 60 Minutes aired as a bi-weekly show hosted by Harry Reasoner and Mike Wallace, debuting on September 24, 1968, and alternating weeks with other CBS News productions on Tuesday evenings at 10:00 p.m. Eastern Time.
3
Controversies
The show has been praised for landmark journalism and received many awards.
It reverted to its original Roman numeral title on July 8, 2005, when the program moved to Fridays in an 8:00 p.m. Eastern Time slot to finish its run.
UNIVERSITY OF MICHIGAN ALUMNI: It'd take more than "60 Minutes" to honor this anchor/alum, also a character in "The Insider"
Mike Wallace
Initially, 60 Minutes aired as a bi-weekly show hosted by Harry Reasoner and Mike Wallace, debuting on September 24, 1968, and alternating weeks with other CBS News productions on Tuesday evenings at 10:00 p.m. Eastern Time.
3
Hewitt was forced to issue an on-air retraction.
60 Minutes II  In 1999, a second edition of 60 Minutes was started in the U.S., called 60 Minutes II. This edition was later renamed 60 Minutes by CBS for the fall of 2004 in an effort to sell it as a high-quality program, since some had sarcastically referred to it as 60 Minutes, Jr. CBS News president Andrew Heyward said, "The Roman numeral II created some confusion on the part of the viewers and suggested a watered-down version".
Other versions  A Mexican version, which featured Juan Ruiz Healy serving as anchor, aired in the late 1970s and 1980s.
ED-UCATION: The 2005-2006 TV season marks this famous Ed's 25th year on "60 Minutes"
Ed Bradley
This Morning  Sharyn Alfonsi (2015–present); also correspondent for 60 Minutes Sports  Former correspondents and hosts Former hosts  Christiane Amanpour (part-time correspondent, 1996–2000; host, 2000–2005); now at CNN, CNN International and ABC News  Ed Bradley †
3
This took place because football telecasts were protected contractually from interruptions in the wake of the infamous "Heidi Bowl" incident on NBC in November 1968.
Despite the irregular scheduling, the program's hard-hitting reports attracted a steadily growing audience, particularly during the waning days of the Vietnam War and the gripping events of the Watergate scandal; at that time, few if any other major network news shows did in-depth investigative reporting to the degree carried out by 60 Minutes.
p. 1925.
1804: This inventor's Feb. 7, 1804 birth made William & Sarah his plowed, er, proud parents
John Deere
– James Fannin, Texas revolutionary (d. 1836)  January 10 – Élie Frédéric Forey, Marshal of France (d. 1872)  January 20 – Eugène Sue, French novelist (d. 1857)  January 21 – Eliza Roxcy Snow, American poet (d. 1887)  February – James Bronterre O'Brien, Irish-born Chartist (d. 1864)  February 7 – John Deere, American industrialist (d. 1886)  February 13  – Claude-Étienne Minié, French army officer and weapon inventor (d. 1879)   March 8
3
February 14 –
The 1804 Haiti Massacre, an ethnic cleansing, eradicates the white population on Haiti; it is not stopped until 22 April.
The Napoleonic Code is adopted as French civil law.
PRESIDENTIAL FACTS: (Hi, I'm George Clinton)  In 1805 New York governor George Clinton became vice president under this man
Thomas Jefferson
thumb|130px|right|March 4: Thomas Jefferson.
2
March 5 –
George Müller, Prussian evangelist and founder of the Ashley Down orphanage in England (d. 1898)  November 14 –
ART & ARTISTS: Gauguin's mom was Peruvian, & from 1851 to 1855 he lived with her in this capital city
Lima
King Camp Gillette, American razor inventor (d. 1932)  January 20 – Ernest Chausson, French composer (d. 1899) thumbnail|Marie-Anne de Bovet  January 21 John Moses Browning, American firearms inventor (d. 1926) Henry B. Jackson, British admiral (d. 1929)  February 4 – George Cope, American painter (d. 1929)  February 12 – Marie-Anne de Bovet, French writer  February 17 – Otto Liman von Sanders, German general (d. 1929)  February 20 – John R. Lindgren, founder of the banking firm Haugan & Lindgren (d. 1915)
3
January 23  The first bridge over the Mississippi River opens in what is now Minneapolis, a predecessor of the modern-day Father Louis Hennepin Bridge.
The Point
Henry Funtecha. .
THEY BLEW US OUT OF THE WATER: At the Battle of Lepanto in 1571, a European alliance crushed this empire's navy under Ali Pasha
the Ottoman Empire
Cyprus is established as an eyalet of the Ottoman Empire and the first Turkish colony moves into the island.
3
June 3 – Following conquest of the Kingdom of Maynila, Spanish Conquistador Miguel López de Legazpi makes Manila a city and the capital of the Philippines.
The House of Commons of England introduces the first pro forma bill, symbolizing its authority over its own affairs.
Mōri Motonari, Japanese warlord (b. 1497)  July 15 –
TAKE A LETTER: In 1610 he described the moon as seen in his telescope as having a "rough and unequal" surface
Galileo
January 7 – Galileo Galilei first observes the four Galilean moons of Jupiter: Ganymede, Callisto, Europa and Io, but is unable to distinguish the latter two until the following day.
3
May 14 – François Ravaillac assassinates Henry IV of France.
Temporary Governor Gates decides to abandon Jamestown.
October 17 – Louis XIII of France is crowned.
COLONIAL AMERICA: In 1619 this first elected legislative assembly in America met in Jamestown
House of Burgesses
In Jamestown, Virginia, the first representative assembly in the Americas, the House of Burgesses, convenes for the first time.
3
Giuseppe Felice Tosi, Italian composer (d. 1693)
(d. 1646)  October 27 – Frederick Louis, Count Palatine of Zweibrücken (d. 1681)  November 5 – Philip de Koninck, Dutch painter (d. 1688)  November 7 –
Richard Burbage, English actor (b. c. 1567)  March 15 –
FAMOUS FIRSTS: Colonists got their first taste of popcorn at a dinner celebrating this holiday in 1621
Thanksgiving
The Pilgrims of Plymouth Colony and Wampanoags celebrate a harvest feast (3 days), later regarded as the "First Thanksgiving", noted for peaceful co-existence.
3
Tamblot starts the Tamblot Uprising  The Dutch East India Company sends 2000 soldiers under the command of Jan Pieterszoon Coen to the Banda Islands in order to force the local inhabitants to accept the Dutch trade monopoly on the lucrative nutmeg, grown almost exclusively on the Banda islands.
Robert Bellarmine, Italian saint (b. 1542)  September 24 –
November 26 –
17th CENTURY SCIENCE: In 1628 this British physician circulated his description of how blood circulates
William Harvey
Date unknown   William Harvey publishes Exercitatio Anatomica de Motu Cordis et Sanguinis in Animalibus in Frankfurt, containing his findings about blood circulation.
3
– Christoph Bernhard, German composer (d. 1692)  January 3 – Alvise II Mocenigo, doge of Venice (d. 1709)  January 8 – François-Henri de Montmorency, duc de Luxembourg, French general (d. 1695)  January 10 –
Johann Reinhard II, Count of Hanau-Lichtenberg,  (d. 1666)  February 1 – Jan Hackaert, Dutch painter (d. 1685)  February 5 –
Noël Coypel, French painter (d. 1707)  December 26 – John Page (Middle Plantation) (d. 1692)  probable –
YOU DO THE MATH: If 5 chickens each lay an egg every Monday, Wednesday & Friday only, it'll take this many weeks to make a 30-egg omelet
2
This is a further sign of the rising power of Wang  Mang.{{sfn|Klingaman| 1990| p= 64}}  Births   Julia, daughter of Drusus Julius Caesar and Livilla (d. 43)  Ruzi Ying, great-grandson of Emperor Xuan Han, Emperor of China (d. 25)  Yin Lihua, Empress of China (d. 64)  Saint Paul (approximate date) (d. 67 AD)   Deaths    References   Sources        als:0er#Johr 5
3
The denomination 5 for this year has been used since the early medieval period, when the Anno Domini calendar era became the prevalent method in Europe for naming years.
The Germanic Tribes of Cimbri and Charydes send ambassadors to Rome.
Agrippina the Elder marries Germanicus, her second cousin.
THE TALK OF THE "TOWN": Named for the PM who sponsored them, these 1767 "Acts" levied unpopular taxes on the American colonies
Townshend
Charles Townshend, English politician (b. 1725)  October 15 – Archduchess Maria Josepha of Austria (b. 1751) (smallpox)  October 16 –
3
June 15 – Rachel Donelson Robards Jackson, wife of 7th President of the United States Andrew Jackson.
Bernhard Meyer, German physician and ornithologist (d. 1836)  August 25 – Louis Antoine de Saint-Just, French revolutionary (d.1794)
John Newbery, English publisher (b. 1713)  December 28 – Emerich de Vattel, Swiss philosopher (b. 1714)  date unknown''  Firmin Abauzit, French scientist (b. 1679)  Blas María de la Garza Falcón, Spanish settler of Texas (b. 1712)   References   Further reading
CROSSWORD CLUES "S": 64 across:Lee or Musial             (4)
Stan
Events   By place   Roman Empire   July 19 – Great Fire of Rome: A fire begins in the merchant area of Rome and soon burns completely out of control, while emperor Nero allegedly plays his lyre and sings as he watches the blaze from a safe distance.
3
This plan will not be applied until after his death in 68.
However, during the winter of 64–65, Lyon suffers a catastrophic fire itself, and Nero reciprocates by sending money to Lyon.
Births   September 13 – Julia Flavia, daughter of Roman Emperor Titus, lover of his brother Domitian (d. 91 AD)  Philo of Byblos, Phoenician historical writer (d. 141)   Deaths   Paul the Apostle (earliest date) (b. 5 AD)  Peter the Apostle (earliest date) (b. 1 BC)  Empress Yin Lihua (b. 5)   See also    First Martyrs of the Church of Rome   References      als:60er#64
SCIENCE QUIZ: To the nearest 100, the number of different elements we know about
100
thumb|The eastern hemisphere in 100 AD thumb|The world in 100 __NOTOC__ Year 100 (C) was a leap year starting on Wednesday (link will display the full calendar) of the Julian calendar.
3
Pliny the Younger advances to consulship, giving his panegyric on Trajan in the process.
The future emperor Hadrian marries Vibia Sabina.
Asimov's Guide to the Bible, page 954.
FAMOUS KENTUCKIANS: Her brother Nick, nephew George & friend Al Pacino all attended her 2002 funeral in Maysville, Ky., her hometown
Rosemary Clooney
Rosemary Clooney, American singer and actress (b. 1928)  June 30 – Chico Xavier, Brazilian medium (b. 1910)  July thumb|100px|Joaquín Balaguer thumb|100px|Joseph Luns  July 2 – Ray Brown, American bassist (b. 1926)  July 5  Benjamin O. Davis Jr., American general (b. 1912)  Katy Jurado, Mexican actress (b. 1924)  Ted Williams, American baseball player (b. 1918)  July 6  Dhirubhai Ambani, Indian businessman (b. 1932)  John Frankenheimer, American film director (b. 1930)  Abdul Qadir, Vice president of Afghanistan (b. 1951)  July 9  Mayo Kaan, bodybuilder (b. 1914)  Rod Steiger, American actor (b. 1925)  July 10 – Evangelos Florakis, Greek military officer (b. 1943)  July 13 –
3
May 31 –
The United States Senate withdraws from the Anti-Ballistic Missile Treaty of 1972.
The Queen Mother, consort of George VI of the United Kingdom and mother of Elizabeth II (b. 1900)  April thumb|100px|Layne Staley thumb|100px|Byron White  April 1 – Simo Häyhä, Finnish sniper (b. 1905)  April 5 – Layne Staley, American singer (Alice in Chains) (b. 1967)  April 8 – María Félix, Mexican actress (b. 1914)  April 9 – Leopold Vietoris, Austrian mathematician (b. 1891)  April 15 – Byron White, American athlete and Supreme Court Justice (b. 1917)  April 16  Franz Krienbühl, Swiss speed skater (b. 1929)  Robert Urich, American actor (b. 1946)  April 18  Thor Heyerdahl, Norwegian explorer (b. 1914)  Wahoo McDaniel, American football player and professional wrestler (b. 1938)  April 22 – Linda Lovelace, American pornographic actress (b. 1949)  April 25 – Lisa Lopes, American rapper; one-third of the multi-platinum girl group TLC (b. 1971)  April 27  George Alec Effinger, American author (b. 1947)  Baron Hans Heinrich Thyssen-Bornemisza, Swiss industrialist and art collector (b. 1921)  Ruth Handler, American toy manufacturer (b. 1916)  April 28 –
HISTORIC AMERICANS: In 1836 he set up shop in Paterson, New Jersey to manufacture his famous revolvers
Samuel Colt
February 25 – Samuel Colt receives a United States patent for the Colt revolver, the first revolving barrel multishot firearm.
3
The Battle of the Alamo ends; 182 Texan settler soldiers die in a struggle with approximately 5,000 Mexican soldiers.
August 17 – Marriage Act in the United Kingdom establishes civil marriage and registration systems that permit marriages in nonconformist chapels, and a Registrar General of Births, Marriages, and Deaths.wikisource:1836 (33) Registration of Births &c.
Agnes Bulmer, English poet (b. 1775)  August 21 –
U.S. PRESIDENTS: In 1832 this president vetoed the recharter of the Second Bank of the United States
Andrew Jackson
December 3 – U.S. presidential election, 1832: Andrew Jackson is re-elected president.
3
Bad Axe Massacre ends the last major Native American rebellion east of the Mississippi in the U.S.  August 7 –
Charilaos Trikoupis, seven-time Prime Minister of Greece (d. 1896)
Jean-Baptiste
IN FLORIDA: This has been the state's capital since 1824, 2 years after Florida became a U.S. territory
Tallahassee
March 7 – Florida State Capitol moves from St. Augustine, Florida to Tallahassee  March 11 –
3
March 5 – First Anglo-Burmese War begins.
The Montparnasse Cemetery is established in Paris, France.
– Ambrose Burnside, American Civil War general (d. 1881)  June 26 –
LET'S GO BALLOONING!: (Sofia of the Clue Crew reports from the International Balloon Fiesta in Albuquerque)  A rooster, a sheep & a duck are the passengers in a hot air balloon launched by these brothers at Versailles in 1783
Montgolfier brothers
__NOTOC__   Events   January–June  thumb|200px|The first manned hot-air balloon, designed by the Montgolfier brothers, takes off from the Bois de Boulogne, on November 21, 1783  February 3 – American Revolutionary War: The Kingdom of Great Britain acknowledges the independence of the United States of America.
3
May 26 –
June 8 –
The city of Sevastopol is founded on the Crimean Peninsula of the Russian Empire.
THEY SAYETH OF BEAUTY: From his 1711 Essay on Criticism: "'Tis not a lip, or eye, we beauty call, but the joint force & full result of all"
Alexander Pope
Date unknown  Alexander Pope publishes the poem An Essay on Criticism in London.
3
February – French settlers at Fort Louis de la Mobile celebrate Mardi Gras in Mobile (Alabama) by parading a large papier-mache ox head on a cart (the first Mardi Gras parade in America).
Jeanne-Marie Leprince de Beaumont, French writer (d. 1780)  May 1 –
Richard FitzWilliam, 6th Viscount FitzWilliam (d. 1776)  July 26 –
ANCIENT HISTORY: In 439 A.D. this north African city-state was conquered by the Vandals under Genseric
Carthage
Carthage falls to the Vandals.
3
Greek becomes an official language in the Eastern Roman Empire.
Balkans   Winter –
Genseric makes it his capital and established the Vandal Kingdom.
INVENTORS & INVENTIONS: In 1798 this cotton gin inventor began using a system of interchangeable parts to make muskets for the U.S. government
Eli Whitney
Eli Whitney contracts with the U.S. federal government for 10,000 rifles, which he produces with interchangeable parts.
2
The Ayrshire (Earl of Carrick's Own)
Johan Rudolph Thorbecke, Dutch politician (d. 1872)  January 19 –
LET'S GET ECONOMICAL: Born in Scotland in 1723, this economist concluded that people always act in their own best interests
Adam Smith
Adam Smith, Scottish economist and philosopher (d. 1790)  June 11 – Johann Georg Palitzsch, German astronomer (d. 1788)  June 20  Adam Ferguson, Scottish philosopher and historian (d. 1816)  Theophilus Lindsey, English theologian (died 1808)
3
February 15 – John Witherspoon, American signer of the Declaration of Independence (d. 1794)  February 17 – Tobias Mayer, German astronomer (d. 1761)  February 21 – Louis-Pierre Anquetil, French historian (d. 1808)  February 23 –
Sir Joshua Reynolds, English painter (d. 1792)  September 11 –
Thomas d'Urfey, English writer (b. 1653)
18th CENTURY AMERICA: In 1775 he told the Virginia Convention, "Gentlemen may cry peace, peace!  But there is no peace"
Patrick Henry
March 23 – American Revolution: Patrick Henry, a delegate to the Second Virginia Convention after the Virginia House of Burgesses was disbanded by the Royal Governor, delivers his "Give me liberty, or give me death!" speech at St. John's Church in Richmond, Virginia.
3
On June 17, two months into the colonial siege of Boston, at the Battle of Bunker Hill, just north of Boston, British forces are victorious, but only after suffering severe casualties and after Colonial forces run out of ammunition, Fort Ticonderoga is taken by American forces in New York Colony's northern frontier, and American forces unsuccessfully invade Canada, with an attack on Montreal defeated by British forces on November 13 and an attack on Quebec repulsed December 31.
December 5 – American Revolution: Henry Knox begins his journey to Cambridge, Massachusetts with the artillery that has been captured from Fort Ticonderoga.
Peyton Randolph, American president of the Continental Congress (b. 1721)  November 9 – Francisco Ximenes de Texada, 69th Grandmaster of the Knights Hospitaller (b. 1703)  November 21 – John Hill, English writer  November 24 – Lorenzo Ricci, Italian Jesuit leader (b. 1703)  December 7 –
MITCH McCONNELL'S KENTUCKY MEGAMIX: Founded in 1775, this city, home to Transylvania U., was named for an American Revolution battle site
Lexington
__NOTOC__     Events   Summary  The  American Revolution begins this year, with the first military engagement being the April 19 Battles of Lexington and Concord on the day after Paul Revere's now-legendary ride.
3
The following month he discovers the South Sandwich Islands.
April 19 – American Revolution:
John Wilkinson invents and patents a new kind of boring machine.
FAMOUS AMERICANS: In the wee hours of an April morning in 1775, this silversmith warned, "The British are Coming!"
Paul Revere
__NOTOC__     Events   Summary  The  American Revolution begins this year, with the first military engagement being the April 19 Battles of Lexington and Concord on the day after Paul Revere's now-legendary ride.
3
September 24 – Nathan Heald, officer in the United States Army during the War of 1812 (d. 1832)  September 25 – Pierre Flor, Norwegian politician (d. 1848)  September 26 – James Grimston, 1st Earl of Verulam, British peer and Member of Parliament (d. 1845)  September 29 François Michel de Rozière, French Egyptologist (d. 1842) David McConaughy, fourth president of Washington College (d. 1852)  September 30 – Robert Adrain, Irish-born American mathematician and scientist (d. 1843)   October   October 6 –
Johann Karl Wilhelm Illiger, German biologist (d. 1813)  November 21 George Kremer, American politician (d. 1854) Josef Servas d'Outrepont (d. 1845)  November 23 Clemens Wenzeslaus Coudray, German architect (d. 1845) Maria Anna of Naples and Sicily, member of the French Royal Family (d. 1780)  November 25 Joseph Borremans, Belgian composer (d. 1858) Jean Baptiste Godart, French entomologist (d. 1825) Michel Étienne Descourtilz, French physician, botanist and historiographer of the Haitian revolution (d. 1835) Charles Kemble, British actor (d. 1854)  November 27 – Lauritz Weidemann, Norwegian politician (d. 1856)  November 28 William Frere, English lawyer and academic (d. 1836)
Thomas Gardner, political figure and heroic soldier (b. 1724)
THAT'S THE FACT, JACK!: In 2008 this company's 77-year run as the world's largest automaker came to an end
GM
King Jigme Khesar Namgyel Wangchuck of Bhutan is crowned, having ascended to the throne in 2006.
3
Over 133,000 in Burma/Myanmar are killed by Cyclone Nargis, the deadliest natural disaster since the Boxing Day Tsunami in 2004.
Rockets land east of Ashdod m Ynetnews, December 28, 2008; Rockets reach Beersheba, cause damage, Ynetnews, December 30, 2008.
Peter Poreku Dery, Ghanaian cardinal (b. 1918)  March 14 –
RECENT SPACE NEWS: In 2008 this country reached the Moon with its Chandrayaan-1 impact probe
India
April 28  India sets a world record by sending 10 satellites into orbit in a single launch.
3
May 12 –
May 25 – NASA's Phoenix spacecraft becomes the first to land on the northern polar region of Mars.
November 22 – November 23 –
TURNING 25: This foreign capital's Disneyland turns 25 in 2008
Tokyo
In the Akihabara area of Tokyo, Japan, a 25-year-old man stabs seven to death and wounds 10, before being arrested.
3
February 10 –
August 26 – September 1 – Hurricane Gustav makes landfall on Louisiana as Category 2 and kills 7 in the United States, after making landfall on western Cuba as Category 4, and killing 66 in Haiti, 8 in the Dominican Republic, and 11 in Jamaica.
The last time this occurred was in 2005.
PROJECT RUNWAY: This designer, hailed as the man who brought pants to women, died in 2008
Yves Saint Laurent
June thumb|120px|Chinghiz Aitmatov 120px|thumbnail|right|Cyd Charisse thumb|120px|George Carlin  June 1  Yves Saint Laurent, French fashion designer (b. 1936)  Tommy Lapid, Israeli television presenter, journalist, and politician (b. 1931)  June 2 – Bo Diddley, American musician (b. 1928)  Mel Ferrer, American actor, director, and producer (b. 1917)  June 4 – Agata Mróz-Olszewska, Polish volleyball player (b. 1982)  June 7 –
3
April 22 – Surgeons at London's Moorfields Eye Hospital perform the first operations using bionic eyes, implanting them into 2 blind patients.
The International Court of Justice awards Middle Rocks to Malaysia and Pedra Branca to Singapore, ending a 29-year territorial dispute between the 2 countries.
An earthquake measuring 6.6 magnitude kills at least 65 in Kyrgyzstan.
OPRAH'S FIRSTS: (Oprah Winfrey gives the clue.)  For a 2005 show on age-defying things for women, I had this part of my body "stabbed" with a special gun; I was told the 2 clicks would hurt "a little", yeah, right!
ear
2005 was designated as: The Year of the Volunteer by the UK government The World Year of Physics by the International Union of Pure and Applied Physics The Year of Cork City, Ireland, as European Capital of Culture The Year of the Veteran in Canada The Year of Discovery International Year for Sport and Physical Education International Year of Microcredit  The year 2005 was the end of the International Decade of the World's Indigenous People (1995–2005).
3
Carlton defeated Hawthorn by 6 points in Round 6 of the 2005 AFL Season.
May 15 –
Milton Obote, President of Uganda (b. 1925)  October 17 – Ba Jin, Chinese writer (b. 1904)  October 22 – Arman, French-American artist (b. 1928)  October 24  Rosa Parks, American civil rights activist (b. 1913)  José Azcona del Hoyo, President of Honduras (b. 1926)  Robert Sloman, English writer (b. 1926)  October 28 – Richard Smalley, American chemist and physicist (b. 1943)  November  thumb|120px|Eddie Guerrero thumb|120px|Pat Morita  November 1 –
IN LINE FOR BRITAIN'S THRONE: Number 2:This 2005 graduate of the University of St. Andrews
William
Edward Heath, Prime Minister of the United Kingdom (b. 1916)  July 18 – William Westmoreland, U.S. general (b. 1914)  July 19 – John Tyndall, British activist (b. 1934)  July 20 – James Doohan, Canadian actor (b. 1920)  July 21  Long John Baldry, British musician (b. 1941)  Alfred Hayes, English wrestling announcer (b. 1928)  July 23 –
2
The Pakistan Army opens fire on insurgents in Balochistan, in the first armed uprising since General Rahimuddin Khan's stabilization of the province in 1978.
At least 61 people are killed and many others wounded in 3 powerful blasts in the Indian capital, Delhi (see 2005 Delhi bombings).
WOOD: The remarkable elasticity of yew led to this new weapon that made history at a 1346 battle
the longbow
1346: Triumph of the Longbow.
3
Asia    Western Asia
Laurier Books Ltd, 1988.
97.Housley, Norman.
CONTEMPORARIES: Burnt at the stake in 1431, she was probably a pin-up girl for 11-year-old Torquemada
Joan of Arc
Events   January–December   January 9 – Pretrial investigations for Joan of Arc begin in Rouen, France under English occupation.
3
May 30 –
October 30 – Treaty of Medina del Campo, consolidating peace between Portugal and Castille.
Ladislaus Hunyadi, Hungarian statesman and warrior (d. 1457)  probable  William Hastings, 1st Baron Hastings (d. 1483)  John Neville, 1st Marquess of Montagu, English politician (d. 1471)  François Villon, French poet   Deaths   January 25 – Charles II, Duke of Lorraine (b. 1364)  February 20 –
2006 NATIONAL GEOGRAPHIC STORIES: National Geographic called the circumstances of his death over Batt Reef off Queensland "extremely rare"
Steve Irwin
Jack Warden, American actor (b. 1920)  July 20  Lim Kim San, Singapore politician (b. 1916)  Ted Grant, British politician (b. 1913)  July 21  Ta Mok, Cambodian military leader (b. 1926)  Mako Iwamatsu, Japanese-born actor (b. 1933)  July 22  José Antonio Delgado, Venezuelan mountain climber (b. 1965)  Gianfrancesco Guarnieri, Italian-born Brazilian actor and playwright (b.1934)  July 25  Ezra Fleischer, Romanian dissident, later Israeli writer (b. 1928)  Hani Mohsin, Malaysian actor (b. 1965)  July 28 – David Gemmell, British author (b. 1948)  July 30 – Murray Bookchin, American libertarian socialist (b. 1921)  August  thumb|120px|James Van Allen thumb|120px|Alfredo Stroessner 120px|thumb|right|Glenn Ford  August 3  Elisabeth Schwarzkopf, German-born soprano (b. 1915)  Arthur Lee, American musician (b. 1945)  August 6 – Hirotaka Suzuoki, Japanese voice actor (b. 1950)  August 9 – James Van Allen, American physicist (b. 1914)  August 11 – Mike Douglas, American entertainer (b. 1925)  August 13  Tony Jay, English-born actor (b. 1933)  Jon Nödtveidt, Swedish musician (b. 1975)  August 14 - Bruno Kirby, American actor (b. 1949)  August 15  Te Atairangikaahu, Maori queen (b. 1931)  Faas Wilkes, former Dutch football player (b. 1923)  August 16 – Alfredo Stroessner, President of Paraguay (b. 1912)  August 19 – Óscar Míguez, Uruguayan football player (b. 1927)  August 20 – Joe Rosenthal, American photographer (b. 1911)  August 21  Bismillah Khan, Indian musician (b. 1916)  S. Yizhar, Israeli writer (b. 1916)  August 23  Maynard Ferguson, Canadian musician and bandleader (b. 1928)  Wolfgang Přiklopil, Austrian kidnapper of Natascha Kampusch (b. 1962)  August 26  Rainer Barzel, German politician (b. 1924)  Clyde Walcott, Barbadian cricketer (b. 1926)  August 27  Hrishikesh Mukherjee, Indian filmmaker (b. 1922)  María Capovilla, Ecuadorian supercentenarian and last remaining person born during the 1880s (b. 1889)  August 30  Glenn Ford, Canadian actor (b. 1916)  Naguib Mahfouz, Egyptian writer, Nobel Prize laureate (b. 1911)  Robin Cooke, Baron Cooke of Thorndon, New Zealand jurist and member of the British House of Lords (b. 1926)  September  thumb|right|120px|Steve Irwin  September 1 – György Faludy, Hungarian poet (b. 1910)  September 2  Charlie Williams, British comedian (b. 1927)  Bob Mathias, American athlete (b. 1930)  Willi Ninja, American dancer and choreographer (b. 1961)  September 4  Steve Irwin, Australian environmentalist and television personality (b. 1962)  Giacinto Facchetti, Italian footballer (b. 1942)  Colin Thiele, Australian author and educator (b. 1920)  September 8 – Hilda Bernstein, English-born author, artist, and activist (b. 1915)  September 9  Richard Burmer, American composer and musician (b. 1955)  William B. Ziff, Jr., American publishing executive (b. 1930)  September 10 –
3
The Qinghai–Tibet Railway launches a trial operation, making Tibet the last province-level entity of China to have a conventional railway.
December 30 – Basque nationalist group ETA detonates a van bomb at Madrid-Barajas Airport in Madrid, Spain, ending a nine-month ceasefire.
Shelley Winters, American actress (b. 1920)  January 15 –
PEOPLE IN HISTORY: Born in 1519, this Medici queen of France was the great-niece of Pope Leo X
Catherine de' Medici
King Henry II of France (d. 1559)  April 13 – Catherine de' Medici, queen of Henry II of France (d. 1589)  May 27 – Girolamo Mei, Italian humanist historian (d. 1594)  June 6 – Andrea Cesalpino, Italian philosopher, physician, and botanist (d. 1603)  June 12 –
3
Isabella Jagiellon, Queen (d. 1559)  February 5 –
Pedro Menéndez de Avilés, first Spanish Governor of Florida (d. 1574)  February 16 – Gaspard de Coligny, French Huguenot leader (d. 1572)  February 17 – Francis, Duke of Guise, French soldier and politician (d. 1563)  February 19 – Froben Christoph of Zimmern, Author of the Zimmern Chronicle (d. 1566)  March 4   Adrian Stokes, English politician (d. 1586)
Hindal Mirza, Mughal Empire emperor (d. 1551)
THE OTTO CLUB: In 1654 Otto von Guericke showed it was nearly impossible to pull 2 hemispheres apart with one of these inside
vacuum
thumb|right|115px|The original Magdeburg hemispheres and Guericke's vacuum pump in the Deutsches Museum, Munich, Germany  April 12 – Oliver Cromwell creates a union between England and Scotland, with Scottish representation in the Parliament of England.
3
Elizabeth Monck, Duchess of Albemarle (d. 1734)
John Backwell, English politician (d. 1708)  April 27 – Charles Blount (deist), English deist and philosopher (d. 1693)  April 30 – Robert Digby, 3rd Baron Digby, English peer and Member of Parliament (d. 1677)
Jean-Louis Guez de Balzac, French writer (b. 1594)  March 24 –
THE UNLUCKY 13th CENTURY: This Mongol died in 1227 after a fall from his horse
Genghis Khan
Genghis Khan, founder of the Mongol Empire (b. c. 1162)
2
March 19 –
Pope Gregory IX succeeds Pope Honorius III as the 178th pope.
"C" IN HISTORY: This grandfather of Charlemagne "hammered" Burgundy in 733
Charles Martel
His lands are being divided between his sons Hunald and Hatton who continue the conflict with Charles Martel, mayor of the palace of Neustria and Austrasia.
3
Duffy, p. 64; Mann, p. 207   Europe   Duke Eudes of Aquitaine, aged almost 80, abdicates and retires to a monastery.
David Nicolle (2008).
He is succeeded by Gregory who becomes ruler of Benevento.
OPERA: 1976 was also the bicentennial of this famed Milan opera house
Teatro alla Scala
This profound urban and artistic renewal included the establishment of Teatro alla Scala, inaugurated in 1778 and today one of the world's most famous opera houses, and the renovation of the Royal Palace.
3
In 452, the Huns overran the city.
In 1700 the Spanish line of Habsburgs was extinguished with the death of Charles II.
The seat of the regional government is Palazzo Lombardia that, standing at , is the second tallest building in Milan.
LITERARY PLACES: At the end of this novel, Yorkshire folks swear that the ghosts of Heathcliff & Cathy walk the moors
Wuthering Heights
Among the most celebrated novels written by the sisters are Anne Brontë's The Tenant of Wildfell Hall, Charlotte Brontë's Jane Eyre and Emily Brontë's Wuthering Heights.
3
Nidderdale and the Howardian Hills are designated Areas of Outstanding Natural Beauty.
Leeds' traditional industries were mixed; service-based industries, textile manufacturing and coal mining being examples.
James Herriot, the best selling author of over 60 million copies of books about his experiences of some 50 years as a veterinarian in Thirsk, North Yorkshire, the town which he refers to as Darrowby in his books (although born in Sunderland), has been admired for his easy reading style and interesting characters.
ATALANTA: This Greek goddess of the hunt took an interest in Atalanta, who grew up to be a great hunter
Artemis
She took an oath of virginity to the goddess Artemis.http://www.theoi.com/Heroine/Atalanta.htmlhttp://thanasis.com/store/atalanta.htm  Calydonian Boar Hunt  When Artemis was forgotten at a sacrifice by King Oineus, she was angered and sent the Calydonian Boar, a wild boar that ravaged the land, men, and cattle and prevented crops from being sown.
3
Either Greek original, 1st century BC or Roman copy, 2nd century AD Atalanta (;  Atalantē) is a character in Greek mythology, a virgin huntress, unwilling to marry, and loved by the hero Meleager.
Atalanta was the daughter of Iasus (or Mainalos or Schoeneus, according to Hyginus), a Boeotian (according to Hesiod), or an Arcadian princess (according to the Bibliotheca).
She was following Meleager, who had put away his young wife for Atalanta's sake.
EXPLORERS: The ancestors of the Texas longhorn were brought to the Americas in 1493 by this explorer
Columbus
Christopher Columbus was delayed by a storm in Azores  March 15 – Christopher Columbus and Martín Alonso Pinzón return to Palos de la Frontera the original port in Spain from where they started the first voyage of discovery.
3
Events   January–December   January 19 –
March 1 Martín Alonso Pinzón returns to city of Bayona in Spain from the  voyage of discovery, sending the first notice about the discovery to the Catholic Monarchs.
In the papal bull Inter caetera, Pope Alexander VI decrees that all lands discovered 100 leagues or further west of the Azores are Spanish.
THE BIBLE: In Acts 11 Barnabas brought this man to Antioch to assist his mission
Paul
11:22 by Barnabas and Paul during Paul's first missionary journey.
3
The city's geographical, military, and economic location benefited its occupants, particularly such features as the spice trade, the Silk Road, and the Persian Royal Road.
Christianity  Antioch was a chief center of early Christianity during Roman times.
In 1152 Baldwin III of Jerusalem came of age, but from 1150 he had proposed three different but respectable suitors for Constance's hand in marriage, all of whom she rejected.
"NEW" ENGLAND: A popular cookie shares part of its name with this city that was originally part of Cambridge, Massachusetts
Newton
The University of Cambridge used to have a seat in the House of Commons, Sir Isaac Newton being one of the most notable holders.
3
For example, 2000 firkins of butter were brought up the river every Monday from the agricultural lands to the North East, particularity Norfolk, to be unloaded in the town for road transportation to London.
The A10 connects the city to King's Lynn to the north via Ely, and to central London to the south.
Great St Mary's Church has the status of "University Church".
WHAT BROUGHT THAT ON?: In 1987 this anchor walked off, leaving CBS black for 6 minutes, because a tennis match cut into the news
Dan Rather
The book heavily criticized the media, and some CBS anchors and correspondents in particular (such as Dan Rather).
3
Goldmark also invented the 33-1/3 r.p.m.
John Charles Daly hosted the show from 1963 to 1966, succeeded by Bob Barker from 1967 to 1987 (at which point Barker, an animal rights activist who eventually convinced producers of The Price Is Right to cease offering fur coats as prizes on the program, quit in a dispute over their use), Alan Thicke in 1988, Dick Clark from 1989 to 1993, and Bob Goen from 1994 to 1996.
After the success of The Price Is Right, Silverman would establish a working relationship with Mark Goodson and Bill Todman in which most of their game shows would air on CBS, including a revival of Match Game.
THE PERFORMER: From 1960 to 2010 Don Hastings played Bob Hughes on this "global" CBS soap opera
As the World Turns
Other than Guiding Light, notable daytime soap operas that once aired on CBS include As the World Turns, Love of Life, Search for Tomorrow, The Secret Storm, The Edge of Night and Capitol.
3
By 1937, the network took in $28.7 million and had 114 affiliates, almost all of which cleared 100% of network-fed programming, thus keeping ratings, and revenue, high.
The Late Show with David Letterman is broadcast by Studio 23 and Maxx, which are both owned by ABS-CBN. 60 Minutes is currently broadcast on CNN Philippines (formerly Talktv, Solar News Channel and 9TV ) as a part of their Stories block, which includes documentaries and is broadcast on Wednesday at 8:00 p.m. before CNN Philippines Nightly News with replays in a capacity as a stand-alone program on Saturdays at 8:00 a.m. & 5:00 pm and Sundays at 6:00 a.m, all in local time (UTC + 8).
On Saturday mornings, Silverman commissioned Hanna-Barbera to produce the animated series Scooby-Doo, Where Are You?
ANCIENT EGYPT: (Sarah of the Clue Crew stands in the foreground of the Sphinx and Great Pyramid in Giza, Egypt.)  In a dream this falcon-headed son of Isis told Thutmose IV to clear the sand that buried the sphinx--and he'd be king
Horus
R.E Witt, Isis in the Ancient World, p. 7, 1997, ISBN 978-0-8018-5642-6 Isis is often depicted as the mother of Horus, the falcon-headed deity associated with king and kingship (although in some traditions Horus's mother was Hathor).
2
In fact, Egyptologists such as Maria MünsterMaria Münster: Untersuchungen zur Göttin Isis: vom Alten Reich bis zum Ende des Neuen Reiches.
The Dea Caelestis was identified with the constellation Virgo (the Virgin), who holds the divine balance of justice.
NOVEL OPERAS: Scotsman whose novel, "The Bride of Lammermoor" inspired "Lucia di Lammermoor"
Sir Walter Scott
Salvadore Cammarano wrote the Italian language libretto loosely based upon Sir Walter Scott's historical novel The Bride of Lammermoor.
3
Mackerras, p. 30
Early 18th centuryEnrico mentions the death of "William", assumedly William III who died in 1702 Place: ScotlandOsborne, p. 240
Accessed 6 February 2009.
HISTORIC GREETING CARDS: Author of the 1541 anniversary card:Catherine,I can't believe it's been a year. Wishing us many more happy months together...
Henry VIII
By the Crown of Ireland Act, the Parliament of Ireland declares King Henry VIII of England and his heirs to be Kings of Ireland, replacing the Lordship of Ireland with the Kingdom of Ireland.
3
Gerardus Mercator makes his first globe.
John Calvin translates his Institutio Christianae religionis into French as L'Institution chrétienne.
September 17 – Roberto de' Nobili, Italian cardinal (d. 1559)  September 21 – Anna of Nassau-Dillenburg, Countess consort of Nassau-Weilburg (d. 1616)  November 9 – Menso Alting, Preacher and reformer (d. 1612)  November 25 – Michele Bonelli, Catholic cardinal (d. 1598)  December 12 –
FOOD & DRINK HISTORY: The world's first pure food & beverage law, one pertaining to beer, was proclaimed by the Duke of this region in 1516
Bavaria
The Reinheitsgebot is instituted in Ingolstadt, Bavaria, regulating the purity of beer permissible for sale.
3
July–December   July –
October 27 – Ruy Gómez de Silva, Portuguese noble (d. 1573)
King Ferdinand II of Aragon (b. 1452)  March 13 – King Ladislaus II of Bohemia and Hungary (b. 1456)  March 17 – Giuliano di Lorenzo de' Medici, ruler of Florence (b. 1449)  April 25 – John Yonge, English diplomat (b. 1467)  June 14 –
LEAVE BRITTANY ALONE!: In the 9th century Nomenoë, Brittany's national hero, drove out this "Bald" Frankish king's forces
Charles
His son Erispoe secured the independence of the new kingdom of Brittany and won the Battle of Jengland against Charles the Bald.
3
The highest hill in Brittany is the Roc'h Ruz in the Monts d'Arrée, at .
Before them, Brittany had also been visited by Academic and Romantic painters like Jean Antoine Théodore de Gudin and Jules Achille Noël who were looking for dramatic seascapes and storms.
Since the 1920s, the flag has become very popular and it is flown from a large number of institutions.
CONTEMPORARY AUTHORS: Among the items that have been sold on her website are a Coven party fan & Lestat cologne & wine
Anne Rice
In novels such as The Vampire Chronicles by Anne Rice and the Twilight series by Stephenie Meyer, covens are families or unrelated groups of vampires who live together.
3
References  Margot Adler (2006) Drawing Down the Moon (book).
Penguin Books.
San Francisco: Harper.
THE MUSEUMS OF EUROPE: The Museo Internazionale delle Marionette in Palermo on this Italian island is the world's top puppet museum
Sicily
Palermo (, Sicilian: Palermu, , from , Panormos, , Balarm; Phoenician: זִיז, Ziz) is a city in Insular Italy, the capital of both the autonomous region of Sicily and the Province of Palermo.
2
This famous general entered Palermo with his troops (the “Thousands”) on May 27, 1860.
The Zisa houses the Islamic museum.
SCIENCE: The length of this on Jupiter is less than 10 hours
the day
It is visible to the naked eye in the night sky and can occasionally be seen in the daytime when the Sun is low.
3
The Great Red Spot is roughly the same size as the Earth.
It is known to have been in existence since at least 1831, and possibly since 1665.Philosophical Transactions Vol.
So far the only spacecraft to orbit Jupiter is the Galileo orbiter, which went into orbit around Jupiter on December 7, 1995.
JUMPING JUPITER!: Appropriately, a NASA probe that orbited Jupiter for more than 8 years was named for this astronomer
Galileo
Jupiter has at least 67 moons, including the four large Galilean moons discovered by Galileo Galilei in 1610.
3
The presence of a core during at least part of Jupiter's history is suggested by models of planetary formation that require the formation of a rocky or icy core massive enough to collect its bulk of hydrogen and helium from the protosolar nebula.
The next planned mission to the Jovian system will be the European Space Agency's Jupiter Icy Moon Explorer (JUICE), due to launch in 2022, followed by NASA's Europa Clipper mission in 2025.
Possibility of life   In 1953, the Miller–Urey experiment demonstrated that a combination of lightning and the chemical compounds that existed in the atmosphere of a primordial Earth could form organic compounds (including amino acids) that could serve as the building blocks of life.
I WAS HIS VEEP: Spiro Agnew
Richard Nixon
Spiro Theodore Agnew (; November 9, 1918 – September 17, 1996) was an American politician who served as the 39th Vice President of the United States from 1969 to 1973, under President Richard Nixon.
3
Agnew was the second Vice President in United States history to resign, the other being John C. Calhoun, and the only one to do so because of criminal charges.
He studied chemistry at Hopkins for three years.
Agnew went from his first election as County Executive to Vice President in six years—one of the fastest rises in US political history, comparable with that of Nixon, who became Vice President after four years in the House of Representatives and two years in the Senate.
THEY'RE IN CHARGE: President Jacques Chirac
France
Jacques René Chirac (; ; born 29 November 1932) is a French politician, who served as the President of France from 1995 to 2007.
3
12 July 2004 Chirac is the grandfather of Martin Rey-Chirac by the relationship of Claude with French judoka Thierry Rey.
When Valéry Giscard d'Estaing became president, he nominated Chirac as prime minister on 27 May 1974, in order to reconcile the "Giscardian" and "non-Giscardian" factions of the parliamentary majority.
The Osirak deal was then used by parts of the American media to criticise the Chirac-led opposition to starting a war in Iraq,Joshua Glenn, Rebuilding Iraq, Boston Globe, 2 March 2003 despite French involvement in the Gulf War.
EASY HISTORY: As of 1206 he formally wore the title "Great Khan of the Mongols"
Genghis Khan
Events  By area  Asia  Temüjin is proclaimed Genghis Khan of the Mongol people, founding the Mongol Empire.
3
By topic  Arts and culture  Sugar, an import from the Muslim world, is mentioned for the first time in a royal English account.
Almonds, cinnamon, ginger, and nutmeg are also imported for royal banquets.
This year, Dominic de Guzmán claims to have received the Holy Rosary from the Virgin Mary.
KHAAAAAAAAAN!: Born around 1162, Temujin, or "Ironworker", must have decided this name would look better for him on Mongol billboards
Genghis Khan
Genghis Khan,  Great Khan and founder of the Mongol Empire (d. 1227)   Deaths   February 10 – King Baldwin III of Jerusalem (b. 1130)  June 27 – Eudes II, Duke of Burgundy (b. 1118)  July 7 – King Haakon II of Norway  August 6 – Ramon Berenguer IV, Count of Barcelona (b. c. 1113)  Iziaslav III of Kiev  Ibn Zuhr, Arab physician (b. 1090)   References
2
Picard C. (1997)
Europe   June 3 – Thomas Becket is consecrated as Archbishop of Canterbury.
MR. OR MS. MAYOR: 6-term mayor Richard J. Daley begat Richard M. Daley of this city
Chicago
Richard Joseph Daley (May 15, 1902 – December 20, 1976) was an American politician who was the Mayor of Chicago for 21 years (1955–1976) and chairman of the Cook County Democratic Central Committee for 23 years, holding both positions until his death in office in 1976.
2
Ribicoff, with his voice shaking, then said:  "How hard it is to speak the truth, when we know the problems that are facing this nation", for which some in the crowd booed Ribicoff.
Daley defended his police force with the following statement, which was also a slip of the tongue: "The confrontation was not caused by the police.
A STACK OF KNOWLEDGE: Carl Sandburg called this city not only the "hog butcher for the world" but also "stacker of wheat"
Chicago
During his lifetime, Sandburg was widely regarded as "a major figure in contemporary literature", especially for volumes of his collected verse, including Chicago Poems (1916), Cornhuskers (1918), and Smoke and Steel (1920).
3
Lilian's brother was the photographer Edward Steichen.
Carl Sandburg College is located in Sandburg's birthplace of Galesburg, Illinois.
Carl Sandburg attended the dedication of the school.
INGRID BERGMAN: In 1982 Ingrid won a posthumous Emmy Award for playing this Middle East leader
Golda Meir
She was offered the starring role in a television mini-series, A Woman Called Golda (1982), about the late Israeli prime minister Golda Meir.
3
Chandler adds, "Ingrid felt guilty all the rest of her life because when she was in Germany at the end of the war, she had been afraid to go with the others to witness the atrocities of the Nazi extermination camps."
She ran the gamut of emotions.
Awards Bergman won three Academy Awards for acting, two for Best Actress and one for Best Supporting Actress.
THE JUNG & THE RESTLESS: The son of a Protestant clergyman, Carl Jung was born in this mountainous country in 1875
Switzerland
Marriage In 1903, Jung married Emma Rauschenbach, who was a daughter of a wealthy family in Switzerland.
3
Thought
Carl Gustav Jung, Two Essays on Analytical Psychology.
He argued that the alchemical process was the transformation of the impure soul (lead) to perfected soul (gold), and a metaphor for the individuation process.
"WILD" ABOUT ENTERTAINMENT: Clark Gable starred in the 1935 big screen version of this Jack London adventure tale
Call of the Wild
Personal Life/Family  Clark Gable had a daughter, Judy, with the actress Loretta Young while filming The Call of the Wild (1935) in November 1935.
3
Gable was a tall, shy child with a loud voice.
Gable was wary of potentially disappointing an audience that had decided that no one else could play the part.
Loretta promptly threw up and confirmed that she was her biological mother and Gable was her father.
AFRICAN CITIES: This capital city's Grand Palace was once home to Haile Selassie
Addis Ababa
King and emperor  In 1928, the authority of Ras Tafari Makonnen was challenged when Dejazmatch Balcha Safo went to Addis Ababa with a sizeable armed force.
3
During this period, Haile Selassie suffered several personal tragedies.
In 1948, the Ogaden, a region disputed with Somalia, was granted to Ethiopia.
ISBN 0-435-98650-3 particularly via the two Time magazine articles on the coronation the week before and the week after the event.
FIVE WEDDINGS & A FUNERAL: Dustin Hoffman learns about plastics & then busts up a wedding in this classic 1967 film
The Graduate
This was soon followed by his breakthrough 1967 film role as Benjamin Braddock, the title character, in The Graduate.
3
Hoffman was named after stage and silent screen actor Dustin Farnum.
Now an aspiring actor, he spent the next ten years doing odd jobs, being unemployed, and struggling to get any available acting roles.
Jacob Edward (born March 20, 1981), Rebecca Lillian (b. March 17, 1983), Maxwell Geoffrey (born August 30, 1984), and Alexandra Lydia (born October 27, 1987).
"C" PLUS: We're betting 2-1 you know Chiron was this type of mythological creature
a centaur
Although a centaur, Chiron's physical appearance often differs somewhat from other centaurs, demonstrating his status and heritage.
3
Peleus - Peleus, father of Achilles, was once rescued by Chiron:
The middle one (eyes fixed upon his chest) is Chiron the Great.
John Updike's novel The Centaur is an expansion and interpretation of the story of Chiron, set in the context of 20th-century small-town America.
MYTHING IN ACTION: This man who taught music to Hercules shares his name with a character in "Peanuts"
Linus
Most of the other characters that eventually became the main characters of Peanuts did not appear until later: Violet (February 1951), Schroeder (May 1951), Lucy (March 1952), Linus (September 1952), Pig-Pen (July 1954), Sally (August 1959), Frieda (March 1961), "Peppermint" Patty (August 1966), Woodstock (introduced April 1967; given a name in June 1970), Franklin (July 1968), Marcie (July 1971), and Rerun (March 1973).
3
Despite the widespread acclaim generated by Peanuts as a whole, some critics have alleged a decline in the strip's quality in the later years of its run, as Schulz frequently digressed from the more cerebral socio-psychological themes that characterized his earlier work in favor of lighter, more whimsical fare.
Schulz, Mendelson and Meléndez also collaborated on four theatrical feature films starring the characters, the first of which was A Boy
The game was created by Justin Gage, a prolific collector and friend of Charles and Jeannie Schulz.
TELEVISION: Elizabeth Taylor voiced the first word spoken by this young Simpson: "Daddy"
Maggie
left|thumb|Promotional poster for Cat on a Hot Tin Roof (1958) Taylor considered her next performance as Maggie the Cat in the Tennessee Williams adaptation Cat on a Hot Tin Roof (1958) a career "high point", although it coincided with one of the most difficult periods in her personal life.
3
The supercouple continued starring together in films in the mid-1960s, earning a combined $88 million over the next decade; Burton stated that "they say we generate more business activity than one of the smaller African nations".
The former was based on a Tennessee Williams play, and featured her as an aging, serial-marrying millionaire and Burton as a younger man who turns up on the Mediterranean island on which she has retired.
Her make-up look in Cleopatra (1963) started a trend for "cat-eye" make-up done with black eyeliner.
HISTORIC COUPLES: In his will, this playwright left his second-best bed to his wife; maybe the best one went to Gwyneth Paltrow
William Shakespeare
thumb|150px|Paltrow at the 2000 Toronto International Film Festival   In 1998, Paltrow starred in Shakespeare in Love, portraying the fictional lover of William Shakespeare, played by Joseph Fiennes.
3
She Sings.
She was quoted as saying "I'm a Jay-Z fan.
18 23 20 10 22 "Do You Wanna Touch Me (Oh Yeah)" (with Glee Cast) 2011 57 — 63 — 95 Glee: The Music, Volume 5 "Kiss" (with Glee Cast) 83 98 80 — — "Landslide" (with Glee Cast) 23 38 35 36 52 "Turning Tables" (with Glee Cast) 66 — 66 — 75 Glee: The Music, Volume 6 "Happy" (with Glee Cast) 2014 — — — — — Glee: The Music, Celebrating 100 Episodes "Party All the Time" (with Glee Cast) — — — — — "—" denotes releases that did not chart.
A LITTLE CRAZY: As John Doe, Kevin Spacey gets a head of Gwyneth Paltrow in this 1995 film
Se7en
In 1995, she played Brad Pitt's wife in the hit thriller Se7en.
3
She also won an Emmy Award for Outstanding Guest Actress in a Comedy Series in 2011 for her role as Holly Holliday on the Fox hit TV show Glee in the episode "The Substitute".
Iron Man was Paltrow's highest-grossing film to date, earning more than $585,000,000 worldwide, until she reprised her role as Potts in Joss Whedon's 2012 epic, The Avengers, which grossed more than $1 billion worldwide.
Personal life
VICE PRESIDENTS: 2 Minnesotans have served as vice president: Hubert Humphrey & this man, Jimmy Carter's veep
Walter Mondale
Declaring his candidacy in a speech in Washington, D.C. alongside Senators Fred Harris of Oklahoma and Walter Mondale of Minnesota (who both served as the co-chairs to his campaign), Humphrey stated:  Here we are, just as we ought to be, here we are, the people, here we are the spirit of dedication, here we are the way politics ought to be in America, the politics of happiness, politics of purpose, politics of joy; and that's the way it's going to be, all the way, too, from here on out.
3
A watered-down version called the Full Employment and Balanced Growth Act passed the House and Senate in 1978.
Honors  On July 14, 1951, Humphrey and actor Richard Carlson were the guests on the CBS variety show, Faye Emerson's Wonderful Town, in which hostess Faye Emerson visited Minneapolis to accent the kinds of music popular in the city.
The Hubert H. Humphrey Comprehensive Health Center of the Los Angeles County Department of Health Services in Los Angeles, California.
SCULPTURE: His suspended abstract sculptures were given the name "mobiles" by Marcel Duchamp
Alexander Calder
Later, in Alexander Calder's studio in 1931, while looking at the sculptor's kinetic works, Duchamp suggested that these should be called "mobiles".
3
(Notably, "échec" is French for "failure".)
Outside of these relations there is no knowable reality",Poincaré wrote in 1902.Poincaré, H. (1902) Science and Hypothesis.
An explanation about the Roue de bicyclette by Duchamp (website) Dossier : Marcel Duchamp, Centre Pompidou   Philadelphia Museum of Art Portrait of Chess Players (Portrait de joueurs d'échecs) (1911).
WRITERS' PEN NAMES: O. Henry
William Sydney Porter
William Sydney Porter (September 11, 1862 – June 5, 1910), known by his pen name O. Henry, was an American short story writer.
3
A federal indictment followed and he was arrested on charges of embezzlement.
Once again, Porter's father-in-law posted bail so that he could stay with Athol and Margaret.
In later film and TV depictions, the Kid would be portrayed as a dashing adventurer, perhaps skirting the edges of the law, but primarily on the side of the angels.
THE MOVIES: John Malkovich forces Secret Service agent Clint Eastwood back on presidential detail in this 1993 film
In the Line of Fire
Other popular films include the Western Hang 'Em High (1968), the psychological thriller Play Misty for Me (1971), the crime film Thunderbolt and Lightfoot (1974), the Western The Outlaw Josey Wales (1976), the prison film Escape from Alcatraz (1979), the action film Firefox (1982), the suspense thriller Tightrope (1984), the Western Pale Rider (1985), the war film Heartbreak Ridge (1986), the action thriller In the Line of Fire (1993), the romantic drama The Bridges of Madison County (1995), and the drama Gran Torino (2008).
3
Early life  Clinton Eastwood, Jr. was born in San Francisco, the son of Clinton Eastwood Sr.
After signing, Eastwood was criticized for his stiff manner, his squint, and for hissing his lines through his teeth, a feature that would become a lifelong trademark.
Schickel, p. 378
FILM ROLES IN COMMON: Laurence Olivier reigned as this warrior king in 1945; Kenneth Branagh took the throne in 1989
Henry V
Among Olivier's films are Wuthering Heights (1939), Rebecca (1940), and a trilogy of Shakespeare films as actor-director: Henry V (1944), Hamlet (1948), and Richard III (1955).
3
Early acting career (1924–29)  In 1924 Gerard Olivier, a habitually frugal man, told his son that not only must he gain admission to the Central School of Speech Training and Dramatic Art, but he must also gain a scholarship with a bursary to cover his tuition fees and living expenses.
thumb|upright|alt=young woman, dark-haired, in left profile|Peggy Ashcroft, a contemporary and friend of Olivier's at the Central School of Speech Training and Dramatic Art, photographed in 1936 One of Olivier's contemporaries at the school was Peggy Ashcroft, who observed he was "rather uncouth in that his sleeves were too short and his hair stood on end but he was intensely lively and great fun".
After the London season the company played both the double bills and Uncle Vanya in a six-week run on Broadway.
FLORAL QUOTES: British poet Philip Larkin once said, "Deprivation is for me what" these flowers "were for Wordsworth"
Daffodils
Eric Homberger (echoing Randall Jarrell) called him "the saddest heart in the post-war supermarket"—Larkin himself said that deprivation for him was what daffodils were for Wordsworth.
3
A similar argument was made by Richard Bradford in his biography on Larkin from 2005.Bradford 2005, pp.
The play was published by Larkin's usual publishers, Faber and Faber.
Philip Larkin Society
AUTHORS & THEIR WORKS: "The Cinnamon Peeler" is a book of poems by this Ceylon-born author of "The English Patient"
Michael Ondaatje
The English Patient is a 1992 Booker Prize-winning novel by Michael Ondaatje.
3
The four main characters are: an unrecognisably burned man—the titular patient, presumed to be English; his Canadian Army nurse, a Sikh British Army sapper, and a Canadian thief.
The story is told out of sequence, moving back and forth between the severely burned "English" patient's memories from before his accident and current events at the bomb-damaged Villa San Girolamo, an Italian monastery, where he is being cared for by  Hana, a troubled young Canadian Army nurse.
David Caravaggio David Caravaggio is a Canadian thief whose profession is legitimized by the war, as the Allies needed crafty people to steal Axis documents.
FORD & CHEVY: In 1992 Chevy Chase was on the run in "Memoirs of an Invisible Man"; in 1993 Harrison Ford fled in this film
The Fugitive
Ford also reprised his role as Solo in Star Wars: The Force Awakens (2015)  His career has spanned six decades and includes roles in several Hollywood blockbusters; including the epic war film Apocalypse Now (1979), the legal drama Presumed Innocent (1990), the action film The Fugitive (1993), the political action thriller Air Force One (1997) and the psychological thriller What Lies Beneath (2000).
3
Ford also played straight dramatic roles, including an adulterous husband in both Presumed Innocent (1990) and What Lies Beneath (2000), and a recovering amnesiac in Mike Nichols' Regarding Henry (1991).
He was taken to Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he was reported to be in fair to moderate condition.
Archaeology Following on his success portraying the archaeologist Indiana Jones, Ford also plays a part in supporting the work of professional archaeologists.
MOVIE NUMBER, PLEASE: Harrison Ford in "Force ___ from Navarone"
Ten
He attended Ripon College in Wisconsin, where he was a member of the Sigma Nu fraternity.
3
Ford managed to secure other roles in movies, such as A Time for Killing (The Long Ride Home), starring Glenn Ford, George Hamilton, and Inger Stevens.
Ankle injury
Doctors suspected that his ankle might have been broken and he might have received a pelvic injury.
MEL GIBSON: Mel made his directorial debut in this 1993 film in which he played a scarred teacher who mentors a 12-year-old boy
The Man Without a Face
He expanded beyond acting into directing and producing, with: The Man Without a Face, in 1993; Braveheart, in 1995; The Passion of the Christ, in 2004; and Apocalypto, in 2006.
3
Not the sort of actor you'd think would make an ideal Hamlet, but he had enormous integrity and intelligence."Garry O'Connor (2002), Paul Scofield: An Actor for All Seasons, Aplause Books.
In April 2012, Eszterhas wrote a letter to Gibson accusing him of sabotaging their movie about the Maccabees because he "hates Jews", and citing a series of private incidents during which he allegedly heard Gibson express extremely racist views.
After Gibson's introduction, Downey did not discuss himself but instead explained he had chosen Gibson since he had helped Downey through his hardships.
GODS & GODDESSES: He became the supreme Roman deity after he overthrew his father, Saturn
Jupiter
Saturn is the sixth planet from the Sun and the second-largest in the Solar System, after Jupiter.
2
Astronomers use three different systems for specifying the rotation rate of Saturn.
Huygens discovered Saturn's moon Titan; Giovanni Domenico Cassini later discovered four other moons: Iapetus, Rhea, Tethys and Dione.
THE PLANET URANUS: He discovered Uranus as well as 2 of its moons
William Herschel
Sir William Herschel announced its discovery on March 13, 1781, expanding the known boundaries of the Solar System for the first time in history.
3
Finnish-Swedish astronomer Anders Johan Lexell, working in Russia, was the first to compute the orbit of the new object and its nearly circular orbit led him to a conclusion that it was a planet rather than a comet.
There may be a layer of ionic water where the water molecules break down into a soup of hydrogen and oxygen ions, and deeper down superionic water in which the oxygen crystallises but the hydrogen ions move freely within the oxygen lattice.
A similar periodic variation, with maxima at the solstices, has been noted in microwave measurements of the deep troposphere begun in the 1960s.
MOVIE WAITRESSES: In this film Helen Hunt as waitress Carol Connelly makes Jack Nicholson "want to be a better man"
As Good as it Gets
About You for seven years, and played single mother Carol Connelly in the 1997 romantic comedy film As Good as It Gets, for which she won the Academy Award for Best Actress.
3
She appeared as a marijuana-smoking classmate on an episode of The Facts of Life.
In 2000, Hunt starred in four films: Dr. T & the Women, with Richard Gere; Pay It Forward, with Kevin Spacey and Haley Joel Osment; What Women Want, with Mel Gibson; and Cast Away, with Tom Hanks.
Drama/Romance  Cast Away   Blockbuster Entertainment Award for Favorite Supporting Actress –
CELLULOID LOVE: In this film, Helen Hunt tells Jack Nicholson, "I thought you were handsome... then, of course, you spoke"
As Good as It Gets
About You for seven years, and played single mother Carol Connelly in the 1997 romantic comedy film As Good as It Gets, for which she won the Academy Award for Best Actress.
3
She appeared as a marijuana-smoking classmate on an episode of The Facts of Life.
She also starred in the 1985 film Girls Just Wanna Have Fun, with Sarah Jessica Parker and Shannen Doherty.
In 2006, Hunt appeared in the ensemble cast film Bobby alongside Demi Moore, Anthony Hopkins, Sharon Stone and William H. Macy.
FILMS OF THE '90s: Many of the scenes in this Brad Pitt film were shot at the Stoney Indian Reserve near Calgary, Canada
Legends of the Fall
His first leading roles in big-budget productions came with the dramas A River Runs Through It (1992) and Legends of the Fall (1994), and Interview with the Vampire (1994).
3
The following year he had a role in the legal drama Sleepers (1996), based on Lorenzo Carcaterra's novel of the same name.
Pitt met Friends actress Jennifer Aniston in 1998 and married her in a private wedding ceremony in Malibu on July 29, 2000.
The magazine credited Pitt with using "his star power to get people to look [to where] cameras don't usually catch".
STATES' LOWEST POINTS: 479 feet above sea level on the Colorado River in Clark County just south of Laughlin
Nevada
Clark County, Arkansas  Clark County, Idaho  Clark County, Illinois  Clark County, Indiana  Clark County, Kansas  Clark County, Kentucky  Clark County, Missouri  Clark County, Nevada, the most populous county bearing the name Clark, containing Las Vegas  Clark County, Ohio  Clark County, South Dakota  Clark County, Washington  Clark County, Wisconsin  See also  Clarke County (disambiguation)  Lewis and Clark County, Montana
2
Clark County is the name of twelve counties in the United States.
Most, though not all, are named after two brothers: military hero George Rogers Clark in the Midwest, and explorer William Clark in the West.
FINANCE WITH DAVID FABER: (David Faber gives the clue from the set of The Faber Report.)  In May 2007 I broke the news that an unsolicited $60 a share offer for Dow Jones was made by News Corp., controlled by this man
Rupert Murdoch
BBC News - Dow Jones family to consider sale - 1 June 2007   Buyout offer  On May 1, 2007, Dow Jones released a statement confirming that News Corporation, led by Rupert Murdoch, had made an unsolicited offer of $60 per share, or $5 billion, for Dow Jones.
3
Times Online - Dow Jones board agrees News Corp's $5bn offer; July 18, 2007
Products  Consumer media Its flagship publication, The Wall Street Journal, is a daily newspaper in print and online covering business, financial national and international news and issues around the globe.
thumb|Logo of the Dow Jones Newswires  Ventures In 2009 Dow Jones Ventures launched FINS.com, a standalone resource for financial professionals with information about finance careers and the finance industry.
AMUSEMENTS: Nathan's Famous began as a nickel hot dog stand in 1916 in this Brooklyn amusement park
Coney Island
Racetracks, amusement parks and beach resorts opened in Brighton Beach, Coney Island and elsewhere in the southern part of the county.
3
The British set up a system of notorious prison ships off the coast of Brooklyn in Wallabout Bay, where more American patriots died of intentional neglect than died in combat on all the battlefields of the American Revolutionary War, combined.
Demographics  thumb|250px|Brooklyn has been New York City's most populous borough since the mid-1920s.
There are 58 library branches, placing one within a half mile of each Brooklyn resident.
THE BROOKLYN BRIDGE: (Cheryl of the Clue Crew reports from the Brooklyn Bridge in New York.)  When completed over this river in 1883, the Brooklyn Bridge was the largest suspension bridge in the world
the East River
The settlement began in the 17th century as the small Dutch-founded town of "Breuckelen" on the East River shore of Long Island, grew to be a sizable city in the 19th century, and was consolidated in 1898 with New York City (then confined to Manhattan and part of the Bronx), the remaining rural areas of Kings County, and the largely rural areas of Queens and Staten Island, to form the modern City of New York.
3
Borough of Brooklyn.blue and gold.
(Key: Each borough's historical population in millions.
Pacific Islanders comprised just 0.1% of the population, and Multiracial Americans made up 1.4% of the population.
SUMMER: 1935 folk opera that featured the song "Summertime"
Porgy and Bess
, an EP by The Drums, 2005  Summertime, by Herb Alpert & the Tijuana Brass, 1971  Summertime, by Joe Locke and Geoffrey Keezer, 2005  Summertime, an EP by The Subways  Songs  "Summertime" (song), a 1935 popular song by George Gershwin from the opera Porgy and Bess  "Summertime" (DJ Jazzy Jeff & The Fresh Prince song), 1991   "Doin' Time", by Sublime, a loose cover version of the Gershwin song, and frequently referred to as "Summertime", 1997  "Summertime" (Beyoncé Knowles song), 2003  "Summertime" (Kenny Chesney song), 2006  "Summertime" (Bon Jovi song), 2007  "Summertime" (Brian Melo song), 2008   "Summertime" (The Maybes? song), 2008  "Summertime" (New Kids on the Block song), 2008  "Summertime" (Wiley song), 2008   "Summertime" (Selah Sue song), 2011  "Summertime" (Bridgit Mendler song), from the soundtrack of the film Arietty, 2012   "Summertime", by Aaron Carter from Another Earthquake  "Summertime", by Another Level from Nexus  "Summertime", by Barenaked Ladies from All in Good Time  "Summertime", by The Click Five from Modern Minds and Pastimes  "Summertime", by Cody Simpson, a B-side of the single iYiYi  "Summertime", written by Leonhard Cohen and Sharon Robinson, recorded by Diana Ross from Red Hot Rhythm & Blues  "Summertime", by Kreayshawn from Somethin' 'Bout Kreay  "Summertime", a song by Mos Def  "Summertime", by My Chemical Romance from Danger Days: The True Lives of the Fabulous Killjoys  "Summer Time", by The Pretty Things from the reissue of Parachute  "Summertime", by Vince Staples from Summertime '06, 2015  "Summertime", by Sam Adams  "Summertime", by The Sundays from Static & Silence  "Summertime", by Stromae from Racine Carrée  Summer Breeze (song) by Seals and Crofts  Television  Summertime (TV programme), a short drama from 1995  Summertime '57/'58, a 1950s Canadian variety television series  Summertime, a 1934 cartoon by Ub Iwerks, featured in a 1986 episode of Pee-wee's Playhouse  See also  "Emit Remmus", a song by Red Hot Chili Peppers from Californication  In the Summertime (disambiguation)  "Sommartider" ("Summertimes"), a song by Per Gessle  Summer (disambiguation)  Summer Hours (L'Heure d'été), a French film starring Juliette Binoche  "Summertime Summertime", a song by Corina  "Summertime, Summertime", a song by The Jamies
2
Summertime may refer to:  Seasons and time of day  Summer, one of the temperate seasons  Daylight saving time (in American English; summer time, in British English), advancing the clock one hour during summer  British Summer Time, the civil time during the summer months in the UK during which the clocks are advanced one hour  Art, entertainment, and media Film   Summertime (1955 film), an American/British film starring Katharine Hepburn  Summertime (2001 film), a South Korean film starring Choi Cheol-ho  Summertime (2015 film), a French drama film  Summer Times, a 2009 Taiwanese film starring Bryant Chang and Shara Lin  Literature  Summertime (novel), a 2009 novel by J. M. Coetzee  Summertime, a 1937 play by Ugo Betti  Summertime, a 2000 play by Charles L. Mee  Music Albums  Summertime
(Paul Desmond album), 1969  Summertime (MFSB album), 1976  Summertime!
POTPOURRI: This computer maker's NASDAQ symbol is AAPL, not MAC
Apple
Paul area  Military Airlift Command, the predecessor of the Air Mobility Command of the United States Air Force  Biology  Membrane attack complex, one of the immune system functions using complement  Minimum alveolar concentration, a concept used to compare the strengths of anaesthetic vapours  Mitochondrial apoptosis-induced channel, the cytochrome c release pore of apoptotic mitochondria  Mycobacterium avium complex, a group of environmental pathogens  Business and economics  MAC Cosmetics, cosmetics brand, stylized as M•A•C  Manufacture d'armes de Châtellerault, French state arms manufacture  Marginal Abatement Cost, a concept in environmental economics  Material adverse change  Maximaal Aanvaarde Concentratie (Maximum Accepted Concentration), application of  threshold limit value in the Netherlands  Morgan Advanced Ceramics, a ceramic manufacturing company  MAC or Money Access Card, a regional name for an ATM card  Computing  .mac, a file extension for macros in Agilent ChemStation  .Mac, a former name of MobileMe  MAC address, Media Access Control address or Ethernet Hardware Address (EHA)  Mac OS, an operating system of Apple's Macintosh  MAC times, file system metadata which record times of events associated with a computer file  Mac, shortened from Macintosh, computers and computer operating systems made by Apple Inc.  Mandatory access control, a type of access control in computer security  Maximum activate count, a parameter associated with the LPDDR4 memory's TRR feature that mitigates row hammer effect  Media Access Control, sublayer of Data Link layer  Message authentication code, used to authenticate a message in cryptography  Migration Authorisation Code, a unique code used when switching between DSL Internet service providers in the UK  Multiply–accumulate operation or multiplier–accumulator  Fictional characters  Captain Mac, a character in Final Fantasy Mystic Quest  Mac, a character in the television series Foster's Home for Imaginary Friends  Mac, a character from Apple's "Get A Mac" ad campaign, representing a Macintosh computer  Mac, one of the two Goofy Gophers  Mac (Green Wing), a character from the sitcom Green Wing  Mac (It's Always Sunny in Philadelphia), a character on the FX television sitcom It's Always Sunny in Philadelphia  Mac, the alien from the film Mac and Me  Little Mac, a character in the Punch-Out!!
3
Mac or MAC may refer to:  Aviation  Martin's Air Charter, now Martinair  Mean Aerodynamic Chord  Merchant aircraft carrier, used during World War II by Britain and the Netherlands  Metropolitan Airports Commission, the operator of airports in the Minneapolis-St.
Sarah MacKenzie, a character from the TV series JAG  Nickname of Randle McMurphy, a character in One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest  Mac, a character from Clifford the Big Red Dog  Mac Duff, a character from Tiny Toon Adventures  Mac, the second DC Comics G.I. Robot  Mac, a character from Peg + Cat  Museums  Archaeology Museum of Catalonia (Museu d'Arqueologia de Catalunya), an archaeology museum in Catalonia  Niterói Contemporary Art Museum (Museu de Arte Contemporânea de Niterói), a museum in Niterói, Brazil  Non-profit organizations  mac (Birmingham), formerly known as the Midlands Arts Centre, in Birmingham, UK  Marine Aquarium Council  Malaysian AIDS Council  Myanmar Accountancy Council  People  "Mac", nom de plume of Stanley McMurtry, British cartoonist  Mac (rapper), American rapper formerly signed to No Limit Records  Mac, member and musician of So Solid Crew  Mac (nickname)  Mạc (surname), a Vietnamese surname  Alison Mac, British actress  Bernie Mac, a comedian from the United States of America  Mac Dre, rapper from Vallejo, California  Mac King, an American comedy magician  Mac Mall, rapper from Vallejo, California  "Uncle Mac", Derek McCulloch, British radio broadcaster  Ian McCulloch (singer), commonly referred to as "Mac the Mouth", or just "Mac"  Politics  Mainland Affairs Council, an agency under the Executive Yuan of the Republic of China  Military Affairs Commission in PRC: see Central Military Commission (People's Republic of China)  Mouvement Autonome Casamançais (Casamancian Autonomous Movement), a defunct political party in Casamance, Senegal  Mouvement d'Action Civique, a defunct Belgian far right group  Mudiad Amddiffyn Cymru, a Welsh organization responsible for a number of bombing incidents  Municipal Assistance Corporation, created by the State of New York in 1975 to deal with New York City's fiscal crisis  Muslims Against Crusades, a UK-based Islamic group noted for burning poppies during the Remembrance Day silence in 2010  Sports  MAC Award, another name for the Hermann Trophy, the highest award in American college soccer  Macomb Area Conference, a Michigan high school football conference  Maranhão Atlético Clube, a Brazilian association football club  Marília Atlético Clube, a Brazilian association football club  Mayflower Athletic Conference, a high school athletic conference in Massachusetts  Mid-American Conference, an NCAA Division I (Football Bowl Subdivision) sports conference  Mid-Atlantic Athletic Conference, a Washington, D.C., area high school athletic league  Mid-Atlantic Rifle Conference, an NCAA rifle-only conference  Middle Atlantic Conferences, an NCAA Division III sports conference  Mississippi Athletic Conference, a high school sports conference in the Iowa Quad Cities  Mountain Athletic Conference (NCHSAA), a North Carolina high school athletic conference  Mountain Athletic Conference (PIAA), a Pennsylvania high school athletic conference  Midwest Athletic Conference, an Ohio high school athletic conference in west-central Ohio  Technology  Mission assurance category, a US Department of Defense designation  Multiplexed Analogue Components  Other uses  Mac, Gaelic for "son", a prefix to family names often appearing in Irish and Scottish names  MAC, Amtrak station code of Macomb (Amtrak station), Illinois, United States  Mac, a Beanie Baby cardinal produced by Ty, Inc. in 1999  MAC Awards, presented annually to honor achievements in cabaret, comedy and jazz  Mac (film), 1992 directed by and starring John Turturro  Mac (novel), by John MacLean  Mac, informal name of McMaster University in Canada  Mac-10 (Military Armament Corporation Model 10, officially the M10), a highly compact, blowback operated machine pistol  Mac-11 (Military Armament Corporation Model 11), a sub-compact version of the Model 10 machine pistol  The Macdonald Campus of McGill University, Canada  Mackintosh, a raincoat made of rubberized cloth  Manhattan Association of Cabarets & Clubs  Michigan Agricultural College, the former name of Michigan State University  Missouri Athletic Club,  a traditional gentlemen's club and athletic club in Downtown St. Louis, Missouri  Modern Army Combatives, hand-to-hand combat training  Monitored anesthesia care, a form of anesthesia with partial awareness  Monster Attack Crew, a fictional pilot squadron in Ultraman Leo  Musical Arts Conference, a marching band competition circuit  UCLA Marina Aquatic Center, located in Marina del Rey, California  Big Mac, a burger at McDonald's  MAC (chemotherapy), an acronym for chemotherapy regimen consisting of Mitoxantrone and standard-dose Ara-C
See also Mach (disambiguation) Mack (disambiguation) Mak (disambiguation) Mark (disambiguation)  ru:Mac
SHAKESPEERS: Suffolk, Norfolk & the Earl of Surrey find that Cardinal Wolsey's downfall was his objection to this king's divorce
Henry VIII
The still more spectacular palace of Nonsuch was later built for Henry VIII near Ewell.
3
thumb|left|160px|George Abbot Bankside in Southwark, then part of Surrey, was the principal entertainment district of early modern London.
South East Coast Ambulance Service as of 1 July 2006.
Surrey's important country houses include the Tudor mansion of Loseley Park, built in the 1560s and Clandon Park, an 18th-century Palladian mansion in West Clandon to the east of Guildford.
MUSICAL THEATRE: Although Rodgers & Hammerstein produced it, Irving Berlin wrote the songs, including "Anything You Can Do"
Annie Get Your Gun
She adds that he was in his mid-50's at the time, and later declared those years with the show were the "most thrilling time of his life.""BOOKS OF THE TIMES; Recalling the Somber Man Behind So Many Happy Songs" New York Times (book review), January 20, 1995  "Annie Get Your Gun" (1946) The grueling tours Berlin did performing "This Is The Army" left him exhausted, but when his old and close friend Jerome Kern, who was the composer for "Annie Get Your Gun," suddenly died of a cerebral hemorrhage, producers Richard Rodgers and Oscar Hammerstein II persuaded Berlin to take over composing the score.
3
So entranced was he that he failed to notice a swinging crane, and he was knocked into the river.
Corliss notes that the next day, at an official requiem at the National Cathedral in Washington, D.C., it was played by the United States Army Orchestra.
I love this country."
"ORANGE" YOU GLAD: Dystopian Anthony Burgess novel of punks & pathology
A Clockwork Orange
Although Burgess was predominantly a comic writer, his dystopian satire A Clockwork Orange remains his best known novel.
3
The causes listed on her death certificate were influenza, acute pneumonia, and cardiac failure.
The affair was hidden from Burgess's now-alcoholic wife, whom he refused to leave for fear of offending his cousin (by Burgess's stepmother, Margaret Dwyer Wilson), George Patrick Dwyer, then the Roman Catholic Bishop of Leeds.
The University of Manchester unveiled a plaque in October 2012 that reads: "The University of Manchester commemorates Anthony Burgess, 1917–1993, Writer and Composer, Graduate, BA English 1940".
BORN ON THE 14th OF JULY: On July 14, 1938 Abbie Hoffman was in short pants when this future "Chicago 7" leader made the scene as the "Cincinnati 1"
Jerry Rubin
Hoffman was arrested and tried for conspiracy and inciting to riot as a result of his role in protests that led to violent confrontations with police during the 1968 Democratic National Convention, along with Jerry Rubin, David Dellinger, Tom Hayden, Rennie Davis, John Froines, Lee Weiner, and Bobby Seale.
3
Chicago Eight conspiracy trial
This article gives a detailed description of the trial, the events leading up to it, the reversal on appeal and the aftermath.
Pete Townshend was adjusting his amplifier between songs and turned to look at Hoffman over his left shoulder.
17th CENTURY QUOTATIONS: This scientist wrote to Robert Hooke, "If I have seen further it is by standing on the shoulders of giants"
Newton
He also came near to an experimental proof that gravity follows an inverse square law, and hypothesised that such a relation governs the motions of the planets, an idea which was subsequently developed by Isaac Newton.
3
Ernst Florens Friedrich Chladni, Institute for Learning Technologies, Columbia UniversityOxford Dictionary of Scientists, Oxford University Press, 1999, p. 101, ISBN 7810802259.
(Hooke's inference about the velocity was actually incorrect)Wilson, p. 244.
Likenesses No authenticated portrait of Robert Hooke exists.
U.S. CITIES: This city near San Francisco grew when it became the western terminus of the Transcontinental Railroad
Oakland
The city and its surrounding areas are known as the San Francisco Bay Area, and are a part of the larger OMB designated San Jose-San Francisco-Oakland combined statistical area, the fifth most populous in the nation with an estimated population of 8.6 million.
3
In World War II, San Francisco was the port of embarkation for service members shipping out to the Pacific Theater.
Above average rain years are often associated with warm El Niño conditions in the Pacific while dry years often occur in cold water La Niña periods.
There were about 4,469 burglaries, 25,100 thefts, and 4,210 motor vehicle thefts.
THE WORDS OF BEN FRANKLIN: This present state "resembles a beer barrel, tapped at both ends," with the beer "running into Philadelphia & New York"
New Jersey
Europeans came to the Delaware Valley in the early 17th century, with the first settlements founded by the Dutch, who in 1623 built Fort Nassau on the Delaware River opposite the Schuylkill River in what is now Brooklawn, New Jersey.
3
Philadelphia has the second-largest Irish and Italian populations in the United States, after New York City.
Interstate 676, the Vine Street Expressway, was completed in 1991 after years of planning.
References  Further reading   Abigail Perkiss, Making Good Neighbors: Civil Rights, Liberalism, and Integration in Postwar Philadelphia.'' Ithaca, NY: Cornell University Press, 2014.
SODA POP QUIZ: The drink known as "Code" this is "everything you love about Mountain Dew with a smooth cherry flavor"
Red
On August 27, 1964, the Mountain Dew brand and production rights were acquired from Tip by the Pepsi-Cola company, at which point distribution expanded more widely across the United States and Canada.
3
Gordon and the Hartman brothers subsequently made a deal to bottle Mountain Dew by the Tri-Cities Beverage Corporation in Johnson City, Tennessee.
becoming a permanent Canadian flavor.
See also  Generic citrus sodas Surge (soft drink)  References  External links  Mountain Dew nutritional facts and other information via Pepsico   * Category:1940 introductions Category:PepsiCo brands Category:PepsiCo soft drinks Category:Products introduced in the 20th century
LET'S SPEAK SWAHILI: Ms. Farrow could tell you this 3-letter word means "100" in Swahili
Mia
Notable people with the surname include: Amariah Farrow (born 1980), professional football player in the Canadian Football League Brad Farrow (born 1956), Canadian judoka Dave Farrow, Guinness World Records holder for memory David Farrow Maxwell (1900–1985), eightieth president of the American Bar Association Ernie Farrow (1928–1969), American jazz multi-instrumentalist George Farrow (1913–1980), English footballer Jake Farrow (born 1978), television writer and actor James Farrow (1827–1892), 19th century politician Jane Farrow, Canadian author and broadcaster Jo Farrow, British broadcast meteorologist John Farrow (1904–1963), Australian film director John Farrow (baseball) (1853–1914), also known as Jack, American Major League Baseball player John Farrow (author), pen name of Trevor Ferguson (born 1947), Canadian novelist Jonathan Farrow (born 1984), English cricketer Joseph Farrow (c. 1652–1692), English cleric Kenneth Farrow (1924–2007), English Police officer and recipient of the George Cross Margaret Farrow (born 1934), American politician from Wisconsin Mark Farrow, graphic designer Mia Farrow (born 1945), American actress Nigel Farrow (born 1963), English cricketer Prudence Farrow (born 1948), American actress Ronan Farrow (born 1987), American human rights activist, son of Woody Allen and actress Mia Farrow Samuel Farrow (1775–1824), American politician from South Carolina Stuart Farrow, South African politician Thomas Farrow (1833–1916), Canadian merchant and political figure Tisa Farrow (born 1951), American actress William Hastings Farrow, World War I flying ace William Henry Farrow (c. 1805–1876), physician born and trained in England and practiced in Canada   Other   Farrow, Alberta Farrow & Ball, British manufacturer of paints Farrow, County Westmeath, a townland of Leny civil parish in the barony of Corkaree, County Westmeath, Ireland Farrow (customs brokerage), customs broker in Canada Farrow Group, former group of building societies, based in Geelong, Australia Farrow (musician), English record producer and DJ Farrow Parkway, South Carolina   See also  Farro, a food product consisting of the grains of certain wheat species in whole form Faro (disambiguation)
3
In farming To farrow means for a sow to give birth to piglets.
The sow's litter is also called a farrow.
See domestic pig.
STUPID ANSWERS: (Hi, I'm Jeff Probst (in Thailand))  Parts of this 2000 Leonardo DiCaprio movie were filmed nearby on the beach of Thailand's Phi Phi Island
The Beach
thumb|left|upright|DiCaprio at a press conference for The Beach in February 2000|alt=A photograph of Leonardo DiCaprio attending a press conference for The Beach.
3
After being removed from the set of children's television series Romper Room for being disruptive at the age of five, he followed his older stepbrother Adam Farrar into television commercials, landing an ad for Matchbox cars at 14.
Todd McCarthy of Variety noted that "Richard [DiCaprio's role] is too much the American Everyman and not enough of a well-defined individual to entirely capture one's interest and imagination, and DiCaprio, while perfectly watchable, does not endow him with the quirks or distinguishing marks to make this man from nowhere a dimensional character."
Reviews towards the film were mostly mixed, with many critics commending DiCaprio's performance but feeling that, overall, the film lacked coherence.
BOB MARLEY & ME: Inducting Marley into the Rock & Roll Hall of Fame in 1994, this U2 singer said Bob was "showman, shaman, human"
Bono
Formed in 1976, the group consists of Bono (vocals and rhythm guitar), the Edge (lead guitar, keyboards, and vocals), Adam Clayton (bass guitar), and Larry Mullen, Jr. (drums and percussion).
1
Partly recorded in Slane Castle, The Unforgettable Fire was released in 1984 and was at the time the band's most marked change in direction.de la Parra (2003), pp.
THE OLD TESTAMENT: To escape the pursuing Egyptians, the Israelites went into the midst of this sea "upon the dry ground"
Red Sea
Oxford World's Classics, 1999. toward the Red Sea, but Pharaoh changes his mind and arises to massacre the fleeing Hebrews.
3
Samaritans commonly refer to themselves and Jews collectively as Israelites, and describe themselves as the Israelite Samaritans.
The Greek term Ioudaios (Jews) historically refers to members of the Tribe of Judah, which formed the nucleus of the kingdom of Judah.
Settlement in the southern highlands was minimal from the 12th through the 10th centuries BCE, but a state began to emerge there in the 9th century,Joffe p.448–9.
ANNUAL EVENTS: Milwaukee's yearly Lakefront Festival of the Arts takes place at the War Memorial Center on this lake
Lake Michigan
It is the county seat of Milwaukee County and is located on the southwestern shore of Lake Michigan.
2
2000; 1895.
In July 2008, it was announced that Coors beer would be added to the list of beers brewed in Miller Valley.
BEER: The "High Life" of this beer began in Milwaukee on Dec. 30, 1903
Miller
Known for its brewing traditions, major new additions to the city include the Milwaukee Riverwalk, the Wisconsin Center, Miller Park, an internationally renowned addition to the Milwaukee Art Museum, Milwaukee Repertory Theater, and Pier Wisconsin, as well as major renovations to the UW–Milwaukee Panther Arena.
3
In the 1950s, the Hispanic community was beginning to emerge.
Famous Chef Julia Child visited Milwaukee and selected Milwaukee native chef Sanford D'Amato to cook for her 80th birthday.
The building, dubbed "The Northwestern Mutual Tower and Commons", would stand 550 feet tall and have 32 stories, making it the second tallest building in Milwaukee, Wisconsin.
TV TITLE PAIRS: Robin Williams &Pam Dawber
Mork & Mindy
After rising to fame as Mork in the sitcom Mork & Mindy (197882), he went on to establish a career in both stand-up comedy and feature film acting.
2
From Dustin Hoffman, with whom he co-starred in Hook, he learned to take on totally different character types, and to transform his characters by extreme preparation.
It was revealed following his death that Williams had been suffering from severe depression, and had been sleeping in a different room from his wife due to restlessness and anxiety caused by his Parkinson's.
BIG BANDS: Benny Goodman got good "vibes" from him
Lionel Hampton
Many of Goodman's professional colleagues appear in the film, including Ben Pollack, Gene Krupa, Lionel Hampton and Harry James.
3
In his book Benny Goodman and the Swing Era on page 164, Collier lists both a "McFadden's Ballroom in San Francisco" and "Sweet's in Oakland" as separate engagements for Goodman, with Pismo Beach in between.
This integration in music happened ten years before Jackie Robinson became the first black American to enter Major League Baseball. "[Goodman's] popularity was such that he could remain financially viable without touring the South, where he would have been subject to arrest for violating Jim Crow laws."
A longtime resident of Stamford, Connecticut, Benny Goodman is interred in the Long Ridge Cemetery in Stamford.
THEY USED TO BE IN CHARGE: Olof Palme was its Prime Minister 1982-1986
Sweden
A longtime protégé of Prime Minister Tage Erlander, Palme led the Swedish Social Democratic Party (SAP) from 1969 until his assassination in 1986, and was a two-term Prime Minister of Sweden, heading a Privy Council Government from 1969 to 1976 and a cabinet government from 1982 until his death.
3
En levande vilja:
That same year, work-environment improvement grants were introduced and made available to modernising firms “
Arrangements had therefore been made for him to go to Moscow to discuss a number of contentious bilateral issues, including alleged Soviet submarine incursions into Swedish waters (see U 137).
POT LUCK: In the Scarecrow's song "If I Only Had a Brain" from "The Wizard of Oz", this U.S. president is mentioned
Lincoln
The Wonderful Wizard of Oz (1910 film), a 1910 American silent fantasy film  Wizard of Oz (1925 film), directed by Larry Semon  The Wizard of Oz (1933 film), animated short directed by Ted Eshbaugh  The Wizard of Oz (1939 film), starring Judy Garland  The Wizard of Oz (1982 film), a 1982 Japanese anime feature film  Television and video  The Wonderful Wizard of Oz (1986 TV series), a Japanese anime series  The Wizard of Oz (TV series), a 1990 American animated series  Tales of the Wizard of Oz, a 1961 animated television series  The Wizard of Oz (1950 film), a 1950 half-hour television adaptation  The Muppets' Wizard of Oz, a 2005 musical television film  Musicals and concerts  The Wizard of Oz (1902 musical), by L. Frank Baum, Paul Tietjens and others  The Wizard of Oz (1942 musical), commissioned by the St. Louis Municipal Opera The Wiz: The Super Soul Musical "Wonderful Wizard of Oz", a 1975 musical featuring African American actors, winning the 1975 Tony Award for Best Musical  The Wizard of Oz (1987 musical), adapted by the Royal Shakespeare Company  The Wizard of Oz in Concert: Dreams Come True (1995), a benefit performance held at Lincoln Center for the Children's Defense Fund  The Wonderful Wizard of Oz (2000 musical), adapted by the Toronto Civic Light Opera Company   The Wizard of Oz (2011 musical), by Andrew Lloyd Webber and Tim Rice  Comics  The Wonderful Wizard of Oz (comics)  Gaming  The Wizard of Oz (video game), a 1993 SNES game  The Wizard of Oz: Beyond the Yellow Brick Road, a 2008 Nintendo DS game  The Wizard of Oz (arcade game), a game that awards tokens redeemable for prizes  The Wizard of Oz, A slot machine from WMS Gaming  The Wizard of Oz (pinball): A pinball machine from Jersey Jack gaming.
2
The Wonderful Wizard of Oz, a 1900 American novel by L. Frank Baum often reprinted under the title The Wizard of Oz  Adaptations  Adaptations of The Wizard of Oz  Film
The Wizard of Oz, a 1978 album by Meco  The Wizard of Oz (pinball), a pinball machine  See also  The Wonderful Wizard of Oz (disambiguation)  Oz (disambiguation)  Wizard of Ahhhs, a 2007 album by Black Kids
VEGAS ON FILM: In the first of these films, Whoopi Goldberg was a Reno lounge singer; in the second she's a Vegas headliner
Sister Act
On May 29, 1992, Sister Act was released.
3
She became the first African-American woman to host the Academy Awards show in 1994, and the first woman to solo host.
Goldberg stirred controversy when on September 28, 2009, during a discussion of Roman Polanski's case, she opined that Polanski's rape of a thirteen-year-old in 1977"Personalities Column", Roman Polanski Media Archive was not "rape-rape".
On April 1, 2010, Goldberg joined Cyndi Lauper in the launch of her Give a Damn campaign to bring a wider awareness of discrimination of the LGBT community.
"LA" DEE DA: The Census Bureau uses "Hispanic", but many of South & Central American heritage prefer this 1-word term
latino
The U.S. Census Bureau defines the ethnonym Hispanic or Latino to refer to "a person of Cuban, Mexican, Puerto Rican, South or Central American, or other Spanish culture or origin regardless of race" and states that Hispanics or Latinos can be of any race, any ancestry, any ethnicity.
3
A Hispanus is someone who is a native of Hispania with no foreign parents, while children born in Hispania of (Latin) Roman parents were Hispaniensis.
(See: Colombian people)120x120px Ecuador Spanish (official), Amerindian languages (especially Quechua) Mestizo (mixed Amerindian and White) 65%, Amerindian 25%, White 7%, Black 3%120x120px  Paraguay Spanish (official), Guaraní (official) Mestizo (mixed European and Amerindian) 74,5%, White 20%, Mulato 3,5%, Indigenous 1,5%120x120px  Peru Spanish (official), Quechua (official), Aymara, and a large number of minor Amazonian languages White and Mestizo 64.4%, Quechua 22.7%, Aymara 2.7%, Amazonian 1.8%, Black, East Asian and others 8.3%.120x120px  Uruguay Spanish (official) White (mostly from Spanish and Italian ancestries) 88%, Mestizo 8%, Black 4%, Amerindian (less than 0.5%)120x120px  Venezuela Spanish (official), numerous indigenous dialects
Many aspects of Filipino culture including cuisine, traditional dances, music, festivals, religion, architecture, traditional costumes and crafts exhibit Hispanic origin and influences.
A LITTER OF ALLITERATION: The Pleiades are also known as these due to their number & relation
the Seven Sisters
The nine brightest stars of the Pleiades are named for the Seven Sisters of Greek mythology: Sterope, Merope, Electra, Maia, Taygeta, Celaeno, and Alcyone, along with their parents Atlas and Pleione.
3
The celestial entity has several meanings in different cultures and traditions.
Later work consistently argued that the Hipparcos distance measurement for the Pleiades was erroneous.
Another way of estimating the age of the cluster is by looking at the lowest-mass objects.
AFRICAN CITIES: Update your address book--Tanzania's capital is moving from this city to Dodoma
Dar es Salaam
Geography Located at , in the center of the country, the town is  west of the former capital at Dar es Salaam and  south of Arusha, the headquarters of the East African Community.
2
It is also 259 km north of Iringa through Mtera.
There are two universities in Dodoma: St Johns University of Tanzania , owned by the Anglican Church of Tanzania, and University of Dodoma, currently with 22,000 students.
NATIONS OF AFRICA: In a song title, this country whose capital is Accra might come before "Fly Now"
Ghana
Accra  is the capital and largest city of Ghana, with an estimated urban population of 2.27 million .
3
Accra serves as the Greater Accra region's economic and administrative hub.
The British then captured Accra in 1874, and in 1877, at the end of the second Anglo-Asante War, Accra replaced Cape Coast as the capital of the British Gold Coast.
The country's first BRT system is also planned for the city, with the first phase to commence by the end of 2015.
THE BRITISH INVASION: Led by Mick Jagger, this group has been called the "World's Greatest Rock & Roll Band"
The Rolling Stones
Sir Michael Philip "Mick" Jagger  (born 26 July 1943) is an English singer, songwriter and actor, best known as the lead vocalist and a co-founder of The Rolling Stones.
3
His mother, Eva Ensley Mary (née Scutts; 6 April 1913 – 18 May 2000), born in New South Wales, Australia, of English descent, was a hairdresser and an active member of the Conservative Party.
Another fruit of this collaboration was their first international hit, "(I Can't Get No) Satisfaction".
While it failed to match the commercial success of his debut, it was critically well received.
THE ROLLING STONES: In 1971 Mick Jagger married this Nicaraguan socialite in St. Tropez; they divorced 8 years later
Bianca Jagger
With wife Bianca Jagger, he has daughter Jade Sheena Jezebel Jagger (born 21 October 1971).Christopher Andersen "Mick Jagger" With Jerry Hall, he has daughter Elizabeth 'Lizzie' Scarlett Jagger (born 2 March 1984), son James Leroy Augustin Jagger (born 28 August 1985), daughter Georgia May Ayeesha Jagger (born 12 January 1992), and son Gabriel Luke Beauregard Jagger (born 9 December 1997).
3
"Richards, Keith.
The Prince of Wales.
thumb|left|180px|Jagger's military-style jacket worn during the 1989-1990 tour, on display at Hard Rock Cafe, Sydney, Australia Pop artist Andy Warhol painted a series of silkscreen portraits of Jagger in 1975, one of which was owned by Farah Diba, wife of the Shah of Iran.
TRAVELIN': If you're in Rabat, you must be in the capital city of this country
Morocco
Rabat (; ) is the capital of Morocco and its seventh largest city center with an urban population of approximately 580,000 (2014) and a metropolitan population of over 1.2 million.
3
First, around the ramparts, there is the old neighborhoods, Quartier l'Océan and Quartier les Orangers.
Other families in the city are considered residents of Rabat because they came at the time when Rabat became the capital of the country, either through rural exodus or to work in public administration based in the city since the establishment of the protectorate.
Trains  thumb|Rabat-Ville Train Station Rabat is served by two principal railway stations run by the national rail service, the ONCF.  Rabat-Ville is the main inter-city station, from which trains run south to Casablanca, Marrakech and El Jadida, north to Tanger, or east to Meknes, Fes, Taza and Oujda.
'90s NEWS: After a bitter confirmation hearing, this man took over for retiring justice Thurgood Marshall
Clarence Thomas
Bush nominated Clarence Thomas to replace Marshall.
3
Marshall wanted to study in his hometown law school, the University of Maryland School of Law, but did not apply because of the school's segregation policy.
In a private letter to Hoover, Marshall "attacked Howard as a 'rugged individualist' who did not speak for the NAACP."Root, Damon (March 20, 2009) A Forgotten Civil Rights Hero, Reason Two years earlier Howard arranged for Marshall to deliver a well-received speech at a rally of his Regional Council of Negro Leadership in Mound Bayou, Mississippi only days before the Brown decision.
Later it opened Broadway at the Booth Theatre on April 30, 2008, starring Laurence Fishburne.
QUOTES: Completes the line from Stephen Crane, "He wished that he, too, had a wound, a..."
red badge of courage
He won international acclaim in 1895 for his Civil War novel The Red Badge of Courage, which he wrote without having any battle experience.
3
The New York Times reported that Leslie gave him $800 in November 1896 but that he'd repaid only a quarter of the sum.
2002.
New York: Mifflin.
ALBUMS: In 1995 Alanis Morissette became one of the youngest to win a Grammy when this was named album of the year
Jagged Little Pill
Together the pair began creating what would become Jagged Little Pill, and by the spring of 1995, she had signed a deal with Maverick Records.
3
Rolling Stone.
For the first time in her career, she took on the role of sole writer and producer of an album.
(The NHL requires arenas to perform both the American and Canadian national anthems at games involving teams from both countries.)
THEATER: He proposed to Helen Hayes the night "The Front Page" opened in 1928
Charles MacArthur
The Front Page is a hit Broadway comedy about tabloid newspaper reporters on the police beat, written by former Chicago reporters Ben Hecht and Charles MacArthur which was first produced in 1928.
3
It's the story of a lifetime.
Web. 7 Apr. 2012.
John Varley's 1991 science fiction novel Steel Beach takes the story — and the change of sex — to another level; the plot includes a sex-change by a male reporter named Hildy Johnson.
LEGENDARY!: In a Homeric epic, he's ordered home to his kingdom in Ithaca after the fall of Troy
Odysseus
thumb|Head of Odysseus wearing a pileus depicted on a 3rd-century BC coin from Ithaca.
3
It became a French possession again in 1807, until it was taken over by the United Kingdom in 1809.
The population welcomed the French, who took care in the control of the administrative and judicial systems, but later the heavy taxation they demanded caused a feeling of indignation among the people.
It has been argued that in Homeric times Paliki was separated from Kefalonia by a sea channel since closed up by earthquake-induced rockfalls.
THEIR FIRST FILMS: [Hi, I'm Joseph Gordon-Levitt]  I made my feature film debut in this '92 movie directed by Robert Redford; if you want to know the title, "Go Fish"
A River Runs Through It
He released his third film as a director, A River Runs Through It, in 1992.
3
In the same year, Redford reteamed with Brad Pitt for Spy Game, another success for the pair but with Redford switching this time from director to actor.
In The Clearing (2004), a thriller co-starring Helen Mirren, Redford was a successful businessman whose kidnapping unearths the secrets and inadequacies that led to his achieving the American Dream.
Herbert later became Governor of Utah.
PET PROJECTS?: Robert Redford: "The _____ Whisperer"
Horse
Fonda and Redford were paired again in the popular big-screen version of Barefoot in the Park (1967) and were again co-stars much later in Pollack's The Electric Horseman (1979).
3
He released his third film as a director, A River Runs Through It, in 1992.
Other directorial projects have included the period drama A River Runs Through It (1992), based on Norman Maclean's novella, and the exposé Quiz Show (1994), about the quiz show scandal of the late 1950s.
In April 2014, Redford, a Pitzer College Trustee, and Pitzer College President Laura Skandera Trombley announced that the college will divest fossil fuel stocks from its endowment; at the time, it was the higher education institution with the largest endowment in the US to make this commitment.
JOHN GRISHAM BOOKS: A black man murders the 2 white men who raped his daughter in this novel, Grisham's first
A Time to Kill
He began writing his first novel, A Time to Kill, in 1984; it was published in June 1989.
3
Retrieved on 2011-12-09.
He decided to quit but stayed when he was offered a raise.
Bestsellers.about.com (1955-02-08).
"OUT": Bret Harte told the story of these "Poker Flat" exiles
Outcasts
The Tales of the Argonauts (1875)  Gabriel Conroy (1876)  Two Men of Sandy Bar (1876)  Drift from Two Shores (1878)  The Crusade of the Excelsior (1887)  A Protégée of Jack Hamlin's; and Other Stories (1894)  Dramatic and musical adaptations  Several film versions of "The Outcasts of Poker Flat" have been made, including one in 1937 with Preston Foster and another in 1952 with Dale Robertson.
3
New York: The Penguin Press, 2014: 59.
China and the International System, 1840-1949: Power, Presence, and Perceptions in a Century of Humiliation.
Bret Harte Elementary School in Chicago, Illinois Bret Harte Preparatory Middle School (Vermont Vista) South Los Angeles, California  Bret Harte Middle School in San Jose, California Bret Harte Middle School in Oakland, California Bret Harte Middle School in Hayward, California Bret Harte High School in Altaville, California is named after him and celebrated its 100th anniversary in 2005 Bret Harte Elementary in Burbank, California Bret Harte Elementary in Cherry Hill, New Jersey Bret Harte Elementary in Sacramento, California Bret Harte Elementary School in Modesto, Californiahttp://mcs.monet.k12.ca.us/schools/MCSPages/SchoolInfoPage.aspx?schoolnumber=014 A community called The Shores of Poker Flat, California claims to have been the location of Poker Flat, although it is usually accepted that the story takes place further north.
AROUND THE BLOC: In November 1956 Soviet troops moved into this country to crush the revolution led by Imre Nagy
Hungary
Imre Nagy (; 7 June 1896 – 16 June 1958) was a Hungarian communist politician who was appointed Chairman of the Council of Ministers of the People's Republic of Hungary on two occasions.
3
Failed Illusions: Moscow, Washington, Budapest and the 1956 Hungarian Revolt, p. 42.
In 1982, Erzsébet Nagy married János Vészi.
ISBN 0-356-20316-6  Karl Benziger, Imre Nagy, Martyr of the Nation:
MODERN "TIME"S: It's the parent company of CNN
Time Warner
The Cable News Network (CNN) is an American basic cable and satellite television channel that is owned by the Turner Broadcasting System division of Time Warner.
3
CNN was the first cable news channel to break the news of the September 11 attacks.
Despite this, Zucker emphasized a continuing commitment to news programming, especially during breaking news events (where the 9 p.m. hour can be pre-empted for special coverage).
Sonya / Sonya Live in L.A.  1987–1994 A weekday call-in show airing at 1:00 p.m. Eastern Time in the late 1980s and early 1990s, hosted by Dr. Sonya Friedman.
A DATE WITH HISTORY: (I'm Aaron Brown of CNN.)  One of my first on-air assignments for CNN was on this fateful date, reporting from a rooftop vantage point
September 11, 2001
Paula Zahn assisted in the September 11, 2001, coverage on her first day as a CNN reporter, a fact that she mentioned as a guest clue presenter on a 2005 episode of Jeopardy!.  CNN has made archival files of much of the day's broadcast available in five segments, plus an overview.
3
The original panelists were Pat Buchanan, Al Hunt, Mark Shields and Robert Novak.
thumb|right|Post production editing offices in Atlanta.
In October 2015, CNN and Facebook hosted the first 2016 Democratic Party presidential debate in Las Vegas, Nevada.http://www.cnn.com/2015/08/06/politics/cnn-democratic-debate-host/ CNN conducted an online poll asking viewers to select which of the participants they believed won the debate.
ISLANDS: Stewart Island, south of South Island, is this island country's 3rd largest
New Zealand
The South Island or Te Waipounamu is the larger of the two major islands of New Zealand, the other being the smaller but more populous North Island.
2
History  thumb|Charcoal rock drawing at Carters rockpool on the Opihi River  right|thumb|First European impression of Māori, at Murderers' Bay, 1642.
Thousands of people took up this offer to relocate temporarily in the wake of the event.
THURSDAY NIGHT TV: This cop show seen on Thursdays in the early '70s was named for its main character (played by Raymond Burr) seen here
Ironside
Raymond William Stacey Burr (May 21, 1917 – September 12, 1993) was a Canadian-American actor, primarily known for his title roles in the television dramas Perry Mason and Ironside.
3
Burr appeared in over 60 movies between 1946 and 1957.
33, no. 1, winter 1992, 59.
The Pittsburgh Post-Gazette reported that People magazine was preparing a story on Burr's "secret life" and asked, "Are the inevitable rumors true?"
HITCHCOCK'S CATTLE: A good guy as Perry Mason, he played the bad guy Jimmy Stewart spied on in "Rear Window"
Raymond Burr
These were followed by its best-known adaptation, the CBS television series Perry Mason (1957–66) starring Raymond Burr.
3
Mason has a professional relationship with Paul Drake, although after The Case of the Velvet Claws fees are seldom discussed.
The character is also an inspiration for the TV show Adaalat on Sony TV India.
Judge in seven of the Perry Mason television films.
FASHION: In the 1800s it was fashionable to wear a cap named for this woman who stabbed Jean-Paul Marat
Charlotte Corday
Marat was assassinated by Charlotte Corday, a Girondist sympathizer, while taking a medicinal bath for his debilitating skin condition.
3
Biographical Anecdotes of the Founders of the French Republic.
Gottschalk, Louis R. Jean Paul Marat –
2001: Marat en famille –
INTELLIGENT FILMS: They don't get much smarter than this scientist played by Walter Matthau in "I.Q."
Albert Einstein
, 1969 Matthau played Albert Einstein in the film I.Q. (1994), starring Tim Robbins and Meg Ryan.
3
He also attended Surprise Lake Camp.
Personal life  Marriages Matthau was married twice; first to Grace Geraldine Johnson from 1948 to 1958, and then to Carol Marcus from 1959 until he died in 2000.
thumb|Walter Matthau gravesite Matthau suffered from atherosclerotic heart disease.
BOOK TO MOVIE: Kubrick filmed "Dream Story" by Arthur Schnitzler under this title
Eyes Wide Shut
None but the Brave (Leutnant Gustl – 1900)  Berta Garlan (1900)  Blind Geronimo and his Brother (Der blinde Geronimo und sein Bruder – 1902)  The Prophecy (Die Weissagung – 1905)  Casanova's Homecoming (Casanovas Heimfahrt – 1918)  Fräulein Else (1924)  Rhapsody – also published as Dream Story (Traumnovelle – 1925/26), later adapted as the film Eyes Wide Shut by American director Stanley Kubrick  Night Games (Spiel im Morgengrauen – 1926)  Flight into Darkness (Flucht in die Finsternis – 1931)
3
With his 1900 short story Lieutenant Gustl, he was the first to write German fiction in stream-of-consciousness narration.
Flirtation (Liebelei – 1895), also known as The Reckoning, which was made into a film by Max Ophüls and adapted as Dalliance by Tom Stoppard (1986)Dalliance was staged at the National Theatre by Peter Wood.
Chronik eines Frauenlebens (1928)   Short stories and novellas   Dying (Sterben – 1895)
3-LETTER WORDS: Muhammad Ali stung like a bee with this short, straight punch
a jab
One was a jab that Ali called the 'snake lick', like cobra striking that comes from the floor almost, really low down.
3
Ali transformed the role and image of the African American athlete in America by his embrace of racial pride and his willingness to antagonize the white establishment in doing so.
These early fights were not without trials.
Charlie Powell, who fought Ali early in Ali's career and was knocked out in the third round, said: "When he first hit me I said to myself, 'I can take two of these to get one in myself.'
BRAND "X": This company's Jack Kilby created the first integrated circuit back in 1958
Texas Instruments
Jack St. Clair Kilby (November 8, 1923 – June 20, 2005) was an American electrical engineer who took part (along with Robert Noyce) in the realization of the first integrated circuit while working at Texas Instruments (TI) in 1958.
3
To congratulate him, US President Bill Clinton wrote, "You can take pride in the knowledge that your work will help to improve lives for generations to come."
Symposia and exhibits examined the many ways in which technology and engineers shaped the modern world.
Oral history interview with Jack S. Kilby at Charles Babbage Institute, University of Minnesota, Minneapolis.
LAKE CITY: Toronto, Canada
Lake Ontario
Located in Southern Ontario on the northwestern shore of Lake Ontario, Toronto is situated on a broad sloping plateau intersected by an extensive network of rivers, deep ravines, and urban forest.
3
As the Irish before them, many of these new migrants lived in overcrowded shanty-type slums, such as "the Ward" which was centred on Bay Street, now the heart of the country's finances.
The summer months are characterized by very warm temperatures.
While Miami's foreign-born population has traditionally consisted primarily of Cubans and other Latin Americans, no single nationality or culture dominates Toronto's immigrant population, placing it among the most diverse cities in the world.
FILMS OF THE 1980s: The title of this 1989 comedy refers to Baby Mikey, voiced by Bruce Willis
Look Who's Talking
In Country as Vietnam veteran Emmett Smith and also provided the voice for a talking baby in Look Who's Talking, as well as its sequel Look Who's Talking Too.
3
In 1999, Willis then went on to the starring role in M. Night Shyamalan's film, The Sixth Sense.
The film was released on October 15, 2010.
In 2002, Willis's then 8-year-old daughter, Tallulah, suggested that he purchase Girl Scout cookies to send to troops.
DOUBLE TALK: Tourism is a major source of income on this French Polynesian island that's about 160 miles northwest of Tahiti
Bora Bora
The Bora Bora cruiseline sails to Bora Bora about once a week.
3
Books Ngram Viewer «
It is an ethnographic museum that was founded in 1974 to conserve and restore Polynesian artifacts and cultural practices.
For women the themes are closer to home or from nature: combing their hair or the flight of a butterfly, for example.
BASEBALL: Pitcher Nolan Ryan set a major league record in 1973 by recording 383 of these
Strikeouts
While his lifetime winning percentage was .526, Ryan was an eight-time MLB All-Star, and his 5,714 career strikeouts rank first in baseball history by a significant margin.
2
The high velocity remained throughout his career, even into his 40s.
Ryan was named the Dallas-Fort Worth’s 2012 CEO of the Year by Southern Methodist University’s Cox School of Business.
CHURCHES & CATHEDRALS: Located in Red Square, it was begun in the 1550s to commemorate the military conquests of Ivan the Terrible
St. Basil's
Rather, the name came about because the Russian word красная (krasnaya), which means "red," was applied to a small area between St. Basil's Cathedral, the Spassky Tower of the Kremlin, and the Lobnoe Mesto (place of execution), and Tsar Alexei Mikhailovich officially extended the name to the entire square, which had previously been called Pozhar, or "burnt-out place", in reference to the fact that several buildings had to be burned down to make place for the square.
3
These were the fortified gates at Voskresensky Bridge over the River Neglinnaya.
Red Square has also served as a venue for high-profile concerts.
Listing  The Kremlin and Red square were together recognized as a UNESCO World Heritage Site in 1990, due to their inextricable links to Russian history since the 13th century.
TOYS: In 1963 sculptor Phil Kraczkowski was paid $600 to design this Hasbro toy's original head
G.I. Joe
Instead, in 1964, Hassenfeld Brothers produced the G.I. Joe toy, which they termed an "action figure" in order to market the toy to boys who wouldn't want to play with "dolls."
3
In 1977, Hasbro's losses were $2.5 million and the company held a large debt load.
Outside Asia, Hasbro owns and operates only two manufacturing facilities, one in Waterford, Ireland, the other in East Longmeadow, Massachusetts, USA.
In 2012 Hasbro received a US$1.6 million tax credit from the state of Rhode Island with a promise to create 245 new jobs in the state.
WORD & PHRASE ORIGINS: This evergreen tree was named for Scottish botanist David Douglas, who collected samples in America
the Douglas fir
right|frame|Coast Douglas-fir cone, from a tree grown from seed collected by David Douglas in 1826  David Douglas (25 June 1799 – 12 July 1834) was a Scottish botanist, best known as the namesake of the Douglas fir.
3
He first briefly visited Hawaii in 1830 on his way to the Pacific Northwest.
246–8
p.15  Writings
LISZT: Franz Liszt always claimed that this great German composer saw him perform as a child & kissed him on the forehead
Beethoven
He had been in the service of Prince Nikolaus II Esterházy and knew Haydn, Hummel and Beethoven personally.
3
187ff
When on October 7, 1850, he was professed, he took the name Père Augstin–Marie du Très Saint Sacrament ("Pater Augustin–Mary of the Most Holy Sacrament").
However, Carl Czerny charged an expensive fee for lessons and even dismissed Stephen Heller when he was unable to afford to pay for his lessons.
OPERA: This title character performs the Dance of the Seven Veils for Herod in an opera by Richard Strauss
Salome
He is known for his operas, which include Der Rosenkavalier, Elektra, Die Frau ohne Schatten and Salome; his Lieder, especially his Four Last Songs; his tone poems, including Don Juan, Death and Transfiguration, Till Eulenspiegel's Merry Pranks, Also sprach Zarathustra,   Ein Heldenleben, Symphonia Domestica, and An Alpine Symphony;  and other instrumental works such as Metamorphosen and his Oboe Concerto.
3
Kennedy 1999, p. 297
41 No. 1  Deutsche Motette, Op.
ISBN 0-333-73432-7, ISBN 1-56159-228-5.
ALL MY CHILDREN: Isabella Rossellini is the daughter of a famous Italian director & this Oscar-winning actress
Ingrid Bergman
Background and early life Rossellini was born in Rome, the daughter of Swedish actress Ingrid Bergman, who was of Swedish and German descent, and Italian director Roberto Rossellini, who was born in Rome from a family originally from Pisa, Tuscany.
3
Rossellini was raised in Rome, as well as in Santa Marinella and Paris.
In October 1992, Rossellini modelled for Madonna's controversial book Sex.
In that same year, she also appeared in the Canadian film The Saddest Music in the World, directed by Guy Maddin.
COME, HO CHI MINH: The trail bearing Ho's name was a series of Viet Cong supply routes mostly through this neighboring nation
Laos
In May 1959, Group 559 was established to maintain and upgrade the Ho Chi Minh trail, at this time a six-month mountain trek through Laos.
3
About 40,000 communist soldiers infiltrated the South in 1961–63.Ang, p. 76.
They claimed that Viet Cong was composed of several parties: People's Revolutionary Party, the Democratic Party and the Radical Socialist Party.
ISBN 0-688-09130-X.  Merle Pribbenow (translation).
LITERATURE: This Raymond Chandler private eye was introduced in the 1939 novel "The Big Sleep"
Philip Marlowe
The Big Sleep (1939) is a hardboiled crime novel by Raymond Chandler, the first to feature detective Philip Marlowe.
2
He determines the store is a pornography lending library.
Although the stories were independent and shared no characters, they had some similarities that made it logical to combine them.
CELEBRITY DAUGHTERS & MOMS: Jamie Lee Curtis
Janet Leigh
Curtis currently stars in the horror comedy anthology series Scream Queens on FOX.  Curtis is the daughter of the actress Janet Leigh and actor Tony Curtis.
3
Returning to California in 1976, she attended the University of the Pacific in Stockton, California.
In a 2015 interview, she admitted that she has never watched Weaver's film, Alien, in its entirety because she was too scared.
Barbara Duran  23 episodes 1979  Buck Rogers in the 25th Century  Jen Burton  Episode: "Unchained Woman" 1981  She's in the Army Now  Pvt.
SCULPTURE: Donatello's earliest authenticated work is a marble of this biblical king
David
thumb|Donatello David head and shoulders front right  In Florence, Donatello assisted Lorenzo Ghiberti with the statues of prophets for the north door of the Baptistery of Florence Cathedral, for which he received payment in November 1406 and early 1408.
2
For his last commission in Florence, Donatello produced reliefs for the bronze pulpits in the Basilica of San Lorenzo, with help from students Bartolomeo Bellano and Bertoldo di Giovanni.
Museo dell'Opera del Duomo, Florence  The Feast of Herod (c. 1425) —
THE LIFE & REIGN OF CHARLES I: During part of the English Civil War, Charles' main residence was Christ Church College at this university
Oxford
Etymology The name's etymology is a Common Germanic noun *karlaz meaning "free man", which survives in English as churl (< Old English ċeorl),T. F. Hoad, English Etymology, Oxford University Press, 1993 (ISBN 0-19-283098-8).
2
This line descended from Infante Carlos, Count of Molina (1788–1855), and was founded due to dispute over the succession laws and widespread dissatisfaction with the Alfonsine line of the House of Bourbon.
In Roman Catholicism, the best known Saint Charles is Charles Borromeo (1538–1584), an Italian cardinal, canonized in 1606 by Pope Paul V. Charles, Duke of Brittany (1319–1364)  had been canonized after his death, but this was annulled by Pope Gregory XI. Charles the Good  (d. 1127) is sometimes referred to as a saint, but while he was beatified in 1904, he has not been canonized.
OF AN ENGLISHMAN: Prince Charles is the Duke of Cornwall & Prince Philip is the Duke of this
Edinburgh
Former Jean-Baptiste Bernadotte, Marshal of France Infante Carlos, Count of Molina (1788–1855) Charles, Count Léon (1806–1881), illegitimate son of Emperor Napoleon I of France and Catherine Eléonore Denuelle de la Plaigne Charles III, Prince of Monaco (1818–1889) founder of the casino in Monte Carlo Infante Carlos, Count of Montemolin (1818–1861) Charles I of Romania (1839–1914) first ruler of the Hohenzollern-Sigmaringen dynasty Carlos, Duke of Madrid (1848–1909) Charles I of Portugal (1863–1908), second to last King of Portugal and Algarves from 1889 to 1908 Charles I of Austria (1887–1922), Emperor of Austria Charles II of Romania (1893-1853) eldest son of Ferdinand I Charles XV of Sweden (1826–1872), king of Sweden, the eldest son of King Oscar I and Josephine of Leuchtenberg Prince Charles of Belgium (1903–1983), second son of King Albert I of Belgium and Queen Elizabeth Archduke Karl Pius of Austria, Prince of Tuscany (1909–1953) Carlos Hugo, Duke of Parma (1930–2010) Juan Carlos I of Spain (b. 1938) former King of Spain Charles, Prince of Wales (b. 1948),  eldest son of Queen Elizabeth II and Prince Philip, Duke of Edinburgh  Scientists   Name DescriptionCharles Babbage English mathematician, philosopher, mechanical engineer and computer scientistCharles L. Bennett American astrophysicistCharles Thomas Bolton astronomer who proved the existence of black holesCharles Darwin British naturalistCharles Dawson English archaeologist, involved in the Piltdown Man hoaxCharles Fleming (ornithologist)
3
The only other compound name with the Carl- prefix is Carlofred (Carlefred), attested in the 7th century; as a suffix, it occurs in the rare names Altcarl and Gundecarl (9th and 11th centuries, respectively).E. Förstemann, Altdeutsches Namenbuch (1856), s.v. 'Carl' (303).
Slovak  Karol Slovene  Karel Spanish  Carlos  Carlito, CarlitosSwedish  Karl, Carl, Kalle Tagalog  Carlos  Welsh  Siarl   List of notable people called Charles  Media, arts and entertainment  In literature  Name DescriptionCharles Bukowski American poet and novelistCharles Dickens English novelistCharles Dodgson (pen-name Lewis Carroll) English clergyman, writer and mathematicianCharles Henri Ford American poet, photographer and writerCharles Fort American writer and researcher into anomalous phenomenaCharles L. Grant American science-fiction authorCharles Roger HargreavesChildren's author who wrote the Mr. Men and Little Miss series.
References  Category:English given names Category:English-language masculine given names Category:French masculine given names Category:Given names  cs:Karel
QUOTES ABOUT PLACES: In "The Third Man" Orson Welles said it "had 500 years of democracy & peace, & what did that produce?  The cuckoo clock"
Switzerland
In Switzerland, they had brotherly love, they had five hundred years of democracy and peace – and what did that produce?
3
Lime shoots and kills Paine, but Calloway shoots and wounds Lime.
At the risk of missing his flight out of Vienna, Martins waits to speak to Anna.
Welles in the Limelight JonathanRosenbaum.net n.p.
BARBRA STREISAND: In "Funny Girl" & "Funny Lady", Barbra Streisand portrayed this funny lady
Fanny Brice
Over the next six months at the club, some were comparing her singing voice to famous names such as Judy Garland, Lena Horne and Fanny Brice.
3
She also joined the Freshman Chorus and Choral Club, where she sang with another choir member and classmate, Neil Diamond.
Liberace invited her to Las Vegas, Nevada to perform as his opening act at the Riviera Hotel.
She performed this in a duet with Judy Garland on The Judy Garland Show.
LITERATURE: This author's "The Man Who Would Be King" has been called the perfect short story
Rudyard Kipling
"The Man Who Would Be King" (1888) is a novella by Rudyard Kipling.
3
[railroad] engine-drivers, petty contractors," and more, and have decided India is not big enough for them.
The 9th track on Iron Maiden's fifteenth studio album, The Final Frontier, is entitled "The Man Who Would Be King".
The song has no apparent connection with the novella apart from the title.
SI's SIGNS OF THE APOCALYPSE: This Miami Heat superstar center's "wife, Shaunie, said their family has outgrown its 18-bedroom home"
Shaquille O'Neal
In the offseason, Riley engineered a summer blockbuster trade for Shaquille O'Neal from the Los Angeles Lakers.
3
The first two games in San Antonio were split but the Heat fell to the Spurs 4-1, failing to 3-peat.
The series was marked by several suspensions, flagrant fouls, and confrontations between the players: Tyler Hansbrough's flagrant foul on Dwyane Wade (which drew blood), Udonis Haslem's retaliatory flagrant foul on Hansborough (which led to Haslem's Game 6 suspension), Wade colliding with Darren Collison in transition, Juwan Howard confronting Lance Stephenson over the latter's flashing of the choke sign to James, and Dexter Pittman elbowing Stephenson in the neck (which led to his own three-game suspension).
NamePositionTenureInducted– Pat Riley  Coach  1995–20032005–08  2008  Retired numbers
THE STATE'S JR. SENATOR: Joe Lieberman
Connecticut
Joseph Isadore "Joe" Lieberman (born February 24, 1942) is an American politician and former United States Senator from Connecticut.
3
In the 1986 general election, Lieberman won more votes than any other Democrat on the statewide ticket, including Governor William O'Neill.
Joe Lieberman looks hopefully toward the White House.
The Hartford Courant April 15, 2004.
LAST BUT NOT LEAST: This band gave its last concert with Jerry Garcia at Chicago's Soldier Field in 1995
the Grateful Dead
Jerome John "Jerry" Garcia (August 1, 1942 – August 9, 1995) was an American musician best known for his lead guitar work, singing and songwriting with the band the Grateful Dead, which came to prominence during the counterculture era in the 1960s.
3
His parents named him after composer Jerome Kern.
Garcia was well-noted for his "soulful extended guitar improvisations", which would frequently feature interplay between him and his fellow band members.
That March, he received a guitar that little is known about today.
YOUNGER MEN: Cato the Younger, great-grandson of Cato the Elder, supported Pompey & killed himself when this man took power
Julius Caesar
His epithet "Elder" distinguishes him from his equally famous great-grandson Cato the Younger, who opposed Julius Caesar.
3
§ 1.
Roman triumph
E.M. Jellinek, "Drinking and Alcohilics in Ancient Rome".
A CLOSER LOOK AT ART: (Jon of the Clue Crew shows a famous painting on the monitor.)  Notice the washbasin & the simple clothes hanging on the wall--this artist's painting is so intimate, it's been called a self-portrait; it's his bedroom in Arles
Van Gogh
The Dutch post-Impressionist painter Vincent van Gogh lived in Arles from 1888 to 1889 and produced over 300 paintings and drawings during his time there.
3
Arelate was a city of considerable importance in the province of Gallia Narbonensis.
Very unusually, the Roman bridge was not fixed but consisted of a pontoon-style bridge of boats, with towers and drawbridges at each end.
The friction between the Arian Christianity of the Visigoths and the Catholicism of the bishops sent out from Rome established deep roots for religious heterodoxy, even heresy, in Occitan culture.
5 MOVIES: The title of a 1982 Cher film asks Jimmy Dean to "come back to" this place
The Five and Dime
In the early 1980s, Cher made her Broadway debut in the play Come Back to the Five and Dime, Jimmy Dean, Jimmy Dean, and then starred in the film adaptation of the same title.
3
I was always thinking about when I was grown up and famous."
Her 1989 music video for "If I Could Turn Back Time" was the first ever to be banned by MTV.  Fashion thumb|left|170px|Cher on The Sonny and Cher Show in 1977; she was the first woman to expose her navel on television.
In an interview with Vanity Fair, she was critical of a variety of political topics, including Republican politicians like Sarah Palin and Jan Brewer.
IT'S CHER'S WORLD: At Cher's website, T-shirts & a thermal PJ set appear under this rhyming name
Cher Wear
Legacy and influence  thumb|right|170px|Wax figure of Cher wearing an outfit similar to the one she wore at the 60th Academy Awards in 1988 According to Goldmine magazine's Phill Marder, Cher "has been and remains today one of the Rock Era's most dominant figures".
3
She was so special ...
With Love, Chér (1967) includes songs described by biographer Mark Bego as "little soap-opera stories set to rock music" such as the U.S. top-ten hit "You Better Sit Down Kids".
With "Believe", she became the oldest female artist to have a U.S. number-one hit in the rock era, at the age of 52.
LEADERS & LANDS: President Hamid Karzai
Afghanistan
Hamid Karzai  (Pashto/Persian: حامد کرزی; born 24 December 1957) served as President of Afghanistan for almost ten years, from 7 December 2004 to 29 September 2014.
1
The family owns and operates several successful Afghan restaurants in the East Coast of the United States and in Chicago.
TRAVEL FUN: You'll want to munch on petha & gazak, signature sweets of this Taj Mahal city
Agra
Persian for "Crown of Palaces", ) is an ivory-white marble mausoleum on the south bank of the Yamuna river in the Indian city of Agra.
3
The finial is topped by a moon, a typical Islamic motif whose horns point heavenward.
More recent threats have come from environmental pollution on the banks of Yamuna River including acid rainAcid Rain and the Taj Mahal.
Indian Architecture: Its Psychology, Structure and History, John Murray.
A CINEMATIC FEAST: Jessica Tandy spins yarns to Kathy Bates in this tale named for an odd Southern treat
Fried Green Tomatoes
She became the oldest actress to receive the Academy Award for Best Actress for her role in Driving Miss Daisy (1989), for which she also won a BAFTA and a Golden Globe, and was nominated for an Academy Award for Best Supporting Actress for Fried Green Tomatoes (1991).
3
During the 1930s, she appeared in a large number of plays in London's West End, playing roles such as Ophelia (opposite John Gielgud's legendary Hamlet) and Katherine (opposite Laurence Olivier's Henry V).
Mary Murray1942Yesterday's Magicdaughter Cattrin1947Blanche DuBoisTony Award for Best Actress in a Play1950Hilda CraneHilda Crane1951Agnes1959Five Finger ExerciseLouise Harrington1966Agnes1971HomeMarjorie1977Fonsia DorseyTony Award for Best Actress in a PlayDrama Desk Award for Outstanding Actress in a Play1982FoxfireAnnie NationsTony Award for Best Actress in a PlayDrama Desk Award for Outstanding Actress in a Play1983Amanda Wingfield1986Lady Elizabeth Milne Nominated —
Motion Picture1963Lydia Brenner1975Bicentennial Minute for August 31, 1775, Destruction of Boston's Liberty TreeHerselfCBS Television Network, August 31, 1975 - Sponsor:  Royal Dutch Shell1976ButleyEdna Shaft1981Honky Tonk FreewayCarol1982Mrs.
AMELIA EARHART: (Jimmy of the Clue Crew is in the pilot's seat of a cockpit mockup.)  I'm at the National Geographic Society's Explorers Hall in a Lockheed Electra like the one in which  Amelia Earhart took off from this large island on her last flight
New Guinea
The pair departed Miami on June 1 and after numerous stops in South America, Africa, the Indian subcontinent and Southeast Asia, arrived at Lae, New Guinea, on June 29, 1937.
3
Marriage thumb|left|Earhart and Putnam in 1931 For a while Earhart was engaged to Samuel Chapman, a chemical engineer from Boston, breaking off her engagement on November 23, 1928.Lovell 1989, pp.
As Putnam had already sold his interest in the New York based publishing company to his cousin, Palmer, following the fire the couple decided to move to the West Coast where Putnam took up his new position as head of the editorial board of Paramount Pictures in North Hollywood.
Wait."
SHAKESPEAREAN ACTORS: Wearing just a few small leaves, Judi Dench leaves nothing to the imagination as Titania in this 1968 film
A Midsummer Night's Dream
In 2010, she renewed her collaboration with Peter Hall at the Rose Theatre in Kingston upon Thames in A Midsummer Night's Dream, which opened in February 2010; she played Titania as Queen Elizabeth I in her later years – almost 50 years after she first played the role for the Royal Shakespeare Company.
3
Although most of her work during this period was in theatre, she also branched into film work, and won a BAFTA Award as Most Promising Newcomer.
Actors often stayed in the Dench household.
In March 2013, she was listed as one of the fifty best-dressed over 50s by  The Guardian.
TRIALS OF THE CENTURY: Alger Hiss was indicted for this, defined as lying under oath
Perjury
Alger Hiss (November 11, 1904 – November 15, 1996) was an American government official who was accused of being a Soviet spy in 1948 and convicted of perjury in connection with this charge in 1950.
3
Anthony Summers, The Arrogance of Power: The Secret World of Richard Nixon (New York, London: Penguin-Putnam Inc, 2000), p. 77.
The verdict was upheld by the United States Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit (case citation 185 F.2d 822), and the Supreme Court of the United States denied a writ of certiorari (340 U.S. 948).
Also that the prosecution had withheld from Hiss and his lawyers the records of this surveillance, none of which provided any evidence that Hiss was a spy or a Communist.
NFL: In 1933 the first NFL championship tilt saw this team win 23-21 on a 4th quarter pass by Bronko Nagurski
the Chicago Bears
Professional career Nagurski turned professional to play for the Chicago Bears from 1930 to 1937.
3
His parents, "Mike" and Michelina Nagurski, were immigrants, from Western Ukraine (Halychyna/Galicia).
I wouldn't be carrying the ball 20 or 25 times a game."
The other starting defensive tackle on that list was Rich Glover.
TV BANDLEADERS: "Broadway Open House" accordionist, he led The Gong Show's "Band With A Thug"
Milton Delugg
right after this message!"  Musical direction Milton DeLugg, the show's musical director, was a popular musician and bandleader during the 1940s, and got the Gong Show job by default.
3
Future Super Bowl XXXV winning head coach Brian Billick also made an appearance, performing a routine known as the "spider monkey."  Dancer Danny Lockin, who had played Barnaby in the film Hello Dolly!, was murdered hours after winning the show taped August 21, 1977.
Members of the crew would toss random objects from the wings, littering the stage while Gene-Gene danced on, seemingly unaware of the activity around him.
Cancellation Despite fairly respectable ratings for a non-soap-opera midday show, NBC cancelled Gong, with its final episode to air on July 21, 1978.
CITY & STATUE: Sun Yat-Sen, at the corner of Grant & California
San Francisco
In Chinatown, San Francisco, there is a 12-foot statue of him on St. Mary's Square.
3
In Tokyo 1907–1908 members from the recently merged Restoration society raised doubts about Sun's credentials.
pg 87.
Rowman & Littlefield publishing.
RELIGIOUS LEADERS: He was the founder & first general of The Salvation Army
William Booth
Its founders Catherine and William Booth sought to bring salvation to the poor, destitute and hungry by meeting both their "physical and spiritual needs".
3
We believe that the Scriptures of the Old and New Testaments were given by inspiration of God, and that only they constitute the Divine rule of Christian faith and practice.
Salvation Army hopes to reap millions by supporting George Bush policy on gays' rights]  The Salvation Army states that it does not "discriminate against hiring gays and lesbians for the majority of its roughly 55,000 jobs".
In it, the Army explicitly rejected a claim, made by a party unnamed in the apology, that there were as many as 500 potential claimants.
THE CIVIL WAR: Confederate General John C. Breckinridge previously held this U.S. office under Pres. Buchanan
vice president
He represented the Commonwealth in both houses of Congress and in 1857, became the 14th and youngest-ever Vice President of the United States (1857–61).
3
Gaining confidence in his ability as a lawyer, Breckinridge moved his family back to Lexington in 1845 and formed a partnership with future U.S. Senator James B. Beck."John Cabell Breckinridge".
Davis, p. 59
Eight state delegations – with a total of 55 votes – voted for Breckinridge in spite of his refusal of the nomination, making him the second-highest vote getter.
19th CENTURY VPs: In 1848 future VP Henry Wilson helped form this party opposed to extending slavery to new territory
Free Soil Party
Originally a Whig, Wilson was a founder of the Free Soil Party in 1848, and served as the party chairman during the 1852 presidential election.
3
Throughout his career, Wilson was known for championing causes that were at times unpopular, including the abolition of slavery and workers' rights for both blacks and whites.
He had joined the Whigs out of disappointment with the fiscal policies of Andrew Jackson and Martin Van Buren, and like most Whigs blamed Democrats Jackson and Van Buren for the Panic of 1837.
Having left the Whig Party, Wilson worked to build coalitions with others opposed to slavery, including Free Soilers, anti-slavery Democrats, Barnburners from New York's Democratic Party, the Liberty Party, the anti-slavery remnants of the Whig Party, and anti-slavery members of the Know Nothing or Native American Party.
JEAN-CLAUDE VAN DAMME: Jean-Claude played a police agent chasing time-traveling criminals in this 1994 sci-fi thriller
Timecop
The most successful of these films include Bloodsport (1988), Kickboxer (1989), Lionheart (1990), Double Impact (1991), Universal Soldier (1992), Hard Target (1993), Street Fighter (1994), Timecop (1994), Sudden Death (1995), JCVD (2008) and The Expendables 2 (2012).
3
Film and television career thumb|left|Jean-Claude Van Damme at the Cannes Film Festival In 1982, Van Damme and childhood friend, Michel Qissi, moved to the United States in the hope of becoming action stars.
Van Damme indicated that Stallone might include him in The Expendables 3, in which Van Damme would play Claude Villain, the brother to his Expendables 2 character Jean Villain.
Ed Boon and John Tobias eventually decided to create a different character for the game named Johnny Cage, who is modelled after Jean-Claude Van Damme, primarily from Van Damme's appearance and outfit in the martial arts film Bloodsport.
PARTY TIME!: Harold Pinter wrote a 1958 play named for this kind of "party"
The Birthday Party
His best-known plays include The Birthday Party (1957), The Homecoming (1964), and Betrayal (1978), each of which he adapted for the screen.
3
Not so.
Pinter played the major role of Roote in a 1995 revival at the Minerva Theatre, Chichester.
Münder 220; cf.
U.S. PLACE NAMES: Popular with shoppers, this Pa. town was named for a tavern that was named after Frederick the Great
King of Prussia
Frederick I, Duke of Austria (Babenberg), Duke of Austria from 1195–1198  Frederick II, Duke of Austria (1219–1246), last Duke of Austria from the Babenberg dynasty  Frederick the Fair (Frederick I of Austria (Habsburg), 1286–1330), Duke of Austria and King of the Romans  Baden  Frederick I of Baden, Grand-Duke of Baden  Frederick II of Baden, Grand-Duke of Baden  Bohemia  Frederick, Duke of Bohemia (died 1189), Duke of Olomouc and Bohemia  Britain  Frederick, Prince of Wales (1707–1751), eldest son of King George II of England  Brandenburg/Prussia  Frederick I, Elector of Brandenburg (1371–1440), also known as Frederick VI, Burgrave of Nuremberg  Frederick II, Elector of Brandenburg (1413–1470), Margrave of Brandenburg  Frederick William I, Elector of Brandenburg (1620–1688), Duke of Prussia  Frederick I of Prussia (1657–1713), Elector of Brandenburg  Frederick II of Prussia (1712–1786), King of Prussia, Frederick the Great  Frederick III, German Emperor
1
Palatinate  Frederick IV, Elector Palatine (1574–1610), German aristocrat  Frederick V, Elector Palatine (1619–1620), Bohemian aristocrat  Saxony  Frederick III, Elector of Saxony (1463–1525), known as Frederick the Wise  Frederick Augustus I of Saxony (1750–1827), Elector and King of Saxony  Frederick Augustus II of Saxony (1797–1854), King of Saxony  Frederick Augustus III of Saxony (1865–1932), King of Saxony  Sweden  Frederick I of Sweden (1676–1751), King of Sweden  Württemberg  Frederick of Württemberg (1754–1816), Duke, Elector, and King of Württemberg   Other people   Frederick Banting (1891–1941), Canadian doctor who co-discovered insulin  Fred Dibnah (1938–2004), English steeplejack and television personality  Frederick Douglass (1818–1891), American abolitionist, editor, orator, author, statesman and reformer  Frederick Augustus Forbes (1818–1878), Australian politician  Frederick Forsyth (born 1938), British novelist  Freddy Stephen Fuller, Canadian ex-amateur boxer  Fred Hollows (1929–1993), Australian ophthalmologist and philanthropist  Frederick Pei Li (born 1940), American physician and co-discoverer of Li-Fraumeni syndrome  Frederik Magle (born 1977), Danish composer  Fred Meyer (1927–2012), American politician   Frederick Norris (1921–2006), British marathon runner  Frederick de la Roche (died 1173), the sixth Latin archbishop of Tyre  Frederick Segura (born 1979), Venezuelan track and road cyclist  Frederick Skiff (1867–1947), American author, collector and bibliophile  Fred "Sonic" Smith (1949–1994), MC5 guitarist  Frederick Varley (1881–1969), artist   Fictional people   Frederick (Animal Farm), the owner of Pinchfield Farm in the novel by George Orwell  Frederick Gaylord Crane, (TV) fictional child of Lilith and Frasier Crane on the American TV shows "Cheers" and "Frasier"   Places  United States  Frederick, Colorado, a town in Weld County  Frederick, Kansas, a town  Frederick County, Maryland  Frederick, Maryland, a city in Frederick County  Frederick, Michigan, a ghost town  Frederick, Ohio, an unincorporated community  Frederick, Oklahoma, a city in Tillman County  Frederick, South Dakota, a town in Brown County  Frederick County, Virginia  Frederick Creek, a stream in Minnesota  Frederick Sound, a sound in Alaska  Canada  Frederick Sound (Canada), a sound in British Columbia   Other uses   Frederick, a merchant sailing ship wrecked in 1818  "Frederick" (song) by Patti Smith   See also   Federico
ANCIENT EGYPT: A Greek scholar named Callimachus wrote a bibliographical survey of the authors of the books held here
the Alexandrian Library
The Alexandrian Library and the Origins of Bibliography, trans.
3
It is important to note that Callimachus did not seem to have any models for his pinakes, and invented this system on his own.
Hymn to Apollo (OUP, 1978).
H.H. Wellisch (U. Wisconsin, 1991).
FILLING FOODS: Dijon ____ greens
mustard
Dijon is famous for Dijon mustard which originated in 1856, when Jean Naigeon of Dijon substituted verjuice, the acidic "green" juice of not-quite-ripe grapes, for vinegar in the traditional mustard recipe.
3
Sights thumb|left|Porte Guillaume (Guillaume Gate), Place Darcy (Darcy Square), in the center of Dijon.
It was designed by the Dijon-born architect Jacques Cellerier (1742–1814) in the Neo-classical style with an interior modelled on Italian opera houses.
Ministère de la Culture et de la Communication de France.
THE GREEN HORNET: The Green Hornet's car, it shares its name with an Anna Sewell horse
Black Beauty
(1993) ISBN 0-19-214176-7 was an English novelist, best known as the author of the classic 1877 novel Black Beauty.
3
The maker of the omnibus by Jack Hodges.
Although it is now considered a children's classic, she originally wrote it for those who worked with horses.
p. 95.
TURN OF THE CENTURY MOVIES: A young cop works with rogue detective Denzel Washington on the narcotics beat in Los Angeles
Training Day
He has received three Golden Globe awards, a Tony Award, and two Academy Awards: Best Supporting Actor for the historical war drama film Glory (1989) and Best Actor for his role as a corrupt cop in the crime thriller Training Day (2001).(April 4, 2002). "Halle Berry, Denzel Washington get historic wins at Oscars.
3
The guys I was hanging out with at the time, my running buddies, have now done maybe 40 years combined in the penitentiary.
Mary's: A When-Did Timeline", p. 30, By Janet Butler Haugaard, Executive Editor and Writer, St. Mary's College of Maryland with Susan G. Wilkinson, Director of Marketing and Communications, Historic St. Mary's City Commission and Julia A. King, Associate Professor of Anthropology, St. Mary's College of Maryland.
In 1995, Denzel and Pauletta renewed their wedding vows in South Africa with Archbishop Desmond Tutu officiating."Denzel Washington and Wife Celebrate 27th Wedding Anniversary in Italy", LoveTripper.com, June 28, 2009  Washington is a devout Christian, and has considered becoming a preacher.
EERIE TV ANTHOLOGIES: This Rod Serling series that "hung around" NBC was cut from 60 minutes to 30 in 1972
Night Gallery
Night Gallery  In 1969, NBC aired a Serling-penned pilot for a new series, Night Gallery.
3
Without your degree, where will you be after the war?"Sander, p.36.
Rosenbaum, Bob.
Themes  According to his wife, Rod Serling often said that "the ultimate obscenity is not caring, not doing something about what you feel, not feeling!
COMPUTER HISTORY: 1995 brought us the file format known as VRML, which enables 3-D graphics for the web; "VR" stands for this
virtual reality
VRML (Virtual Reality Modeling Language, pronounced vermal or by its initials, originally—before 1995—known as the Virtual Reality Markup Language) is a standard file format for representing 3-dimensional (3D) interactive vector graphics, designed particularly with the World Wide Web in mind.
3
30 Oct 1995.
VRML97 was used on the Internet on some personal homepages and sites such as "CyberTown", which offered 3D chat using Blaxxun Software.
H-Anim is a standard for animated Humanoids, which is based around VRML, and later X3D.
WRITERS NAMED JAMES: He adapted his novel "Deliverance" for the big screen & played a sheriff in the 1972 movie
James Dickey
The film is based on the 1970 novel of the same name by American author James Dickey, who has a small role in the film as the Sheriff.
2
The canoe scenes were filmed in the Tallulah Gorge southeast of Clayton and on the Chattooga River.
Soundtrack and copyright dispute The film's soundtrack brought new attention to the banjo work "
BATTLE CRIES: This battle cry may have come from a cartoon that appeared in the Washington Post on April 3, 1898
Remember the Maine
In 1898, during the Spanish–American War, The Post printed Clifford K. Berryman's classic illustration Remember the Maine, which became the battle-cry for American sailors during the War.
3
The latter two are in a tabloid format.
After Wilkins' death in 1903, his sons John and Robert ran The Post for two years before selling it in 1905 to John Roll McLean, owner of the Cincinnati Enquirer.
Bartlett, Bruce (March 13, 2007). "Partisan Press Parity?".
DAN RATHER: Dan Rather was co-editor of this TV show from 1975 to 1981
60 MInutes
He also contributed to CBS's 60 Minutes.
3
Daniel Irvin "Dan" Rather, Jr. (born October 31, 1931) is an American journalist and the former news anchor for the CBS Evening News.
This story infuriated local journalists at then-CBS affiliate KRLD-TV (now Fox-owned-and-operated KDFW-TV).
Gen. William B. Caldwell and Sergeant Maj.
THE ADAM SANDLER STORY: In 1998 Adam Sandler was Bobby Boucher, this title "boy" at a Lousiana university
The Waterboy
He is best known for his comedic roles, such as in the films Billy Madison (1995), the sports comedies Happy Gilmore (1996) and The Waterboy (1998), the romantic comedy The Wedding Singer (1998), Big Daddy (1999), and Mr. Deeds (2002), and voicing Dracula in Hotel Transylvania (2012) and Hotel Transylvania 2 (2015).
3
Adam Richard Sandler (born September 9, 1966) is an American actor, comedian, screenwriter, film producer, and musician.
Schneider had larger roles in Sandler films Big Daddy, 50 First Dates, Eight Crazy Nights, You Don't Mess with the Zohan, and Grown Ups.
1995 Best Comedic Performance Billy Madison  Note: Click on the 'Winners' tab.
FAMILY FILMS: Steve Martin played hapless dad George Banks in this 1991 matrimonial comedy
Father of the Bride
Martin also starred in a remake of the comedy Father of the Bride in 1991 (followed by a sequel in 1995), and in the 1992 comedy Housesitter, with Goldie Hawn and Dana Delany.
3
His next album, A Wild and Crazy Guy (1978), was an even bigger success, reaching the No.
In 2007, he published a memoir, Born Standing Up, which Time magazine named as one of the Top 10 Nonfiction Books of 2007, ranking it at  6, and praising it as "a funny, moving, surprisingly frank memoir."
On July 28, 2007, after three years together, Martin married Anne Stringfield, a writer and former staffer for The New Yorker magazine.
MUSIC: The Everly Brothers sang close two-part ones
harmonies
They were introduced by Neil Young, who observed that every musical group he belonged to had tried and failed to copy the Everly Brothers' harmonies.
3
Jerry Bledsoe. "Ike and Margaret Everly Don't Like Doing Nothing." Greensboro (NC) Daily News, November 29, 1971, p. B1.
The brothers joined Simon & Garfunkel in their "Old Friends" reunion tour of 2003 and 2004.
For Paul Simon, it was not the first time he had performed with his heroes; in 1986, the Everlys had sung background vocals on the title track of Simon's album Graceland.
LITERARY BRAWLS: At Key West in 1936, Wallace Stevens broke his hand punching this man, who responded by knocking Stevens down
Ernest Hemingway
The following year, Stevens allegedly assaulted Ernest Hemingway at a party at the Waddell Avenue home of a mutual acquaintance in Key West.
3
Letter from Father Arthur Hanley to Professor Janet McCann, July 24, 1977Maria J. Cirurgião, “
Likewise, were we to place a jar on a hill in Tennessee, we would impose an order onto the landscape.
Fred Hersch recorded a piece named "Thirteen Ways" for piano, clarinet, and percussion on his album of the same name.
POETIC BIRDS: Wallace Stevens (I of XIII):"Among twenty snowy mountains/ The only moving thing/ Was the eye of a ___"
blackbird
"Disillusionment of Ten O'Clock," "The Emperor of Ice-Cream," "The Idea of Order at Key West," "Sunday Morning," "The Snow Man," and "Thirteen Ways of Looking at a Blackbird."  Life and career  Education and marriage The son of a prosperous lawyer, Stevens attended Harvard as a non-degree special student, after which he moved to New York City and briefly worked as a journalist.
3
His first major publication (four poems from a sequence entitled "Phases" in the November 1914 edition of Poetry Magazine)Wallace Stevens (search results), Poetry Magazine. was written at age 35, although as an undergraduate at Harvard, Stevens had written poetry and exchanged sonnets with George Santayana, with whom he was close through much of his life.
Because it is constantly changing as we attempt to find imaginatively satisfying ways to perceive the world, reality is an activity, not a static object.
Wallace Stevens' Supreme Fiction: A New Romanticism (1987) Doggett, Frank.
THE PLAYER'S PRO TEAM: Kirby Puckett
the Minnesota Twins
He played his entire 12-year Major League Baseball (MLB) career as a center fielder for the Minnesota Twins (1984–1995).
3
Kirby was also recognized for his defensive skills, earning his first Gold Glove Award.
The game went into extra innings, and in the first at-bat of the bottom of the 11th, Puckett hit a dramatic game-winning home run on a 2–1 count off of Charlie Leibrandt to send the Series to Game 7.
The Twins retired Puckett's number 34 in 1997.
KIBBUTZ LIFE: (Jimmy of the Clue Crew reports from Kibbutz Amiad in Israel.)  The kibbutz scene began as utopian communities, combining socialism with this movement to reestablish a Jewish homeland
Zionism
Kibbutzim began as utopian communities, a combination of socialism and Zionism.
3
When the kibbutz was perceived as an initiator for values and national objectives, it was very much appreciated in the Israeli society and it was easier for the members to identify themselves with the kibbutz, its function and its significance.
Not having traditional marriage was seen as a way to dissolve the patriarchy and give women their own standing without depending on a man (economically or socially) and was also viewed as a positive thing for the community as a whole, as communal life was the main aspect of the kibbutz.
The poet Rachel rhapsodized on the landscape from viewpoints from various Galilee kibbutzim in the 1920s and 1930s.
NEAR EAST ANCIENT HISTORY: Dagon was the top god of these people, whose name has come to mean "uncouth" & "unsophisticated"
the Philistines
He was also a major member, or perhaps head, of the pantheon of the Philistines.
3
Dagon < Late Greek (Ec.)
In Ugarit around 1300 BC, Dagon had a large temple and was listed third in the pantheon following a father-god and Ēl, and preceding Baīl Ṣapān (that is the god Haddu or Hadad/Adad).
In other texts, his wife is Ishara.
PLACES FOR PILGRIMS: Uluru, also known as this rock, is a sacred site to Aborigines in Australia
Ayers Rock
Uluru (), also known as Ayers Rock  and officially gazetted as UluruAyers Rock, is a large sandstone rock formation in the southern part of the Northern Territory in central Australia.
3
When relatively fresh, the rock has a grey colour, but weathering of iron-bearing minerals by the process of oxidation gives the outer surface layer of rock a red-brown rusty colour.
Yulara Ultraviolet (UV) Index Forecast Graph.
Cold season bringing morning frosts  Piriyakutu (August/September/October) –
BIRTHPLACES: Quelle Surprise!  Yo-Yo Ma & Kathie Lee Gifford were both born in this city
Paris
Born in Paris, he spent his schooling years in New York City and was a child prodigy, performing from the age of five.
3
The work is based on a poetic description written for the composer of the evolution of brain into mind by neuroscientist Antonio Damasio and featured, at the premiere, a film of brain scans provided by Hanna Damasio and other images, coordinated with the music during the performance.
Pieces he performed included the Sarabande movement from Bach's Cello Suite No.
In 2011, Ma performed with American dancer Charles "Lil Buck" Riley in the United States and in China at the U.S.-China Forum on the Arts and Culture.
HIT SONGS: This song by Christina Aguilera says, "You are" this, "no matter what they say" & "in every single way"
beautiful
Her 2002 fourth studio album, Stripped, ventured into various genres including hip hop, Latin, and rock, and won a Grammy Award for Best Female Pop Vocal Performance for its second single "Beautiful".
3
The album was a commercial success in the United States, peaking at number one on the Billboard 200 and was certified octuple platinum by the Recording Industry Association of America (RIAA) for having shipped eight million copies.
Its lead single, "Your Body", peaked at number 34 on the Billboard Hot 100 and entered the top 40 charts of several regions including New Zealand, Spain and Sweden.
She released her fourth fragrance, By Night, in October 2009, which became the third best selling fragrance in the United Kingdom in 2009.
BROADWAY MUSICALS: Jonathan Pryce won a Tony for playing a pimp known as "The Engineer" in this Vietnam war-set musical
Miss Saigon
His career in theatre has also been prolific, and he has won two Tony Awards—the first in 1977 for his Broadway debut in Comedians, the second for his 1991 role as The Engineer in the musical Miss Saigon.
3
He was educated at Holywell Grammar School (today Holywell High School), and, at the age of 16, he went to art college and then started training to be a teacher at Edge Hill College (now Edge Hill University) in Ormskirk.
After appearing mostly in films, such as the Ian McEwan-scripted The Ploughman's Lunch, and Martin Luther, Heretic (both also 1983), he achieved a breakthrough with his role as the subdued protagonist Sam Lowry in the Terry Gilliam film, Brazil (1985)."Entertainment Weekly's Top 50 Cult Movies (Brazil #13)".
In this adaptation of Andrew Lloyd Webber's stage musical, Pryce portrayed the Argentinian president Juan Perón.
WOODS: Created by this author, Mirkwood was originally called Greenwood until Sauron's shadow fell on it
Tolkien
Places    Australia   Greenwood, Western Australia, a suburb of Perth   Canada   Greenwood, Calgary, Alberta, a neighbourhood  Greenwood, British Columbia, a city  Greenwood, Nova Scotia, a village  CFB Greenwood, an RCAF/Canadian Forces base located near the village of Greenwood  Greenwood, Halifax County, Nova Scotia, a community in the Halifax Regional Municipality  Greenwood, Ontario  Greenwood, Durham Regional Municipality, Ontario  Greenwood, Huron County, Ontario  Greenwood, Renfrew County, Ontario  Greenwood (electoral district)  Greenwood Yard, a Toronto Transit Commission subway train yard  Greenwood (TTC), a station on the subway system in Toronto  Greenwood Raceway, a defunct harness horse-racing track in Toronto   United Kingdom   Greenwood or Greenwode, a settlement near Heptonstall in West Yorkshire, England  GreenWood Forest Park, a theme park in North Wales  Greenwood Public House, Birmingham, a pub in Chelmsley Wood  Green Wood Centre, Shropshire, formerly the Greenwood Trust, a centre for the coppice revival  The Community Forest better known as Sherwood Forest   United States   Greenwood, Arkansas Greenwood, El Dorado County, California Greenwood, Glenn County, California Greenwood, California, former name of Elk, Mendocino County, California  Greenwood Village, Colorado, a city  Greenwood, Delaware  Greenwood, Florida  Greenwood, Illinois  Mount Greenwood, Chicago, Illinois  Greenwood, Indiana  Greenwood, Louisville, Kentucky  Erlanger, Kentucky, previously known as Greenwood  Greenwood, Louisiana  Greenwood, Maine  Greenwood (MBTA station) in Wakefield, Massachusetts  Greenwood, Minnesota  Greenwood (Columbia, Missouri), a house  Greenwood, Mississippi  Greenwood Springs, Mississippi  Greenwood, Missouri  Greenwood, Nebraska  Greenwood Lake, interstate lake in New Jersey and New York  Greenwood, New York  Greenwood Lake, New York, a village  Greenwood Museum, Smyrna, New York  Greenwood, Tulsa, Oklahoma  Greenwood Furnace State Park in Pennsylvania  Greenwood, South Carolina  Greenwood, Charles Mix County, South Dakota  Greenwood, Lawrence County, South Dakota  Greenwood, Midland County, Texas   Greenwood, Parker County, Texas   Greenwood, Wise County, Texas   Greenwood, Seattle, Washington  Greenwood, Wisconsin, a city in Clark County  Greenwood, Taylor County, Wisconsin, a town  Greenwood, Vernon County, Wisconsin, a town  Greenwood (community), Vernon County, Wisconsin, an unincorporated community   In fiction   Greenwood the Great, also known as Mirkwood, a fictional forest in J.R.R. Tolkien's Middle-earth saga   See also    Greenwood Academy (disambiguation)  Greenwood Cemetery (disambiguation)  Greenwood County (disambiguation)  Greenwood High School (disambiguation)  Greenwood River (disambiguation)  Greenwood station (disambiguation)  Greenwood Township (disambiguation)  Under the Greenwood Tree, an 1872 novel by Thomas Hardy  References
3
Green wood is unseasoned wood.
Greenwood or Green wood may also refer to:  Lumber  Pressure treated lumber, wood treated with a preservative that gives the wood a green hue  Music  Greenwood, a song written by Peter Yarrow and performed by Peter, Paul, and Mary.
People  Greenwood (surname)  Companies  Greenwood Events, a London based running events company spelt specifically with a lower case 'w' in Greenwood  Greenwoods, a menswear store chain  Greenwood Publishing Group  Greenwood Clean Energy, an American company that manufactures wood and biomass central heating systems  GreenWood, an American non-profit that supports good forest management and sustainable development.
THE EX FILES: Her "Love Story" with Robert Evans ended when she made a "Getaway" with Steve McQueen
Ali MacGraw
He worked for director Sam Peckinpah again with the leading role in  The Getaway, where he met future wife Ali MacGraw.
3
After this he resolved to focus his energies on self-improvement and embraced the Marines' discipline.
April 21, 2007.Tucker, Reed, Isaac Guzman and John Anderson.
Metro.co.uk –
THE MOVIES: Elmer Bernstein did the classic music for this movie in which Steve McQueen flees Nazis on a motorcycle
The Great Escape
The Magnificent Seven, The Great Escape, and The Towering Inferno.
3
The other guys in the bungalow had ways of paying you back for interfering with their well-being."
At 29, McQueen got a significant break when Frank Sinatra removed Sammy Davis, Jr., from the film
In 1963, McQueen starred in Love with the Proper Stranger with Natalie Wood.
TELEVISION: (VIDEO DAILY DOUBLE):"(Hi, I'm Fred Savage):In an episode of "Working", I pick up Danica McKellar, who played this "Wonder Years" character"
Winnie Cooper
She played Kevin Arnold's on-off girlfriend Winnie Cooper in the television series The Wonder Years, and later wrote four non-fiction books: Math Doesn't Suck, Kiss My Math, Hot X: Algebra Exposed and Girls
2
McKellar's Erdős number is four and her Erdős–Bacon number is 6."There's not much separating her from Bacon, Erdős", USA Today, August 14, 2007   Personal life
The book's target audience is girls in the 7th through 9th grades.
19TH CENTURY AMERICA: On May 1, 1898 Commodore George Dewey sailed into this bay
Manila Bay
Admiral Dewey is best known for his victory at the Battle of Manila Bay during the Spanish–American War.
3
George was baptized and attended Sunday school there.
Hero thumb|Dewey on the cover of an 1899 souvenir calendar Returning to the United States in 1899, he received a hero's welcome.
Dewey Street, in St. Paul, Minnesota, was renamed in his honor.
ROCK & POP: Of a steamroller, airplane or 2 U.S. cities, it was what the group Buffalo Springfield was named after
A steamroller
The group's name was taken from the side of a steamroller made by the Springfield, Ohio-based Buffalo-Springfield Roller Company, that had been parked on the street outside Friedman's house where Stills and Furay were staying at the time.
3
Ever distrustful of Greene and Stone, Young and Stills bickered between themselves, and each insisted on producing the recording sessions for his own compositions.
Surviving Buffalo Springfield members Young, Stills, and Furay reunited at the annual Bridge School Benefit concerts on October 23 and 24, 2010, in Mountain View, California.
According to Furay and a band spokesman, the group was supposed do a full tour in 2012, but this was put on hold, because Young was recording two new albums with Crazy Horse.
THE STATE OF MY BIRTH: Medgar Evers, Oprah Winfrey, Eudora Welty
Mississippi
Her house in Jackson, Mississippi has been designated as a National Historic Landmark and is open to the public as a house museum.
2
Near the time of her high school graduation, Eudora moved with her family to a house built for them at 1119 Pinehurst Street, which would remain her permanent address until her death.
Retrieved May 26, 2009.
MAFIA FAMILY TIES: Powerful family leader Carlo Gambino was born on this island in 1902 & died on Long Island in 1976
Sicily
Early life  Carlo Gambino was born in the city of Palermo, Sicily, in 1902, to a family that belonged to the Honored Society.
3
However, Masseria still had to deal with the powerful Maranzano and his Castellammarese clan.
Masseria demanded absolute loyalty from the other criminals in his area, and killed anyone who failed to comply.
Farrar Straus and Young, 1992.
BIBLICAL GEOGRAPHY: Before "sightseeing" in this city, Samson was stripped of his sight
Gaza
Later, Samson travels to Gaza, where he stays at a harlot's house.
3
At the urgent and tearful imploring of his bride, Samson told her the solution, and she told it to the thirty groomsmen.
Once inside the temple, Samson, his hair having grown long again, asks the servant who is leading him to the temple's supporting pillars if he may lean against them.
Samson's strength was divinely derived (Talmud, Tractate Sotah 10a).(Midrash Genesis Rabbah xcviii. 18)  Jewish legend records that Samson's shoulders were sixty cubits broad.
PICTURESQUE: Yousuf Karsh created definitive portraiture immortalizing such subjects as Winston Churchill and this author
Ernest Hemingway
Some famous subjects photographed by Karsh were Field Marshal Lord Alanbrooke, Muhammad Ali, Marian Anderson, W. H. Auden, Joan Baez, Prince Bernhard of Lippe-Biesterfeld, Zulfiqar Ali Bhutto, Humphrey Bogart, Alexander Calder, Pablo Casals, Fidel Castro, Madame Chiang Kai-Shek, Winston Churchill, Joan Crawford, Ruth Draper, Albert Einstein, Dwight Eisenhower, Princess Elizabeth, Robert Frost, Clark Gable, Indira Gandhi, Grey Owl, Ernest Hemingway, Audrey Hepburn, Pope John Paul II, Chuck Jones, Carl Jung, Helen Keller and Polly Thompson, Grace Kelly, Jacqueline Kennedy, John F. Kennedy, Peter Lorre, The Marx Brothers, Pandit Nehru, Georgia O'Keeffe, Laurence Olivier, General Pershing, Pablo Picasso, Pope Pius XII, Prince Rainier of Monaco, Paul Robeson, the rock band Rush, Albert Schweitzer, George Bernard Shaw, Jean Sibelius, Pierre Elliott Trudeau, Andy Warhol, and Frank Lloyd Wright.
3
He grew up during the Armenian Genocide where he wrote, "I saw relatives massacred; my sister died of starvation as we were driven from village to village."
He photographed many of the great and celebrated personalities of his generation.
Canada Post honoured the 100th anniversary of the birth of Yousuf Karsh by releasing an artist's series of three stamps depicting Karsh images.
"LE" CATEGORIE: He's the lead singer of Duran Duran
Simon Le Bon
The group was formed by keyboardist Nick Rhodes and bassist John Taylor, with the later addition of drummer Roger Taylor, and after numerous personnel changes, guitarist Andy Taylor and lead singer Simon Le Bon.
3
Duran Duran parted ways with Capitol/EMI in 1999, although the label has since used Duran Duran's back catalogue to release several compilations of remixes and rare vinyl-only B-sides.
While supporting Medazzaland and Pop Trash, Duran Duran toured with bassist Wes Wehmiller and drummer Joe Travers.
Other contributing artists included Carla Bruni, Devendra Banhart, Edward Sharpe & the Magnetic Zeros, and Warpaint.
SPORTS ILLUSTRATED 50th ANNIVERSARY: After breaking the 4-minute mile, he wrote an article for Sports Illustrated on "The Joy of Running"
Roger Bannister
Sportsman of the Year  Since its inception in 1954, Sports Illustrated magazine has annually presented the Sportsman of the Year award to "the athlete or team whose performance that year most embodies the spirit of sportsmanship and achievement." Roger Bannister won the first ever Sportsman of the year award thanks to his record breaking time of 3:59.4 for a mile (the first ever time a mile had been run under four minutes).
3
More importantly, perhaps, many feel that 24-hour-a-day cable sports television networks and sports news web sites have forever diminished the role a weekly publication can play in today's world, and that it is unlikely any magazine will ever again achieve the level of prominence that SI once had.
Sportsman of the Century thumb|Sports Illustrated Sportsman of the Century Muhammad Ali In 1999, Sports Illustrated named Muhammad Ali, the Sportsman of the Century, at the Sports Illustrateds 20th Century Sports Awards in New York's Madison Square Garden.
Sports Illustrated covers  The magazine's cover is the basis of a sports myth known as the Sports Illustrated Cover Jinx.
IF IT'S WEDNESDAY THEY MUST BE BELGIANS: Eddy Merckx won this noted bike race 5 times, the first in 1969 when he was 24
the Tour de France
At the behest of his team, Merckx raced the Giro d'Italia instead of the Tour de France.
3
thumb|upright|At the 1967 Giro d'Italia Merckx won his first Grand Tour stages on the way to finishing ninth overall.|alt=Eddy Merckx being pushed while on bike before a stage.
Merckx won the race's sixth stage through attacking before the leg's final major climb, the Ballon d'Alsace, and then outlasting his competitors who were able to follow him initially.
He became the third rider to win La Flèche Wallonne and Liège–Bastogne–Liège in the same weekend.
"SH"!  I'M WATCHING TV!: Don Rickles exercised his "jaws" as this chief petty officer
C.P.O. Sharkey
In 1976-1978, he starred in the sitcom C.P.O. Sharkey, which lasted two seasons.
3
Witchel, Alex. " I'm
Rickles considers this performance the highlight of his career.
"I'm in good health.
RUSSIAN CINEMA: This man directed the classic Russian films "Alexander Nevsky" & "Ivan the Terrible"
Sergei Eisenstein
In 1938, Sergei Eisenstein made one of his most acclaimed films, Alexander Nevsky, on Alexander's victory over the Teutonic Knights.
3
In spring of 1241 he returned from his exile, gathered an army, and drove out the invaders.
Historians seem to be unsure about Alexander’s behavior when it came to his relations with Mongols.
He is known to have gone to the Horde himself and achieved success in exempting Russians from fighting beside the Tatar army in its wars with other peoples.
SEASONAL CINEMA: Richard Gere & Winona Ryder have a May-December romance in this weepy 2000 drama
Autumn in New York
T2000Autumn in New YorkWill Keane2002The Mothman PropheciesJohn Klein2002UnfaithfulEdward Sumner2002ChicagoBilly Flynn2004Shall We Dance?John Clark2005Bee SeasonSaul Naumann2007The HoaxClifford Irving2007The Hunting PartySimon2007I'm
3
His first major acting role was in the original London stage version of Grease in 1973.
The Gere Foundation.
Honors and awards In 1995 he was the President of the Jury at the 19th Moscow International Film Festival.
ROCK & ROLL FRONTMEN: Roger Daltrey
The Who
In a career spanning more than 50 years, Daltrey came to prominence in the mid 1960s as the founder and lead singer of the English rock band The Who, which released fourteen singles that entered the top ten charts in the United Kingdom during the 1960s, 1970s, and 1980s, including "I Can't Explain", "My Generation", "Substitute", "I'm a Boy", "Happy Jack", "Pictures of Lily", "Pinball Wizard", "Won't Get Fooled Again", and "You Better You Bet".
3
Early life Roger Harry Daltrey was born in the Hammersmith area of London on 1 March 1944, one of three children born to parents Irene and Harry Daltrey.
Anyway, Anyhow, Anywhere", was the only song on which Daltrey and Townshend collaborated, and Daltrey only wrote two other songs for the band during these years.
The collaboration came about through Anthrax guitarist Scott Ian's girlfriend, Pearl Aday, daughter of Meat Loaf, whose mother was a friend of Daltrey and his wife.
STEAMBOATS: Mark Twain recounts learning to pilot steamboats called Paul Jones & Crescent City in this 1883 memoir
Life on the Mississippi
61–65, at   Twain describes in Life on the Mississippi how, when he was a boy, "there was but one permanent ambition" among his comrades: to be a steamboatman.
3
It brought him national attention.
Edited by Louis J. Budd.
A True Story, Repeated Word for Word As I Heard It from The Atlantic Monthly.
MARK TWAIN: Mark Twain was a pen name; this was his real name
Samuel Langhorne Clemens
thumb|Mark Twain (1909) thumb|right|Samuel L. Clemens stamp, 1940  Samuel Langhorne Clemens (November 30, 1835 – April 21, 1910), better known by his pen name Mark Twain, was an American author and humorist.
3
A year later, he traveled to the Sandwich Islands (present-day Hawaii) as a reporter for the Sacramento Union.
New York:
Critical Companion to Mark Twain: A Literary Reference to His Life and Work, Facts On File, 2007.
TRUMAN CAPOTE: Capote called this writer "Maestro of the Semicolon" & co-wrote a movie version of his "The Turn of the Screw"
Henry James
The Innocents| Screenplay based on The Turn of the Screw by Henry James; 1962 Edgar Award, from the Mystery Writers of America, to Capote and William Archibald for Best Motion Picture Screenplay |- | 1963 | Selected Writings of Truman Capote| Midcareer retrospective anthology; fiction and nonfiction |- | 1964 | |
3
In 1933, he moved to New York City to live with his mother and her second husband, Joseph Capote, a Cuban-born textile broker, who adopted him as his stepson and renamed him Truman García Capote.
They are Beverly, a student at the University of Kansas, and Mrs. Donald G. Jarchow of Mount Carroll, Illinois.
In 1992, he recreated his performance in the play Tru for the PBS series American Playhouse and won an Emmy Award for his performance.
GEOGRAPH"IA": Lake Titicaca is on the border of Peru & this country
Bolivia
Titicaca (in the hispanicized spelling) or Titiqaqa (Quechua) is a large, deep lake in the Andes on the border of Peru and Bolivia.
3
Palaeogeography, Palaeoclimatology, Palaeoecology 194:281-297.Rigsby, C., P. A. Baker and M. S. Aldenderfer 2003 Fluvial History of the Rio Ilave Valley, Peru, and Its Relationship to Climate and Human History.
Quaternary Research 56(1):1-9.Mourguiart, P., T. Corrége, D. Wirrmann, J. Argollo, M. E. Montenegro, M. Pourchet and P. Carbonel 1998
These artifacts are currently on display in the site museum of the village of Challapampa.
MICHELLE PFEIFFER PFILMS: Daniel Day-Lewis is Newland Archer to Michelle's Countess Olenska in this film based on a novel by Edith Wharton
The Age of Innocence
During the post war years she divided her time between Hyères and Provence, where she finished The Age of Innocence in 1920.
3
Edith Wharton: An Extraordinary Life, An Illustrated Biography, p.210.
She is buried next to her long-time friend, Walter Berry.
Intense Love’s Utterance” is a poem written about Henry Stevens.
ALL I WANT FOR ISTHMUS: To travel from this country's mainland to Sevastapol in the Crimea, traverse the Isthmus of Perekop
Ukraine
It became the Autonomous Republic of Crimea within newly independent Ukraine in 1991, with Sevastopol having its own administration, within Ukraine but outside of the Autonomous Republic.
3
Since the Russian annexation of Crimea in early 2014 and subsequent sanctions targeting Crimea, the tourist industry has suffered major losses.
The Crimean Tatars were forcibly expelled to Central Asia by Joseph Stalin's government as a form of collective punishment, on the grounds that they had formed pro-German Tatar Legions.
Besides the Crimean Germans, Stalin in 1944 also deported 70,000 Greeks, 14,000 Bulgarians"The Persecution of Pontic Greeks in the Soviet Union" (PDF) and 3,000 Italians.
"HARRY" MOVIES: In 1984 Paul Newman starred in "Harry And Son"; 10 years earlier, Art Carney won an Oscar for this film
Harry And Tonto
He is best known for playing sewer worker Ed Norton, opposite Jackie Gleason's Ralph Kramden in the sitcom The Honeymooners, and for winning the Academy Award for Best Actor for his role in Harry and Tonto.
2
One of his radio roles during the 1940s was the first Red Lantern on Land of the Lost.
In it, he played Trader Saun Dann, a member of the Rebel Alliance who helped Chewbacca and his family evade an Imperial blockade.
19th CENTURY AMERICAN LIT: In 1853 Harriet Beecher Stowe published "A Key to" this novel, with facts & figures to back up its accuracy
Uncle Tom's Cabin
She came from a famous religious family and is best known for her novel Uncle Tom's Cabin (1852).
3
ISBN 978-0-8021-4390-7 She was the seventh of 13 children born to outspoken Calvinist preacher Lyman Beecher and Roxana (Foote), a deeply religious woman who died when Stowe was only five years old.
She imagined that she was engaged in the original composition, and for several hours every day she industriously used pen and paper, inscribing passages of the book almost exactly word for word.
She was the first woman to hold the office of the presidency and was called her own First Lady.
CANADIAN MUSICIANS: Jazz musician Maynard Ferguson is renowned for his high, squealing tone on this instrument
Trumpet
{{externalvideo | align = left | width = 320px | video1 = Oral History, Maynard Ferguson recalls his first job at Paramount playing trumpet for the movie, Rear Window.
3
Kenton and Hollywood Stan Kenton's bands were notable for their strong brass sections and Ferguson was a natural fit.
England In 1969, Ferguson moved to just outside Windsor (about 20 miles from London) in a very small place called Oakley Green.
1959 - A Message from Birdland (Roulette)  1959 - Maynard Ferguson Plays Jazz for Dancing (Roulette)  1960 - Newport Suite (Roulette)
A LA "CART": One of the best-known examples of this 6-letter term is OPEC
a cartel
(Although many believe that OPEC acts as a cartel when it sets production quotas to maintain price, others point out that widespread cheating largely neutralizes OPEC's collective ability to influence prices.
3
Two-thirds of OPEC's oil production and reserves are in its six Middle Eastern countries that surround the oil-rich Persian Gulf.
Their combined rate of oil production represented 40% of the world's total in 2014, and they accounted for 73% of the world's "proven" oil reserves, including 48% from just the six Middle Eastern members:   Country Region Membership Years Population(2015 est.)
(By the time of the Libyan Civil War in 2011, OPEC was calling for more efforts by governments and regulatory bodies to curb "excessive speculation" in oil futures markets, blaming financial speculators for increasing volatility in prices, disconnected from market fundamentals.)  In May 2008, Indonesia announced that it would leave OPEC when its membership expired at the end of that year, having become a net importer of oil and being unable to meet its production quota.
A BRAND NEW "YOU": 3-word title of the 1950s TV show hosted by Walter Cronkite that recreated history as news events
You Are There
You Are There, which reenacted historical events, using the format of a news report.
3
He also was a member of the Houston chapter of DeMolay, a Masonic fraternal organization for boys.
Summer 2000.
Cronkite was a member of the United States Coast Guard Auxiliary, with the honorary rank of commodore.
REAL AUDIO: Moby's version of "South Side" features Gwen Stefani, the lead singer of this group
No Doubt
She is the co-founder and lead vocalist of the ska band No Doubt.
3
[But] everything works out how it should."
She and Williams were coaches for season 7 of The Voice.
May 13, 2007.
FAMOUS FIRSTS: Their first million-selling record was "Satisfaction" which, in fact, sold 4½ million
The Rolling Stones
Accord and satisfaction, a contract law concept about the purchase of the release from a debt obligation  Entertainment and music  Satisfaction (Australian TV series), a drama series which aired on Showcase Australia in 2007–2010  Satisfaction (2013 TV series), a sitcom which aired on CTV  Satisfaction (2014 TV series), a drama series on USA Network  Satisfaction (film), a 1988 drama  Satisfaction!, a 1965 album by jazz organist Don Patterson  "(I Can't Get No) Satisfaction", a 1965 rock song by the Rolling Stones  "Satisfaction" (Laura Branigan song), a 1984 song by Laura Branigan  "Satisfaction" (Vanilla Ice song), a 1991 hip hop song from the album Extremely Live  "Satisfaction" (Eve song), a 2003 hip hop song  "Satisfaction" (F.T. Island song), a 2011 pop rock song  Satisfaction (Benny Benassi song)
1
Satisfaction may refer to:  Contentment  Computer user satisfaction  Customer satisfaction  Job satisfaction  Satisfaction theory of atonement, a Christian view of salvation  The specification of variables that make an open sentence true  The regaining of honour in a duel  Law  Satisfaction of legacies, a doctrine of fulfilling a legacy during the testator's lifetime.
SCIENTISTS: Scientist & author Temple Grandin overcame this alienating condition, from the Greek for "self" or "same"
autism
Mary Temple Grandin (born August 29, 1947) is an American professor of animal science at Colorado State University, best-selling author, autism activist and  consultant to the livestock industry on animal behavior.
2
She said, “It should be on the market.
She regularly takes antidepressants, but no longer uses a squeeze-box (hug machine), a device which she invented at the age of 18 as a form of stress relief therapy, stating in February 2010 that: "It broke two years ago, and I never got around to fixing it.
MUSICAL HEART CONDITIONS: In 1992 you couldn't escape this country crossover hit by Billy Ray Cyrus
"Achy Breaky Heart"
Having released 12 studio albums and 44 singles since 1992, he is best known for his number one single "Achy Breaky Heart", which became the first single ever to achieve triple Platinum status in Australia.
3
Some Gave All, which has been certified 9× Multi-Platinum in the United States and is the longest time spent by a debut artist at number one on the Billboard 200 (17 consecutive weeks) and most consecutive chart-topping weeks in the SoundScan era.
His parents divorced in 1966.
65 respectively.
WORLD CITIES: The Prefecture, the palace of Pizarro, still stands in this southern Peru city known for its Incan remains
Cuzco
Regions  Amazonas  Ancash  Apurímac  Arequipa  Ayacucho  Cajamarca  Callao  Cuzco  Huancavelica  Huánuco  Ica  Junín  La Libertad Lambayeque  Lima  Loreto  Madre de Dios  Moquegua  Pasco  Piura  Puno  San Martín  Tacna  Tumbes  Ucayali  Province  Lima   Geography   Peru covers  of western South America.
3
On 29 January, de la Serna organized a coup against de la Pazuela which was recognized by Spain and he was named Viceroy of Peru.
Inti Raymi, which is an old Inca festival, is still celebrated.
Perú:
LODGE-PODGE: (Jimmy of the Clue Crew presents from the Hotel Monasterio in Cuzco, Peru.)  Cuzco's Hotel Monasterio, once a 16th century monastery, features in its chapel this style of art, also seen in European churches
Baroque
Baroque dominated colonial art, though modified by native traditions.
3
De la Serna abandoned the city and on 12 July 1821 San Martin occupied Lima and declared Peruvian independence on 28 July 1821.
With the help of Antonio José de Sucre they defeated the larger Spanish army in the Battle of Junín on 6 August 1824 and the decisive Battle of Ayacucho on 9 December of the same year, consolidating the independence of Peru and Alto Peru.
Columbia University Press, 1978, ISBN 0231034334   Further reading   Economy   Banco Central de Reserva.
DANCE: Some dancers get their kicks doing high kicks in this Radio City Music Hall chorus line
the Rockettes
A New York Christmas tradition since 1933, it features the women's precision dance team known as The Rockettes.
3
The names "Radio City" and "Radio City Music Hall" derive from one of the complex's first tenants, the Radio Corporation of America.
Art right|250px|thumb|"Goose Girl", by sculptor Robert Laurent  The public areas of the Music Hall feature the work of many depression era artists.
Three female nudes cast in aluminum were commissioned for the music hall, however Roxy Rothafel thought that they were inappropriate for a family venue.
INSPIRED CHARACTERS: The title character of his unfinished novel "The Last Tycoon" was based on movie tycoon Irving Thalberg
Fitzgerald
In popular culture  The Last Tycoon In October 1939, American novelist F. Scott Fitzgerald began writing The Last Tycoon, a fictionalized biography of Thalberg, naming the protagonist Monroe Stahr to represent Thalberg.
3
Taking risks with new subjects and stars  In 1929, MGM released fifty films, and all but five showed a profit.
Samuel Goldwyn called him "the foremost figure in the motion-picture industry . . . and an inspiration . . . ." M. H. Aylesworth, Chairman of RKO, wrote that "his integrity, vision and ability made him the spearhead of all motion-picture production throughout the world."
He notes that with his numerous production innovations and grand stories, often turning classic literature and Broadway stage productions into big-screen pictures, he managed to keep "American movies supreme throughout the world for a generation."
DIRECTIONS: Besides a young man, Horace Greeley also told the unemployed in New York City to head this way
West
Among many other issues, he urged the settlement of the American West, which he saw as a land of opportunity for the young and the unemployed.
3
Born to a poor family in New Hampshire, Greeley was apprenticed to a printer in Vermont, and in 1831 went to New York City to seek his fortune.
Harrison and his running mate John Tyler were easily elected.
He also planned to give speeches to promote the Republican Party.
ACTORS & HISTORICAL ROLES: In the 2002 film "Frida", Geoffrey Rush portrayed this European firebrand during his final days
Leon Trotsky
Lantana John Knox  2002 Frida Leon Trotsky 2002  Harry Plummer  2003 Pirates of the Caribbean: The Curse of the Black Pearl Captain Hector Barbossa Nominated –
3
Geoffrey Rush Biography.
In 2006, Rush hosted the Australian Film Institute Awards for the Nine Network.
Supporting Actor – Comedy/RomanceNominated – Golden Globe Award for Best Supporting Actor –
BELIZE TO MEET YOU: Belize City, the country's largest city, lies on this sea
Caribbean Sea
The Belize River empties into the Caribbean Sea 5 miles from Belize City on the Philip Goldson Highway on the coast of the Caribbean.
3
Politically, it is divided into ten constituencies, described below.
"London bridges", rickety wooden pallets linking dwellings, and low-strung poles are not uncommon here.
Culture Belize City's culture is considered similar to that of Caribbean capital cities such as St. George's, Grenada or Georgetown, Guyana.
FAMOUS NAMES: This co-founder of United Artists returned to the U.S. in 1972 to pick up a special Oscar
Charlie Chaplin
The studio was founded in 1919 by D. W. Griffith, Charlie Chaplin, Mary Pickford, and Douglas Fairbanks, with the intention of controlling their own interests rather than depending upon the powerful commercial studios.
3
The veteran producer Joseph Schenck was hired as president.
On March 25, 1986, the acquisition of MGM/UA by Ted Turner was finalized in a cash-stock deal for $1.5 billion, and was renamed "MGM Entertainment Co.".
The deal was rejected, but Coppola signed a production deal with the studio instead.
DAD, GUM IT: This "colorful" gum-chewing girl has a golden ticket that gets her & her dad in to see Willy Wonka
Violet Beauregarde
Four of the tickets are found by Augustus Gloop, a gluttonous German boy; Veruca Salt, a spoiled British girl; Violet Beauregarde, a gum-chewing American girl; and Mike Teevee, a television-obsessed American boy.
3
Grandpa Joe follows Wonka to ask him about this, and Wonka angrily tells him that because they violated the contract by stealing Fizzy
According to Paris Themmen, who played Mike Teevee, "The river was made of water with food colouring.
Willy Wonka Candy Factory 1971 TV commercial, YouTube  Reception Willy Wonka was released on 30 June 1971.
LONI, DONNY OR YANNI: Once married to Burt Reynolds
Loni Anderson
Despite much success, Reynolds' finances expired, and he filed for bankruptcy, due in part to an extravagant lifestyle, a divorce from Loni Anderson and failed investments in some Florida restaurant chains in 1996.Laura J. Margulies (2008), "Famous Bankruptcies".Gary Eng Walk (07 October1998), "Burt Reynolds closes the book on Chapter 11", Entertainment Weekly  The filing was under Chapter 11, from which Reynolds emerged two years later.
3
; can be heard at http://www.bbc.co.uk/programmes/b06qv6t1; can be viewed at http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=YY3cuILM698Burt Reynolds Biography, IMDb."Burt Reynolds" at ethnicelebs.com.
In USA's Burn Notice, he played ex-CIA agent Paul Anderson who is being hunted down by a team of Russian assassins who wanted to kidnap, interrogate, and kill him.
Reynolds also co-owned a NASCAR Winston Cup team, Mach 1 Racing, with Hal Needham, which ran the #33 Skoal Bandit car with driver Harry Gant.
HEAPING PORTIONS: (Jimmy of the Clue Crew points to three stacks of different-sized paper cups in a Starbucks in Seattle, Washington.)  At Starbucks, tall is only 12 ounces, grande is 16 ounces & this, Italian for 20, is 20 ounces
venti
Smaller than the three original Frappuccino sizes, offered as lower-calorie option Tall  Larger of the two original sizes Grande  Italian for "large" Venti  Italian for "twenty"
3
Starbucks Coffee Company.
The first two VIA flavors include Italian Roast and Colombia, which were then rolled out in October 2009, across the U.S. and Canada with Starbucks stores promoting the product with a blind "taste challenge" of the instant versus fresh roast, in which many people could not tell the difference between the instant and fresh brewed coffee.
Walker, R. (February 26, 2006). "Consumed: Big Gulp".
KIDDY LIT: Dodie Smith wrote this 1956 classic doggy tale
The Hundred and One Dalmatians
Dorothy Gladys "Dodie" Smith (3 May 1896 – 24 November 1990) was an English children's novelist and playwright, known best for the novel The Hundred and One Dalmatians (1956).
3
Dodie's childhood home, known as Kingston House, was at 609 Stretford Road.
The formative years of Dorothy's childhood were spent at this house.
She and Beesley also spent time in Beverly Hills, Malibu, and Wilton, Connecticut.
TV CHARACTERS: On "Bonanza" Eric Cartwright, whose mother was Scandinavian, was nicknamed this, Norwegian for "good luck"
Hoss
He had three sons, each by a different wife: the eldest was the urbane architect Adam Cartwright (Pernell Roberts) who built the ranch house; the second was the warm and lovable giant Eric "Hoss" Cartwright (Dan Blocker); and the youngest was the hotheaded and impetuous Joseph or "Little Joe" (Michael Landon).
3
Logie Award for Best Overseas Show 1965: Primetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Individual Achievements in Entertainment - Color Consultant, Edward P. Ancona Jr. (color consultant)  1966: Primetime Emmy Award for Individual Achievements in Film Editing - Marvin Coil (editor), Everett Douglas (editor), Ellsworth Hoagland (editor)
1971: Primetime Emmy Award Outstanding Achievement in Music Composition - For a Series or a Single Program of a Series (First Year of Music's Use Only) David Rose (composer)
Sometime after June 1963, it was released as a track on his sixteenth album: Ring of Fire: The Best of Johnny Cash.
"X" RATED: Before testing the Enterprise & flying on the STS-2 shuttle mission, Joe Engle piloted this craft into space 3 times
the X-15
Also, the X-15 (flown by STS-2 Commander Joe Engle) was reused on several suborbital space missions.
3
Although the STS-2 mission had been planned for a duration of five days, with a few hours a day spent testing the Canadarm, the flight was cut short when one of the three fuel cells that produced electricity and drinking water failed.
The deorbit and reentry phase of this mission differed from STS-1, in that while the first shuttle entry was flown as a "middle of the road" test of the automatic guidance, the success of that mission allowed for the STS-2 crew to explore the stability margins of the vehicle's performance.
Flight Day Song Artist/Composer Day 2 "Pigs in Space" The Muppets Day 3 "Columbia, Gem of the Ocean" Flight Operations Directorate group Contraband  See also   List of human spaceflights  List of Space Shuttle missions  References  External links  STS-2 mission summary.
SHE'S A SAINT: In 1858 the Virgin Mary appeared to her 18 times near the town of Lourdes
Saint Bernadette
Museums   Wax Museum  Pyrenean Museum  Museum of the Nativity  Museum of small Lourdes  See also  Château fort de Lourdes  Communes of the Hautes-Pyrénées department  Lourdes apparitions  Lourdes effect  Shrines to the Virgin Mary  "The Village of Saint Bernadette" (1959 song)  Rosary  References  INSEE commune file  Notes  Bibliography  Collectif, Lourdes de la Préhistoire à nos jours, Musée Pyrénéen, 1987.
3
It is overlooked from the south by the Pyrenean peaks of Aneto, Montaigu, and Vignemale (3,298 m), while around the town there are three summits reaching up to  which are known as the Béout, the Petit Jer (with its three crosses) and the Grand Jer (with its single cross) which overlook the town.
The town was a place people passed through on their way to the waters at Barèges, Cauterets, Luz-Saint-Sauveur and Bagnères-de-Bigorre, and for the first mountaineers on their way to Gavarnie, when the events which were to change its history took place.
A statue of Our Lady of Lourdes was erected at the site in 1864.
AFRICA: The famous remains known as "Lucy" are in a museum in this capital of Ethiopia
Addis Ababa
It occupies a total area of , and its capital and largest city is Addis Ababa.
3
Frumentius became the first bishop of Aksum.
Cross-border trade by pastoralists is often informal and beyond state control and regulation.
International Development Research Centre. Retrieved on 24 May 2008  Most poor families (75%) share their sleeping quarters with livestock, and 40% of children sleep on the floor, where nighttime temperatures average 5 degrees Celsius in the cold season.
PEOPLE: In 1995 this paleoanthropologist helped form Safina, a new political party, to rid Kenya of corruption
Richard Leakey
During excavations at Lake Turkana in 1984, paleoanthropologist Richard Leakey assisted by Kamoya Kimeu discovered the Turkana Boy, a 1.6-million-year-old fossil belonging to Homo erectus.
3
The highlands are the site of the highest point in Kenya and the second highest peak on the continent: Mount Kenya, which reaches  and is the site of glaciers.
In snub to Washington, Kenyan president visits China, Russia first", Washington Post, 17 August 2013.
Additionally, a distinct local dialect, Kenyan English, is used by some communities and individuals in the country, and contains features unique to it that were derived from local Bantu languages, such as Swahili and Kikuyu.
LINCOLN'S CABINET: Salmon P. Chase thought Lincoln wasn't on the money with a moderate anti-slavery position & resigned as this
Secretary of the Treasury
During his career, Chase was the 23rd Governor of Ohio and U.S. Senator from Ohio prior to service under Abraham Lincoln as the 25th Secretary of the Treasury.
2
He also tried to pressure Lincoln by repeatedly threatening resignation, which he knew would cause Lincoln difficulties with the Radical Republicans.
Battle Cry of Freedom.
STATE THE GOVERNOR: In 2007 Charlie Crist took over for Jeb Bush in this state
Florida
John Ellis "Jeb" Bush (born February 11, 1953) is an American businessman and politician who served as the 43rd Governor of Florida from 1999 to 2007.
3
The nickname "Jeb" is composed of his initials J.E.B. (John Ellis Bush).
Getter, Lisa. "Jeb Bush's Recount Role Examined." Los Angeles Times.
Freedberg, Sydney P. "Jeb Bush: The Son Rises Away from Dad's Shadow." The Miami Herald, August 15, 1994.
PAST LIVES: Women force their husbands to stop warring in this man's 411 B.C. play "Lysistrata"
Aristophanes
Lysistrata ( or ; Attic Greek: , "Army Disbander") is a comedy by Aristophanes.
1
Originally performed in classical Athens in 411 BC, it is a comic account of one woman's extraordinary mission to end the Peloponnesian War.
HOLLYWOOD HISTORY: The poster for this controversial 1956 film showed Carroll Baker sucking her thumb like an infant
Baby Doll
While performing on Broadway in 1954, she was recruited by director Elia Kazan to play the lead in Tennessee Williams's Baby Doll (1956).
3
Baker's first major screen role was the supporting part of Luz Benedict II in Giant (1956), opposite Elizabeth Taylor, Rock Hudson, and James Dean, in his final role.
Later roles and television: 1988–2002 In 1990, Baker played a villainess— described by Roger Ebert as "an effective bitch on wheels"— in Ivan Reitman's comedy Kindergarten Cop, starring Arnold Schwarzenegger, which she filmed in Astoria, Oregon in the summer of 1990.
You're Tearing Me Apart, Terence Pettigrew's documentary which commemorated the 25th anniversary of Dean's death in a car accident in 1955.
SAINTS: This country's crown bears the name of St. Stephen, who became its 1st crowned king in the year 1000
Hungary
715–765), Byzantine iconodule martyr  Stephen I of Hungary (c. 965–1038), canonized in 1083  Stephen of Obazine (1085–1154), Cistercian, first Abbot of Obazine Abbey, France  Stephen Harding (died 1134), English, one of the founders of the Cistercian Order  Stephen III of Moldavia or Stephen the Great and Holy (c.1432–1504), son of Bogdan II  Royalty  Stephen of Armenia (died 1165), marshal, son of Leo I  Stephen of England or Stephen of Blois (c.1096–1154), grandson of William the Conqueror  Stephen I of Hungary (c. 965–1038), Grand Prince of the Magyars, first king of Hungary  Stephen II of Hungary (1101–1131), elder son of King Coloman  Stephen III of Hungary (1147–1172), eldest son of King Geza II  Stephen IV of Hungary (c.1133–1165), third son of King Béla II  Stephen V of Hungary (1239–1272), elder son of King Béla IV  Stephen I of Moldavia (1394–1399), son of Costea  Stephen II of Moldavia  (died 1447), prince, son of Alexandru cel Bun  Stephen III of Moldavia or Stephen the Great and Holy (c.1432–1504), son of Bogdan II  Stephen Báthory of Poland (1533–1586), prince of Transylvania, king consort of Poland, grand duke consort of Lithuania  Stefan Nemanja or Stefan I, Nemanja (c.1109–1199), grand prince of Serb state of Raška  Stefan Nemanjić or Stefan II, Nemanja (1176–1228), proclaimed king of Serbia in 1217  Stefan Radoslav of Serbia (c.1192-c.1235), king of Serbia, son of Nemanjić  Stefan Vladislav
3
For Stephen as a surname see Stephen (surname), Stephenson and Stevenson.
Steve Backshall (born 1973), English Naturalist, writer, and television presenter of Deadly 60  Steve Ballmer (born 1956), former CEO of Microsoft and current owner of the Los Angeles Clippers  Steve Belles (born 1966), American football player  Steve Beshear (born 1944), American attorney and politician  Steve Birnbaum (born 1991), Major League Soccer player  Steve Burns (born 1973), American entertainer  Steve Cardenas (born 1974), American martial artist and retired actor  Steve Case, founder of America Online  Steve Chappell, American aerospace engineer, mountain climber and aquanaut  Steve Coleman (born 1956), American saxophonist  Steve Coleman (American football) (born 1950), American football player  Steve Davis (born 1957), British snooker player  Steve Dubinsky (born 1970), Canadian NHL center  Steve Dublanica (born 1968), American author and blogger  Steve Fossett (1944–2007), American businessman  Steve Griffin (born 1964), American football player  Steve Handelsman (born 1948), American journalist  Steve Irwin (1962–2006), Australian TV personality, nicknamed "The Crocodile Hunter"  Steve Jobs (1955–2011), American co-founder of Apple Inc  Steve Kearns (born 1956), Canadian football player  Steve Madden (born 1958), Founder and former CEO of Steve Madden Ltd., a footwear company.
In Scotland, "Steven" and "Stephen" were the 8th and 10th most popular names for newborn boys in 1975, but were not in the top ten in 1900, 1950 or 2000.Popular Forenames in Scotland, 1900 – 2000, General Register Office, Scotland, Occasional Paper No.
THE BAHAMAS: Of Bimini, New Providence, or Grand Bahama, the island on which you would visit the capital, Nassau
New Providence
Nassau may refer to:   Places  Bahamas Nassau, Bahamas, capital city of the Bahamas, on the island of New Providence  Canada Nassau District, renamed Home District, regional division in Upper Canada from 1788 to 1792 Nassau Street (Winnipeg), Manitoba  Cook Islands Nassau (Cook Islands), one of the Northern Cook Islands  Germany  Nassau, Rhineland-Palatinate, a town founded in AD 915, after which most other entities called Nassau are named directly or indirectly:  Nassau (region), the broader geographical and historical region comprising the former independent country Nassau Nassau (Verbandsgemeinde), an administrative district including the town of Nassau and its surrounding areas  Duchy of Nassau, German state within the Holy Roman Empire and an independent state until 1866  Hesse-Nassau, Prussian province formed by annexation of the Duchy of Nassau  Nassau Castle, ancestral seat of the House of Nassau Nassau Nature Park, a major nature park in Germany located within the historical state of Nassau  Nassau, Saxony, a village in the Ore Mountains  Hong Kong Nassau Street, Mei Foo Sun Chuen, Kowloon Peninsula
2
Nassau is principally the name of the German town Nassau, which has given its name to many other places and entities, notably including the royal House of Nassau, the former, sovereign Duchy of Nassau (in modern-day Germany), Nassau County, New York, and the city of Nassau, Bahamas.
Indonesia Nassau, a subdistrict in Toba Samosir Regency, North Sumatra Nassau Range, alternate name of the Sudirman Range in Indonesia  Ireland Nassau Street (Dublin)  Netherlands Baarle-Nassau, a town in the southern Netherlands  United States Nassau, Delaware Nassau, Minnesota  Nassau, New York (disambiguation) Nassau (town), New York, in Rensselaer County Nassau (village), New York East Nassau, New York Nassau Island, former name for "Long Island" Nassau County, New York, on Long Island Nassau Street (Manhattan), New York Nassau Bay, Texas Nassau County, Florida Nassau Fjord, a fjord in Prince William Sound, Alaska Nassau Street (Princeton), New Jersey Nassau Village-Ratliff, Florida  People House of Orange-Nassau House of Orange-Nassau,  a noble dynasty originally from Germany and at present the monarchs of the Kingdom of the Netherlands: John William Friso, Prince of Orange, Prince of Nassau-Dietz, who became the titular Prince of Orange in 1702 Louis of Nassau (1538 – 1574), third son of William, Count of Nassau, and Juliana of Stolberg  Maurice of Nassau, Prince of Orange (1567 – 1625), son of William the Silent and Princess Anna of Saxony Sofia of Nassau William I, Count of Nassau-Dillenburg (Willem of Nassau) William Nassau de Zuylestein, 4th Earl of Rochford  Of the branch of Nassau-Siegen John Maurice, Prince of Nassau-Siegen  House of Luxembourg-Nassau (formerly Nassau-Weilburg) a noble dynasty originally from Germany and at present the monarchs of the Grand Duchy of Luxembourg  Adolf of Germany, usually known as Adolf of Nassau Adolphe, Grand Duke of Luxembourg Charlotte, Grand Duchess of Luxembourg Henri, Grand Duke of Luxembourg Jean, Grand Duke of Luxembourg Marie-Adélaïde, Grand Duchess of Luxembourg William IV, Grand Duke of Luxembourg (Wilhelm Alexander von Nassau)   Other Nassau William Senior  Nobles Adolf of Nassau (disambiguation) Adolph of Nassau-Weilburg (disambiguation) House of Nassau, a European aristocratic dynasty  Maria of Nassau (disambiguation) William of Nassau (disambiguation)  Art, entertainment, and media Nassau (album), a 1995 album by The Sea and Cake Nassauische Neue Presse, a German newspaper in the Nassau area  Battles  Battle of Nassau (disambiguation)  Battle of Nassau (1720), in the Bahamas, during the War of the Quadruple Alliance  Battle of Nassau (1776), in the Bahamas, during the American War of Independence  Ships HMS Nassau, a UK Royal Navy shipname for many ships HNLMS Johan Maurits van Nassau, Dutch gunboat MV Queen of Nassau, name of the "HMCS Canada" after exiting government service Nassau-class battleship, an Imperial German battleship class SMS Nassau, a German battleship SS Nassau, a steam turbine-driven twin-screw passenger-and-cargo ocean liner, launched in 1928, serving as "Nassau" 1951-1961 USS Nassau, a U.S. Navy shipname for multiple ships USS Nassau (CVE-16), a United States Navy escort aircraft carrier USS Nassau (LHA-4), a United States Navy amphibious assault ship Nassau (steamboat), the first steam ferry, built by Robert Fulton, which started operating in 1814 on the East River between Brooklyn and lower Manhattan in New York City  Transportation Nassau (Staten Island Railway station), United States Nassau Light Railway, a German railway company  Other uses Nassau (bet), a type of bet between golfers Nassau (cookie), a chocolate peanut butter sandwich cookie from Pepperidge Farm Nassau Coliseum, an arena in Uniondale, New York, USA Nassau grouper, an endangered species of fish  See also  Fort Nassau (disambiguation)  Nassau County (disambiguation)  Nassau Street (disambiguation)  Orange-Nassau (disambiguation)
'70s MUSIC: When it charted in 1976, this song first called "Cotton's Dream" was subtitled "The Young and the Restless"
Nadia's Theme
Theme song and other music  "Nadia's Theme" has been the theme song of The Young and the Restless since the show's debut in 1973.
3
When she announced her intention not to renew her contract, Bell decided to replace the original core families.
Worlds Without End, p. 93
He also served as head writer with Maria Arena Bell during the 2007-08 writers strike.
WORLD GEOGRAPHY: Melbourne is in the Australian state named for this woman, a friend of Viscount Melbourne
Queen Victoria
He was Queen Victoria's first Prime Minister, and she greatly relied upon his wisdom and experience in her early days on the throne, to the point where Melbourne's political foes complained that he had enthralled her.
3
Viscount Melbourne, of Kilmore in the County of Cavan, was a title in the Peerage of Ireland held by the Lamb family.
This family descended from Matthew Lamb, who represented Stockbridge and Peterborough in the House of Commons.
All five titles became extinct on his death in 1853.
CHECKING IT TWICE: Laura Dern plaved Katherine Harris in the HBO movie with this electoral title
Recount
Harris rose to national attention as Secretary of State of Florida during the 2000 presidential election for her role in the Florida election recount.
3
Harris received a Bachelor of Arts degree in history from Agnes Scott College in Decatur, Georgia, in 1979, and then studied under Christian theologian Francis Schaeffer at the L'Abri community in Huemoz, Switzerland, not far from Lausanne.
In the letter, Harris emphasized the importance of the project, asking that it be added to her list of five priorities and identifying it as her new No.
There are people of other faiths and backgrounds of outstanding integrity who know how to tell the truth.
A REAL BEATITUDE PROBLEM: This "God is dead" philosopher mocked the Beatitudes, citing them as proof of the hypocrisy of Christianity
Nietzsche
Friedrich Nietzsche in On the Genealogy of Morals considered the verse to be embodying what he perceived as a slave morality.
3
Although the Beatitude concerning the meek has been much praised even by some non-Christians such as Mahatma Gandhi, some view the admonition to meekness skeptically.
The Bhagavad Gita and the traditional writings of Buddhism (e.g., some of the Mangala Sutta) have been interpreted as including teachings whose intentions resemble some of the messages of Beatitudes (e.g., humility and absence of ego), although their wording is not the same.<ref name="Randall41">{{cite book |title=Strangers on the Shore: The Beatitudes in World Religions |first1=Albert B. |last1=Randall |year=2006 |isbn=978-0-8204-8136-4 |pages=41–44}}</ref>
Grand Rapids: W.B. Eerdmans, 1992.
LAMA-RAMA: The name of Padmasambhava, who established the first order of lamas, means "born of" this flower
Lotus
Padmasambhava (lit. "Lotus-Born"), also known as Guru Rinpoche, was an 8th-century Indian Buddhist master.
3
Five-coloured strips of silk symbolize the five wisdoms  The khatvanga is also adorned with locks of hair from dead and living mamos and dakinis, as a sign that the Master subjugated them all when he practised austerities in the Eight Great Charnel Grounds.
Dorje Dudjom of Nanam  ()
Reprint: Boudhanath: Rangjung Yeshe Publications, 2004.
TURKMENISTAN, THE COUNTRY: This crop is "king" in the country's agricultural economy
Cotton
Turkmenistan has taken a cautious approach to economic reform, hoping to use gas and cotton sales to sustain its economy.
3
A 1994 referendum and legislation in 1999 abolished further requirements for the president to stand for re-election (although in 1992 he completely dominated the only presidential election in which he ran, as he was the only candidate and no one else was allowed to run for the office), making him effectively president for life.
In 2004, the unemployment rate was estimated to be 60%.
The book was heavily promoted as part of the former president's personality cult, and knowledge of the Ruhnama is required even for obtaining a driver's license.
ALL "DE" BEST PEOPLE: He wrote the classic "The Old Regime and the Revolution" as well as "Democracy in America"
Alexis de Tocqueville
De la démocratie en Amérique (; published in two volumes, the first in 1835 via  Gallica;  via  Gallica and the second in 1840 via  Gallica;  via  Gallica) is a classic French text by Alexis de Tocqueville.
3
When the first edition was published, Beaumont, sympathetic to social justice, was working on another book, Marie, ou, L'esclavage aux Etats-Unis (two volumes, 1835), a social critique and novel describing the separation of races in a moral society and the conditions of slaves in the United States.
The Puritan Founding Tocqueville begins his study of America by explaining the contribution of the Puritans.
L. Jaume, Tocqueville, Fayard 2008  Tocqueville speculates on the future of democracy in the United States, discussing possible threats to democracy and possible dangers of democracy.
NEWBERY MEDAL WINNERS: 1970:This William Armstrong doggie tale of the Deep South
Sounder
From the Mixed-Up Files of Mrs. Basil E. Frankweiler  1968  Jennifer, Hecate, Macbeth, William McKinley, and Me, Elizabeth  1968    1968    1968   1969    1969  To Be a Slave  1969  When Shlemiel Went to Warsaw and Other Stories 1970 Sounder  1970  Our Eddie  1970    1970  Journey
3
liked every one?"
1932  Calico Bush  1932  Boy of the South Seas   1932  Out of the Flame   1932  Jane's Island  1932  Truce of the Wolf and Other Tales of Old Italy 1933 Young Fu of the Upper Yangtze  1933  Swift Rivers   1933    1933  Children of the Soil: A Story of Scandinavia 1934	 Invincible Louisa  1934    1934  Swords of Steel  1934  ABC Bunny   1934  Winged Girl of Knossos   1934  New Land"New land, a novel for boys and girls".
Does My Shirts  2005    2005  Lizzie Bright and the Buckminster Boy 2006 Criss Cross  2006  Whittington  2006  Hitler Youth: Growing Up in Hitler's Shadow  2006  Princess Academy  2006  Show Way 2007    2007  Penny from Heaven 	 2007  Hattie Big Sky  2007  Rules  2008  Good Masters!
NEWBERY MEDAL WINNERS: 1972: "Mrs. Frisby and the Rats of" this group
NIMH
Outside 1971 Summer of the Swans  1971  Knee-Knock Rise  1971  Enchantress from the Stars  1971  Sing Down the Moon 1972 Mrs. Frisby and the Rats of NIMH  1972  Incident at Hawk's Hill  1972  The Planet of Junior Brown  1972    1972  Annie and the Old One  1972   1973 Julie of the Wolves  1973  Frog and Toad Together  1973    1973   1974    1974   1975 M. C. Higgins, the Great  1975  Figgs & Phantoms  1975  My Brother Sam Is Dead  1975    1975  Philip Hall Likes Me, I Reckon Maybe 1976    1976    1976  Dragonwings 1977 Roll of Thunder, Hear My Cry  1977  Abel's Island  1977   1978 Bridge to Terabithia  1978  Ramona and Her Father  1978  Anpao: An American Indian Odyssey 1979    1979   1980    1980   1981 Jacob Have I Loved  1981    1981   1982    1982  Ramona Quimby, Age 8  1982   1983 Dicey's Song  1983    1983  Doctor De Soto  1983  Graven Images  1983  Homesick: My Own Story  1983  Sweet Whispers, Brother Rush  1984  Dear Mr. Henshaw  1984    1984    1984  Sugaring Time  1984   1985    1985  Like Jake and Me  1985    1985  One-Eyed Cat 1986 Sarah, Plain and Tall  1986  Commodore Perry
3
The rule was in place until 1958 and Joseph Krumgold became the first winner of two Newberys in 1960.
The award committee was made up of the Children's Librarian Section executive board, their book evaluation committee and three members at large.
But Pat Scales said, "The criterion has never been popularity.
SHAKESPEAREAN CHARACTERS: This gluttonous guy shows up in "The Merry Wives of Windsor" & both parts of "Henry IV"
Falstaff
thumb|The title page of the 1619 quarto (the False Folio): A most pleasant and excellent conceited comedy, of Sir John Falstaffe, and the merry wiues of Windsor.
2
Further investigation reveals the killer's mother, a textile heiress who had a minor role in the same theater group's production of the Merry Wives of Windsor.
Notes  External links
PAN & POT POURRI: DuPont says that dishwashers are safe for this nonstick coating applied to the cooking surface of some pans
teflon
In the 20th century, DuPont developed many polymers such as Vespel, neoprene, nylon, Corian, Teflon, Mylar, Kevlar, Zemdrain, M5 fiber, Nomex, Tyvek, Sorona and Lycra.
3
DuPont will focus on production of GMO seeds, materials for solar panels, and alternatives to fossil fuels.
One Ohio resident was awarded $1.6 million when a jury in 2015 found that her kidney cancer was caused by PFOA in drinking water.
Kinnane, Adrian (2002).
FEMALE SINGERS: This Irish lass is seen performing at the 1998 Lilith Fair concert
Sinéad O'Connor
Main Stage artists Sarah McLachlan Angie Delight Bonnie Raitt Chantal Kreviazuk Cowboy Junkies Des'ree Diana Krall Emmylou Harris Erykah Badu Indigo Girls Joan Osborne Lauryn Hill Lisa Loeb Liz Phair Luscious Jackson Mary Chapin Carpenter Meredith Brooks Me'shell Ndegeocello Missy Elliott Natalie Merchant Neneh Cherry Paula Cole Queen Latifah Shawn Colvin Sheryl Crow Sinéad O'Connor Suzanne Vega Tracy Bonham  Second Stage artists K's Choice Mono Sister 7 Heather Nova Morcheeba Rebekah Lucinda Williams Victoria Williams Abra Moore Neneh Cherry Elise Knoll Mary Lou Lord Tuesdays Billie Myers N'Dea Davenport Martina McBride Litany Paris Hampton Davina Beth Orton Holly Cole Diana King
2
Appearances were organized into three stages.
Below is a list of artists who have performed at Lilith Fair in the 2010 revival.
FILMS OF THE '70S: In a 1977 film, Diane Keaton was "Looking For" him
Mr. Goodbar
She became an accomplished dramatic performer, starring in Looking for Mr. Goodbar (1977) and received Academy Award nominations for Reds (1981), Marvin's Room (1996) and Something's Gotta Give (2003).
3
As opposed to going it on my own and forging my path to create a wonderful performance without the help of anyone.
While traveling in the late 1970s, she began exploring her avocation more seriously. "
It
ATHLETES: 14-year-old Tara Lipinski upset this world champion at the 1997 U.S. Figure Skating Championship
Michelle Kwan
The following season, Lipinski finished second to Michelle Kwan at Skate America and, while suffering from a bad head cold, to Laëtitia Hubert at Trophée Lalique.
3
Lipinski generally received favorable reviews and was popular with fans, sometimes signing autographs for hours after each show.
She said her hip problem had been misdiagnosed for several years.
She has made several television appearances, which have included guest roles on a number of primetime shows (Are You Afraid of the Dark?, Touched by an Angel, Sabrina, the Teenage Witch, Malcolm in the Middle, Veronica's Closet, Whose Line is it Anyway, Early Edition, 7th Heaven and Still Standing), as well as a cameo in the theatrical film Vanilla Sky.
ACTORS & THEIR ROLES: He was Geraldine Page's sweetie in both the Broadway & film versions of "Sweet Bird of Youth"
Paul Newman
Directed by Elia Kazan, it starred Paul Newman, Geraldine Page, Sidney Blackmer, Madeleine Sherwood, Diana Hyland, Logan Ramsey, John Napier, and Rip Torn.
3
thumb|First edition(publ.
Heavenly still loves Chance and wants to escape her dictating father.
p. 48.
TIME PERIODS: Long before "Toys in the Attic" Lillian Hellman wrote "The Children's" this
Hour
As a playwright, Hellman had many successes on Broadway, including Watch on the Rhine, The Autumn Garden, Toys in the Attic, Another Part of the Forest, The Children's Hour and The Little Foxes.
3
18–19.
131-33, 352–53, includes Hughes' report of the radio broadcast and Hellman's comments the next day citing his I Wonder as I Wander: An Autobiographical Journey, first published in 1956.
Another play, My Mother, My Father, and Me, proved unsuccessful when it was staged in March 1963.
ARCHAEOLOGY: These Biblical texts have been found at numerous sites, but Qumran has yielded the most
Dead Sea Scrolls
It is best known as the settlement nearest to the Qumran Caves where the Dead Sea Scrolls were hidden, caves in the sheer desert cliffs and beneath, in the marl terrace.
3
A key point made by Schiffman is that in addition to the Sadducean orientation of the Qumran halakhot, or rulings, the texts indicate strong identification with the pro-Sadducean persecutions of the Pharisees by the Macccabean King Alexander Jannaeus, and similar pro-Sadducean political views regarding later Maccabean rulers.
The southern end of the room had been walled off.
Meyers, Eric. "Khirbet Qumran and its Environs,"
19th CENTURY SCIENCE: In 1815 William Prout hypothesized that this was the fundamental atom & all other atoms were made of it
hydrogen
In 1815, based on the tables of atomic weights available at the time, he anonymously hypothesized that the atomic weight of every element is an integer multiple of that of hydrogen, suggesting that the hydrogen atom is the only truly fundamental particle (which he called protyle), and that the atoms of the other elements are made of groupings of various numbers of hydrogen atoms.
2
It was in this work that he coined the term "convection" to describe a type of energy transfer.
Prout died in London in 1850 and was buried in Kensal Green Cemetery.
BOOK WORDS: Casey Kasem was known for presenting long-distance ones
dedication
Kasem mixed in biographical information about the artists, flashback, and "long-distance dedication" segments where he read letters written by listeners to dedicate songs of their choice to far away loved ones.
3
At KEWB in Oakland, California, Kasem was both the music director and on-air personality.
Due to his condition, he was no longer able to speak during his final months.
On June 6, 2014, Kasem was reported to be in critical but stable condition at a hospital in Washington state, receiving antibiotics for bedsores and treatment for high blood pressure.
THE MIDEAST: Its president & vice president are the emir, or prince, of Abu Dhabi & the emir of Dubai
United Arab Emirates
Dubai ( ;  , Gulf pronunciation: ) is the most populous city in the United Arab Emirates (UAE).
3
Indians, followed by Britons and Pakistanis are the top foreign investors in Dubai realty.
We're not encouraging the use of the term.
The sale and consumption of pork, though legal, is regulated and is sold only to non-Muslims, in designated areas of supermarkets and airports.
THE BARE FACTS: In 1974 Ray Stevens recorded a novelty record about this new fad of running nude in public & took it to no. 1 on the charts
streaking
In 1974, Stevens recorded perhaps his most famous hit, "The Streak," which poked fun at the early-1970s fad of running nude in public, known as "streaking."  It became number one in both the UK and the US and No. 3 on the country chart.
3
Stevens' collection of Hot 100 hits is evenly divided between serious and comedy.
A 1987 Greatest Hits album became a platinum seller, while several other releases achieved gold status.
Get Serious!
BANDS BY LEAD SINGER: Simon Le Bon
Duran Duran
Simon John Charles Le Bon (born 27 October 1958) is an English musician, best known as the lead singer, lyricist and musician of the band Duran Duran and its offshoot, Arcadia.
2
He worked as a theatre porter at Northwick Park Hospital Accident and Casualty, and also auditioned for a punk band at Harrow College.
Astronaut was released worldwide on 11 October 2004.
GOING DOWNTOWN: At Nordstrom's flagship store, I'll buy shoes so I can walk the Pacific Science Center in this city
Seattle
Nordstrom, Inc. () is an American upscale fashion retailer, founded by John W. Nordstrom and Carl F. Wallin and headquartered in Seattle.
3
Nordstrom fsb: Private Company Information – Businessweek.
Following the success of its Mall of America opening in 1991, Nordstrom has sought to expand in the Twin Cities market.
Retrieved on 2015-09-25.
GLEE SONGS: Amber Riley showed off her singing chops covering "Beautiful" from this blonde pop star
Christina Aguilera
(Fantastic Plastic Machine album), 2001  Beautiful (Fish Leong album), 2003  Beautiful (Jessica Mauboy album), 2013  Beautiful (Meg album), 2009  Beautiful (The Reels album)  Beautiful (Teena Marie album), 2013  Beautiful (Vivian Green album), 2010  Beautiful (EP), by Amber, 2015  Songs  "Beautiful" (10 Years song), 2008  "Beautiful" (2PM song), 2012  "Beautiful" (Akon song), 2009  "Beautiful" (Carly Rae Jepsen and Justin Bieber song), 2012  "Beautiful" (Carole King song), covered by Barbra Streisand and Richard Marx, 1971  "Beautiful" (Christina Aguilera song), 2002  "Beautiful" (Disco Montego song), 2002  "Beautiful" (Eminem song), 2009  "Beautiful" (Jessica Mauboy song), 2013  "Beautiful" (Joydrop song), 1998  "Beautiful" (Mai Kuraki song), 2009  "Beautiful" (Mandalay song), 1998  "Beautiful" (Mariah Carey song), 2013  "Beautiful" (MercyMe song), 2010  "Beautiful" (Moby song), 2005  "Beautiful" (Park Jung-min song), 2012  "Beautiful" (Sarah De Bono song), 2012  "Beautiful" (Snoop Dogg song), 2003  "Beautiful" (Taylor Dayne song), 2007  "Beautiful", by Aerosmith from Music from Another Dimension!  "Beautiful", by Athlete from Vehicles & Animals  "Beautiful", by Audio Adrenaline from Lift  "Beautiful", by Barenaked Ladies from Barenaked Ladies
2
(Charles McPherson album), 1975  Beautiful
The Misconceptions of You  "Beautiful", by The Smashing Pumpkins from Mellon Collie and the Infinite Sadness  "Beautiful", by Social Code from A Year at the Movies  "Beautiful", by Verona from Summer Consequence  "Beautiful", by Vivian Green from Beautiful  Theater Beautiful: The Carole King Musical, 2014 Broadway musical  See also  Beautiful Garbage, a 2001 album by Garbage  Biutiful, a 2010 Mexican-Spanish drama film  Beauty (disambiguation)  Beautiful Girl (disambiguation)
ON YOUR TOES: It's the weapon featured in "Fall River Legend", Agnes De Mille's ballet about Lizzie Borden
an axe
Lizzie Borden took an axe  And gave her mother forty whacks.
3
A family friend later speculated that mutton left on the stove for use in meals over several days was the cause, but Abby had feared poisoning, as Andrew Borden had not been a popular man.
The Warriors (1979), an action thriller film about modern street gangs in New York included an all girl band of violent young women called "The Lizzies" (as a reference to Lizzie Borden).
Boston: Little, Brown and Co., 1968.
CROSSWORD CLUES "M": Hiawatha's honey             (9)
Minnehaha
Retrieved 2013-5-3 The Island of Hiawatha is the former name of the Toronto Islands.http://peoplemaps.esri.com/toronto/ Hiawatha appears as a playable leader for the Iroquois in the video game Sid Meier's Civilization V.  See also The Song of Hiawatha, which includes the fictitious Aboriginal woman Minnehaha  Notes  Further reading  Bonvillain, Nancy (2005).
3
In 1982 Dean Snow considered the mainstream view of the archaeology not to support any dates for an eclipse before 1350 AD (thus ruling out the 1142 AD date.)
It was on the shores of Onondaga Lake where the message of peace was "planted" and the hatchets were buried.
ISBN 0-382-09568-5 ISBN 9780382095689 ISBN 0-382-09757-2 ISBN 9780382097577  Malkus, Alida (1963).
NATURAL WONDERS: Given its current name by John Wesley Powell, it was called Kaibab, or "mountain lying down" by the Paiutes
the Grand Canyon
He is famous for the 1869 Powell Geographic Expedition, a three-month river trip down the Green and Colorado rivers, including the first known passage by Europeans through the Grand Canyon.
3
thumb|John Wesley Powell and his wife, Emma, in Detroit in 1862.
Civil war and aftermath Powell's loyalties remained with the Union and the cause of abolishing slavery.
John Wesley Powell.
ART SCHOOL: While part of the Avignon School, Simone Martini met this poet & painted a portrait of his beloved Laura
Petrarch
Francis Petrarch became a friend of Simone's while in Avignon, and two of Petrarch's sonnets (Canzoniere 96 and 130) make reference to a portrait of Laura de Noves that  Simone supposedly painted for the poet (according to Vasari).
3
It is thought that Martini was a pupil of Duccio di Buoninsegna, the leading Sienese painter of his time.
Biography Simone was doubtlessly apprenticed from an early age, as would have been the normal practice.
A copy of the work, executed shortly thereafter by Lippo Memmi in San Gimignano, testifies to the enduring influence Simone's prototypes would have on other artists throughout the 14th century.
ENTERTAINMENT NEWS: In March 2001, reports had this "Come On Over" singer & her husband Mutt expecting their first pup
Shania Twain
He also wrote and produced songs with his then-wife, Canadian singer Shania Twain.
2
Mutt Lange He would return to work with them years later in a more limited role in 1999, co-writing three tracks for their album Euphoria.
In the 2001 television film Hysteria –
ACTRESSES: She's mom to Kate Hudson
Goldie Hawn
Early life Hudson was born in Los Angeles, California, the daughter of Academy Award–winning actress Goldie Hawn and Bill Hudson, an actor, comedian, and musician.
3
Hudson said the tabloid's statements were "a blatant lie" and she was concerned about the impact the false report could have on impressionable young women.
In February 2011, Hudson bought a house in London, England.
1997 EZ Streets  Larraine Cahill  Episode: "Neither Have I Wings to Fly" (season 1) 2000  Saturday Night Live  Herself/Host  Episode: "Kate Hudson/Radiohead" (season 26)
CARTOON MICE: This "fastest mouse in all Mexico" has a cousin, Slowpoke Rodriguez
Speedy Gonzales
He is described as "the slowest mouse in all Mexico" from the country side of Mexico, and is a cousin to Speedy Gonzales, who is known as the fastest.
3
However, he mentions to his cousin that while he may be slow in the feet, which he is best known for
This short (which was later edited into Bugs Bunny's 3rd Movie: 1001 Rabbit Tales) contains a possible allusion to a marijuana habit when Slowpoke sings La Cucaracha.
Schwarzenegger then orders Rodriguez's deportation, which Rodriguez fears will cause his execution.
WORLD GEOGRAPHY: At 16,800 feet, Vinson Massif is the highest point on this continent
Antarctica
Mount Vinson is the highest peak in Antarctica, at .
2
Vinson Massif () is a large mountain massif that is  long and  wide and lies within the Sentinel Range of the Ellsworth Mountains.
Ten scientists and mountaineers participated in AAME 1966/67.
WORLD TRAVEL: Portimao is one of the most visited fishing villages in this country's Algarve region
Portugal
Al-Gharb, meaning "The West") is the southernmost region of mainland Portugal.
3
The intermunicipal community of Algarve is subdivided into 16 municipalities:  Municipality  Population (2011) Area (km²)
There are over 25 top-class courses in the Algarve, most of which were designed by legendary names such as Nick Faldo, Seve Ballesteros, Jack Nicklaus and Christy O'Connor Jnr.
Founded Porches Pottery/Olaria Algarve.)
EYE 8: Spot John Cusack as one of 8 disgraced Chicago White Sox & you're watching this 1988 film
Eight Men Out
Accessed 30 November 2015  Filmography Film thumb|right|Cusack in The Raven (2012)   Year Title Role Notes1983ClassRoscoe Maibaum 1984Sixteen CandlesBryce1984Grandview, U.S.A.Johnny Maine1985The Sure ThingWalter "Gib" Gibson1985Better Off DeadLane Meyer1985The Journey of Natty GannHarry1986One Crazy SummerHoops McCann1986Stand by MeDenny Lachance1987Hot PursuitDan Bartlett 1987Broadcast NewsAngry Messenger1988TapeheadsIvan Alexeev1988Eight Men OutBuck
3
John Paul Cusack (, born June 28, 1966) is an American actor, producer and screenwriter.
He later starred in High Fidelity (2000), for which he was nominated for a Golden Globe.
June 11, 2008.
AUTHORS: "A Tangled Skein" was this author's original title for "A Study in Scarlet"
Arthur Conan Doyle
A Study in Scarlet is an 1887 detective novel by British author Arthur Conan Doyle.
3
The story, and its main characters, attracted little public interest when it first appeared.
He learned from her that Drebber, a drunk, had attempted to kiss Mrs Charpentier's daughter, Alice, which caused their immediate eviction.
Above his body was again written “
DANCES WITH WOLVES: His girls! girls! girls! included "Viva Las Vegas" dance partner & co-star Ann-Margret
Elvis Presley
Her singing and acting careers span five decades, starting in 1961; initially she was billed as a female version of Elvis Presley.
3
Unable to work for ten weeks, she ultimately returned to the stage almost back to normal.
She also starred in the TV movies Who Will Love My Children?
Everybody Needs Somebody
THINK TWICE: In the title of a noirish 1934 James M. Cain novel, this guy "Always Rings Twice"
The Postman
Cain's first novel, The Postman
2
Several of his crime novels inspired highly successful movies.
Always Rings Twice Mildred Pierce (U.S., 2011), directed by Todd Haynes  References Notes  Bibliography Madden, David & Mecholsky, Kristopher (2011).
ALL THINGS CHINESE: Chinese company Lenovo now markets the Thinkpad, having bought this co.'s personal computing division
IBM
The series was designed, developed, and sold by IBM until Lenovo acquired the brand in 2005.
3
It contained the same ports as the x100e except for an added HDMI port.
It features either the AMD Fusion E240 (1.5 GHz single-core) or E350 (1.6 GHz dual-core) CPUs (both of which are Zacate), along with integrated Radeon 6310 graphics.
Lenovo envisioned the Scout as a very high-end ThinkPad that would be analogous to a luxury car.
BUGGY: In 1897 Dr. Ronald Ross demonstrated that malaria was transmitted by these insects
mosquitoes
His discovery of the malarial parasite in the gastrointestinal tract of a mosquito led to the realisation that malaria was transmitted by mosquitoes, and laid the foundation for combating the disease.
2
It was only on the representation of Patrick Manson, that the government arranged for his continued service in Calcutta on a "special duty".
He immediately carried out research in malaria and kala azar, for which he was assigned.
1898: In 1898, he turned in "The Turn of the Screw" to his publisher
Henry James
The Turn of the Screw, originally published in 1898, is a gothic ghost story novella written by Henry James.
3
Rather, he preferred to create ghosts that were eerie extensions of everyday reality—"the strange and sinister embroidered on the very type of the normal and easy", as he put it in the New York Edition preface to his final ghost story, "The Jolly Corner".
Other critics, however, have strongly defended the governess.
In Clive Bloom (ed), Creepers: British Horror and Fantasy in the Twentieth Century.'' London and Boulder CO: Pluto Press, 1993, pp.
"B-I": The name Nabisco comes from abbreviating the National this Company
Biscuit
Nabisco (from the National Biscuit Company) is an American manufacturer of cookies and snacks headquartered in East Hanover, New Jersey.
3
Prior to the Post Cereals merger, the cereal division kept the Nabisco name in Canada.
Kraft General Foods acquired Nabisco ready-to-eat cold cereals from RJR Nabisco in 1993 (the cereal brands are now owned by Post Holdings).
In Indonesia)
NONFICTION: In "Paper Lion" George Plimpton reported on his attempt to play this sport
Football
In 1963, Plimpton attended preseason training with the Detroit Lions of the National Football League as a backup quarterback, and ran a few plays in an intrasquad scrimmage.
3
He attempts to talk Lisa Simpson into losing the spelling bee with the offer of a college scholarship at a Seven Sisters College and a hot plate, claiming "it's perfect for soup!"
After several problems with transporting and preparing the fireworks, Plimpton and Grucci became the first competitors from the United States to win the event.
In the movie Plimpton!
AROUND WASHINGTON, D.C.: You might see Bob Woodward during your walking tour of this publication's building on 15th Street N.W.
the Washington Post
He has worked for The Washington Post since 1971 as a reporter and is now an associate editor of the Post.
3
The work of Woodward and Bernstein was called "maybe the single greatest reporting effort of all time" by Gene Roberts.
Later, Woodward's source identified himself.
Frum, David, "David Frum's Diary" blog, at the National Review Online Web site, October 5, 2006, 11:07 a.m. post "Blogging Woodward (4)", accessed same day  Despite these criticisms and challenges, Woodward has been praised as an authoritative and balanced journalist.
RECENT MOVIES: At the beginning of this sequel, Tommy Lee Jones is postal worker Kevin Brown, who has no memory of being Agent K
Men in Black II
Hayes 'Hodge' Hodges 2000Space Cowboys William "Hawk" Hawkins 2002Men in Black IIKevin Brown / Agent K 2003The Hunted L. T. Bonham 2003The
3
His other notable starring roles include former Texas Ranger Woodrow F. Call in the TV mini-series Lonesome Dove, Agent K in the Men in Black film series, Sheriff Ed Tom Bell in No Country for Old Men, the villain Two-Face in Batman Forever, terrorist William Strannix in Under Siege, a Texas Ranger in Man of the House, rancher Pete Perkins in The Three Burials of Melquiades Estrada, which he directed, Colonel Chester Phillips in Captain America: The First Avenger and Warden Dwight McClusky in Natural Born Killers.
In the Valley of Elah, the other as a Texas sheriff hunting an assassin in the Oscar-winning No Country for Old Men.
Jones had a role in the Marvel Studios film, Captain America: The First Avenger.
BACKING BANDS: This backing band includes saxophonist Clarence Clemons & guitarist Steve Van Zandt
The E Street Band
Three years following his death, Clemons, along with the rest of the E Street Band, was posthumously inducted into the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame.
3
At this time he also recorded an instrumental record with Alan Niven producing, 'Peacemaker'.
In the 2000s, Clemons along with producer Narada Michael Walden, put together a group called The Temple of Soul, releasing a single called "Anna".
His life, his memory, and his love will live on in that story and in our band."
ART: Georges Rouault liked to include some tragic ones of these in his works; Red Skelton specialized in them
clowns
Skelton's artwork of clowns remained a hobby until 1964 when his wife, Georgia, convinced him to have a showing of his work at the Sands Hotel in Las Vegas while he was performing there.
3
Actor Mickey Rooney contacted Skelton, urging him to try for work in films after seeing him perform his "Doughnut Dunkers" act at President Roosevelt's 1940 birthday party.
The run-through was well attended by CBS Television City employees
With one prop, a soft battered hat", Groucho wrote, describing a performance he had witnessed, "he successfully converted himself into an idiot boy, a peevish old lady, a teetering-tottering drunk, an overstuffed clubwoman, a tramp, and any other character that seemed to suit his fancy.
GEOGRAPHY: Maracaibo is the second-largest city in this country
Venezuela
Maracaibo () is a city and municipality in northwestern Venezuela, on the western shore of the strait that connects Lake Maracaibo to the Gulf of Venezuela.
3
For about 390 years, Maracaibo remained isolated and separated from the rest of the country.
Other universities and schools include Universidad Dr. Rafael Belloso Chacín (URBE) and Universidad Rafael Urdaneta, with one of the country's leading psychology schools.
PMID 17240289   Geography    Location  The Maracaibo Municipality is currently divided into 18 parishes, which are  Climate
A WORLD OF MUSIC: Carlos Gardel, "the Songbird of Buenos Aires", became a cultural icon singing the music of this dance
tango
Carlos Gardel (born Charles Romuald Gardes; 11 December 1890 – 24 June 1935) was a French Argentine singer, songwriter, composer and actor, and the most prominent figure in the history of tango.
3
Gardel went on tour through Argentina, Uruguay, Chile, Brazil, Puerto Rico, Venezuela and Colombia, as well as making appearances in Paris, New York, Barcelona and Madrid.
Legacy thumb|right|160px|A statue of Gardel outside the Abasto Market in Buenos Aires, near where he grew up.
Gardel appears as a fictionalized character in the play El día que me quieras (1979) by the Venezuelan writer José Ignacio Cabrujas.
BOXING: Fearsome nickname of 1980s heavyweight champ James Smith
"Bonecrusher"
Specifically, it may refer to:  Sports figures  James Smith (Australian rules footballer) (1899–1974), Australian rules footballer for Richmond Football Club  James Smith (boxer) (born 1953), American boxer, nicknamed "Bonecrusher"  James Smith (footballer, born 1848) (1848–?), played in first official international football match  James Smith (footballer, born 1876) (1876–?), footballer  James Smith (footballer, born 1908) (1908–1956), English left back who played for Doncaster Rovers, Lincoln City and Bradford City  James Smith (footballer, born 1985), English football player (Southport)  James Smith (Scottish footballer) (fl. 1922), Scottish football player (Port Vale)  James Smith (sports media figure) (born 1959), American boxer and host of
2
In This Corner  James Crosbie Smith (1894–1980), English cricketer  James R. Smith (born 1959), American water polo player and coach  James Stephen Smith (born 1963), Scottish-born Canadian ice hockey player  James Smith (Leicestershire cricketer) (born 1977), English cricketer  James Smith (Australian cricketer) (born 1988), Australian cricketer  James Smith (Kent cricketer) (fl.
Jimmy Smith (disambiguation)  Jamie Smith (disambiguation)  James Smyth (disambiguation)
CANADA ROCKS: Toronto-born Robbie Robertson was part of the Bob Dylan backup group that made it big on their own using this name
The Band
Jaime Royal "Robbie" Robertson, OC (born July 5, 1943), is a Canadian singer-songwriter and guitarist best known for his work as lead guitarist and primary songwriter for the Band.
1
He has been inducted into the Canadian Songwriters Hall of Fame and was ranked 59th in Rolling Stone magazine’s list of the 100 greatest guitarists.
FOOD DUDE: This Jamie Oliver nickname refers to his minimalist style of cooking (it also fits in a nude dude category)
the Naked Chef
In 1999, his BBC show The Naked Chef débuted, and his cookbook became a #1 bestseller in the United Kingdom.
3
Our BaconPart of Channel 4's British Food Fight Season, a thematic sequel to Jamie's Fowl Dinners.
In the last 12 months, the average vegetable grower has gone from making a small profit to making a loss.
Ministry of Food Centres and trucks have opened in Australia in Ipswich, near Brisbane and Geelong, Melbourne.
THE LOVE BOAT: Harry Blackmun played Joseph Story, Supreme Court Justice from 1811 to 1845, in this film about a Spanish boat
Amistad
He is most remembered for his opinions in Martin v. Hunter's Lessee and The Amistad case, and especially for his magisterial Commentaries on the Constitution of the United States, first published in 1833.
3
David Brion Davis, Antebellum American culture (1997), pp.
The case can be compared to both Marbury v. Madison and Fletcher v. Peck.
The case came to symbolize a profound transformation in Story's tenure on the Court.
PRESIDENTIAL TRIVIA: 3 of the 1st 10 presidents had this 1st name, not James
John
After leaving the band at the age of nineteen, Miley briefly toured the Southern States with a show titled The Sunny South, and then joined Mamie Smith's Jazz Hounds, replacing trumpeter Johnny Dunn.
3
While touring in Chicago, he heard King Oliver's Creole Jazz Band playing and was captivated by Oliver's use of mutes.
On the other hand, they also mention his notorious unreliability, and problems with alcohol abuse.
Final years (1929–1932) After leaving Ellington's orchestra in 1929, Miley joined Noble Sissle's Orchestra for a one-month tour to Paris.
"KING" ME: Bruce Boxleitner & Kate Jackson were the title duo on this '80s TV show
Scarecrow and Mrs. King
Lucy Kate Jackson (born October 29, 1948) is an American actress, director and producer, known for her television roles as Sabrina Duncan in the 1970s series Charlie's Angels (1976–79) and Amanda King in the 1980s series Scarecrow and Mrs. King (1983–87).
2
Jackson's performance was well received in the 1972 independent film Limbo, one of the first theatrical films to address the Vietnam War and the wives of soldiers who were POWs, MIA or killed in action (KIA).
Nora HartTV film1992HomewreckerLucy (voice)TV film1993AdriftKatie NastTV film1993Empty CradleRita DonohueTV film1993Arly HanksArly HanksUnsold TV pilot1994Armed and InnocentPatsy HollandTV film1994Justice in a Small TownSandra ClaytonTV film1995Dr.
THAT'S BUSINESS: In 1927 this brand name first appeared on a Sears washing machine
Kenmore
Over the decades it established major national brands, such as Kenmore, Craftsman, DieHard, Silvertone, Supertone, and Toughskins.
3
The mail order market was based on rural America, with a slow-growing population and far less spending power than urban America.
and, in addition, provided a catalog sales department through which catalog items could be ordered.
The domain sears.com attracted at least 240 million visitors annually by 2011, according to a Compete.com survey.
CLASSICAL MUSIC: Peter Tchaikovsky wrote 3 ballets: "Swan Lake", "Sleeping Beauty" & this perennial Christmas favorite
The Nutcracker
But unlike the instructions that Tchaikovsky received for the scores of The Sleeping Beauty and The Nutcracker, no such written instruction is known to have survived.
3
The 2000 American Ballet Theatre version (taped for television in 2005), rather than having the curtain down as the slow introduction is played, used this music to accompany a new prologue in which the audience is shown how Von Rothbart first transforms Odette into a swan.
Allegro moderato-], but freezes when one of them transforms into a beautiful maiden, Odette [Scène.
It stays fairly close to the original story, but does contain many differences.
FORD: Richard Nixon awarded former Marine & Navy man John Ford this rank
Rear Admiral
John Ford – at IMDbBiography of Rear Admiral John Ford; U.S. Naval Reserve – at Naval Historical Center"Oral History – Battle of Midway:Recollections of Commander John Ford" – at Naval Historical Center  Ford was also present on Omaha Beach on D-Day.
3
In addition to credited roles, he appeared uncredited as a Klansman in D. W. Griffith's 1915 The Birth of a Nation, as the man who lifts up one side of his hood so he can see clearly.
It starred Victor McLaglen as The Sergeant—the role played by his brother Cyril McLaglen in the earlier version—with Boris Karloff, Wallace Ford, Alan Hale and Reginald Denny (who went on to found a company that made radio-controlled target aircraft during World War II).
I felt so right when I saw a film by John Ford and I was in front of those people.
WOMEN WRITERS: A young adult series by Madeleine L'Engle begins with the novel "A Wrinkle in" this
Time
Madeleine L'Engle (; November 29, 1918 – September 6, 2007;  Camp) was an American writer best known for young-adult fiction, particularly the Newbery Medal-winning A Wrinkle in Time and its sequels: A Wind in the Door, National Book Award-winning A Swiftly Tilting Planet, Many Waters, and An Acceptable Time.
3
The L'Engles traveled frequently.
but could not attend the ceremony due to poor health.
Like a Lotus (1984) ISBN 0-374-33385-8
TODD McFARLANE FIGURINES: A character from this Maurice Sendak children's bestseller is seen here
"Where the Wild Things Are"
I know that if there's a purpose for life, it was for me to hear Mozart."Maurice Sendak: "Where the Wild Things Are".
3
Before Where the Wild Things Are, Sendak was best known for illustrating Else Holmelund Minarik's Little Bear series of books.
New York.
("This Pig Wants To Party: Maurice Sendak's Latest")
RETIRED NUMBERS BY TEAM: This NFL team has just one, 12: Jim Kelly
the Buffalo Bills
James Edward Kelly (born February 14, 1960) is a retired American football player, a quarterback in the National Football League (NFL) for the Buffalo Bills and in the United States Football League (USFL) for the Houston Gamblers.
3
University of Miami  Kelly wanted to play college football at Penn State University under Joe Paterno, but he was offered a linebacker scholarship instead of quarterback.
Career statistics NCAA YearTeamGPRecAttComPctYdsTDIntRate1979  Miami Hurricanes  11  5–6–0  104  48  46.2  721  5  6  108.71980  Miami Hurricanes  12  9–3–0  206  109  52.9  1,519  11  7  125.71981  Miami Hurricanes  11  9–2–0  285  168  58.9  2,403  14  14  136.21982  Miami Hurricanes  11  7–4–0  81  51  63.0  585  3  1  133.4Totals 45  30–15  676  376  55.6  5,228  33  28  128.4USFLYearTeamGPRecAttComPctYdsTDIntRate1984  Houston Gamblers  18  13–5–0  587  370  63.0  5,219  44  26  98.21985  Houston Gamblers  18  10–8–0  567  360  63.5  4,623  39  19  97.9Totals 36  23–13  1,154  730  63.3  9,842  83  45  98.0NFLYearTeamGPRecAttComPctYdsTDIntRate1986  Buffalo Bills  16  4–12–0  480  285  59.4  3,593  22  17  83.31987  Buffalo Bills  12  6–6–0  419  250  59.7  2,798  19  11  83.81988  Buffalo Bills  16  12–4–0  452  269  59.5  3,380  15  17  78.21989  Buffalo Bills  13  6–7–0  391  228  58.3  3,130  25  18  86.21990  Buffalo Bills  14  12–2–0  346  219  63.3  2,829  24  9  101.21991  Buffalo Bills  15  13–2–0  474  304  64.1  3,844  33  17  97.61992  Buffalo Bills  16  11–5–0  462  269  58.2  3,457  23  19  81.21993  Buffalo Bills  16  12–4–0  470  288  61.3  3,382  18  18  79.91994  Buffalo Bills  14  7–7–0  448  285  63.6  3,114  22  17  84.61995  Buffalo Bills  15  10–5–0  458  255  55.7  3,130  22  13  81.11996  Buffalo Bills  13  8–5–0  379  222  58.6  2,810  14  19  73.2Totals 160
The Hunter James Kelly Research Institute was founded at the University of Buffalo in 2004, where neuroscientists and clinicians are studying myelin and its diseases.
AWARDS: This auction site won a 2003 Webby Award for best Services Website on the Internet
eBay
Past winners include Amazon.com, eBay, SimplyHired.com, Kayak.com, Yahoo!, iTunes, Google, FedEx, BBC News, CNN, MSNBC, The New York Times, Annie Lennox, NPR, Salon Magazine, Facebook, Meetup, Wikipedia, Flickr, ESPN, Comedy Central, PBS, The Onion News Network, The Office Webisodes, SwiftKey, My Damn Channel, NASA, George Takei, Airbnb, The Onion, Kickstarter, Mashable, Zach Galifianakis, Justin Bieber, Rhett and Link and Humans of New York.
3
Los Angeles Times.
The event was held in San Francisco from 1996 to 2004 and quickly became known for their "5 word Acceptance Speeches".
Ceremony   Since 2005, The Webby Awards has been presented in New York City.
FAMOUS JAPANESE: In 1968 Yasunari Kawabata became the first Japanese author to win this
the Nobel Prize for Literature
was a Japanese novelist and short story writer whose spare, lyrical, subtly-shaded prose works won him the Nobel Prize for Literature in 1968, the first Japanese author to receive the award.
3
Many theories have been advanced as to his potential reasons for killing himself, among them poor health (the discovery that he had Parkinson's disease), a possible illicit love affair, or the shock caused by the suicide of his friend Yukio Mishima in 1970.
The protagonist, an aging man, has grown disappointed of his children and has lost all passion for his wife.
From painting he moved on to talk about ikebana and bonsai as art forms that emphasize the simplicity and the beauty that arises from the simplicity. "The Japanese garden, too, of course symbolizes the vastness of nature."  In addition to the numerous mentions of Zen and nature, one point that was briefly mentioned in Kawabata’s lecture was that of suicide.
THE WESTERN U.S.: The Oregon Spectator was the first of these on the Pacific coast
Newspaper
See also: Wikipedia_talk:Manual_of_Style#Use_of_America/American, Talk:List of people from the United States/naming, Wikipedia talk:Manual of Style, talk:Alternate words for American, talk:American  If you check news outlets like The Washington Post, NY Times and such you'll read headlines like "US Senate...", "US outsourced...", "US Troops..." now I would think that major newspapers (in the US!) would do a good research on how to properly name their headlines for the past decades and how to use proper english.
3
I have a few points to make.
I'm from America/the USA/ the US/ the United States, and have never found any of those terms to be offensive.
—Michael Z. 05:54, 2004 Aug 24 (UTC)
THE 1800s: Though the U.S. won the war, it still paid this country more than $18 million for the land it took in the 1840s
Mexico
What do the people of the United States of Mexico think about someone taking their name for the use of people and institutions of another country?
3
As for the Portuguese part, Im not damanding anything.
You might come off as immature answering things like that.("It isnt because it isnt!").
John FitzGerald 17:08, 6 December 2005 (UTC)
MEDICINE: A special ward of the hospital devoted to very sick patients is the ICU, which stands for this
Intensive Care Unit
Universities Information and Communications University, a research university in Daejeon, South Korea Istanbul Commerce University, a private university in İstanbul, Turkey International Christian University, a private university (liberal arts college) in Mitaka, Tokyo, Japan International Christian University – Kiev, a private university in Kyiv, Ukraine Imperial College Union, the students union of Imperial College London  Politics Industrial and Commercial Workers' Union, a South African political group from the 1920s International Clearing Union, a non-existent currency regulatory institution proposed in 1944 Internationalist Communist Union, an international grouping of Trotskyist political parties Islamic Courts Union, an armed group of Sharia courts in Somalia  Other Intensive Care Unit, a special department of a hospital or healthcare facility that provides treatment for critically ill patients International Components for Unicode, software libraries supporting internationalization Intersection Capacity Utilization, a measure of the capacity of a roadway intersection Inner City Unit, a British hard edge/punk band I.C.U. (film), an unreleased Australian thriller starring Christian Radford
1
ICU may refer to:  Organisations International Cheer Union, the worldwide governing body of cheerleading International Cycling Union (Union Cycliste Internationale), the world governing body for sports cycling  Financial institutions  ICU, former Investment Capital Ukraine, Kyiv-based financial group that includes three business areas: trading, investment banking services and asset management.
ACTRESSES ON TELEVISION: From 1987 to '89 Courteney Cox played Alex Keaton's girlfriend Lauren on this sitcom
Family Ties
Her early television work includes a starring role in the short-lived television series Misfits of Science (1985), and later a recurring role as Lauren Miller, the girlfriend of Alex P. Keaton (Michael J. Fox) in the TV series Family Ties (1987–89).
3
Both Cox and Arquette reprised their respective roles from the Scream trilogy in 2011's Scream 4.
The film was released in theaters April 15, 2011.
October 30, 2008.
WOMEN'S HEALTH: Joint pain is one symptom of SLE, a common disorder in women that's also called by this 5-letter name
lupus
SLE may refer to:  Medicine  Systemic lupus erythematosus, an autoimmune disease affecting multiple systems in the body  Slit lamp examination, as used to examine the eye during an eye examination  St. Louis encephalitis, an inflammation of the brain caused by the SLE virus, a member of the flaviviruses  Science and mathematics  Semiconductor luminescence equations, a set of equations in theoretical physics to describe photoluminescence of semiconductors  Sea level equation, the equation that governs the sea level variations in response to the melting of continental ice sheets  System of linear equations, a collection of linear equations involving the same set of variables.
1
Schramm–Loewner evolution, or stochastic Loewner evolution, a conformally invariant stochastic process  Transportation  IATA Airport Code for McNary Field, the municipal airport for Salem, Oregon  Seletar Expressway, a major divided highway in the northeast of Singapore  Sleeper Either Class, a type of railway sleeping car  Shore Line East commuter rail service in Connecticut, USA  Other  Sri Lankan English, English language spoken in Sri Lanka  NYSE stock exchange code for the Sara Lee Corporation  Separate legal entity, type of legal entity with detached accountability  Simple List Extensions, proposed as an extension to existing syndication technologies such as RSS and Atom to make it easier for clients to support the ordering and filtering of lists  Single loss expectancy in risk analysis manufactured in Britain  Sober living environment, facilities used by addicts recovering from substance abuse  Societas Linguistica Europaea, a linguistics society  Spearhead Land Element, the 'Extremely high readiness' infantry battalion of the British armed forces that is first to deploy in anywhere in time of need  Structured Liberal Education (Stanford University), a department and humanities program for freshmen at Stanford University  Supporting Leading Edge, a structure of a power kite  SUSE Linux Enterprise  In socionics, a Sensory Logical Extrovert  The Space Link Extensions of CCSDS  The /System/Library/Extensions, a filepath in Apple's OSX
WORLD LEADERS: In 1960 Zulu chief Albert Lutuli became the 1st African to win this Nobel Prize
the Nobel Peace Prize
He was the first African, and the first person from outside Europe and the Americas, to be awarded the Nobel Peace Prize.
3
In 1933 the tribal elders asked Lutuli to become chief of the tribe.
When the second ban expired in 1956, he attended an ANC conference only to be arrested and charged with treason a few months later, along with 155 others.
In December 1957, after nearly a year in custody during the preliminary hearings, Lutuli was released and the charges against him and sixty-four of his compatriots were dropped.
HOTELS: National chain of hotels often referred to as "HoJo's"
Howard Johnson's
Hojo or Hōjō may refer to:  Hojo or HoJo:  Howard Johnson's, a U.S. chain of restaurants and hotels A nickname for Howard Johnson, especially Howard Johnson (baseball) A nickname for Howard Jones  Hojo, a supporting character in comic strip Mandrake the Magician Professor Hojo, a non-playable character in the video game Final Fantasy VII  Hōjō or Houjou:  Hōjō clan, a family of regents of the Kamakura Shogunate Late Hōjō clan, daimyo in the Sengoku Period Hōjō, Ehime, a city in Japan Hōjō, one of the five kata of Kashima Shinden Jikishinkage-ryū Hōjō, Tottori, a town in Japan (Now part of Hokuei)
2
Hōjō Tokiyuki, an early Japanese Scouting notable Hōjō (Inuyasha), a character in the manga and anime series InuYasha Hōjō Tsukasa (popularly but incorrectly romanized "Hojo"), Manga artist and creator of City Hunter Hōjō (Zen), the abbot's living quarters in a Zen monastery Satoko and Satoshi Houjou from the series Higurashi no Naku Koro ni.
Reika Hōjō from Goshūshō-sama Ninomiya-kun.
THE SILVER SCREEN: Kathleen Turner auditioned for "Oliver's Story", the sequel to this film, but Candice Bergen was cast instead
Love Story
She was the love interest of Ryan O'Neal in the Love Story sequel, Oliver's Story, and portrayed a best-selling author in Rich and Famous (1981) with Jacqueline Bisset.
3
From 2000 to 2002, she appeared in three episodes of the HBO series Sex and the City.
In reality, Bergen agreed with at least some of Quayle's observations, saying that while the particular remark was "an arrogant and uninformed posture", as a whole, it was "a perfectly intelligent speech about fathers not being dispensable and nobody agreed with that more than I did.
Comedy/Musical for: Murphy Brown (1989, 1992) 2 wins  Television Academy Hall of Fame:  Inducted in 2010  Filmography  Film  Year Title Role Notes 1966  Lakey 1966  Shirley Eckert Nominated—Golden Globe Award for New Star of the Year –
LITERATURE: His third published novel, "Sartoris", was the first he set in Yoknapatawpha County
William Faulkner
thumb|250px|right|Map drawn by William Faulkner for The Portable Faulkner (1946).
3
William Faukner on the Web Contemporary scholars are attempting to map the locations of all Faulkner's fiction.
The word Yoknapatawpha is pronounced  ("Yok'na pa TAW pha").
It is derived from two Chickasaw words—Yocona and petopha, meaning "split land."
YOU'VE NEVER LOOKED LOVELIER: The beautiful Bathsheba was already married, but that didn't stop this King of Israel from pursuing her
King David
She is most known for the Bible story in which she was summoned by King David who had seen her bathing and lusted after her.
3
According to the Hebrew Bible, "Bat Sheva," more commonly known by the anglicized name Bathsheba ( or ; , Baṯ-šeḇa‘, "daughter of the oath"; , "ابنة القسم") was the wife of Uriah the Hittite and later of David, king of the United Kingdom of Israel and Judah.
Uriah was unwilling to violate the ancient kingdom rule applying to warriors in active service.
After relating the parable of the rich man who took away the one little ewe lamb of his poor neighbor (II Samuel 12:1–6), and exciting the king's anger against the unrighteous act, the prophet applied the case directly to David's action with regard to Bathsheba.
VIDEO GAMES: Fight as Anderson Silva or Brock Lesnar in the 2009 "Undisputed" version of this mixed martial arts game
UFC
Brock Edward Lesnar (; born July 12, 1977) is an American professional wrestler and former amateur wrestler, professional American football player, and mixed martial artist, who is currently signed to WWE. Lesnar is a four-time WWE (World Heavyweight) Champion, a former UFC Heavyweight Champion, and an NCAA Division I Heavyweight Wrestling Champion, making him the only person to have won a WWE championship, UFC championship, and NCAA championship in a career.
2
The rivalry then came to an end after The Undertaker chose to focus on Mr. McMahon.
October 27, 2015. "Wall hit the open road eastbound to visit Lesnar on his farm near Moosomin, Saskatchewan..." Retrieved November 3, 2015. and have two sons together: Turk (born June 2009) and Duke (born July 2010).
GUINNESS RECORDS: The longest pizza delivery route (9 hours) is from Christchurch, New Zealand to Scott Base on this continent
Antarctica
right|thumb|Aerial photograph of Scott Base, Ross Island, Antarctica.
3
Located at Pram Point on Ross Island near Mount Erebus in New Zealand's Ross Dependency territorial claim, it was set up as support to field research and the centre for research into earth sciences, but now conducts research in many fields.
Three New Zealand observers were also given the task of selecting the site for a base went to McMurdo Sound with the United States “Operation Deep Freeze I” in the summer of 1955.
The base today thumb|Scott Base thumb|Sign for Scott Base on road to McMurdo Station The base is made up of a collection of Chelsea Cucumber green buildings which are linked by all-weather corridors.
COMPOSERS: He called his "Bolero" a "piece for orchestra without music"
Ravel
Puerto Rico and Mexico The Cuban bolero has traveled to Puerto Rico and the rest of Latin America after its conception, where it became part of their repertoires.
3
Acosta, Leonardo 1987.
Orovio, Helio 2004.
Lists of music used in competitions for American Rhythm Bolero are available.http://www.pbs.org/wgbh/ballroomchallenge/competition-s1-music.html List of Songs used in America's Ballroom Challenge   In art music  thumb|230px|A bolero dancer by Antonio Cabral Bejarano, 1842 There are many so-called boleros in art music (i.e., classical music) that may not conform to either of the above types.
NEIL DOWN: Neil Tennant is half of this British duo whose '80s hits include "West End Girls"
Pet Shop Boys
Neil Francis Tennant (born 10 July 1954) is an English musician, singer and songwriter and co-founder of the synthpop duo Pet Shop Boys, which he formed with Chris Lowe in 1981.
1
Early career
OF ARK: Former astronaut James Irwin launched several expeditions looking for Noah's Ark on this Turkish peak
Mount Ararat
Beginning in 1973, Irwin led several expeditions to Mount Ararat, Turkey, in search of the remains of Noah's Ark.
3
During his military service, he accumulated more than 7,015 hours flying time, 5,300 hours in jet aircraft.
The profits of the sale were intended to be used to establish trust funds for the Apollo 15 crew's children.
from the Samford University in 1972.
SURRENDERS: Admiral Nimitz signed the Japanese surrender for the U.S.; he signed as Supreme Allied Commander
MacArthur
General of the Army Douglas MacArthur was Supreme Allied Commander in the South West Pacific Area (SWPA).
3
These commanders reported to the British/American Combined Chiefs of Staff, although in the case of the Pacific and South East Asia, the relevant national command authorities of the American Joint Chiefs of Staff or the British Chiefs of Staff Committee had responsibility for the main conduct of the war in the theatre, depending on the Supreme Commander's nationality.
NATO The term came into use again with the formation of NATO in 1949.
History  Until June 2003, the operational structure of NATO was divided into "Europe" and "Atlantic".
MOVIES' ALTERNATE ENDINGS: The original script for this Jamie Foxx film set in Saudi Arabia had his FBI team getting blown up
The Kingdom
2007–2009: Intuition thumb|Foxx's star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame 2007 brought him the lead role in the action thriller film The Kingdom opposite Chris Cooper, Jason Bateman, Jennifer Garner and Ashraf Barhom.
3
2003–2006: Ray, Unpredictable, and Dreamgirls thumb|Foxx and Kanye West performing "Gold Digger" In 2003, Foxx featured on the rapper Twista's song, "Slow Jamz", together with Kanye West, which reached #1 on the US Billboard Hot 100 singles chart and #3 on the UK Singles chart.
NY Daily News. Retrieved on January 20, 2016.
The Stan Tookie Williams Story  Tookie  2005  Stealth  Lt.
ALLITERATION ALL AROUND: Visa or American Express, for example
credit cards
The company's logo, adopted in 1958, is a Centurion whose image appears on the company's travelers' cheques, charge cards and credit cards.
2
The old buildings, dubbed by the New York Times as "among the ancient landmarks" of lower Broadway, were inadequate for such a rapidly expanding concern.
Amex also targeted young adults with City Reward Cards that earn INSIDE Rewards points to eat, drink, and play at New York, Chicago and LA hot spots.
THE NEW YORK FIRE DEPARTMENT THROUGH THE YEARS: (Sarah of the Clue Crew stands next to a fire engine in the NYC Fire Museum.)  The 1970s were one of the New York City Fire Department’s most challenging times; Howard Cosell said on TV, this borough "is burning", & firemen were often called there daily
the Bronx
"The Bronx is Burning"
3
Otherwise on radio, Cosell did his show, Speaking of Sports, as well as sports reports and updates for affiliated radio stations around the country; he continued his radio duties even after he became prominent on television.
When Foreman knocked Frazier to the mat the first of six times, roughly two minutes into the first round, Cosell yelled out  His call of Frazier's first trip to the mat became one of the most quoted phrases in American sports broadcasting history.
This was an hour-long variety show, broadcast live from the Ed Sullivan Theater in New York City and hosted by Cosell, which is not to be confused with the NBC series Saturday Night Live (which coincidentally also premiered in 1975 under its original title of NBC's Saturday Night, to avoid confusion with Cosell's show).
UN-SPORTSMANLIKE CONDUCT: For her role in hobbling Nancy Kerrigan, she was banned from the U.S. Figure Skating Association
Tonya Harding
She is also noted for her conflict on and off the ice with skating rival Tonya Harding.
3
Kerrigan's Olympic skating fashions Kerrigan's Olympic skating outfits were designed by noted fashion designer Vera Wang.
Kerrigan's 1994 Olympic dresses were also designed by Wang.
Figure Skating: A Celebration (ISBN 0-7710-2819-9), p. 70.
CAMBODIA, CAMEROON OR CANADA: The smallest in area
Cambodia
Cambodia (;  , Kampuchea, ), officially known as the Kingdom of Cambodia (, Preăh Réachéanachâk Kâmpŭchéa, ) and once known as the Khmer Empire, is a country located in the southern portion of the Indochina Peninsula in Southeast Asia.
3
At Phum Snay, burial goods included weaponry and skeletons showed evidence on trauma inflicted by violence, indicating warfare between different groups in the area as a result of its strategic location for trade.
including many of its Asian neighbours and those of important players during the Paris peace negotiations, including the US, Australia, Canada, China, the European Union (EU), Japan, and Russia.
The Tonle Sap Biosphere Reserve s a unique ecological phenomenon surrounding the Tonle Sap.
GEMS & JEWELRY: Legacy rings inspired by the Edwardian era are exclusive to this preeminent Fifth Avenue jeweler
Tiffany
Many luxury goods, fashion, toys, and sport brand boutiques are located on Fifth Avenue,  including Louis Vuitton, Tiffany & Co., Gucci, Prada, Bottega Veneta, Armani, Fendi, Versace, Tommy Hilfiger, Cartier, Omega, Ralph Lauren, Chanel, Harry Winston, Salvatore Ferragamo, Nike, Escada, Swarovski, Bvlgari, Emilio Pucci, Ermenegildo Zegna, Diesel, Lacoste, Brooks Brothers, Abercrombie & Fitch, De Beers, Emanuel Ungaro, FAO Schwarz, Gap , Lindt Chocolate Shop, Henri Bendel, NBA Store, Oxxford Clothes, Sephora, United Colors of Benetton, Zara, H&M and BCBG Max Azria etc.mustseenewyork.com NYC Madison Avenue - Fifth Avenue Shopping Map Luxury department stores include Lord & Taylor, Saks Fifth Avenue and Bergdorf Goodman.
3
On Monday, August 31, 1987, a state appeals court judge halted the ban for at least a week pending a ruling after opponents against the ban brought a lawsuit.
By the early 20th century, this portion of Fifth Avenue had been nicknamed "Millionaire's Row", with mansions such as the Mrs. William B. Astor House, William A. Clark House, Felix M. Warburg House, two Morton F. Plant Houses, James B. Duke House and numerous others (see Category:Fifth Avenue (Manhattan), below).
Entrepreneur Magazine: "Built for Business: Midtown Manhattan in the 1920s".
"STREET"S: Although nominated 4 times, Karl Malden never won an Emmy for this TV police series
"The Streets of San Francisco"
Michael Douglas, his former "The Streets of San Francisco" co-star, presented Malden with a Lifetime Achievement Award from the Screen Actors Guild on February 22, 2004.. Retrieved 21 Jan 2011.
3
Malden later played in high-profile Hollywood movies such as Baby Doll, How the West Was Won, and Patton as well as appearing on U.S. television as Lt.
Mike Stone in The Streets of San Francisco.
On November 12, 2005, the United States House of Representatives authorized the United States Postal Service to rename the Los Angeles Barrington Postal Station as the Karl Malden Postal Station in honor of Malden's achievements.
CAMEO CAMERA: You'll find Jim Lovell as the captain of the Iwo Jima in this 1995 flick
Apollo 13
James Arthur "Jim" Lovell, Jr. (born March 25, 1928) is a former NASA astronaut and a retired captain in the United States Navy, most famous as the commander of the Apollo 13 mission, which suffered a critical failure en route to the Moon but was brought back safely to Earth by the efforts of the crew and mission control.
3
Lovell is a recipient of the Congressional Space Medal of Honor and the Presidential Medal of Freedom.
He was also recognized by the Boy Scouts of America with their prestigious Silver Buffalo Award.
Filmmakers initially offered to make Lovell's character an admiral aboard the ship (presumably Rear Admiral Donald C. Davis, Commander Task Force 130 (CTF 130), who was the senior officer aboard and welcomed them home).
PIRATES: FACT & FICTION: In honor of its centenary Joseph Papp produced a version of this in Central Park in 1980
The Pirates of Penzance
Among the myriad plays and musicals Papp produced, he is perhaps best known for four productions which transferred to commercial Broadway runs: the original version of Galt MacDermot's Hair'; a star-studded production of The Pirates of Penzance; black feminist Ntozake Shange's For Colored Girls who Have Considered Suicide when the Rainbow is Enuf; and the anomaly that was A Chorus Line.
3
Papp established The Public Theater in what had been the Astor Library Building in downtown New York.
Papp's 1956 production of Taming of the Shrew, outdoors in the East River Amphitheatre on New York's Lower East Side, was pivotal for Papp, primarily because Brooks Atkinson, known as the dean of American theatre critics, went downtown to see it and endorsed Papp's vision in The New York Times.
Just as Rabe's work reflected the concerns of its time (Vietnam and American imperialism), Papp's production in 1985 of Larry Kramer's play The Normal Heart dared to address, in its time, the prejudicial political system which was turning its back on the AIDS crisis and the gay community.
TELEVISION: Before she was Will's Grace, Debra Messing was Gail O'Grady's sister Dana Abandando on this cop drama
NYPD Blue
Subsequently, she appeared in several episodes of the television series NYPD Blue during 1994 and 1995.
3
When Messing was three, she moved with her parents and her older brother, Brett, to East Greenwich, Rhode Island.
Messing starred in The Mysteries of Laura, a police procedural television show that premiered in September 2014.
Filmography  Film  Year  Title Role Notes1995Betty Sutton 1997McHale's NavyLt.
GEOGRAPHY: Sharing its name with a seaport in Yemen, this gulf provides a link between the Red Sea & the Arabian Sea
Gulf of Aden
It is bordered by Saudi Arabia to the north, the Red Sea to the west, the Gulf of Aden and Arabian Sea to the south, and Oman to the east.
3
Effective control over entire Yemen was not achieved by the Umayyad Caliphate.
He was a religious cleric and judge who was invited to come to Saada from Medina to arbitrate tribal disputes.
After his demise, the Zaidi community was split between two rival imams.
ROCK'S ROOTS: It was Dick Clark who suggested that this man record "The Twist"
Chubby Checker
A few of the many artists introduced were Ike and Tina Turner, Smokey Robinson and the Miracles, The Beach Boys, Stevie Wonder, Simon and Garfunkel, Jerry Lee Lewis, Buddy Holly, Johnny Cash, Sam Cooke, Fats Domino and Chubby Checker.
3
On March 25, 1972, Clark hosted American Top 40, filling in for Casey Kasem.
In one episode he plays himself at a Philadelphia diner, and in the other he helps Will Smith's character host bloopers from past episodes of that sitcom.
From 1979 to 1980, Clark reportedly owned the former scandal-ridden Westchester Premier Theatre in Greenburgh, NY and renamed it the Dick Clark Westchester Theatre.
SHORT STORY WRITERS: Sunnyside, the old Dutch home he remodeled in Tarrytown, N.Y., was made a public shrine in 1947
Washington Irving
Canada   Sunnyside (Surrey), a neighbourhood of South Surrey, which in turn is a region of Surrey, British Columbia  Sunnyside, Calgary, a community in Calgary, Alberta, Canada  Sunnyside (C-Train) station   Sunnyside, Newfoundland and Labrador, Canada  Sunnyside, Toronto, a lakeshore district in Toronto, Ontario, Canada  Sunnyside, Toronto railway station Sunnyside Avenue (Ottawa), a road in Ottawa, Ontario, Canada  New Zealand  Sunnyside Hospital, a former mental asylum in Christchurch, New Zealand   South Africa  Sunnyside, Pretoria, a neighbourhood in central Pretoria, South Africa   United Kingdom  Coatbridge Sunnyside railway station  Sunnyside, Hitchin, a neighbourhood in Hitchin, England Sunnyside, Rotherham, a village near Bramley, South Yorkshire, England   United States  (by state) Sunnyside, California Sunnyside, Fresno County, California Sunnyside, Mendocino County, California Sunnyside, Placer County, California Sunnyside, San Diego County, California Sunnyside, San Francisco, California Sunnyside, Tehama County, California Sunnyside-Tahoe City, California Sunnyside, Denver, Colorado, a neighborhood of Denver, Colorado Sunnyside, Florida, an unincorporated community in Bay County Sunnyside, Georgia, a census-designated place  Sunny Side, Georgia, United States  Sunnyside (Louisville, Kentucky), listed on the NRHP in Kentucky  Sunny Side, Maryland, United States  Sunnyside (Aquasco, Maryland), listed on the NRHP in Maryland  Sunnyside, Nevada  Sunnyside, New Jersey  Sunny Side, New Mexico, United States  Sunnyside, New York  Sunnyside, Queens, New York, a neighborhood   Sunnyside (LIRR station) in Queens  Sunnyside (Richfield Springs, New York), listed on the NRHP in New York  Sunnyside, Staten Island, New York, a neighborhood   Sunnyside (Tarrytown, New York), former home of author Washington Irving, a U.S. National Historic Landmark  Sunnyside (Wendell, North Carolina), listed on the NRHP in North Carolina Sunnyside-Central Terrace Historic District, Winston-Salem, NC Sunnyside, Clackamas County, Oregon, a census-designated place Sunnyside, Umatilla County, Oregon, a community Sunnyside, Portland, Oregon, a neighborhood Sunnyside, Pennsylvania, a neighborhood in Lancaster, Pennsylvania  Sunnyside (Greenwood, South Carolina), listed on the NRHP in South Carolina  Sunnyside (Edisto Island, South Carolina), listed on the NRHP in South Carolina  Sunnyside (Nashville, Tennessee), listed on the NRHP in Tennessee  Sunnyside, Houston, Texas, a neighborhood  Sunnyside, Utah  Sunnyside, Virginia Sunny Side, Virginia, a community in Buckingham and Cumberland counties  Sunnyside (Charlottesville, Virginia), listed on the NRHP in Virginia  Sunnyside (Clarksville, Virginia), listed on the NRHP in Virginia   Sunnyside (Heathsville, Virginia), listed on the NRHP in Virginia   Sunnyside (Lexington, Virginia), listed on the NRHP in Virginia   Sunnyside (Newsoms, Virginia), listed on the NRHP in Virginia   Sunnyside (Washington, Virginia), listed on the NRHP in Virginia   Sunnyside, Washington, a city in the U.S. state of Washington Sunnyside, Fayette County, West Virginia Sunnyside, Tyler County, West Virginia  Sunnyside, Wisconsin, an unincorporated community  Art entertainment, and media Film Sunnyside (film), a 1919 film by Charlie Chaplin Sunnyside (1979 film), a 1979 teen slasher film starring Joey Travolta  Literature Sunnyside (novel), a 2009 novel by Glen David Gold The Sunny Side, a collection of short stories and essays by A. A. Milne  Television Sunnyside (TV series), a Canadian TV series Sunnyside Farm (TV series), a British TV series   Enterprises  Sunnyside Amusement Park, a former amusement park in Toronto Sunnyside Coaches, a bus company (Danny Rayburn is shown riding one Miami-bound, from Islamorada, Florida, in the Netflix TV series Bloodline, season 1, episode 11) Sunnyside Mall, a shopping mall in Bedford, Nova Scotia which houses the largest indoor market in the Maritimes (Pete's Frootique) Sunnyside Records, a jazz record label  Schools Sunnyside High School (disambiguation), multiple schools Sunnyside Middle School in Lafayette, Indiana Sunnyside Primary School in Sunnyside, Pretoria, Republic of South Africa  See also  Sunny Side Gang  Sunny side up (disambiguation) Sunnyside Farm (disambiguation)  Category:Place name disambiguation pages
1
Sunnyside and Sunny Side may refer to:  Places  Australia  Sunnyside (Cooranbong, Australia), house of Ellen G. White, co-founder of the Seventh-day Adventist Church Sunnyside railway station, New South Wales Sunnyside, Kangaroo Point, a heritage-listed detached house also known as 'Dr Wright's House'.
FICTIONAL MEN OF WAR: In 1942 George Baker created this "morose" comic-strip soldier for Yank magazine
Sad Sack
2003–present), American art historian George Baker (Bengali actor) (born 1945), Indian actor and politician George Baker (baritone) (1885–1976), British singer George Baker (cartoonist) (1915–1975), Sad Sack comic strip George Baker (Dutch singer) (born 1944), Dutch singer and songwriter George Baker Selection, Dutch pop music group featuring George Baker George Baker (organist) (1773–1847), English musician George C. Baker (born 1951), composer and organist George D. Baker (1868–1933), American film director George Herbert Baker (1878–1943), American Impressionist artist George Melville Baker (1832–1890), American playwright and publisher George Pierce Baker (1866–1935), U.S. drama professor  Politics George Baker (politician) (born 1942), Canadian Senator George Baker (Bengali actor) (born 1945), Indian actor and politician George Barnard Baker (1834–1910), Canadian politician from Quebec George Harold Baker (1877–1916), Canadian politician and lawyer George Luis Baker (1868–1941), mayor of Portland, Oregon, 1917–1933 George W. C. Baker (1872–1953), councilman on the Los Angeles City Council, 1931–1937  Religion Father Divine (c. 1876–1965), U.S. religious leader whose real name was possibly George Baker George Baker (bishop) (fl.
2
George Baker may refer to:  Arts George Baker (actor) (1931–2011), British film and television actor George Baker (art historian) (fl.
1661–1665), Bishop of Waterford and Lismore George Baker (Archdeacon of Totnes) (1687–1772), British Anglican priest George Baker (Dean of Antigua) (fl.
18TH CENTURY AMERICA: Samuel Slater settled in R.I. & built America's first successful cotton-spinning machines driven by this power
water power
Housed in a former fulling mill near the Pawtucket Falls of the Blackstone River, Almy & Brown, as the company was to be called, planned to manufacture cloth for sale, with yarn to be spun on spinning wheels, jennies, and frames, using water power.
3
(Slater Study Group)
The first child workers were hired in 1790."Samuel Slater and Moses Brown Change America"
Slater died on April 21, 1835 in Webster, Massachusetts (a town which he had founded in 1832, naming it for his friend Senator Daniel Webster).
YE OLDE BIG APPLE: Construction of the Empire State Building began in 1930 on the site of this hyphenated hotel that moved to Park Avenue
Waldorf-Astoria
The Waldorf-Astoria Hotel at 301 Park Ave.
3
Efforts to promote a Grand Park Avenue Expressway to Grand Concourse in the Bronx were unavailing.
The flowers and greenery in the median of Manhattan's Park Avenue are privately maintained, by the Fund for Park Avenue.
Boston Consulting Group Bristol Myers Squibb British Airways at 2 Park Ave.
I'M IN CHARGE!: President Bashar Al-Assad
Syria
Bashar Hafez al-Assad ( ,  Levantine pronunciation: ; born 11 September 1965) is the President of Syria, commander-in-chief of the Syrian Armed Forces, General Secretary of the ruling Ba'ath Party and Regional Secretary of the party's branch in Syria.
2
Bashar at the time had few political aspirations.
On 23 May 2011, the EU foreign ministers agreed at a meeting in Brussels to add Assad and nine other officials to a list affected by travel bans and asset freezes.
MEL BROOKS FILMS: Mel's wife, she co-starred with him in "Silent Movie" & "To Be Or Not To Be"
Anne Bancroft
The ensemble cast includes Dom DeLuise, Marty Feldman, Bernadette Peters, and Sid Caesar, with appearances by Anne Bancroft, Liza Minnelli, Burt Reynolds, James Caan, Marcel Marceau and Paul Newman playing themselves.
3
In the next shot, a newspaper ad indicates that they "ink" Newman to do the movie.
It depicts the Studio Chief (Sid Caesar) as a braying donkey.
A secretary attempts to explain to the Studio Chief that Funn has a drinking problem, by pantomiming an uplifted bottle.
AFFAIRS OF STATE: It's out of the closet that he was in the closet with Nan Britton, a young flapper
Warren G. Harding
Nan P. "Nanny" Britton (November 9, 1896 – March 21, 1991) was Warren G. Harding's mistress who publicly revealed in 1928 that he had fathered her illegitimate daughter (Elizabeth Ann Britton Harding Blaesing) shortly before his election as President in 1920.
3
However, she claimed she also began an intimate relationship with Harding.
Carl Sferrazza Anthony, author of Florence Harding, wrote that court transcripts in Toledo, Ohio, show that Mouser referred to Britton as a "degenerate and pervert", then "brought (Florence Kling Harding) in by using Warren's 'love of his good wife' against a 'distorted ... deranged ... demented ... diabolical' Nan who had no respect for the marriage tie ..."
Dean, John; Schlesinger, Arthur M. Warren Harding (The American President Series), Times Books, 2004, ISBN 0-8050-6956-9  Ferrell, Robert H. The Strange Death of President Harding, University of Missouri Press, 1996, ISBN 0-8262-1202-6
PHARMACOLOGY: Claude Bernard pioneered the field with his 19th C. study of this poison used by Amazon natives
Curare
The study of the physiological action of poisons was also of great interest to him, his attention being devoted in particular to curare and carbon monoxide gas.
3
Verification and Disproof.
Bernard states:  Indeed, proof that a given condition always precedes or accompanies a phenomenon does not warrant concluding with certainty that a given condition is the immediate cause of that phenomenon.
Well, I say that this ratio means literally nothing scientifically and gives us no certainty in performing the next operation; for we do not know whether the next case will be among the recoveries or the deaths.
ERIC THE READ: Though American on TV, Lassie was created by this Yorkshireman
Eric Knight
Lassie is a fictional female Rough Collie dog character created by Eric Knight in a short story that was later expanded to a full-length novel called Lassie Come-Home.
3
In helping to deal with the crisis, the local pub in Lyme Regis, called the Pilot Boat, offered its cellar as a mortuary.
To everyone's astonishment, Cowan eventually stirred.
The sinking of the ship was a severe blow to Britain during these early years of the war.
"WONDER" LAND: Mary Stuart Masterson, Eric Stoltz & Lea Thompson are at the heart of this 1987 love triangle
Some Kind of Wonderful
Other films she is known for include All the Right Moves, The Beverly Hillbillies, Howard the Duck, Jaws 3-D, Red Dawn, and Some Kind of Wonderful.
2
She starred in the television movie The Christmas Clause, which received good reviews and ratings.
She was paired with professional dancer Artem Chigvintsev.http://hollywoodlife.com/2014/09/04/dancing-with-the-stars-season-19-cast-dwts-celebrities/
'60s TV ACTORS: He "Bewitched" us as Uncle Arthur
Paul Lynde
28 Serena Elizabeth Montgomery (1966–1972)(credited as "Pandora Spocks") 24 Adam Stephens unknown (1969–1970)Greg and David Lawrence (1970–1972) 24 Phyllis Stephens Mabel Albertson (1964–1971) 19 Dr. Bombay Bernard Fox (1967–1972) 18 Esmeralda Alice Ghostley (1969–1972) 15 Frank Stephens Robert F. Simon (1964–67, 1971)Roy Roberts (1967–1970) 13 Maurice Maurice Evans 12 Uncle Arthur Paul Lynde (1965–1971) 10 During its run, the series had a number of major cast changes, often because of illness or death of the actors.
3
For Bewitched'''s seventh season premiere in the fall of 1970, in order to boost ratings, an eight-part story arc was launched in which Samantha, Darrin, and Endora travel to Salem, Massachusetts for the centennial Witches Convocation.
This show adapted original scripts to an Argentinian context, with local humor and a contemporary setting.
Cable television channel WTBS carried seasons 3–8 throughout the 1980s and 1990s from DFS on a barter basis like most local stations that carried the show did.
THE CLASSICS: Author who sent Alice down the rabbit hole into Wonderland
Lewis Carroll
Alice may refer to:  Alice (given name), including a list of notable people and fictional characters called Alice  Alice (Alice's Adventures in Wonderland), the heroine of Alice's Adventures in Wonderland and Through the Looking-Glass  Literature  Books   Alice series, children's and teen books by Phyllis Reynolds Naylor  Alice (Hermann book), a 2009 short story collection by Judith Hermann  Alice (Dilbert), an engineer from the Dilbert comic strip  Alice the Goon, a character from the Popeye comic strip   Manga   Alice 19th, a manga series written by Yū Watase  Gakuen Alice (Alice Academy), a manga series written by Tachibana Higuchi  Computers  Alice (computer chip), graphics engine chip in the Amiga computer in 1992  Alice (software), an object-oriented programming language and IDE developed at Carnegie Mellon  A.L.I.C.E., a chatterbot based on AIML  Alice (programming language), a functional programming language designed by the Programming Systems Lab at Saarland University  Alice mobile robot, the "sugarcube" micro-robot  Alice, the brand name used by Telecom Italia for internet and telephone services in Italy and San Marino and previously in Germany, France and the Netherlands  Matra Alice, an early home micro-computer marketed in France   Video games   Through the Looking Glass (video game), a 1984 Macintosh computer game also known as Alice  Alice: An Interactive Museum, a 1991 early Japanese point-and-click adventure game inspired by Lewis Carrol's stories  American McGee's Alice, a 2000 computer game inspired by Lewis Carroll's stories  Alice: Madness Returns, the 2011 sequel to American McGee's Alice  Film and television  Films  Alice (1982 film), starring Sophie Barjac and Susannah York based on a Lewis Carroll story Alice (1988 film), by Jan Svankmajer (original Czech title: Neco z Alenky) based on a Lewis Carroll story Alice (1990 film), by Woody Allen Alice (2002 film), by Sylvie Ballyot Alice (2005 film), by Marco Martins Alice Comedies, a series of animated shorts by Walt Disney and Ub Iwerks Alice: Ignorance is Bliss, a short documentary following the relationship between an 84-year-old dementia sufferer and her grandson   Television  Alice (miniseries), a 2009 Syfy channel show, based on Alice's Adventures in Wonderland and Through the Looking-Glass Alice (TV series), a popular American television series in the 1970s1980s.
2
Based on the film Alice Doesn't Live Here Anymore "Alice" (Star Trek: Voyager), a 1999 episode of Star Trek: Voyager Alice Academy, a Japanese animated series Alice, I Think (TV series), a Canadian comedy show on The Comedy Network [[Alice (Brazilian TV series)|Alice (TV series)]], a 2008 Brazilian TV show  Music   Albums   Alice (Per Elisa) a 1981 album by Italian singer Alice  Alice (Tom Waits album), a 2002 album by Tom Waits  Alice (1984 album), a compilation album of recordings by Italian singer-songwriter Alice  Alice (1986 album), a compilation album of recordings by Italian singer-songwriter Alice  Alice (EP), an EP by The Sisters of Mercy   Artists and Bands   Alice Cooper (born 1948), rock singer, active from 1964 on  Alice (singer) (born 1954), San Remo winner and Eurovision participant  Alice Caymmi (born 1990), Música popular brasileira singer, active from 2012 on  Alice (band), Japanese band formerly led by Shinji Tanimura  Alice in Chains, alternative rock band  Alice (Czech band), fronted by multi Grammy winning vocalist Dan Bárta.
Songs   "Alice" (Moby song), a 2008 song by Moby from his album "Last Night"  "Alice" (Pogo song), a 2007 song by Pogo, popularized on YouTube  "Alice" (Avril Lavigne song), from the Alice in Wonderland soundtrack  "Alice", a song on Stevie Nicks' fourth solo album The Other Side of the Mirror "Alice", a song of the Noir Désir's fourth album Tostaky "Alice", a song by Raven-Symoné from her third studio album
ORGANIZATIONS: It's what the R stands for in AARP
retired
AARP, Inc., formerly the American Association of Retired Persons, is a United States-based membership and interest group, founded in 1958 by Ethel Percy Andrus, Ph.
3
84–5, Greenwood Publishing Group, 2000 ISBN 978-0-275-97044-4 though in an interview years later by the Des Moines Register, Senator Simpson remained "troubled by AARP's practices", calling AARP "the biggest marketing operation in America and money-maker" and an organization whose practices are "the greatest abuse of American generosity I witnessed in my time in the U.S. Senate".
Approximately seven million people have AARP branded health insurance, including drug coverage and Medigap, as of April 2007 and AARP earns more income from selling insurance to members than it does from membership dues.
AARP's priorities now are to protect the current programs and implement the Affordable Care Act.
MUSIC OF THE '60s: In this 1965 hit, Roger Miller tells us that "Two hours of pushing broom buys a eight by twelve four-bit room"
"King of the Road"
His most recognized tunes included the chart-topping country/pop hits "King of the Road", "Dang Me" and "England Swings", all from the mid-1960s Nashville sound era.
2
He listened to the Grand Ole Opry and Light Crust Doughboys on a Fort Worth station with his cousin's husband, Sheb Wooley.
He co-wrote Dwight Yoakam's hit "It Only Hurts
IT'S A TEAM THING: (Hi, I'm Julius Erving.)  In the 1972 NBA draft I was picked by this team that 3 years earlier drafted some guy named Lew Alcindor
the Milwaukee Bucks
When he became eligible for the NBA draft in 1972, the Milwaukee Bucks picked him in the first round (12th overall).
3
J. Ted Carter.
According to the Sports Guy.
In 1979, Larry Bird entered the league, reviving the Boston Celtics and the storied Celtics–76ers rivalry; these two teams faced each other in the Eastern Conference Finals in 1980, '81, '82, and '85.
YELLOW THERE!: As a human guinea pig, Jesse Lazear helped Walter Reed prove this was spread by mosquitoes
yellow fever
Major Walter Reed, M.D., U.S. Army, (September 13, 1851 – November 22, 1902) was a U.S. Army physician who in 1901 led the team that postulated and confirmed the theory that yellow fever is transmitted by a particular mosquito species, rather than by direct contact.
3
ISBN 0-425-21202-5
However, his unsophisticated experiments that proved this were discounted by many, but were the basis of Reed's research.
The Walter Reed Tropical Medicine Course  Reed appears in sculpture on the great stone chancel screen at Riverside Church, NYC. (Section 4: "Humanitarians", rather than Section 1: "Physicians".)  Arlington County, Virginia has two facilities named for Reed: the Reed School in Westover and a community/senior center near Walter Reed Drive in Arlington Village.
HODGE PODGE: In 1994, Member of Parliament Margaret Hodge nominated this man as leader of Britain's Labour Party
Tony Blair
At one point, Hodge's Deputy Chairman was Jack Straw (later Foreign Secretary), both becoming key members of PM Tony Blair's government.
3
On 9 June 2010 she was elected Chairman of the influential Public Accounts Committee, in succession to Sir Edward Leigh MP.  Born Margaret Eve Oppenheimer, she was known as Margaret Eve Watson from 1968 to 1978, and styled Lady Hodge from 2004, after her second husband was knighted until her appointment as DBE in 2015.
Every time I received any benefit from the company this happened."Joe Mills "Anti-tax avoidance campaigner Margaret Hodge 'given £1.5m shares from tax haven' Liechtenstein", IB Times, 28 April 2015  Shortly after the 2015 general election it emerged that Hodge would not be standing for re-election to the PAC.Rajeev Syal "Margaret Hodge stands aside as head of spending watchdog", The Guardian, 20 May 2015 Hodge was succeeded in June 2015 by Meg Hillier."Frank Field elected Work and Pensions Committee chairman", BBC News, 18 June 2015  Titles, styles and honours thumb|right|100px|DBE insignia  Miss Margaret Oppenheimer (8 September 1944 – 1968)  Mrs Andrew Watson (1968 – 1973)  Cllr Mrs Andrew Watson (1973 - 1978)  Cllr Mrs Henry Hodge (1978 – 1978)  Cllr Mrs Henry Hodge, MBE (1978 - 1992)   Mrs Henry Hodge, MBE (1992 – 1994)  Mrs Henry Hodge, MBE, MP (1994 – 2003)  The Rt Hon.
Hodge was appointed Member (MBE) in 1978 and promoted Dame Commander of the Order of the British Empire (DBE) in the Dissolution Honours List of 27 August 2015.www.gov.uk
LEFTOVERS: In 1968 Creighton Abrams replaced this general as commander of U.S. forces in Vietnam
William Westmoreland
Due to concerns about the conduct of the Vietnam War, he was appointed as deputy to General William Westmoreland, head of the Military Assistance Command in Vietnam, in May 1967.
3
Following the election of President Richard Nixon, Abrams began implementing the Nixon Doctrine referred to as Vietnamization.
Abrams disdained most of the politicians with whom he was forced to deal, in particular Robert McNamara and McGeorge Bundy, and had an even lower opinion of defense contractors whom he accused of war profiteering.
Thunderbolt:
SONGS OF THE '60s: "Ue O Miute Aruko" by Kyu Sakamoto was retitled this for the U.S.
"Sukiyaki"
was a Japanese singer and actor, best known outside Japan for his international hit song "Ue o Muite Arukō" (known as "Sukiyaki" in English-speaking markets), which was sung in Japanese and sold over 13 million copies.
3
It is also an alternate reading of the kanji of his given name .
Sakamoto's career took off, he ended his studies and left school.
Kyu Sakamoto had only one other song reach the U.S. charts, "China Nights (Shina no Yoru)" (Capitol 5016), which peaked at number 58 in 1963.
FICTIONAL SHIPS: Captain Peleg told Ishmael that he & Captain Bildad were part-owners of this whaler
the Pequod
In popular culture Peleg is the name of one of the owners of the Pequod in Herman Melville's Moby-Dick.
3
()     In the Septuagint and some Christian Bibles derived from it, Peleg is called Phaleg and his father is called Heber.
The meaning of Peleg in English is "brook", a little river.
According to  and , it was during the time of Peleg that "the earth was divided" – traditionally, this is often assumed to be just before, during, or after the failure of Nimrod's Tower of Babel.
BASEBALL HISTORY: Agricultural term for the system, created by Branch Rickey, of minor league teams controlled by a big league team
farm system
He was perhaps best known for breaking Major League Baseball's color barrier by signing African American player Jackie Robinson, for drafting the first Afro-Hispanic superstar, Roberto Clemente, for creating the framework for the modern minor league farm system, for encouraging the Major Leagues to add new teams through his involvement in the proposed Continental League, and for introducing the batting helmet.
3
His many achievements and deep Christian faith earned him the nickname "the Mahātmā."  Early life Rickey was born in Stockdale, Ohio, the son of Jacob Frank Rickey and Emily (née) Brown.
The idealism was at least partially rooted in an incident involving a team for which Rickey worked early on.
Louis Browns players Category:St.
TV ACTORS & ACTRESSES: Mariska Hargitay of "Can't Hurry Love" is the daughter of Mickey Hargitay & this blonde bombshell
Jayne Mansfield
The daughter of bodybuilder-turned-actor Mickey Hargitay and actress Jayne Mansfield, Hargitay made her film debut in the 1985 horror-comedy film Ghoulies and her major television debut in the 1986 adventure drama series Downtown.
3
I said.
On March 3, 2009, she was hospitalized after suffering chest pains related to the injury.
I wanted to help find a way to help people reclaim their lives and live them with a renewed sense of possibility and hope.
TOUGH LIT: Ornithological title name of a prison in a John Cheever novel
Falconer
(William Dean Howells Medal, 1965), Bullet Park (1969), Falconer (1977) and a novella
3
Cheever was a frequent visitor on the set, and made a cameo appearance in the movie.
Cheever soon terminated therapy.
Driven home by his wife on May 7, Cheever never drank alcohol again.
THEATRE: Uta Hagen was the first to play Martha in this playwright's"Who's Afraid of Virginia Woolf?"
Albee
by Edward Albee (who called her "a profoundly truthful actress").
3
Port of New York, passenger list of the S.S. Luetzow, September 4, 1924, sheet 41.
I was not allowed to begin with, or concern myself at any time with, a preconceived form.
The video has been thoroughly studied and is now taught in many acting classes.
BULL: The crowd noises from this first Herb Alpert hit were dubbed from a bullring in Tijuana
"The Lonely Bull"
Alpert adapted the trumpet style to the tune, mixed in crowd cheers and other noises for ambience, and renamed the song "The Lonely Bull".
3
In 1987, Alpert branched out successfully to the R&B world with the hit album, Keep Your Eye on Me, teaming up with producers Jimmy Jam and Terry Lewis on "Diamonds" and "Making Love in the Rain" featuring vocals by Janet Jackson and Lisa Keith.
The Song Begins (1974) SP-3620Coney Island (1975) SP-4521Just You and Me (1976)
Greenwood Press, Westport, Conn. 2001.
QUESTION, MARK: Mark Haddon penned the bestselling novel "The Curious Incident of" this
the Dog in the Night-time
Mark Haddon (born 26 September 1962) is an English novelist, best known for The Curious Incident of the Dog in the Night-Time (2003).
3
In 2003, Haddon won the Whitbread Book of the Year Award—in the Novels rather than Children's Books category—for
He also won the Commonwealth Writers Prize in the Best First Book category, as The Curious Incident was considered his first written for adults; yet he also won the Guardian Children's Fiction Prize, a once-in-a-lifetime award judged by a panel of children's writers.
Titch Johnson, Almost World Champion (1993) Agent Z Goes Wild (1994) At Home At Playgroup In the Garden On Holiday Gridzbi Spudvetch! (1992) The Real Porky Phillips (1994)
ACTORS: Rap star & underwear model who played porn star Dirk Diggler in "Boogie Nights"
Mark Wahlberg
It stars Mark Wahlberg, Julianne Moore, Burt Reynolds, Don Cheadle, John C. Reilly, William H. Macy and Heather Graham.
1
His success allows him to buy a new house, an extensive wardrobe and a "competition orange" 1977 Chevrolet Corvette Stingray.
ON OLD MAPS: 1890s U.S. maps showed the twin territories, Oklahoma Territory & this
Indian Territory
The Territory of Oklahoma was an organized incorporated territory of the United States that existed from May 2, 1890, until November 16, 1907, when it was joined with the Indian Territory under a new constitution and admitted to the Union as the State of Oklahoma.
3
Tent cities grew overnight at Oklahoma City, Kingfisher, El Reno, Norman, Guthrie, and Stillwater, which were the first of the large settlements.
Accessed March 1, 2015.
Kickapoo reserve –
RELIGION: While there are 3 orders of Franciscans, all follow the ideals of the founder, St. Francis of this city
Assisi
St. Francis may refer to numerous Roman Catholic saints:  Francis of Assisi (1181–1226), Italian founder of the Order of Friars Minor (Franciscans) Francis of Paola (1416–1507), Italian (Calabrian) founder of the Order of the Minims Francis Xavier (1506–1552), Navarrese Catholic missionary to India; co-founder of the Society of Jesus (Jesuits) Francis Borgia (1510–1572), Spanish Jesuit priest; third leader of the Jesuits Francis Solanus (1549–1610), Spanish Franciscan missionary to South America Francis Caracciolo (1563–1608), Italian priest who co-founded the Congregation of the Minor Clerics Regular Francis de Sales (1567–1622), French born bishop of Geneva, Switzerland Francis Ferdinand de Capillas (1607–1648), Castilian Dominican missionary; first Roman Catholic martyr killed in China Francis de Geronimo (1642–1716), Italian Jesuit priest St. Francis or Saint Francis may also refer to:  Places St. Francis Harbour, Nova Scotia, a small community in Canada  United States St. Francis, Arkansas, a city St. Francis, Kansas, a city Saint Francis, Kentucky, an unincorporated community St. Francis, Maine, a town St. Francis, Minnesota, a city St. Francis, Texas, an unincorporated community St. Francis, Wisconsin, a city St. Francis River, a river in Missouri and Arkansas  South Africa St Francis Bay,  a village in Cacadu District Municipality, Eastern Cape province
1
Cape St. Francis, a town in Eastern Cape province  Schools St. Francis College, college in Brooklyn Heights, New York St. Francis Brooklyn Terriers, this school's athletic program St. Francis' College, college in Lucknow, India Saint Francis University, university in Loretto, Pennsylvania Saint Francis Red Flash, this school's athletic program University of St. Francis, university with locations throughout the United States University of Saint Francis (disambiguation), various universities Saint Francis High School (disambiguation), various high schools  Other uses St. Francis (film), 2002 film starring Raoul Bove HMCS St. Francis, Royal Canadian Navy destroyer during World War II St. Francis Yacht Club, sailing club in San Francisco St Francis F.C., a football club in Ireland Nobilissima Visione, 1938 ballet by Paul Hindemith, known at its New York performance as Saint Francis  See also List of places named after Saint Francis Frances of Rome (1384–1440), Catholic saint Frances Xavier Cabrini (1850–1917), Catholic saint known as Mother Cabrini San Francisco, a city and county in California St. Francis Hospital (disambiguation) Saint-François (disambiguation) Francis (disambiguation) San Francisco (disambiguation) São Francisco (disambiguation)
NAME'S THE SAME: J. MacDonald heroine who always got her mountie, or "Dick Van Dyke Show"s Sally who seldom got her man
Rose Marie
Complementing Van Dyke was a veteran cast of comic actors including Rose Marie, Morey Amsterdam, Jerry Paris, Ann Morgan Guilbert, Richard Deacon, and Carl Reiner (as Alan Brady), as well as 23-year-old Mary Tyler Moore, who played Rob's wife Laura Petrie.
3
He is the older brother of actor Jerry Van Dyke, who is best known for a role on the TV series Coach.
In November 1959, Van Dyke made his Broadway debut in The Girls Against the Boys.
On August 19, 2013, it was reported that the 87-year-old Van Dyke was rescued from his Jaguar by a passerby after the car had caught fire on the 101 freeway in Calabasas, Los Angeles County.
ENGLISH LIT: His 1919 novel "The Moon and Sixpence" was turned into an opera in 1957
Somerset Maugham
The Moon and Sixpence is a novel by W Somerset Maugham first published in 1919.
3
Strickland is a well-off, middle-class stockbroker in London sometime in late 19th or early 20th century.
Strickland, in his drive to express through his art what appears to continually possess and compel him on the inside, cares nothing for physical discomfort and is indifferent to his surroundings.
It is also mentioned frequently in Stephen King's 1998 novel Bag of Bones and in passing in his 2015 novel Finders Keepers.
A DREW BARRYMORE FILM FESTIVAL: (Drew delivers the clue.)  In my new movie "Music and Lyrics", Hugh Grant plays my love interest; in "50 First Dates" & "The Wedding Singer", I was paired up with this funny actor
Adam Sandler
The film stars Adam Sandler as a lothario veterinarian and Drew Barrymore as an amnesiac, along with Rob Schneider, Sean Astin, Lusia Strus, Blake Clark, and Dan Aykroyd.
2
The two actors, who had previously worked together in the popular film The Wedding Singer, are said to regard 50 First Dates as one of their favorite personal efforts.
The Vow''
THE HISTORY OF MEDICINE: 1590:Dutch lens grinder Zacharias Janssen invents a type of this optical research instrument
a microscope
He may have also been confused about a microscope built by another optician for Drebbel, claiming it was built by Zacharias Janssen.
3
The Telescope
Its actual function and creator has been disputed.
Illegal activities
WOMEN DIRECTING WOMEN: This Oscar-winning actress directed herself in the film "Little Man Tate"
Jodie Foster
Little Man Tate is a 1991 drama film directed by and starring Jodie Foster.
3
It tells the story of a seven-year-old child prodigy, Fred Tate (Adam Hann-Byrd), who struggles to self-actualize in a social and psychological construct that largely fails to accommodate his intelligence.
Dede witnesses some of this as it is broadcast and flies back to New York.
Box Office Mojo.
NCAA TEAM NAME'S THE SAME: BYU, University of Houston
the Cougars
At the game, several Longhorn players saw what had happened and began taunting UH players by holding up their hands with the ring finger bent, suggesting the Cougars were invalids.
2
Test and Research Staff, Bureau of Naval Personnel; "Psychological test construction and research in the Bureau of Naval Personnel.
The Rebecca and John J. Moores School of Music presents concerts in various campus venues:
VIRTUAL MEDICINE: (Sarah of the Clue Crew reads from the surgery simulation room at the Beth Israel Deaconess Medical Center in Boston, MA.)  Doctors get invaluable training on the Human Patient Simulator at Boston's Beth Israel Deaconess Medical Center, a teaching hospital of this medical school founded in 1782
Harvard
Beth Israel Deaconess Medical Center (BIDMC) in Boston, Massachusetts is a teaching hospital of Harvard Medical School.
3
Among independent teaching hospitals, Beth Israel Deaconess Medical Center consistently ranks in the top three recipients of biomedical research funding from the National Institutes of Health.
Although the hospital was originally staffed by the Deaconesses, in 1922 it added a permanent medical and surgical staff.
Researchers at Beth Israel discovered vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) in 1983.
MIDWESTERN CITIES: Bay City in this state is named for its location near Saginaw Bay
Michigan
Bay City can mean:  Places Australia  Westfield Bay City, a shopping centre in Geelong, Victoria  Philippines  Bay City (Metro Manila), the reclamation area of Metro Manila in the Philippines  United States  Bay City, Pope County, Illinois  Bay City, Michigan  Bay City Mall, a shopping mall near Bay City, Michigan  Bay City, Oregon  Bay City, Texas  Bay City, Wisconsin  a nickname for San Francisco  a nickname for Santa Monica, California  Canada  a nickname for Hamilton, Ontario  Fictional  Bay City, a pseudonym used by Raymond Chandler for Santa Monica, California   Bay City, a place visited by Crypto in Destroy All Humans 2  The fictional Southern California community Bay City where the 1970s TV series Starsky and Hutch took place; exteriors for the series were filmed in San Pedro, California  The fictional Southern California community Bay City is where much of the episode "Exit Prentiss Carr" of The Rockford Files took place.
2
It is identified as "45 minutes from Pasadena by freeway".
Bay City, California, the location of the team in the 1970s minor-league baseball-themed series Bay City Blues  Other uses  Bay City (album), by David Thomas  Bay City Rollers, Scottish pop band
BOOKS BY THEIR COVERS: This preacher dresses casually or formally on different dustcovers for his 1997 book "Just As I Am"
Billy Graham
Just as I Am may also refer to:   Just as I Am (Bill Withers album), 1971  Just as I Am (Dee Harvey album), 1991  Just as I Am (Brantley Gilbert album), 2014  Just as I Am (Guy Sebastian album), 2003  Just as I Am (Paul Brandt album), 2012  Just as I Am (Yolanda Adams album), 1987  Just as I Am (hymn), an 1835 hymn by Charlotte Elliott  "Just as I Am", a song by Air Supply from Air Supply (1985)  "Just as I Am", a song by Dee Harvey (1992)  "Just as I Am", a song by David Phelps  "Just as I Am", a song by Travis Cottrell  Just as I Am: The Autobiography of Billy Graham, a 1997 book by Billy Graham
1
Just As I Am is a traditional Christian hymn.
"I" SAY: This 1972 feminist anthem was a No. 1 hit for Helen Reddy
I Am Woman
Six made the Top 10 and three reached No. 1, including her signature hit "I Am Woman".
2
They lived through the Depression and a world war, and they were just strong women.
She maintains, however, that she still refuses to sing "Leave Me Alone (Ruby Red Dress)" because she dislikes the monotony of the repeated chorus.
BLU-RAYS: Time travel info is on the Blu-ray of this Jake Gyllenhaal film, & you don't have to access the title "Code" to get it
Source Code
He has since played lead roles in many films, including Zodiac (2007), Prince of Persia: The Sands of Time (2010), Love & Other Drugs (2010), Source Code (2011), End of Watch (2012), Prisoners (2013), Nightcrawler (2014), and Southpaw (2015).
3
The son of director Stephen Gyllenhaal and screenwriter Naomi Foner, Gyllenhaal began acting at the age of ten.
Retrieved September 29, 2006.Cavagna, Carla (December 2005), "Interview: Jake Gyllenhaal", aboutfilm.com.
At the Directors Guild of America Awards on January 28, 2006, Gyllenhaal also praised Lee for "his humbleness and his respect for everyone around him."CBS news, AP, (January 26, 2005), "'Brokeback' Director Grabs Top Award".
COMPOSERS ON FILM: Don Ameche in "Swanee River"
Stephen Foster
Under Fire  Tracy Egan  1938  Happy Landing  Jimmy Hall  1938  Alexander's Ragtime Band  Charlie Dwyer  1938  Josette  David Brassard Jr.  1938  Gateway  Dick Court  1939  The Three Musketeers  D'Artagnan  1939  Midnight  Tibor Czerny  1939  The Story of Alexander Graham Bell  Alexander Graham Bell  1939  Hollywood Cavalcade  Michael Linnett 'Mike' Connors  1939  Swanee River  Stephen Foster  1940  Lillian Russell  Edward Solomon  1940   Four Sons  Chris Bern  1940  Down Argentine Way  Ricardo Quintana  1941  That Night in Rio  Impersonator Larry Martin/Baron Manuel Duarte  1941  Moon Over Miami  Phil O'Neil (Credits) / Phil 'Mac' McNeil (in Film)  1941
3
He continued to appear on Broadway, as well as on radio and TV, where he was host and commentator for International Showtime, covering circus and ice-shows all over Europe.
Ameche had done well in college dramatics at Marquette University, and when a lead actor for a stock company production of Excess Baggage did not turn up, a friend persuaded him to stand in for the missing actor.
He appeared in such films as Alexander's Ragtime Band (1938), and as the title character in The Story of Alexander Graham Bell (1939).
ARCHITECTS: Charles Bulfinch, who contributed to the Capitol in Washington, D.C., designed this city's state house on Beacon Hill
Boston
Puritan Boston & Quaker Philadelphia.
3
Transaction Publishers (1996), p. 322-24.
There was no payment for his services as selectman, and he received only $1,400 for designing and overseeing the construction of the State House.
In Washington D.C. he connected the Capitol, The Jefferson Building, and the Adams Building to a very elaborate tunnel system that at least has three levels.
THROUGH THE LOOKING GLASS: Alice considered the whole adventure one of these, even without seeing Patrick Duffy in the shower
Dream
However, with both the show and his career on the decline, he returned in 1986 in the infamous shower scene that rendered the entire 1985–1986 season "just a dream."
3
He is also well known for his role on the ABC sitcom Step by Step as Frank Lambert, from 1991 to 1998, and for his role as Stephen Logan on the CBS daytime soap opera The Bold and the Beautiful (2006-2011).
The single reached #5 in the Netherlands in April 1983.
His real-life late parents made a cameo on the revised Dallas series.
CELEBRITY ALUMNI: He wrote his 1st complete play, "Camel", while studying at Goddard College; "Glengarry Glen Ross" came later
David Mamet
actor  David Mamet –
3
A number of prominent educators and laymen agreed with him.
Poet  Wayne Karlin –
Professor of Law at UCLA  Jared Pappas-Kelley  Curator, Writer, and Artist  Russell Potter –
WORLD WAR II: In early 1945, 6,800 Marines were killed while seizing Mount Suribachi & the rest of this island
Iwo Jima
Mount Suribachi (JPN.: , Suribachiyama) is a 169 m high mountain at the southwest end of the island Iwo Jima (now officially Iō-tō) in the northwest Pacific Ocean, under the administration of Ogasawara Subprefecture, Tokyo Metropolis, Japan.
1
Geology Geologically, the mountain is a cinder cone of andesite, formed by volcanic activity.
JUDY: Her losing the Oscar for 1954's "A Star is Born" was called "the biggest robbery since Brinks"
Judy Garland
Judy L. Bonner, American academic  Judy Garland (1922–1969), American actress and singer  People with the surname Judy   Eric Judy (born 1974), American musician  John F. Judy (1856–1931), founder of Judyville, Indiana  Samuel Judy, American pioneer and legislator  Steven Timothy Judy (1956–1981), 4th executed American murder since reinstate of the Capital punishment  Thomas Judy, American legislator   Art, entertainment, and media Fictional entities  Judy, a character in the traditional Punch and Judy puppet show  Judy, another alias used by the character Judith Myers from the film Halloween (1978)  Music Albums  Judy (Judy Garland album), 1956  Judy (Judy Rodman album), 1986 Songs   "Judy" (Thomas Anders song), 1980  "Judy" (The Pipettes song), 2005  "Judy", a song by The Beach Boys  "Judy", song by Hoagy Carmichael and Sammy Lerner Television  Judge Judy, daytime court TV show  Other uses  Judy array, a complex data structure in computer science  Judy, Allied codename for the Japanese Yokosuka D4Y dive bomber aircraft during World War II  Judy, a colloquial name for a dress form  See also  Abisara, a genus of metalmark butterflies commonly known as the Judies  Judith (name)
2
Judy is a short form of the name Judith.
Judy may refer to:  Places  Judy, Kentucky, village in Montgomery County  Animals and mascots  Judy (dog) (1936–1950), mascot on a Royal Navy vessel during World War II  People   People with the first name Judy  Judy Blume (1938- ) an American author of children books and young adult books.
FORBES' RICHEST PEOPLE: Worth $53.5 billion, Carlos Slim, owner of Telmex, became the first person from this country to top the Forbes list
Mexico
Telmex is a Mexican telecommunications company headquartered in Mexico City that provides telecommunications products and services in Mexico, Argentina, Chile, Colombia, Brazil (Embratel), Ecuador, Peru, Venezuela and other countries in Latin America.
3
In 2011, America Móvil purchased the remaining 40% of Telmex.
The total amount of this sale was estimated at nearly US$300 million.
CABLECENTRO offers cable TV and Internet access services and has been in operation for 7 years.
'80s SONG LYRICS: "Jenny, I've got your number, I need to make you mine, Jenny don't change your number" ...this one
867-5309
Jenny may refer to:  People  Jenny (given name), a popular feminine name and list of real and fictional people named Jenny  Jenny (surname), a family name  Jenny (actor), a Telugu actor  Media  Jenny (Nothing More song), a song by American rock band Nothing More  Jenny (novel), 1911 novel by Nobel laureate Sigrid Undset  "Jenny", song by The Mountain Goats from the 2002 album, All Hail West Texas  "Jenny", song by Chicago from the 1973 album Chicago VI  "Jenny", 1968 song by John Mayall's Bluesbreakers  "Jenny", 1997 song by Edyta Bartosiewicz from the album Dziecko  "Jenny" (The Click Five song), 2007 song by The Click Five  "Jenny Jenny", song by Little Richard from the 1957 album Here's Little Richard  "Jenny" 2012 song by Walk the Moon from their eponymous debut album  "Jenny" (Studio Killers song), 2013  "867-5309/Jenny", 1982 song by Tommy Tutone  Jenny (EP), 2003 EP by Stellastarr*  Jenny (TV series), 1997 sitcom featuring Jenny McCarthy  Jenny (film), 1970 TV movie starring Alan Alda and Marlo Thomas  Jenny (Doctor Who), the eponymous character in the Doctor Who episode, "The Doctor's Daughter"  Jenny, a character in the children's novel Sideways Stories from Wayside School by Louis Sachar  Other uses  Jenny (donkey), term for a female donkey  Spinning jenny, device used in the textile industry, where jenny is possibly a corruption of engine  Jenny, Suriname, town in Suriname  Curtiss JN-4 "Jenny", biplane flown during World War I and later popular for barnstorming  Inverted Jenny, famous United States postage stamp error involving a stamp with an upside down Curtiss JN4
1
The schooner Jenny, ship that was frozen in the Antarctic  Nickname for genoa (sail), large form of jib sail  Jenny (doll), Japanese toy  Jenny Foxworth, a character from Oliver & Company  Jenny, a character from the Once Upon a Wintertime segment of Melody Time  Jenny (gorilla), oldest gorilla in captivity at the time of her death at age 55  Jenny (orangutan), orangutan at London Zoo from 1837  "Jenny", a poem by Patti Smith from her 1978 book Babel  Jenny 'XJ9' Wakeman, a fictional character from the TV Series "My Life As A Teenage Robot" , a Panamanian steamship  See also  Hans Jenny (disambiguation)
MYTHOLOGY: As the muse of this scholarly discipline, Clio probably tended to repeat herself
History
thumb|200px|Chariot clock in National Statuary Hall by Carlo Franzoni, 1819, depicting Clio, titled the Car of History.
3
Other accounts credit her as the mother of Linus, a poet that was buried at Argos, but Linus has a number of differing parents depending upon the account, including several accounts where he is the son of Clio's sisters Urania or Calliope.
The most common number of the Muses is 9, but the number is not always consistent in earlier mythologies.
The name is etymologically derived from the Greek root κλέω/κλείω (meaning "to recount," "to make famous," or "to celebrate").
WOMEN ON U.S. STAMPS: 1994:A Shoshone guide for a famous expedition
Sacagawea
Reno-Sparks Indian Colony, Nevada, 1988 acres (8 km²), total 481 members of Shoshone, Paiute, and Washoe bands Skull Valley Indian Reservation, 18,000 acres (73 km²) in Utah, Western Shoshone South Fork Odgers Ranch Indian Colony, Elko County, Nevada Wells Indian Colony, Elko County, Nevada Wind River Reservation, population 2,650 Eastern Shoshone, 2,268,008 acres (9,178 km²) of reservation in Wyoming are shared with the Northern Arapaho  Notable Shoshone people thumb|Tina Manning (left), John Trudell, and their children  Bear Hunter (d. 1863), war chief  Ned Blackhawk (b. ca. 1970), historian and professor at Yale  Cameahwait, chief in the early 19th century  Mary Dann and Carrie Dann  Tina Manning (d. 1979), murdered water rights activist from Duck Valley  Randy'L He-dow Teton  Old Toby  Sacagawea (1788–1812), Lemhi Shoshone guide of the Lewis and Clark Expedition  Chief Washakie  Chief Pocatello  See also   Battle of Kelley Creek  United States v. Shoshone Tribe of Indians Western Shoshone traditional narratives   Notes   References  Murphy, Robert A. and Yolanda Murphy.
3
History thumb|300px|A Shoshone encampment in the Wind River Mountains of Wyoming, photographed by W. H. Jackson, 1870  The Shoshone are a Native American tribe, who originated in the western Great Basin and spread north and east into Idaho and Wyoming.
This was the highest number of deaths which the Shoshone suffered at the hands of United States forces.
Shimkin, Demitri B. "Eastern Shoshone." Warren L. d'Azevedo, volume editor.
MOVIES: David Carradine was "Bound for Glory" playing this great folk singer
Woody Guthrie
TCM Underground, Accessed January 14, 2009  Carradine in April 2005|thumb|left  In 1976, Carradine earned critical praise for his portrayal of folksinger Woody Guthrie in Hal Ashby's Bound for Glory (1976) for which he won a National Board of Review Award for Best Actor.
3
Although he continued to amass movie and television credits, few of his roles garnered much attention.
IMBD  Television appearances Carradine attracted notice in 1985 when he appeared in a major supporting role in North and South, a miniseries about the American Civil War, as the evil and abusive Justin LaMotte.
Carradine was engaged to Hubley for a time, but they never married.
DANCE DANCE REVOLUTION: The czardas is a national dance of this Central European country
Hungary
750 BC), a late Bronze Age culture of Central Europe  Lusatian culture (1300 BCE – 500 BCE), a late Bronze Age and early Iron Age in Central Europe  Hallstatt culture, the predominant Central European culture from the 8th to 6th centuries BC   Central Europe Campaign, Western Allied invasion of Germany  Sport  Central European Football League, a regional American football league  Central European Tour Budapest GP, a cycling race in Hungary  Central European Tour Miskolc GP,  is a cycling race in Hungary  Central European International Cup, an international football competition held by certain national teams from Central Europe between 1927 and 1960 Central Europe Cup (cricket) - a cricket tournament http://www.wort.lu/en/sport/cricket-luxembourg-scoops-3rd-place-in-central-europe-cup-54101348b9b39887080626f8 Central Europe Cup (archery) - an archery competition (Website)  Central Europe Rally, a rally raid endurance race held in Romania and Hungary  Ladies Central European Open, a women's professional golf tournament on the Ladies European Tour  Central European Australian Football League Championships - Australian rules football tournament  Mitropa Cup, officially called the La Coupe de l'Europe Centrale, was one of the first international major European football cups for club sides  See also  European Union, a European supranational entity (federation)  Europe (disambiguation)  EU (disambiguation)  Euro (disambiguation)  References
2
Central European may mean:  A person of one of a Central European Ethnic groups in Europe  Relating to or characteristic of Central Europe or its inhabitants  Culture Central European culture is a part of both Western and more specifically European culture typical to geographical, cultural and political region of Central Europe.
Central European culture may refer to:  Central European cuisine, cuisine typical to Central Europe  Central European University, a graduate-level, English-language university promoting a distinctively Central European perspective  Central European University Press  Central European Free Trade Agreement, a free trade area established by central European countries  Central European Initiative, a forum of regional cooperation  Central European Media Enterprises, a Bermuda-based media and entertainment company  Diocese of Central Europe, a Serbian Orthodox Church diocese  Central European History, a peer-reviewed academic journal on history published quarterly by Cambridge University Press  Central European Time, time zone used in most parts of the European Union  Central European Jamboree, a Scouting jamboree  Central European Exchange Program for University Studies, an international exchange program  History   Urnfield culture (c. 1300 BC –
POETRY: Edgar Guest said, "It takes a heap o' livin' in a house t' make it" this
A Home
(1920)Keep Going (Don't Quit) (1921)When Day Is Done (1921)Don't Quit (3 March 1921)All That Matters (1922)Making The House A Home (1922)The Passing Throng (1923)Mother (1925)The Light of Faith (1926)The Secret of The Ages (1926)You (1927)Harbor Lights of Home (1928)Rhymes of Childhood (1928)Poems for the Home Folks (1930)The Friendly Way (1931)Faith (1932)Life's Highway (1933)Collected Verse of Edgar Guest (1934)All in a Lifetime (1938)Between You and Me: My Philosophy of Life (1938)Today and Tomorrow (1942)Living the Years (1949)Sermons We SeeSee
3
August 1959 in Detroit, Michigan) (aka Eddie Guest) was a prolific English-born American poet who was popular in the first half of the 20th century and became known as the People's Poet.
He became a naturalized citizen in 1902.
His popularity led to a weekly Detroit radio show which he hosted from 1931 until 1942, followed by a 1951 NBC television series, A Guest in Your Home.
COOL PLACES TO GO: With temperatures as low as -94 F., Oymyakon in this large region is the world's coldest inhabited place
Siberia
History During World War II, an airfield was built here for the Alaska-Siberian (ALSIB) air route used to ferry American Lend-Lease aircraft to the Eastern Front.
2
With an extreme subarctic climate (Köppen climate classification Dwd), Oymyakon is known as one of the candidates for the Northern Pole of Cold, the other being the town of Verkhoyansk.
In the winter, once every two days, the village's cattle's herd bull was harnessed between the shafts of a sledge with a big water tank on it and led to the spring.
WORLD CITIES: The lighthouse on Pharos in the harbor of this Egyptian city was 1 of the 7 Wonders of the Ancient World
Alexandria
Pharos may refer to:  Lighthouses:  The Pharos of Alexandria, a tower built on the island of Pharos that became one of the Seven Wonders of the Ancient World  The Pharos, either of two Roman lighthouses built at Dubris (Dover, England)  The Pharos, the common name of the Upper Lighthouse, Fleetwood, England  Other:  Pharos, the ancient Greek name of the Croatian island Hvar  Pharos (horse), a British racehorse  Pharos (album), an album by SETI  The Pharos Project, a project featured in the Logopolis serial of the Doctor Who TV series  Pharos, name of a character in Persona 3  PHAROS (Platform for searcHing of Audiovisual Resources across Online Spaces) an Integrated Project co-financed by the European Union under the Information Society Technologies Programme (6th Framework Programme) – Strategic Objective ‘
2
Search Engines for Audiovisual Content’ (2.6.3)
Pharos-Tribune, The daily newspaper of Logansport, Indiana  Pharos network coordinates, a scalable mechanism for Internet distance (round-trip latency) estimation without explicit measurement  Pharos infrastructure ltd.
PIG-OUT: This porcine "Green Acres" star was a real ham; he won 2 Patsy Awards as TV Animal Of The Year
Arnold
Named Arnold is Born" was ranked #59 on TV Guide's 100 Greatest Episodes of All Time.
2
Oliver's naivete allows Haney to shamelessly exploit him financially (selling him a tractor that continually falls apart, renting him a rooster to awaken him, etc.).
In both, a businessman knowing little about farming moves to an impoverished farm.
WHAT'S UP, DOCTRINE?: In the late 1940s this government body's Fairness Doctrine demanded equal coverage of opposing views
the FCC
The FCC eliminated the Doctrine in 1987, and in August 2011 the FCC formally removed the language that implemented the Doctrine.
2
Broadcasters could therefore trigger Fairness Doctrine complaints without editorializing.
Senate bars FCC from revisiting Fairness Doctrine The Associated Press, February 26, 2009  Suggested alternatives  Media reform organizations such as Free Press feel that a return to the Fairness Doctrine is not as important as setting stronger station ownership caps and stronger "public interest" standards enforcement (with funding from fines given to public broadcasting)."The Structural Imbalance of Talk Radio", Free Press, Center for American Progress  In June 2008, Barack Obama's press secretary wrote that Obama (then a Democratic U.S. Senator from Illinois and candidate for President):  In February 2009, a White House spokesperson said that President Obama continues to oppose the revival of the Doctrine.
THE CRUSADES: Peter the Hermit, like Sancho Panza, rode  one of these animals through France rousing the peasants
Donkey
Riding a donkey, Dapple, he helps Quixote get out of various conflicts while looking forward to rewards of aventura that Quijote tells him of.
3
However, Sancho has never heard of this word before, and does not know its meaning.
Sancho has long been expecting some vague but concrete reward for this adventure, and believes the word to signify the prize that will make the trouble he has been enduring worthwhile.
The Sancho Panza name is used for a cigar brand originating in Cuba in 1852.
SYMBOLIC RODENTS: It "Roared" & "Saved The West" in novels about a tiny duchy called Grand Fenwick
Mouse
The Duchy of Grand Fenwick is a tiny fictional country created by Leonard Wibberley in a series of comedic novels beginning with The Mouse That Roared (1955), which was later made into a film.
2
The names of the parties reflect their positions on whether to dilute the wine exports of the Duchy.
Grand Fenwick's formal protests are ignored by U.S. State Department employees, who think the documents are pranks.
"S"-ENTIAL KNOWLEDGE: In the Bible that traitorous hussy Delilah had this man's pride & joy shaved, & then turned him over to the enemy
Samson
thumb|right|350px|Samson and Delilah by Guercino (Musée des Beaux-Arts de Strasbourg)  Delilah (;  Dəlilah, meaning "[She who]
2
Modern Israel has a Soreq Valley and even a Sorek Vineyard (since 1994/5) producing Merlot.
In Northern Europe the Delilah theme was more prominent among painters like Lucas van Leiden and Maerten van Heemskerck, who made a large woodcut of the subject after Titian.
WHO PLAYED 'EM ON TV?: Boston lawyer Bobby Donnell
Dylan McDermott
Donnell was played by Dylan McDermott.
3
Bobby's relationship with his father is mentioned throughout the early seasons of the show to imply, in various ways, the reason why he is opposed to the firm's expansion.
Bobby arranged for one of his former clients to intimidate Hinks in the hopes of scaring him away from Linsday, but instead, the client ended up cutting off Hinks's head and placing it in the freezer, an apparent homage to Hinks's brutal reign of criminal terror.
Bobby and Lindsay's child was named Bobby, Jr.; he was last mentioned by Lindsay, who said she would retain custody of him after they divorced.
AL PACINO FILM ROLES: Say hello to my Cuban drug lord Tony Montana
Scarface
Antonio Raimundo "Tony" Montana is a fictional character and the villain  protagonist of the 1983 film Scarface.
2
Soon after Rebenga arrives at the camp, Manny and Tony and friend take advantage of the August 11 riot, where Tony stabs Rebenga.
Afterward, Tony goes to Frank's house, telling Elvira that her lover is dead and that he wants her.
SONG HITS FOR 2: Percy Sledge in 1966; Michael Bolton in 1991
"When A Man Loves A Woman"
He is best known for the song "When a Man Loves a Woman", a No. 1 hit on both the Billboard Hot 100 and R&B singles charts in 1966.
3
In later years, Sledge received the Rhythm and Blues Foundation's Career Achievement Award.
Early career Sledge was born on November 25, 1940 in Leighton, Alabama.
The soul anthem became the cornerstone of Sledge's career, and was followed by "Warm and Tender Love" (covered by British singer Elkie Brooks in 1981), "It Tears Me Up", "Take Time to Know Her" (his second biggest US hit, reaching No.
WOMEN AUTHORS: Sites associated with this author's heroine Anne of Green Gables are a tourist draw in eastern Canada
Lucy Maud Montgomery
The Green Gables farm and its surroundings are the setting for the popular Anne of Green Gables novels by Lucy Maud Montgomery.
3
thumb|left|"Anne's Room", one of several rooms in the farmhouse which have been named by Parks Canada after settings in Montgomery's novels.
She drew romantic inspiration from the house, as well as the surrounding area, including the "Haunted Woods", "Lovers Lane", and "Balsam Hollow."
Various rooms in the house have been named according to the Anne of Green Gables story.
OPERAS & OPERETTAS: Rudolf Friml could have called this 1912 operetta "The Lightning Bug"
The Firefly
93–94  The Firefly and early operettas One of the most popular theatrical forms in the early decades of the 20th century in America was the operetta, and its most famous composer was Irish-born Victor Herbert.
3
He settled for a brief time in Los Angeles where he married Mathilde Baruch (1909).
During the 1930s, Friml's music fell out of fashion on Broadway and in Hollywood.
External links        Friml Archive, UCLA Performing Arts Special Collections.
TREKS: To make the 100-mile car trek from Birmingham, Eng. to Cardigan Bay you'll have to enter this other U.K. country
Wales
thumb|Map showing Cardigan Bay thumb|Cardigan Bay thumb|Sunset over Cardigan Bay from Gwbert Cardigan Bay () is a large inlet of the Irish Sea, indenting the west coast of Wales between Bardsey Island, Gwynedd in the north, and Strumble Head, Pembrokeshire at its southern end.
3
History Until the early 20th century, Cardigan Bay supported a strong maritime industry.
Not a seafood normally consumed by British people, since 2010 the local fishermen have supplied the Michelin-starred restaurants of Raymond Blanc.
The Range Danger Area covers some  of Cardigan Bay from sea level to unlimited height.
MUSIC APPRECIATION: In 1717 this oratorio composer found a position writing music for the future Duke of Chandos
Handel
The 1st Duke built an exceptionally grand country house called Cannons that, though it was parodied in his lifetime, was a seat of great learning and culture: Handel was the resident composer from 1717 until 1719.
3
The three succeeding barons were all Members of Parliament and persons of some importance — see particularly Grey, 5th Baron, and his elder son George, 6th Baron.
All of these titles were in the Peerage of Great Britain.
The presumed 2nd Lord Chandos was High Sheriff of Herefordshire for 1359, 1370 and 1372 and the presumed 3rd Lord Chandos served the same office for 1382.
LATIN AMERICAN LAKES & RIVERS: Gatun Lake was formed in 1912 by the Gatun Dam during the construction of this
the Panama Canal
It forms a major part of the Panama Canal, carrying ships for  of their transit across the Isthmus of Panama.
2
The biggest and best known of them is Barro Colorado Island, home of the world famous Smithsonian Tropical Research Institute (STRI).
Locally called Sargento, and believed to be the species Cichla Pleiozona, these peacock bass are not a native game fish of Panama but originate from the Amazon, Rio Negro and Orinoco river basins of South America where they are called Tucanare or Pavon and are considered a premier game fish.
BEYOND THE HORIZON: Head due east from Washington, D.C. or New York City & you'll first hit this Southern European country
Portugal
{{div col|small=yes|rules=yes|colwidth=20em}}  [[Barcelona]], Spain  [[Lisbon]], Portugal  [[Madrid]], Spain (1982)  [[Milan]], Italy  [[Pristina]], Kosovo  [[Rome]], Italy (1992) {{div col end}} '''(''West'')''' {{div col|small=yes|rules=yes|colwidth=20em}}  [[Amsterdam]], Netherlands  [[Antwerp]], Belgium  [[Belfast]], Northern Ireland  [[Berlin]], Germany  [[Brussels]], Belgium  [[Dublin]], Ireland  [[Düsseldorf]], Germany  [[Edinburgh]], Scotland  [[Geneva]], Switzerland  [[Glasgow]], Scotland  [[Hamburg]], Germany  [[Heidelberg]], Germany  [[London]], United Kingdom (2001)  [[Luxembourg (city)|Luxembourg City]], Luxembourg  [[Lyon]], France  [[Munich]], Germany  [[Paris]], France  [[Rotterdam]], Netherlands  [[The Hague]], Netherlands {{div col end}} '''North America'''
3
|publisher=The New York City Department of Health and Mental Hygiene |accessdate=January 19, 2014}}</ref
The [[New York City Marathon|New York Marathon]] is the largest marathon in the world.<ref name = "World's Largest Marathons"/>  | alt1 = Three runners in a race down a street where onlookers are cheering behind barriers.
> the [[National Hockey League]],<ref>{{cite web |url=http://www.hoovers.com/company-information/cs/company-profile.National_Hockey_League.6eb8cbd895fc6ce9.html |title=National Hockey League Company Information |publisher=Hoover's, Inc |accessdate=May 18, 2013}}</ref
U.S. COUNTIES: South Salem, Larchmont & Rye are in this county outside New York City
Westchester
The Bronx River, which flows through the Bronx and Westchester County, is the only entirely fresh water river in the city.
3
Anchored by Wall Street in the Financial District of Lower Manhattan, New York City has been called both the most economically powerful city and the leading financial center of the world, and the city is home to the world's two largest stock exchanges by total market capitalization, the New York Stock Exchange and NASDAQ. Manhattan's real estate market is among the most expensive in the world.
It was one of the worst incidents of civil unrest in American history.
A [[public-benefit corporation|public benefit corporation]] with $6.7 billion in annual revenues, HHC is the largest municipal healthcare system in the United States serving 1.4 million patients, including more than 475,000 uninsured city residents.<ref name="HHC Website">{{cite web |url=http://www.nyc.gov/html/hhc/html/home/home.shtml |title=HHC Website}}</ref> HHC was created in 1969 by the [[New York State Legislature]] as a public benefit corporation (Chapter 1016 of the Laws 1969).<ref>{{cite web |url=http://www.thehhcfoundation.org/history.html |title=The History of New York City's Municipal Hospitals, |publisher=HHC Foundation |deadurl=yes}}</ref><ref>{{cite web |url=http://www.answers.com/topic/new-york-city-health-and-hospitals-corporation |title=Answers.com, New York City Health and Hospitals Corporation |work=Answers.com
CHRISTIANITY: Baptism is the first & extreme unction is the last of these Catholic rites
Sacraments
Millions of Anglo-Catholics (High Church Anglicans) call themselves "Catholic", celebrate Mass and the sacraments, call their clergy "father" (and generally are opposed to women's ordination and gay ordinations, using the argument that "one branch of the Catholic Church cannot on its own change the rules and get out of step with the rest of Catholicism).
3
The proper use of this term "ROMAN" is when speaking specifically of the geographic Roman church in Rome (just as one would speak of the Parisian church as the church in Paris) which IS both a geographical Archdiocese(district) of the Catholic Church and the geographic capital- Holy See of the Catholic Church.
Can KarmaKameleon possibly imagine that when, for instance, Pope St Leo the Great preached to the Church in Rome that "the catholic Faith, which withstands all errors, refutes these blasphemies also at the same time, condemning Nestorius, who divides the Divine from the human, and denouncing Eutyches, who nullifies the human in the Divine" (Sermon 91), he was saying that the Church in Rome was not catholic, but was instead on the side of one or other of the heretics Nestorius or Eutyches?
The only other loss would be Mecandes's change of the order of two paragraphs in  text, a change that Mecandes might not have felt suitable in the original text.
MOVIE DEBUTS: Robert Redford & this "Picket Fences" star both debuted as soldiers in the 1962 drama "War Hunt"
Tom Skerritt
Struggling to maintain order in the community is Sheriff Jimmy Brock (Tom Skerritt).
3
The show's exteriors were shot in the L.A. suburb of Monrovia, California, with many of the townspeople appearing in the background of episodes.
The show dealt with unusual topics for prime-time television such as abortion, incest, homophobia and LGBT adoption, transsexuality, racism, belief in God, medical ethics, polygamy, polyamory, adolescent sexuality (including nocturnal emission), date rape, cryonics, the Holocaust, shoe fetishism, masturbation,  Animal sacrifice,  spontaneous human combustion, and constitutional rights.
A substantial following for the show persists today, and it is popular as reruns in western Europe.
TWINS: A series of children's books by Laura Lee Hope featured these 2 sets of fraternal twins: Bert & Nan & Freddie & Flossie
the Bobbsey Twins
thumb|Cover of Bunny Brown and His Sister Sue on an Auto Tour Laura Lee Hope is a pseudonym used by the Stratemeyer Syndicate for the Bobbsey Twins and several other series of children's novels.
2
1914–1916) Bunny Brown (20 vols.
1918–1930) Make Believe Stories (12 vols.
BUNNY: He was Bambi's bunny buddy on the big screen
Thumper
The main characters are Bambi, a white-tailed deer, his parents (the Great Prince of the forest and his unnamed mother), his friends Thumper (a pink-nosed rabbit), and Flower (a skunk), and his childhood friend and future mate, Faline.
3
Walt Disney was also eager to show man burned to death by his fire that he inadvertently started, but this was discarded when it was decided not to show man at all.
In 2006, the Ad Council, in partnership with the United States Forest Service, started a series of Public Service Announcements that feature footage from Bambi and Bambi II for wildfire prevention.
The ads air on various television networks, and the Ad Council has also put them on YouTube.
SINGERS WHO ACT: She got to act with Meryl Streep when she played Isabel Vasquez in "Music of the Heart"
Gloria Estefan
The film also stars Aidan Quinn, Gloria Estefan, and Angela Bassett.
3
The film is a dramatization of the true story of Roberta Guaspari, portrayed by Meryl Streep, who co-founded the Opus 118 Harlem School of Music.
With a combination of toughness and determination, she inspires a group of kids, and their initially skeptical parents.
Rotten Tomatoes, Music of the Heart Movie Reviews CinemaScore reported that audiences gave the film a rare "A+" grade.
LEGAL HISTORY: After killing his wife's lover in Washington, D.C. in 1859, Rep. Daniel Sickles was the 1st to claim this, a 2-word term
temporary insanity
He was acquitted after using temporary insanity as a legal defense for the first time in United States history.
3
His energy and ability were conspicuous in the Battle of Chancellorsville.
Alfred A. Knopf, 2009.
New York: Savas Beatie, 2009.
FICTIONAL CHARACTERS: In a Judith Krantz bestseller, Billy Ikehorn Orsini owns this title boutique
Scruples
Her works include Scruples, Princess Daisy, and Till We Meet
3
Krantz claims to have learned the lesson well—she did not write fiction again for 31 years.
Her magazine career gave Krantz an opportunity to interview many prominent women.
They had two sons, Tony Krantz and Nicholas Krantz, both of whom reside in Los Angeles.
SCI-FI SIRENS: In this 1995 Ben Kingsley thriller, Natasha Henstridge starred as a shape-changing creature
Species
In 1995, she came to prominence with her debut movie role as the genetically engineered human-alien hybrid Sil in the science-fiction thriller Species, then the human-alien hybrid Eve in Species II and  Species III. Other notable on-screen roles include The Whole Nine Yards, The Whole Ten Yards, It Had To Be You, Ghosts of Mars, She Spies, the TV series Eli Stone, and the Canadian TV mini-series Would Be Kings, for which she won the Gemini Award for best actress.
2
Modeling career
youtube.com.
COOKING: Ricotta isn't a cheese, it's a cheese by-product made from this liquid drained from cheeses
whey
Ricotta ( in Italian) is an Italian whey cheese made from sheep (or cow, goat, or Italian water buffalo) milk whey left over from the production of cheese.
1
It is often used as a substitute for paneer in the Indian dessert known as ras malai.
THEY MEANT BUSINESS: Howard Schultz made this chain ubiquitous in the U.S. after having an epiphany over espresso
Starbucks
of Starbucks and a former owner of the Seattle SuperSonics.
2
Howard D. Schultz (born July 19, 1953) is an American businessman.
take a gamble”.
REED: ALL ABOUT IT: Black clarinetist Don Byron specializes in this Jewish dance music from Eastern Europe
klezmer
He has worked in many different musical genres, ranging from klezmer music and German lieder, to Raymond Scott's "cartoon-jazz," hard rock/metal, and rap.
3
Byron is representative of a new generation of conservatory-trained jazz musicians who explore and record in a rich array of styles; his first album, Tuskegee Experiments, is a stew of classical avant garde and jazz improvisation, while albums such as Ivey Divey represent a straight-ahead exploration of the traditional jazz 'tune'.
Independent Music Awards - Past Judges  In 2001, Byron performed "Bli Blip" for the Red Hot Organization's compilation album Red Hot + Indigo, a tribute to Duke Ellington, which raised money for various charities devoted to increasing AIDS awareness and fighting the disease.
The Songs of Bruce Cockburn (True North, 2000)  Lalo Schifrin: Esperanto (Act, 2000)  Ralph Alessi:
GIRL SCOUTING: A girl might go to a Junior Achievement event on this subject to earn the badge seen here:(lemonade stand)
Business
Junior Achievement works with local businesses and organizations to deliver experiential programs on the topics of financial literacy, work readiness, and entrepreneurship to students in kindergarten through high school.
3
The name was modified in 1926 to Junior Achievement, Inc.  Following World War II, the organization grew from a regional into a national organization. "Chapter 12.
Impressive Growth, Impressive Quality in the 50s."
Today, Junior Achievement Worldwide has regional offices in Junior Achievement USA, JA Middle East and Africa (INJAZ Al-Arab), JA YE Europe, JA Asia Pacific, JA Americas, and JA Africa.
SATURDAY NIGHT LIVE RECURRING ROLES: New York governor David Paterson
Fred Armisen
While cast members would leave over the following two decades, the show saw its next biggest transition in 2013, with the addition of 6 cast members to compensate for the departure of several longtime cast members like Bill Hader, Jason Sudeikis, and Fred Armisen.
3
"He [Lorne Michaels] put me on TV, and no one else would have done that.
In 1986, Doug Hill and Jeff Weingrad authored Saturday Night: A Backstage History of Saturday Night Live (ISBN 0-688-05099-9), a behind-the-scenes look at the first ten seasons.
THE SATURDAY NIGHT LIVE MOVIE from filmbuffonline.com  However, it was the success of Wayne's World (1992) that encouraged Michaels to produce more film spin-offs, based on several popular sketch characters.
ConAgra FOODS: Who wants that microwave stuff; making this brand is more fun
Jiffy Pop
The next day ConAgra Foods announced that it would soon remove diacetyl from its Jiffy Pop and Orville Redenbacher's popcorn products.
3
On November 18, 2015, ConAgra announced it was spinning off their Lamb Weston division into a separate company that will be based out of Kennewick, Washington.
According to the Oregon Secretary of State, ConAgra contributed $71,000 to the campaign to defeat the state ballot initiative.
That meat was linked to the illnesses of 19 people in six Western and Midwestern states.
CHOICE PARENTS: Now for some good news: this anchorwoman & Maury Povich adopted a beautiful boy
Connie Chung
On January 9, 2000, Povich hosted the short-lived primetime revival of the classic game show, Twenty One on NBC. Reruns of the show have been aired on GSN.  In November 2005, MSNBC announced Povich would co-host a weekend news program with his wife, Connie Chung.
3
By 1966 he was a news reporter and sportscaster for D.C. television station WTTG-TV.
In 1995, Chung and Povich adopted a son, Matthew Jay Povich.
Category:University of Pennsylvania alumni
THAT'S ELEMENT-ARY: Cadbury is a chocolate brand; this element, atomic number 48, was discovered by Friedrich Stromeyer
cadmium
While studying compounds of zinc, Stromeyer discovered the element cadmium in 1817; cadmium is a common impurity of zinc compounds, though often found only in minute quantities.
3
Stromeyer received an MD degree from the University of Göttingen in 1800, studying under Johann Friedrich Gmelin and Louis Nicolas Vauquelin.
276–277.
, 1968, pp.
SCREEN QUEENS: Joely Richardson starred as Marie Antoinette in this movie about a scandal over a piece of jewelry
The Affair of the Necklace
She was cast in the 2001 film The Affair of the Necklace after director Charles Shyer noticed her resemblance to doomed 18th century French Queen Marie Antoinette.
3
Personal life Richardson is divorced from film producer Tim Bevan.
Filmography  Film  Year  Title  Role  Notes 1968  The Charge of the Light Brigade Extra Uncredited 1985 Wetherby  Young Jean Travers 1987 Body Contact  Dominique 1988 Drowning by Numbers  Cissie Colpitts 3 1989 A proposito di quella strana ragazza  Giovanna Serafin (Maria) aka
The Christmas Miracle of Jonathan Toomey  | Susan McDowel | |- | 2011 | Anonymous| Young Queen Elizabeth I |  |- | 2011 |
AS "IF"!: Bull Shannon was this type of officer on '80s TV's "Night Court"
a bailiff
#Television Favorites  February 28, 2006 6 The Television Favorites compilation DVD included the pilot episode, "All You Need Is Love"; both parts of the fourth season finale, "Her Honor"; the fifth season episodes "Death of a Bailiff" and "Who Was That Mashed Man?"; and the sixth season episode "Fire", which marked the beginning of Harry's relationship with Christine.
3
In the opening episode of Season 4, a ventriloquist dummy talks on his own without the ventriloquist to Dan, only to freak him out and make him shout and back away slowly down the hall.
He always wore a cardigan, plaid shirt, and a knit tie (Dan stated in his will that Mac would get all of his suits, so "he would stop wearing those God-awful sweaters").
The court clerk character of Lana Wagner had been planned to be a romantic interest for Harry Stone, but when Austin was released, that role was transferred to the new public defender characters—most notably by Markie Post.
SHAKESPEARE: When Mercutio is mortally wounded in this play, he puns, "Ask for me tomorrow and you shall find me a grave man"
Romeo and Juliet
Mercutio (, (The pronunciation mər-ˈkyü-shē-ō was transcribed to IPA per Pronunciation respelling for English.) ) is a fictional character in William Shakespeare's 1597 tragedy, Romeo and Juliet.
3
He is a close friend to Romeo and Benvolio and a blood relative to Prince Escalus and Count Paris.
Draper, John.
Mercutio hurls insults and taunts at Tybalt, and draws the sword first, in reaction to Tybalt's insults, which are directed to Romeo.
SHAKESPEARE, YOU KILL ME!: Mercutio, who has a few choice words about the Montagues & Capulets before dying
Tybalt
After Romeo receives a death threat from Tybalt, Mercutio expects Romeo to engage Tybalt in a duel.
3
The invitation to Capulet's party states that he has a brother named Valentine.
In 1996, Harold Perrineau Jr. portrayed Mercutio in Baz Luhrmann's modernized version, William Shakespeare's Romeo + Juliet.
In 2007, Tetsuya Kakihara and Christopher Bevins voice Mercutio in the anime series Romeo x Juliet.
SHAKESPEREAN WORDPLAY: The wounded Mercutio says, "You shall find me" this type of "man", & he doesn't just mean "serious"
grave
He makes one final pun before he dies: "Ask for me to-morrow, and you shall find me a grave man." A grief-stricken and enraged Romeo kills Tybalt, thus to Romeo's banishment from Verona and beginning the tragic turn of events that make up the rest of the play.
3
Early Comedies, Poems, Romeo and Juliet, Routledge and Kegan Paul Lt, London, 1957, p. 270
In 2011, Hale Appleman portrayed Mercutio in Alan Brown's Private Romeo, a modern-day adaptation set at an all-male military academy.
In 2013, Ricky McLennan played Mercutio in the film adaption "Romeo and Juliet: A Love Song", directed by Tim Van Dammen, starring Christopher Landon as Romeo Montague and Derya Parlak as Juliet Capulet.
COLLEGE STADIUMS & ARENAS: Rupp Arena is the home court to this school's Wildcats basketball team
University of Kentucky
Rupp Arena also serves as home court to the University of Kentucky men's basketball program, and is named after legendary former Kentucky coach Adolph Rupp.
3
Rupp Arena is an arena located in downtown Lexington, Kentucky, U.S.
It is named after UK coaching legend Adolph Rupp, and opened in 1976, a little more than a year before Rupp's death in late 1977.
Unlike many arenas built in the following years, it has no luxury suites, and has never been renovated to add them.
NEW YORK CITY MAYORS: This flamboyant pol has the distinction of being the only mayor to later host "The People's Court"
Ed Koch
Former lawyer and Mayor of New York Ed Koch was chosen as arbiter, which he maintained for 2 seasons.
3
Wapner learned of the decision from his brother-in-law, who read it in The San Francisco Chronicle.
Wapner has expressed holding great resentment and bitterness at the court show's producers for finding out this way, and additional resentment over being let go when, according to him, the show was doing well.
The court reporter was Carol Smillie, the male judge was Jerome Lynch and the female judge was Rhonda Anderson.
BASEBALL HISTORY: Tom Connolly & Bill Klem, "The Old Arbitrator", were the first men to enter the Baseball Hall of Fame as these
umpires
William Joseph Klem, born William Joseph Klimm (February 22, 1874 – September 16, 1951), known as the "Old Arbitrator" and the "father of baseball umpires", was a National League (NL) umpire in Major League Baseball from 1905 to 1941.
3
He worked 18 World Series, which is a major league record.
Klem had a number of nicknames amongst the players: his favorite was "The Old Arbitrator", but his jowly appearance also led to some players calling him "Catfish".
Death and legacy Klem died on September 16, 1951, at age 77, at Doctors Hospital in Coral Gables, Florida.
SPORTS LEGENDS: (Hi, I'm Steve Smith of the NBA.)  My boyhood idol, George Gervin, had this nickname because he always kept his cool
"The Iceman"
George "The Iceman" Gervin (born April 27, 1952) is an American retired professional basketball player who played in both the American Basketball Association (ABA) and National Basketball Association (NBA) for the Virginia Squires, San Antonio Spurs, and Chicago Bulls.
3
With the scoring crown in hand, he sat out some of the third, and all of the fourth quarter.
When Gervin returned, he scored 40+ points.
.830  1.4  3.7  5.1  3.7  1.7
RUTHERFORD B. HAYES: Hayes' number as president, or the century in which he served
19
George Francis "Gabby" Hayes (May 7, 1885 – February 9, 1969) was an American radio, film, and television actor.
2
This celebration was eventually merged into the mid-July Wellsville Balloon Rally and gradually disappeared.
Wellsvilleballoonrally.comAncestry.com
AMERICAN ARTISTS: Robert Motherwell is best known for his "Elegy to" this European "republic" of the 1930s
Spanish Republic
The New York School and the Surrealists thumb|right|300px|Elegy to the Spanish Republic No. 110 by Robert Motherwell, 1971, Solomon R. Guggenheim Museum
3
From Motherwell's own words, the reason he went to Harvard was because he wanted to be a painter, while his father urged him to pursue a more secure career: "And finally after months of really a cold war he made a very generous agreement with me that if I would get a Ph.
In 1940, Motherwell moved to New York to study at Columbia University, where he was encouraged by Meyer Schapiro to devote himself to painting rather than scholarship.
I was painting French intimate pictures or whatever.
THE WOMEN OF BAYWATCH: Seen here, she played Caroline and has since appeared on "Nash Bridges"
Yasmine Bleeth
San Francisco P.D. Inspector  Main  colspan="4"  Michelle Chan  Kelly Hu  San Francisco P.D. Inspector  style="background: #ddffdd" colspan="2"   Main  colspan="2"  Catlin Cross  Yasmine Bleeth  San Francisco P.D. Inspector  style="background: #ddffdd" colspan="3"   Main  colspan="1"  Rachel McCabe  Wendy Moniz  San Francisco P.D. Inspector  style="background: #ddffdd" colspan="5"   Main Antwon Babcock  Cress Williams  San Francisco P.D. Inspector  style="background: #ddffdd" colspan="5"   Main  Cast and characters thumb|Cheech Marin (left) with Don Johnson (right).
3
Cary-Hiroyuki Tagawa as Lieutenant A.J. Shimamura: (Season 1-2)
Ronald Russell II as Sergeant Ronnie: (1997-2001)
The 5th Season22 May 12, 2015 December 17, 2011 n/a
SHORT STORIES: Miss Marple & her friends meet once a week to solve mysteries in "The Tuesday Club Murders" by this author
Agatha Christie
Marple Township, Delaware County, Pennsylvania, in the United States   People   Carole Marple (born 1941), Australian politician  Stan Marple, a Canadian ice hockey player and coach  Miss Marple, a fictional character created by Agatha Christie   Television   Agatha Christie's Marple (aka Marple), a British TV series from 2004 onwards, with Geraldine McEwan and later Julia McKenzie  Miss Marple (TV series), a British TV series from 1984 to 1992, with Joan Hickson
1
Marple may refer to:   Places   Marple, Greater Manchester, a town close to Stockport, in England  Marple Bridge, a village within the Metropolitan Borough of Stockport, in Greater Manchester, England.
IT ENDS WITH "U": Malcolm Guthrie wrote a 4-volume reference, now the standard, on this group of African languages
Bantu
Malcolm Guthrie (10 February 1903 – 22 November 1972), professor of Bantu languages, is known primarily for his classification of Bantu languages (Guthrie 1971).
2
The classification, though based more on geography than relatedness, is nonetheless the most widely used.
For his reconstruction, Guthrie drew data from 28 so-called 'test languages' that were picked more or less randomly.
19th CENTURY AMERICA: This great French actress made her triumphant New York debut in 1880 in "Adrienne Lecouvreur"
Sarah Bernhardt
In 1913 Sarah Bernhardt played her in the silent movie Adrienne Lecouvreur.
3
Done in Paris this 27th day of March, 1717."
She and actor Michel Baron sought for a style that was based on everyday speech, as opposed to the predominant chantante style of the time.
Lecouvreur took this search for a more natural style into another aspect of her work, her wardrobe.
OH MICKEY, YOU'RE SO FINE: You knew we'd ask for the name of this singer/ actress/ choreographer who told Mickey how fine he was
Toni Basil
Mickey may refer to:  Computing and technology  MICKEY, a stream cipher algorithm that is part of the eSTREAM portfolio  Mouse dpi or mickey, a measure of distance reported by a computer mouse  Mickey or 1850XLD, which was developed into the Atari ST home computer  Media and entertainment  Mickey (1918 film), a silent comedy-drama film by F. Richard Jones  Mickey (1948 film), a drama film based on the novel Clementine  Mickey (2004 film), a baseball film  Mickey (TV series), a 1964–1965 TV series  "Mickey" (song), a 1981 song by Toni Basil  Other uses  Mickey Hot Springs, a small hot spring system in Oregon, United States  Mickey, a Canadian slang term for a 375 mL bottle of liquor  People with the given name  Mickey Cohen (1913–1976), American gangster  Mickey Curry (born 1956), American drummer  Mickey Gilley (born 1936), American country music artist  Mickey Guidry (born 1966), American football player  Mickey Hart (born 1943), American drummer with The Grateful Dead  Mickey He (born 1976), Chinese television actor and singer  Mickey Hole (1892–1969), NFL player  Mickey Jones (born 1941), American musician and actor  Mickey Lolich (born 1940), American former professional baseball player  Mickey Mantle (1931–1995), American professional baseball player  Dean Ween or Mickey Melchiondo, guitarist for Ween  Mickey Redmond (born 1947), Canadian professional hockey player  Mickey Rooney (1920–2014), American film actor  Mickey Rourke (born 1952), American film actor  Mickey Russell, American football player  Mickey Spillane (1918–2006), American detective fiction author  Mickey Tettleton (born 1960), American professional baseball player  Mickey Weintraub (1907–1987), American major league baseball player  Fictional characters  Mickey Goldmill, a character from the Rocky franchise  Mickey Mouse, a Disney cartoon character  Mickey Smith, a character in the British sci-fi series Doctor Who  Mickey Crespo, a character in Halo 3:
1
ODST  Mickey Milkovich - one of the characters in the television drama, Shameless  See also   Mick (disambiguation)  Michael (disambiguation)
WHITE WINE: In the names of white wine grapes, this word precedes blanc & grigio
Pinot
The Pinot noir, for example, is commonly used to produce champagne.
3
The sugars on the Vine, Philippe Bavis, CFA de Rouffach, Œnologie.fr, consulted on 3 June 2010   The organic acids thumb|alt=Diagram showing the structural formula of the form of an "L" of tartaric acid, the major organic acid in wine.
Above, an endless stainless steel screw used to bring the harvest in the press.
Another solution is to introduce Metatartaric acid, a tartaric acid polymer, into the wine.
BESTSELLERS: His "Skipping Christmas" & "A Painted House" were among the Top 10 bestselling books of 2001
John Grisham
Skipping Christmas is a comedy novel by John Grisham.
3
On the Sunday after Thanksgiving, the two take their daughter Blair to the airport, where she departs for a year-long assignment in a remote area of Peru with the Peace Corps.
It doesn't take long for Nora to adjust to the idea of no Christmas shopping, no Christmas tree, and not throwing the  Christmas Eve party they host every year.
Nor does it rank with Grisham's own best work.
LATE NIGHT TV: In 1973 Tom Snyder began hosting this show that, fittingly, was on after midnight
Tomorrow
July 29, 2007) was an American television personality, news anchor, and radio personality best known for his late night talk shows The Tomorrow Show, on the NBC television network in the 1970s and 1980s, and The Late Late Show, on the CBS Television Network in the 1990s.
3
For a time he worked at Savannah, Georgia, AM station WSAV (now WBMQ).
Unique one-on-one exchanges were common to the program, notably with author Harlan Ellison, John Lydon of PiL and The Sex Pistols in 1980, John Lennon in 1975, actor and writer Sterling Hayden, Charles Manson, and author and philosopher Ayn Rand.
Another was a lengthy interview with Robert Blake very soon before Blake was charged with murder.
SINGLE-NAMED SINGERS: This R&B singer had the aptly titled album "Rated R"
Rihanna
The following article subjects use the term figuratively as a name or title:  In music:  Rated R (Queens of the Stone Age album)  Rated R (Rihanna album)  "Rated R", a song by Ralph Tresvant  "Rated R", a song by Redman  "Reality Is Rated 'R'", a song by d.b.s.
2
Rated R is a term primarily used to refer movies that have been given an "R - Restricted" rating by the Motion Picture Association of America, the British Board of Film Classification or the Canadian Home Video Rating System.
on the album If the Music's Loud Enough…  "The Rated R", a rapper from Thug Life group  "Rated R", a rapper from Tampa, Florida Unrated In sports:  "Rated R Superstar", the nickname of professional wrestler Edge  In radio:  Rated R, an entertainment program aired on the radio station DYAB in the Philippines  See also  R rating (disambiguation)
MEET THE BROWNS: His 1998 techno-thriller "Digital Fortress" focuses on NSA cryptographer Susan Fletcher
Dan Brown
Digital Fortress is a techno-thriller novel written by American author Dan Brown and published in 1998 by St. Martin's Press.
2
Susan later discovers through Strathmore's pager that he is the one who hired Hulohot.
Martin's Press books Category:Mass surveillance in fiction Category:Malware in fiction
HEISMAN WINNERS: Carson Palmer, Reggie Bush & Matt Leinart are a few of this school's recent winners
the University of Southern California
left|thumb| Palmer and his retired jersey at USC  Freshman season In 1998, Palmer began to attend the University of Southern California and play for head coach Paul Hackett for the first 3 years of his college career.
3
The NCAA let him use his redshirt, although he had already played in 3 games.
During OTA's (Organized Team Activities), Palmer asserted himself as the leader of the team by calling out Chad Ochocinco, saying that the number one receiver should be there with the team.
During an interview at the 2011 NFL Draft, head coach Marvin Lewis said that Carson Palmer told him he has planned to retire.
ON BROADWAY: (Jon of the Clue Crew reads from the Shubert Theatre in New York.)  The creators of "Spamalot" proudly proclaim that it is "lovingly ripped off" from this be-knighted British film
Monty Python and the Holy Grail
Monty Python's Spamalot is a musical comedy adapted from the 1975 film Monty Python and the Holy Grail.
3
Sara Ramirez was replaced by Lauren Kennedy, then by Marin Mazzie, Hannah Waddingham, and Merle Dandridge.
Rochester, NY Geva Theatre Center opened its 2015-2016 Season with a production starring Hunter Foster as Arthur.
Coconut orchestra world record
THE 2011 EMMYS: After joining her fellow nominees onstage, Melissa McCarthy won for this double "M" sitcom
Mike and Molly
Is Having Her Moment" September 28, 2011, Hollywood Reporter McCarthy was raised on a farm in a "big Irish Catholic family"."‘Mike and Molly’s’
3
McCarthy achieved major success and fame for her breakthrough film role as Megan Price in the 2011 comedy hit Bridesmaids, which garnered her numerous award nominations including an Academy Award nomination for Best Supporting Actress, a BAFTA nomination and a Screen Actors Guild Award nomination for Best Supporting Actress.
Personal life McCarthy married her longtime boyfriend, Ben Falcone, an actor and alumnus of The Groundlings, on October 8, 2005.
One of her closest friends is shoe designer Brian Atwood.
FICTIONAL CHARACTERS: Irwin Shaw introduced brothers Thomas & Rudolph Jordache in this 1970 bestseller
Rich Man, Poor Man
He is best known for two of his novels: The Young Lions (1948), about the fate of three soldiers during World War II, made into a film of the same name starring Marlon Brando and Montgomery Clift, and Rich Man, Poor Man (1970), about the fate of three siblings after World War II, that was made into a popular miniseries starring Nick Nolte.
3
He later claimed that the blacklist "only glancingly bruised" his career.
Bread Upon the Waters (1981)  Acceptable Losses (1982)  Short-story collections   Sailor off the Bremen and other Stories (1939)  Welcome to the City, and other Stories (1942)  Act of Faith, and other stories (1946)  The Girls in Their Summer Dresses  Mixed Company.
The Big Game, RKO, 1936.
INTERNATIONAL FOOD: Raita, which cools the mouth after spicy Indian dishes, is made from this dairy product
yogurt
Raita is an Indian, Pakistani and Bangladeshi side dish made with dahi (yogurt, often referred to as curd) together with raw or cooked vegetables, more seldom fruit, or in the case of boondi raita, with fried droplets of batter made from besan (chickpea flour, generally labelled as gram flour).
2
The closest approximation in western cuisine is a side dish or  dip, or a cooked salad.
Raw ginger and garlic paste, green chili paste, and sometimes mustard paste are used to enrich flavour.
YOU RULE!: King Norodom Sihamoni
Cambodia
Norodom Sihamoni (; born 14 May 1953) became the King of Cambodia on 14 October 2004.
2
Sihamoni was born in 1953.
His father Norodom Sihanouk stated that Sihamoni "loves women as his sisters".
TELEVISION: In 1998 Brian Dennehy made his first appearance as Red Finch, David Spade's firefighter father, on this hit series
Just Shoot Me
He also appeared as a recurring character in the NBC sitcom Just Shoot Me!.  Dennehy was parodied in South Park: Bigger, Longer & Uncut (1999) and an episode of The Simpsons.
3
In 2011, Dennehy returned to the Stratford Shakespeare Festival in the role of Sir Toby Belch in Shakespeare's Twelfth Night.
1999 The Virtuoso Unknown  1999
Our Fathers   References  External links         Photograph of Dennehy as "Doctor D." in Michael Mann's "The Jericho Mile" (1979)  Star File: Brian Dennehy  Category:American male film actors Category:American male stage actors Category:American male television actors Category:Chaminade High School alumni Category:Columbia University alumni Category:Columbia Lions football players Category:Drama Desk Award winners Category:American people of Irish descent Category:Laurence Olivier Award winners Category:Male actors from Bridgeport, Connecticut Category:Tony Award winners Category:Best Miniseries or Television Movie Actor Golden Globe winners Category:Outstanding Performance by a Male Actor in a Miniseries or Television Movie Screen Actors Guild Award winners Category:United States Marines Category:Yale School of Drama alumni Category:1938 births Category:Living people Category:20th-century American male actors Category:21st-century American male actors Category:American Theater Hall of Fame inductees Category:People from Mineola, New York
LAS VEGAS: Remind this Las Vegas headliner that he's nicknamed "Mr. Excitement" & he might say, "Danke Schoen"
Wayne Newton
It gained its fame in 1963 when American singer Wayne Newton recorded his version of it.
3
Other versions
In 2004, Deluxe (a Spanish indie-rock artist) recorded a rock version for his album
Milt Gabler, the author of the English lyrics of the song, was the son of Austrian and Russian Jewish immigrants and would have been most familiar with the Yiddish pronunciation of the word schön (or schoen) as sheyn.
ART HEISTS: An early version of "The Potato Eaters" was among 3 of his paintings taken from a museum in Holland in 1988
van Gogh
The Potato Eaters () is an oil painting by Dutch artist Vincent van Gogh painted in April 1885 in Nuenen, Netherlands.
2
So I certainly don’t want everyone just to admire it or approve of it without knowing why."
Though he appreciated small scale graphic work and was an enthusiastic collector of English engravings he worked relatively little in graphic mediums.
MUSICAL TRIBUTES: "Darken my Fire: A Gothic" CD "Tribute to" this group boasts the Electric Hellfire Club's rendition of "Light my Fire"
the Doors
"Light My Fire" is a song by the Doors, which was recorded in August 1966 and released in January 1967 on their self-titled debut album.
3
The single was certified gold by the Recording Industry Association of America in September 1967 for one million units shipped.
Ed Sullivan did not shake Morrison's hand as he left the stage.
3:17  "Light My Fire" (Booster Mix) – 5:05  "Light My Fire" (Shirley Bassey original version) –
CANTERBURY TALE TELLERS: John, the nun's priest, tells the tale of Chanticleer, one of these animals
Rooster
Chanticleer may refer to:   Fiction  Chanticleer (Reynard), a rooster appearing in fables about Reynard
2
The Fox A character in The Nun's Priest's Tale, a version of Chanticleer and the Fox told in Chaucer's Canterbury Tales  A character in the movie Rock-a-Doodle played by Glen Campbell The protagonist of the novel The Book of the Dun Cow, based on the cock from The Nun's Priest's Tale Chanticleer, the surname of the main family in Hope Mirrlees' 1926 novel Lud-in-the-Mist   Arts   Chanticleer (ensemble), a male vocal ensemble  Chanticleer (magazine), a short-lived (1952-1954) literary magazine edited by the poets Patrick Galvin and Gordon Wharton  Chanticleer, a race of angelic humanoids in the game Project Nomad  The Chanticleer, a student-run magazine at Averett University in Danville, VA  The Chanticleer (yearbook), Duke University’s undergraduate yearbook   Sports   "The Chanticleers", the mascots of:  Rutgers University, before changing to the Scarlet Knights  Coastal Carolina University located in Conway, South Carolina, United States  Ord High School, Ord, Nebraska, United States  The French national rugby league team (as Les Chanticleers)   Places   Chanticleer, Arkansas, an unincorporated community in Chicot County, Arkansas, United States  Chanticleer Garden, a botanical garden located in Wayne, Pennsylvania, United States  Chanticleer Island, an island lying off the northwest end of Hoseason Island in the Palmer Archipelago  Chanticleer Point, a geographical landmark on the Oregon side of the Columbia River Gorge   Ships  , more than one ship of the British Royal Navy , more than one United States Navy ship  Chanticleer-class submarine rescue vessel
See also Chantecler (disambiguation)
KISSES: He kissed Jesus in the Garden of Gethsemane
Judas Iscariot
Judas Iscariot, one of the twelve apostles, secretly strikes a bargain with the Jewish elder, agreeing to betray Jesus to them for 30 silver coins.
3
While the flow of some events (such as Jesus' baptism, transfiguration, crucifixion and interactions with the apostles) are shared among the Synoptic Gospels, incidents such as the transfiguration do not appear in John, which also differs on other matters, such as the Cleansing of the Temple.
This short gospel records few of Jesus' words or teachings.
New York: Oxford University Press.
JUST US CHICKENS: Tyson Foods could tell you that this state leads the USA in broiler production
Arkansas
Tyson Foods, Inc. () is an American multinational corporation based in Springdale, Arkansas, that operates in the food industry.
3
Every week, its 54 chicken plants, 13 beef plants, and six pork plants slaughter and package 42.5 million chickens, 170,938 cattle, and 347,891 pigs.
Kathleen M. Bader.
The suit further contends that the company violated federal racketeering laws by conspiring with National Council of La Raza and League of United Latin American Countries not to question the employment applications of anyone with a Hispanic surname.
POETS & POETRY: Irving Babbitt, Geo. Santayana & Bertrand Russell were among this Prufrock poet's teachers at Harvard
Eliot
His influence He had an early influence on T. S. Eliot, a student of his at Harvard.
2
Harvard At this point, he moved away from a career as a classical scholar, taking a teaching position at Williams College in romance languages — just for one year, as it turned out.
The National Humanities Institute runs an Irving Babbitt Project.
CAR TUNES: In 1976 Rose Royce did the dirty work & went to No. 1 "employed" here (Whoa Whoa Whoa Whoa!)
"Car Wash"
(Mary J. Blige, Y?N-Vee) "Love Don't Live Here Anymore" (Morrissey–Mullen, Madonna, I'm Talking, Joe Cocker, Jimmy Nail, Patti LaBelle, Faith Evans, Jully Black, City and Colour, Seal and Bastille) "Wishing on a Star" (The Cover Girls, Teena Marie, Beyoncé, Randy Crawford, Paul Weller, Bic Runga, En Vogue, Jordin Sparks, Miriam Stockley, Seal, Marion Meadows, X Factor United Kingdom Finalists 2011) "I Wanna Get Next to You" (Cherrelle, Christion, Raja-Nee', Double Trouble) "Car Wash" (Christina Aguilera) "Wishing on a Star" is the next X-Factor single   In addition, Jay-Z recorded his own song, also called "Wishing on a Star", for which Gwen Dickey re-recorded some of her original lyrics and was credited as a featured artist.
3
Rose Royce is an American soul and R&B group.
The group, now called Magic Wand, began working with Yvonne Fair and became the studio and concert band for The Undisputed Truth.
Schultz offered Whitfield the opportunity to score his next picture, Car Wash. Whitfield  would utilize the film to launch his new group, and began composing music based on script outlines.
1999 ART NEWS: It was the first U.S. city to host a cow parade, hundreds of fiberglass cows by artists, placed around the city
Chicago
-Vsmith 00:52, 8 Nov 2004 (UTC)  POLL CLOSED  Proposal 2 (A)   Replace the policy:  8.3 Commas  As stated by Kate Turabian's A Manual for Writers of Term Papers, Theses, and Dissertations, the Chicago Manual of Style, Strunk and White, and other authoritative sources, when a conjunction joins the last two elements in a series of three or more elements, a comma is used before the conjunction: "The wires were brown, blue, and green.
2
Sinuhe 20:48, 1 Nov 2004 (UTC)
One advantage of the current policy over 2A, in my opinion, is that the current policy is the same as that stated by most style guides, while the policy of 2A is shared by no style guides.
NOMINATIVE DETERMINISM: In 2005 the U.S. turned the (Roderick) Paige on this cabinet post, handing it to Margaret Spellings
the Secretary of Education
Secretary of Education Following Rod Paige's departure as Secretary of Education, Spellings was nominated to the post of the Secretary of Education by George W. Bush on November 17, 2004, confirmed by the U.S. Senate on January 20, 2005, which also marked the beginning of Bush's second presidential term, and sworn in on January 31 the same year.
3
"PBS' 'Buster' Gets An Education" (TV column), Washington Post, January 27, 2005.
No Child Left Behind  thumb|upright|left|Spellings delivers a speech at the Ronald Reagan Presidential Library; former first lady Nancy Reagan is seated at the right.
The President of the UNC-System Association of Student Governments expressed his concern about Spellings' "disservice" to LGBT students, suggesting her remark would alienate them on campus.
BRIDE & GLOOM: This daughter of Brabantio elopes before the start of a Shakespeare play; her hubby will be the death of her--in Act V
Desdemona
He is a Venetian senator and the father of Desdemona.
3
While the principal characters in Shakespeare's play have their counterparts in Cinthio's tale, Brabantio is Shakespeare's invention.
The first recorded mention of Othello is found in a Revels account indicating the play was performed at Whitehall Palace on November 1, 1604.Bevington, p. 367.
References  Bibliography  Bevington, David and William Shakespeare.
BRITISH ROYALTY: England had this many kings named Richard
3
People named Richard  Rulers and aristocrats Richard, Duke of Burgundy (died 921) Richard I, Duke of Normandy (933-996) Richard II, Duke of Normandy (died 1026), son of Richard I of Normandy Richard I of Capua (died 1078), King of Capua and Count of Aversa Richard fitz Gilbert (before 1035 –
2
Ričardas Persian: ریچارد (Ritchard)  In Afroasiatic languages Arabic: ريتشارد (Rytshrd, Ritshrd, Rytshard, Ritshard) Hebrew: ריצ'רד (Richard)  In Uralic languages Finnish: Rikhard Hungarian: Richárd Saami:
Ryčka Polish: Rysio, Rysiek, Ryś Portuguese: Rico, Ric Slovak: Rišo, Riško, Riči Spanish: Cayo (Guatemala) Greek: Στούκος (Stoúkos)  Pet forms English: Ricky, Rickie, Rikki, Richie, Richi, Richy, Rich, Hick,  Dick, Dickie, Ritchie, Dickon  References   Meaning of Richard (English)  Meaning of Richard (French)  See also Richarda Richardis (given name)
SITCOMS: Jon Cryer plays an agent who moved up from mailroom clerk at the Unlimited Talent Agency in this CBS sitcom
The Famous Teddy Z
Although Cryer gained fame with his early film roles, it took several years to find success on television; none of his star vehicles, including The Famous Teddy Z, Partners, and The Trouble with Normal, lasted more than 22 episodes.
2
Also in 2012, Joyner told Jeff Probst that when she and Cryer started dating, she wondered if he might be gay because "he never kissed me."
Jim "Wash Out"
BROADWAY MUSICALS: Donna McKechnie kicked up her heels as Cassie in this show in 1975; Charlotte d'Amboise recently played the part
A Chorus Line
She is known for her professional and personal relationship with choreographer Michael Bennett, with whom she collaborated on her most noted role, "Cassie" from the musical A Chorus Line, for which she earned the Tony Award for Best Actress in a Musical in 1976.
2
Along with Baayork Lee and Margo Sappington, she danced in one of Broadway's most famous numbers, Turkey Lurkey Time.
Awards and nominations  Awards  1976 Tony Award Best Actress in a Musical –
NEW ROCK: This Brit's first name is a flower; her MySpace page and her "Smile" helped to launch her fame
Lily Allen
Some well known singers such as Lily Allen, Owl City, Hollywood Undead, Sean Kingston, Arctic Monkeys, and Drop Dead, Gorgeous gained fame through Myspace.
3
June 20–26 U.S. print edition.
In November 2010, the group feature was turned off.
On March 10, 2010, Myspace added some new features, like a recommendation engine for new users which suggests games, music and videos based on their previous search habits.
A PALACE IN HISTORY: This small Scandinavian country's parliament meets at Christiansborg Palace, the fifth on the same site
Denmark
Christiansborg Palace (; ) is a palace and government building on the islet of Slotsholmen in central Copenhagen, Denmark.
3
The palace and church were ruined by a fire in 1794, but the showgrounds were saved.
Prince George's Courtyard The palace is roughly divided in the middle, with the Parliament located in the southern wing and the Royal Reception Rooms, the Supreme Court and the Prime Minister's Office in the northern wing.
The bridge was extremely elegant— sandstone covered with medallion decorations by the sculptor Louis August le Clerc.
BELOVED SINGERS: Shawn Colvin said her life was changed by this singer whose biggest album was "Court and Spark"
Joni Mitchell
Court and Spark is a 1974 album by Canadian singer-songwriter Joni Mitchell.
3
During 1973, her stage appearances were fewer than in previous years.
The album became the pinnacle of Mitchell's commercial success.
PositionAustralian Kent Music Report34Canadian RPM Albums Chart1Norwegian Albums Chart18UK Albums Chart14U.S. Billboard Pop Albums2  Year-end charts  Chart (1974)
TV TEENS: Kristen Bell is this title sleuth at Neptune High
Veronica Mars
She gained critical acclaim playing the title character in the television series Veronica Mars from September 2004 to May 2007.
3
She then attended Shrine Catholic High School in nearby Royal Oak, where she took part in the drama and music club.
Bell is sometimes confused with Lauren Conrad from the show The Hills. "Yeah, sometimes fans yell, 'Hey, Lauren' to me, but usually from a distance," said Kristen.
Filmography  Film  Year Title Role Notes1998Polish WeddingTeenage girlUncredited2001Pootie TangRecord executive's daughter2002People Are DeadAngela's friend #12002Hiromi (voice)English dub2004SpartanLaura Newton2004Gracie's ChoiceGracie Thompson2005Reefer MadnessMary Lane2005DeepwaterNurse Laurie2005Last Days of AmericaFriend in New York #12005The ReceiptPretty GirlShort film2006Fifty PillsGracie2006PulseMattie2006RomanThe Girl / Isis2007Flatland: The MovieHex (voice)Short film2008FanboysZoe2008Forgetting Sarah MarshallSarah Marshall2009Serious MoonlightSara2009Astro BoyCora (voice)2009Couples RetreatCynthia2010Astro Boy vs. The Junkyard PiratesCora (voice)Short film2010Lost Masterpieces of PornographyJune CrenshawShort film2010When in RomeBeth2010Get Him to the GreekSarah MarshallCameo2010You AgainMarni Olsen2010BurlesqueNikki2011Scream 4ChloeCameo2012Safety
19th CENTURY SCIENCE: Names for types of these, including cirrus & nimbus were coined in 1803 by British meteorologist Luke Howard
clouds
His lasting contribution to science is a nomenclature system for clouds, which he proposed in an 1802 presentation to the Askesian Society.
3
Career He was born in London, the son of Robert Howard, a lamp manufacturer, and educated at the Quaker school in Burford, Oxfordshire.
Legacy Howard's cloud classification had a major influence on the arts as well as on science.
Howard also inspired Shelley's poem "The Cloud" and informed John Constable's paintings and studies of skiesThornes 1999: 52.
THE "EL" YOU SAY: In the 1540s German adventurer Philipp Von Hutten searched South America for this fabled city
El Dorado
The party landed at Coro in February 1535 and Hutten accompanied von Speyer on his long and difficult expedition into the interior in search of treasure (El Dorado).
3
As the years had gone by with no news of Hutten and his followers, Carvajal had begun to feel secure in his position, and the return of the adventurers was not welcome to him.
Family He was a relative of Ulrich von Hutten.
Bobbs-Merrill, Indianapolis 1967.
PARKS: Located in this province, Terra Nova National Park is Canada's most easterly national park
Newfoundland
Terra Nova National Park is located on the east coast of Newfoundland in the Canadian province of Newfoundland and Labrador, along several inlets of Bonavista Bay.
3
Activities thumb|View from Ochre Hill thumb|View from Malady Head thumb|Newman Sound thumb|Visitor's Centre and dock  There are two campgrounds that offer front country camping:  Newman Sound and Malady Head.
During the summer there are a number of interpretive programs offered at Terra Nova.
Winter activities at the park include winter camping, snowshoeing and cross-country skiing.
SCIENCE: After length, width & depth, the 4th dimension
time
However, 4th & B'way was not distributed through major-label channels—the flagship Island label was distributed by Atlantic Records at that time—until the label and distribution company were acquired by PolyGram Records in 1989, when Island Trading became a unit of PolyGram Group Distribution and was renamed Independent Label Sales (ILS).
3
When Island moved its headquarters to the Worldwide Plaza Building at 825 8th Avenue in 1995, where PolyGram's US headquarters were also located, the empty 4th Street offices became the headquarters of V2 Records.
In the UK, Fourth and Broadway was established in 1992, and it had a roster different from its American version, although it did release titles from its American cousin and vice versa.
4th & B'way's remaining hip hop artists would be transferred to Def Jam Recordings.
GENIUS BY MUSE: Ballerinas Maria Tallchief, Tanaquil LeClercq, Suzanne Farrell...
George Balanchine
thumb|Suzanne Farrell in 1965 thumb|Suzanne Farrell in 1965 thumb|Suzanne Farrell and George Balanchine in Don Quixote Suzanne Farrell (born August 16, 1945) is an eminent 20th-century ballerina (often referred to as the greatest American lyric ballerina) and the founder of the Suzanne Farrell Ballet at the Kennedy Center in Washington, D.C.
3
With this company she danced leading roles, some created for her, for four years, exploring a style/choreography completely different from Balanchine.
Balanchine continued to create new ballets for her, such as Chaconne, Mozartiana, Tzigane and Davidsbundlertanze.
It gives you a discipline, it gives you a place to go.
MUSICALS!: In Act I of this musical, Curly asks Laurey to the Box Social
Oklahoma!
1825-1904, American farmer and legislator   First name, nickname or stage name   Crazy Horse (1840–1877), Oglala Sioux war chief  Curly (scout) (c. 1856–1923), one of General Custer's Crow Indian scouts at the Battle of Little Big Horn  Curly Armstrong (1918-1983), American basketball player  William Brocius (c. 1845-1882), American Old West gunman, rustler and outlaw better known as "Curly Bill" Brocius  Curly Brown (1888-1968), American Major League Baseball pitcher  Curly Chalker (1931-1998), American country and jazz musician  Curly Ray Cline (1923-1997), American bluegrass fiddler  Curly Fox (1910-1995), American county music singer and musician  Curly Hammond (1879–1963), English rugby union  Curly Howard (1903–1952), stage name of comic actor Jerome Lester Horwitz, one of the Three Stooges  Curly Howard (DJ) (c. 1930–2001), disc jockey in North Carolina  Curley Johnson (born 1935), American Football League and National Football League punter  Curly Lambeau (1898-1965), founder, player and first coach of the Green Bay Packers National Football League team  Gordon 'Curly' Mack, Irish badminton player of the 1920s and '30s  Fred "Curly" Morrison (born 1926), American National Football League player  Fred Neal (born 1942), American basketball player, member of the Harlem Globetrotters  Curly Oden (1899-1978), American National Football League player  Curly Ogden (1901-1964), American Major League Baseball pitcher  Curly Page (1902-1987), New Zealand cricketer  Curly Putman (born 1930), American songwriter  Curley Russell (1917-1986), American jazz double-bassist  Curly Seckler (born 1919), American bluegrass musician  Curly Thirlwell (1905-1985), American sound engineer nominated for two Academy Awards  "Curly M.C.", a pseudonym of musician Michael Cretu   Fictional characters   Curly McLain, in the musical Oklahoma!
2
Curley may refer to:   Surname   August Curley (born 1960), American football player  Carlo Curley (1952–2012), American concert organist  Edward W. Curley (1873–1940), U.S. Representative from New York  James Curley (astronomer) (1796–1889), Irish-American astronomer  James Curley (Australian politician) (1846–1913)  James Michael Curley (1874–1958), Governor and U.S. Representative from Massachusetts and mayor of Boston  Michael Joseph Curley (1879–1947), Catholic Archbishop of Baltimore and Washington  Michael Curley (footballer) (1912–1973), English footballer  Patricia S. Curley (born 1946), American jurist  Robert M. Curley (1922–2001), American jurist and legislator  Thomas Curley (born 1976), American production sound mixer  Thomas Curley (Wisconsin)
Curly Washburn, in the movies City Slickers and City Slickers II: The Legend of Curly's Gold  "Curley", a character in the Bluey and Curley comic strip drawn by Alex Gurney  Norman Curly Watts, in the British TV drama Coronation Street  Marshal Curly Wilcox, in the movie Stagecoach  Curley, a character in John Steinbeck's 1937 novel Of Mice and Men  Curley's wife, a character in John Steinbeck's 1937 novel Of Mice and Men   Curly, in the British comic strip Dennis the Menace and Gnasher  Curly, a Lost Boy in Peter Pan   Animals   "Curly" or "Little Curly", a nickname of Laika, the first dog in space  Curly Horse, a curly-coated breed of horse  Curly, the name of the first LaPerm cat   Places   Curly, County Tyrone, a townland in County Tyrone, Northern Ireland  Curley, Côte-d'Or, a French commune  A nickname for Curl Curl, New South Wales, Australia   Other uses   Archbishop Curley High School, a private boys' school in Baltimore, Maryland  Curley (film), a 1947 film produced by Hal Roach  "Curly" (song), a 1969 song by The Move  Curly: An Illustrated Biography of the Superstooge   See also   Bolesław IV the Curly (c. 1125-1173), Duke of Masovia and High Duke of Poland  Category:Lists of people by nickname
AMERICANA: Shoppers, take note:  the Potomac Mills discount mall is this state's No. 1 tourist destination
Virginia
Potomac Mills is a shopping mall in Woodbridge, Virginia in the Washington, D.C., metropolitan area.
3
In 1993 it was said to be the state's top tourist destination.
The mall was the first in the Mills Corporation's chain of shopping malls, and has over 225 retailers and an 18-screen AMC movie theater.
It was expanded in 1993, adding a wing anchored by Marshalls and JCPenney, along with a Burlington Coat Factory.https://news.google.com/newspapers?id=R-YyAAAAIBAJ&sjid=kgcGAAAAIBAJ&pg=5233,5940845&dq=potomac-mills+spiegel&hl=en  Cohoes Fashions was also an early tenant.
GOVERNORS: In 1780 he signed on as Massachusetts' first governor
John Hancock
Anti-Parliamentary activity by men such as Samuel Adams and John Hancock, followed by reprisals by the British government, were a primary reason for the unity of the Thirteen Colonies and the outbreak of the American Revolution in 1775.
3
Alternatively, Massachusett has been represented as Moswetuset, from the name of the Moswetuset Hummock (meaning "hill shaped like an arrowhead") in Quincy where Plymouth Colony commander Miles Standish and Squanto, a Native American, met Chief Chickatawbut in 1621.
The climate of Boston is quite representative for the commonwealth, characterized by summer highs of around  and winter highs of  and is quite wet.
The Pilgrims were a group of Puritans who founded Plymouth in 1620.
AMERICAN HISTORY: 19 convicted "witches" were executed this way in Salem, Massachusetts
Hanging
Energy  Massachusetts' electricity generation market was made competitive in 1998, enabling retail customers to change suppliers without changing utility companies.
2
though surveying problems resulted in disputed territory until 1803–04.
Major non-interstate highways in Massachusetts include U.S. Routes 1, 3, 6, and 20, and state routes 2, 3, 24, and 128.
THE IDES OF MARCH: In 1819 residents in this part of Massachusetts voted for separation; on March 15, 1820 it became a state
Maine
In 1691, the colonies of Massachusetts Bay and Plymouth were united (along with present-day Maine, which had previously been divided between Massachusetts and New York) into the Province of Massachusetts Bay.
3
Colonial period
Other major interstates include I-91, which travels generally north and south along the Connecticut River, I-93, which travels north and south through central Boston, then passes Methuen before entering New Hampshire.
Judicial appointments are made by the governor and confirmed by the executive council.
GOVERNMENT & POLITICS: This Presidential retreat is perched on the highest point of Maryland's Catoctin Mountain Park
Camp David
Originally planned to provide recreational camps for federal employees, one of the camps eventually became the home of the Presidential retreat, Camp David.
3
Approximately  in area, the park features sparkling streams and panoramic vistas of the Monocacy Valley.
thumb|left|240px|Catoctin Mountain vista thumb|right|240px|Cunningham Falls at Catoctin Mountain Park  Bills were introduced in the United States Senate in 2003 and 2005 to re-designate the park as Catoctin Mountain National Recreation Area.
The bills passed the Senate, but were not taken up by the House, and therefore did not become law.
'60s TV: Dr. Kildare & this Vince Edwards doctor began practicing on TV in 1961 & both left in 1966
Ben Casey
He was best known for his TV role as doctor Ben Casey and as Major Cliff Bricker in the 1968 war film The Devil's Brigade.
3
As a result of the show's and his own popularity, Edwards also released several music albums and appeared in the all-star war film The Victors in 1963.
He was represented by one of Hollywood's first "super agents", Abbey Greshler of Diamond Artists in Hollywood.
He made his last film, The Fear, in 1995.
A STEW OF STEWARTS: This man played the title bandleader in the 1954 film "The Glenn Miller Story"
Jimmy Stewart
This is the second of three movies that paired Jimmy Stewart and June Allyson, the others being The Stratton Story and Strategic Air Command.
3
Several turning points in Miller's career are depicted with varying degrees of verisimilitude, including: the success of an early jazz band arrangement; his departure from the Broadway pit and sideman work to front a band of his own; the failure of his first band on the road; and the subsequent re-forming of his successful big band and the establishment of the “Miller Sound” as typified by “
Billboard charts
The Glenn Miller Story at the Internet Movie Database  Awards won by The Glenn Miller Story  Review of The Glenn Miller Story at The Shelf  Category:1954 films Category:1950s biographical films Category:1950s musical films Category:American biographical films Category:American films Category:Biographical films about musicians Category:English-language films Category:Films that won the Best Sound Mixing Academy Award Category:Films directed by Anthony Mann Category:Universal Pictures films Category:Jazz films Category:Films set in the 1920s Category:Films set in the 1930s Category:Films about the United States Army Air Forces Category:Films set in New York City Category:Film scores by Henry Mancini
TEAM EDWARD: These 4 words complete the now-cliched opening of Edward Bulwer-Lytton's "Paul Clifford": "It was a..."
dark and stormy night
Bulwer-Lytton's Paul Clifford and Poe's tales It is the source of the famous opening phrase "It was a dark and stormy night;..."
3
Plot Paul Clifford tells the story of a chivalrous highwayman in the time of the French Revolution.
Brought up not knowing his origins and living an evil life, Clifford is arrested for theft.
The line was also frequently parodied in Charles Schulz' Peanuts comic strip by showing Snoopy repeatedly starting a novel that starts with the first part of the opening sentence.
THE KIDS LOVE THAT ROCK & ROLL: Known for '80s hits like "The Reflex" & "Hungry Like the Wolf", this band charted in the '90s with "Come Undone"
Duran Duran
"The Reflex" is the eleventh single by Duran Duran, released worldwide on 16 April 1984.
3
producer Ian Little –
CHUM. Retrieved 7 May 2014.1Europe (Eurochart Hot 100).
The song is part of the "Hooked on Polkas" medley on the 1985 Dare to Be Stupid album by "Weird Al" Yankovic.
POETRY POTPOURRI: He married Minnehaha, the "Loveliest of Dacotah Women"
Hiawatha
thumb|Hiawatha and Minnehaha sculpture by Jacob Fjelde near Minnehaha Falls in Minneapolis, Minnesota.
1
Minnehaha is also the name of a ship that wrecked off the western shore of Lake Michigan in 1893.http://www.arcadiami.com/Exhibits/Shipwrecks/shipwrecksmap.htm   Minnehaha as a name  Her name is connected to many things in Minnesota, such as Minnehaha Falls, Minnehaha Park, Minnehaha Creek, Minnehaha Academy, and the name of a boat once operated by Twin City Rapid Transit on Lake Minnetonka, which has now been restored and is currently operated by Museum of Lake Minnetonka.
LET'S SPEAK FRENCH: An English translation of "D'accord" could be these 2 letters
OK
The album also features two remixes, "Mr. Johnson's Head" and "Hokus Pokus."
3
Before this album's release the ICP released Forgotten Freshness in 1995, but because of sample-clearing problems it was only released in the Detroit area and the mid-west.
Many of the tracks on that album appeared again on these albums for wider distribution purposes.
With a change in beat and lyrics, the song "Hey, Vato" became "Wagon Wagon" found on the Ringmaster album.
STATE SUPERLATIVES: The nation's highest flat-top mountain, Grand Mesa, is in this state
Colorado
The Grand Mesa is a large mesa in western Colorado in the United States.
3
The Grand Mesa is flat in some areas, but quite rugged in others.
Climate  Climate on Grand Mesa varies by elevation.
Surrounding areas with lower elevation are warmer and more arid throughout the year.
KIDDY LIT: These brothers have delved into "The Secret of the Old Mill" & "The Tower Treasure"
The Hardy Boys
The Tower Treasure is the first volume in the original The Hardy Boys Mystery Stories published by Grosset & Dunlap.
3
The Hardys realize that Jackley was referring to the old water tower and not the Tower Mansion.
Then they are rewarded a thousand dollars for returning the missing jewels.
The introduction, which was sung by Thurl Ravenscroft, was as follows,  Computer game
WHEN YOU WERE A KID: You probably ran home at lunch to watch this game show that debuted March 30, 1964 with host Art Fleming
Jeopardy!
He is most notable for being the host of the original version of the television game show Jeopardy!, which aired on NBC from 1964 until 1975.
3
He also played attorney Jeremy Pitt in The Californians, an NBC Western set in San Francisco during the gold rush of the 1850s.
I agree!"
He also hosted a syndicated television program, called Senior America; it showcased seniors and senior activities.
TRIAL PARTICIPANTS: The accusers in his 399 B.C. trial were Meletus, Anytus & Lycon
Socrates
Meletus (; fl. 4th–3rd century BCE) was an ancient Athenian Greek from the Pithus deme known for his prosecuting role in the trial and eventual execution of the philosopher Socrates.
1
Diogenes Laërtius, 2.43
HAUTE COUTURE: Nicole Farhi, who married playwright David Hare, is called the "Donna Karan of" this world capital
London
Career Farhi started her career as a freelancer in Paris, before moving to London in the 1970s.
3
On 15 March 2010, French Connection announced the sale of the brand and retail chains to OpenGate Capital for up to £5 million.http://www.guardian.co.uk/business/2010/mar/15/french-connection-sells-nicole-farhi.
" Administrators Zolfo Cooper were appointed on 3 July 2013, to advise on sale or restructuring of the remaining five UK shops and associated retail outlets located within Harvey Nichols, House of Fraser and Selfridges.
Farhi and Marks' professional relationship resulted in a personal relationship, and the couple had a daughter, Candice Marks, before separating.
"B-L-T": The name of "High Noon" screenwriter Carl Foreman was put on this in 1951
blacklist
He was blacklisted by the Hollywood movie studio bosses in the 1950s.
3
Based on the novel by Pierre Boulle, the two were not given screen credit and the Academy Award for Writing Adapted Screenplay went to Pierre Boulle, who did not speak English.
Byman, pp.
Foreman said that Kramer was afraid of what would happen to him and his career if Kramer didn't cooperate with the Committee.
EUROPEAN ARCHITECTS: The last name of Eliel, the Finn who wrote "The Search for Form in Art & Architecture"; his son was a famous architect, too
Saarinen
A famous bearer of this name is Eliel Saarinen, an architect of the early 20th century.
3
Eliel is a Hebrew name.
A Puerto Rican reggaeton producer also bears this name.
(see Eliel (producer))
COLONIAL AMERICA: In 1721 Dr. Zabdiel Boylston gave the first inoculations in America against this disease
smallpox
Inoculation During a smallpox outbreak in 1721 in Boston, he inoculated about 248 peopleBlake, John B, Public Health in the Town of Boston, 1630–1822.
3
During this hostility, his family was also in a dangerous situation.
-188
pp.
CROPS: An 1855 book was called this cash crop "is King; or, the Economical Relations of Slavery"
Cotton
Her uncle Avon Long had played the part of Sportin' Life in the first Broadway revival of Porgy and Bess and worked with Lena Horne at the Cotton Club.
3
Return to music On August 14, 2007, King released her first studio album in 12 years, Open Book.
|- | colspan="15" style="font-size:90%" | "—" denotes a recording that did not chart or was not released in that territory.
Outside the Skyline  "—" denotes a recording that did not chart or was not released in that territory.
IT'S A GUY THING: In 1990 Colorado football coach Bill McCartney founded this movement of Christian men
Promise Keepers
William Paul McCartney (born August 22, 1940) is a former American football player and coach and the founder of the Promise Keepers men's ministry.
1
Three times, in 1985, 1989, and 1990, he was named the Big Eight Coach of the Year.
DUMB CRIMINALS: A vending machine thief had a hard time claiming innocence after paying $400 bail in this currency with Washington on it
quarters
The headquarters office of the park is near the east side of the trail at Smith's Switch Road in Ashburn.
3
An overlook at the Luck Stone Quarry east of Goose Creek displays a large trap rock quarry.(1)
Brandymore Castle and Four Mile RunCoordinates of natural area near W&OD Trail and Four Mile Run in Glencarlyn Park in Arlington County:  in Arlington, Piney Branch and Difficult Run in Fairfax County,Coordinates of natural area near W&OD Trail and Piney Branch in Clarks Crossing Park in Fairfax County:  and the confluence of Goose Creek and Sycolin Creek in Loudoun County.
Cycling on Custis Trail and W&OD Trail in Arlington, Falls Church and Fairfax County (38 minutes).
DON'T BE AN "ASS": The song "Cherish" was the first No. 1 hit for this L.A. band
The Association
Cherish may refer to:   Music   Cherish (group), an American R&B, Soul, and Hip hop quartet  Cherish (David Cassidy album), 1972  Cherish (Seiko Matsuda album), 2011  "Cherish" (The Association song), 1966  "Cherish" (Kool & the Gang song), 1985  "Cherish" (Madonna song), 1989  "Cherish", a song by Ai Otsuka from Love Cook  "Cherish", a song by Beni Arashiro from Girl 2 Lady  "Cherish", a song by Nana Mizuki from Alive & Kicking  "Cherish", a song by NEWS from Touch   Film and television   Cherish (film), a 2002 film directed by Finn Taylor  Valerie Cherish, a fictional character in the HBO TV series The Comeback  Cherish, a fictional character in the anime series Zatch Bell!
1
See also   Cherished, a 1977 album by Cher  Cherished (film), a 2005 film directed by Robin Shepperd
AMERICAN HISTORY: This Oglala Sioux chief was fatally stabbed Sept. 5, 1877 at Fort Robinson, Nebraska
Crazy Horse
Crazy Horse surrendered here with his band on May 6, 1877.
3
Because the Cheyenne had refused to return to Indian Territory, where they believed conditions were too adverse for them to survive, the army had been holding them without adequate food, water or heat during the severe winter to try to force them into submission.
In 1955, the Nebraska State Historical Society began to acquire property on the fort; in 1956, they opened a museum on the site.
References  Further reading Barnes, Jeff.
WILD WEST: Nickname of judge Isaac Parker whose court was called “The Gates of Hell”
hanging judge
He served in as a judge during western expansion of the United States and is known as "Hanging Judge" of the American Old West.
3
City attorney was a part-time position with a one-year term, Parker was re-elected during 1862 and 1863.
Parker replaced William Story who was facing impeachment proceedings due to allegations of corruption.
Parker sentenced 160 people to death, 79 were executed, the others died while incarcerated, were acquitted pardoned or their sentence was commuted.
ROYALTY & BALLET: In the early 1890s, before he was czar, he was in a spin over ballerina Mathilde Kschessinska
Nicholas II
She was also a mistress of the future Tsar Nicholas II of Russia.
2
Relationship with Petipa Petipa allowed Kschessinskaya to create only a small number of new roles, as he considered the Italian Pierina Legnani to be the superior ballerina.
Dancing in Petersburg — London, 1960, 1973 S.A.S. La Princesse Romanovsky-Krassinsky Souvenirs de la Kschessinska — Paris, 1960.
MUCH ADO ABOUT NOTHING: Perseus had a hat & Harry Potter had a cloak that made them this
invisible
The world only accessible to wizards and magical beings comprises a fragmented collection of overlooked hidden streets, ancient pubs, lonely country manors and secluded castles invisible to the Muggle population.
3
Near the beginning of the novel, lacking his own book, Harry is given an old potions textbook filled with many annotations and recommendations signed by a mysterious writer; "the Half-Blood Prince."
In June 2006, Rowling, on an appearance on the British talk show Richard & Judy, announced that the chapter had been modified as one character "got a reprieve" and two others who previously survived the story had in fact been killed.
Research by the National Endowment for the Arts (NEA) has found no increase in reading among children coinciding with the Harry Potter publishing phenomenon, nor has the broader downward trend in reading among Americans been arrested during the rise in the popularity of the Harry Potter books.
STATE CAPITAL FUN FESTS: This city has been hosting its Golden North Salmon Derby since 1947, before it was officially a state capital
Juneau
250px|right thumb|Golden North Salmon Derby Winner 1955, Bob Pasquan The Golden North Salmon Derby is an annual salmon fishing competition held in Juneau, Alaska in August.
3
The object of the event is to catch the largest Chinook or Coho salmon over a period of three days; pink and chum salmon are not accepted.
Contestants may anchor their vessels overnight in Swanson Harbor, southwest of Point Couverton, but this area is not allowed for fishing.
The Triangle Building is directly behind the banner.
"C" IN SCIENCE: In order to duplicate itself in cell division, one of these splits into 2 identical strands called chromatids
chromosomes
Title and theme Popular belief dictates that the song title references an idea first conceived by Carl Jung and later expounded upon by Drunvalo Melchizedek concerning the possibility of reaching a state of evolution at which the body would have two more than the normal 46 total chromosomes and leave a currently disharmonious state.
1
Zoo Entertainment, Tool's label until 1996 was dissolved in early 1997 by its new owners Volcano Entertainment.
CHAUVINISTIC TERMS FOR WOMEN: A little bird, or sportscaster Hearn
Chick
Hearn, Hearne, or Hearns can refer to the following:  People  Barry Hearn, British sports promoter  Bunny Hearn, American baseball player, scout, and coach  Francis Dayle "Chick" Hearn, American sportscaster  David Hearn (golfer), Canadian professional golfer  George Hearn, American actor  George E. Hearn, American psychologist  Glenn Hearn, American politician; former mayor of Huntsville, Alabama  James Hearn, British vocalist  Jeff Hearn, British sociologist  Kevin Hearn, Canadian musician  Kevin Hearne, American writer  Lafcadio Hearn, Greek-born Irish-Japanese author  Lian Hearn, pseudonym for Australian children's author Gillian Rubinstein  Loyola Hearn, Canadian politician  Richard L Hearn, Canadian electrical engineer  Michael Patrick Hearn, American scholar and writer  William Patrick Hearn, American Veterinary Technician  Frank Hearne, English and South African cricketer  John Edgar Colwell Hearne, Jamaican novelist  John Michael Hearne, British composer  Jack Hearne:  J.T. Hearne (John Thomas), 19th century English cricketer  J.W. Hearne (John William), 20th century English cricketer  Richard Hearne 20th century English actor, comedian, producer and writer  Samuel Hearne, English explorer  Thomas Hearne, English antiquarian Thomas Hearne (artist), landscape painter  Thomas Hearns, American professional boxer  Places  Hearn Generating Station, Toronto, Ontario, Canada  Hearne, Saskatchewan, Canada  Hearne, Texas, USA  Fictional characters  Abigail Hearns, Grayson Space Navy, Honorverse novels  Institutions   Horace Hearne Institute for theoretical physics at Louisiana State University.
1
See also Ahern Ahearn Herne (disambiguation)  External links The Ahern Family
JUILLIARD ALUMNI: In 1992, a year after playing an older Peter Pan, he was a mime instructor in "Shakes the Clown"
Robin Williams
It also features Julie Brown, Blake Clark, Paul Dooley, Kathy Griffin, Florence Henderson, Tom Kenny, Adam Sandler, Scott Herriott, LaWanda Page, Jack Gallagher, and a cameo by Robin Williams as Mime Jerry (using the pseudonym "Marty Fromage", an homage to an earlier film they worked in together called Tapeheads in which Goldthwait used the pseudonym "Jack Cheese").
3
This was Goldthwait's bitter satire of the dysfunctional standup comedy circuit he knew as a performer.
In an interview with Conan O'Brien, Goldthwait revealed that no less than Martin Scorsese had defended the movie from detractors.
It's the Citizen Kane of Alcoholic Clown Movies!"
